
I’m a poz guy in his 50’s. I live in a city in the middle of America and lost my partner almost nine years ago. I’ve been taking care of an elderly parent and haven’t made time to have a sex life until about six months ago. I joined Adam4Adam and ran into an acquaintance who is also poz who wanted to know if I was interested in “taking loads.” Since we both have undetectable viral loads, I agreed and we’ve been seeing each other ever since at least once a week and sometimes two or three times a week. He’s in an open marriage, I’m not shopping for a husband, and we have common interests besides sex. 
Here’s the problem: He fucks me and then we’re done. On three occasions he’s blown me until I came (before fucking me), but otherwise he expresses no interest in my getting off. In fact, when I’ve told him that the fuck was so good I almost came, he has said, “I don’t care. That’s nice for you, though.” The first time we met, he mentioned almost casually that he’s been called a “selfish top.” Not knowing he was really serious, I just sort of said, “No problem.” Did I agree to his being this way by saying that? He’s not generally an asshole, he’s a pretty nice guy, really. So this behavior doesn’t jibe and I’m confused. Could this be a condition of his open marriage? Is not caring if the bottom gets off a fetish of some kind?
If he didn’t fuck so well, I’d have stopped seeing him months ago, but he’s really good. And after an eight-year dry spell, it’s been nice getting laid again. I don’t want to lose what we have so far, but I’m tired of going home unsatisfied and jerking off. Does any of this make sense to you and if so, can you explain it to me?

Longtime listener and reader here. Late-thirties gay man from a progressive city in a 1.5 year non-monogamous relationship with a really great guy. We're super compatible when it comes to socializing, entertainment, eating, music, art, politics, and all that fun stuff. The sex is great—adventurous, connected, comfortable, and a good balance of dirty/sweet. We've been non-monogamous for our entire relationship and have the occasional conversation about it, but by and large that seems to come easily—allowing us our freedom without creating conflict or problems. In fact, we've had zero conflict in the last 18 months.
Until yesterday.
At 10:30 am I received the following text: "How would you feel if I dabbled in prostitution a bit?"
For context, my boyfriend lost his job recently. Mind you he was planning to quit soon anyway to take some time off, so getting fired was actually in line with his plans. Plus he got a very nice golden hand shake, has no debt and healthy savings.
I made a joke about his text because I thought he was joking, but his next response made me realize he was serious. I lost my shit with him. Not just because of the question itself, but because he was texting about something I felt should have been a face-to-face conversation in a private setting at an appropriate time. Also, I was at work and about to walk into a meeting, which did not go well because my mind was all over the place. I mean, seriously, who thinks that's the kind of conversation to have you with your S.O. over text on a Tuesday morning?
I made it clear to him I was upset. He apologized right away. I made clear I didn't want him to make any moves on that until we had a chance to talk. He apologized again and we made plans to talk last night.
I went to his place and laid out that there were two conversations to have. The first being about how he approached the conversation, and the second being my thoughts on his initial inquiry. We got through the first part okay. I explained why the timing and mode of communication had really been shitty, and he owned up to that and apologized. I also thanked him for asking me about it, rather than just running off and doing it in secret, even if he had gone about asking me in a very clumsy way. 
So you know, I'm fine with sex work in general. Two of my close friends do occasional sex work. I think it should be legalized and make a point of sticking up for sex workers and porn actors when I hear them being demeaned.
Then we got into the actual question of him considering turning tricks. His immediate response was to say it was a stupid idea and he wouldn't act on it. But I pressed a bit because I wanted to know why he was thinking about doing it in the first place. It didn't seem to me that money was the only driving factor being that he is in good financial shape. He's an attractive guy in his late 20's who has been propositioned by older guys on hook-up apps more than once, and after I pressed a bit more and made sure he knew I had no judgments around sex work in general, he confessed it was in part about having curiosity around the experience of being paid for sex.
In his specific case I found that to be a more compelling reason than his needing to make money. I practice non-monogamy because I don't feel that I own his body or sexuality, and I really want to maintain a relationship that allows us to maximize our experiences in life, rather than pass on opportunities that pique our interest. So if this were a curiosity of his, there's a big part of me that would like him to be able to try it.
After some talking we agreed that he wasn't going to do it right now, and that if he still wants to do it at some later point he can, but we will discuss it in advance, and then discuss it again after he does it, and see how it made us both feel and what our thoughts are at that point. I trust he'll stick to that bargain and feel like it was a pretty good place to leave it.
So after all that backstory, here's my question: Why am I feeling so anxious and uneasy about all of this? We both have sex with other men already, so what's the difference if he's doing that and getting paid for it? (Provided he's keeping himself safe mentally, emotionally and physically.) Despite the fact we're non-monogamous, and despite the fact I'm okay with sex work, the thought of my boyfriend doing it really has my stomach tied in knots, my head in a fog, and my heart beating like crazy.
Am I stupid for entertaining this idea? Or does it make me sex-negative if I don't want him to pursue it? Is that even within my rights to deny him? Am I making a mountain out of a mole hill? I'm really just not sure how to react. I feel like there is serious long-term potential between us, and don't know how giving this a go, or saying no, might affect that.
Please give me some guidance, Dan!

I've been seeing my boyfriend on and off for about two years. We met at a difficult time—he was recently divorced—but have both grown a lot and are back together. Things are better than ever, but I had a feeling something was up. I already know it's not great to be in a relationship where you snoop your partner's phone, but I did, because my spidey senses were tingling, and I found correspondence that appeared to be to an escort. I shut it down by texting to ask her to stop texting my dude and had a pleasant conversation with her. 
It turns out he put up an ad online offering a woman $500-$1000 to let her take a video of him shaving her head.
I looked at his browsing history and there are tons of YouTube videos of women shaving their heads. Our sex life has never been great—it's improved with emotional intimacy, but it's always been a red flag that touching my vagina can trigger a panic attack. I've wondered for a long time if he was gay, but the fact that all these videos are of women has made me think that's not the case. To be honest, I'm wondering whether he could have been molested by a hairdresser—he's super avoidant about getting haircuts, and has always been keen on having me cut his hair for him (and has hinted a few times that he'd like to cut mine). This is a theme in his correspondence with past girlfriends as well.
I've asked him directly whether he's been molested and he says he doesn't think so. Is this a fetish you've encountered before? I'm hoping this is just a case of him having shame about the fetish and am hopeful that with more time (we've only been together seriously for about two months) that he might feel safe disclosing it. He has been in therapy and I'm wondering whether this is something clinicians can actually deal with, or if I should just give this up as a lost cause. 
I don't want to DTMFA. We are better together, we want all the same things in life, and everything has been so much better this time around. Things are actually getting better all the time. I've tried so hard to make a safe space for him to express himself. As far as I know, he is happy. Is this something I should just let go?

I am a 21-year-old woman in my very first sexual relationship. (Hooray, finally!) My partner is a lot more experienced than I am and has been doing a great job (so far) of taking the lead. He's been patient and kind, but I can tell things are getting a little stale for him. We satisfy each other, but I want to get to a place where I feel comfortable experimenting. This is hard for me to do, being new to the whole sex thing, and as a bigger woman with some body image and confidence issues. 
He asks me to do fun things ranging from sitting on his lap while we make out to sitting on his face… and I am always hesitant because I can’t shake the feeling that I am going to crush him!
And crush is no exaggeration— I’m about 5’7” and weigh 270 pounds. I try to tell myself I’m a babe anyway, and I’m working on losing weight. He’s attracted to me, so I’m not concerned about that, but I am concerned about causing him harm. He is 6’4” and probably has 50+ pounds on me, but because of his size I’m worried he won’t say anything if I’m hurting him. Having grown up bigger, I know the expectation is that you’re extra strong, too. To complicate things further, he knows I am self-conscious about my size so being a kind and perceptive person he will avoid saying anything about it that might hurt my feelings. 
How do I get past my very un-sexy hesitancy? How do we determine his weight bearing limits without causing unnecessary injury? Any tips on good reads for people who are trying to have a vital sex life while overweight? 

The letter in your column this week about Trump Minus 100 parties totally made me cry! This is the best idea I've heard since the election. I really hope someone runs with this and makes it a thing. Nothing special to say otherwise. I love your podcast and listen to it every Tuesday whilst I make gold and diamond wedding bands (people always ask me what I listen to in the studio, and it's not Mozart...).

Should I get married to my transgender undocumented girlfriend before January 20? We live in Chicago and have been very happy in love and committed to each other for two years.

I'm a 29 year old CIS female dating a 55-year-old handsome amazing guy for the last 2.5 years. The first year, our sex life was amazing and GGG- he had more sexual vigor than any man my own age. We'd have passionate sex whenever we saw each other, often 3-4 times in a night. Fast forward nearly 2 years later and we live together, our sex life now goes like this: intercourse for 5 minutes, 8 if I'm lucky, and then he stops intercourse to tell me how much he loves me (every time), cuddles me and 5 minutes later asks for a handjob. He's obsessed with handjobs and it's obliterated the amount of sex we have. While he is incredibly giving sexually and makes sure I get off every time, the amount of actual dick I get has dramatically decreased. I'm in the best shape of my life, beautiful and have a tight vagina, so what gives? Whenever I bring up this issue, he acts like he's being shamed for something he enjoys. He recently asked me to marry him and I cannot for the life of me commit to a life where I'm only getting 5-8 minutes of dick. 
Again, what gives?

Two guys, Dan.
1. My boyfriend. Brilliant, truly. We have a small artistic business together, we have the same goals, we go to therapy and he works really hard on himself. He probably has depression, sex is so fraught we aren't having it right now, just doing exercises to get us to a healthy place. Every few months we go into crisis mode because he doesn't feel satisfied with his life and projects it onto our relationship. Still, we're committed to each other. 4 1/2 years (not counting a six month break in the middle). I love him, I just really love sex too. Like in a deep way.
2. Ex. We never got over each other, the sex is insane (experimental, generous, passionate,) we live across the country from each other and he isn't looking for a relationship. Can't stop thinking about him. He admits to the same. I've cheated three times with this guy over seven years. 
Writing this out, I see what the smart choice is. Do NOT move across the country and destroy my relationship for a guy who doesn't even know how to prioritize me. But I don't know what to do with my feelings for him. I don't WANT to get rid of them. I feel like a reckless fool. I could use some advice. 

I am a 47-year old man and I have been married to my wife for 20 years. We have been together for 23 years.
Around age 44 or 45, I started having ED problems. My urologist prescribed Cialis and put me on hormone replacement therapy. My wife was OK with the testosterone, but acted disappointed about the Cialis. For example, she would act all excited about how we just had sex without any pills—only for me to say, yes, I did take one. Then she would mope. I explained several times that I find this very hurtful and insulting. If it were a problem about my not being attracted to her, then the Cialis would not help. The fact that it is a medical condition that can be treated should make her feel better, not worse. Saying that non-Cialis sex is somehow better or purer implies that there is something wrong with my needing it. Gee, I really need to feel there is something wrong with me to perform better!  Nothing like pressure to help with ED, right?
By the way, I don't tell her there is anything wrong when she needs to use lube or a vibrator.
The frequency of sex has been a big problem ever since our first kid was born in 2002. She will often make false promises—“Let’s have a date tomorrow night!”—followed by a last minute excuse... after I have already taken a pill, of course. Sometimes, she will spontaneously do things that will sabotage the plans to have sex that night—such as announcing that it is “family movie night” so we have to stay up late with the kids. I have explained to her that I find this to be ego-shredding. Given that my insurance only pays for 4 pills each month, wasting three of them on false hopes is a big problem. Last weekend, she indicated once again that she wanted to try going without the Cialis—she “knows” I can do it. I emailed her this morning telling her that I found this very hurtful and insensitive given that we have already discussed how this make me feel. I also explained that magical thinking is no excuse for wasting the pills that I do have when she gets my hopes up.
She has some very rigid and judgmental views on other medical issues. She is strongly against cesareans, for example, and she has put down other women who have had them. She was devastated when she had to have one when our son wouldn’t descend. She insisted that I needed to tell her that I “knew” that she could have a vaginal birth when she became pregnant with our daughter. One time when she asked me to say this during a medical appointment, I looked straight at her midwife and asked if she could guarantee that my wife would not need a cesarean. Of course, she couldn’t make that promise. But I was supposed to. (The midwife later decided that our daughter was in danger during labor and told her that a cesarean was in fact necessary.) Both of our kids have issues—including some bad OCD from my side of the family—that could possibly be helped with psychiatric medications but she is dead set against considering that option.
Is there anything else I can do to get her to respect my feelings and the fact that taking Cialis is a medical decision between my doctor and me, not a negative judgment on her desirability? Is there any way to convince her to stop giving me false hopes about sex? Yes, the low frequency sucks. But the dashed expectations make it much worse.
Hi, Dan! Love the Slog. I've been reading for years. So much insightful content in there. And one of the things I love is that you will post rebuttals and counter-points to your SLLOTD. And... I have one of those for you.
On Tuesday you posted a response from CLOSURE, a man trying to make sense of a surprise breakup who you responded to on Monday. Reading CLOSURE's original letter and his response brought back some pretty painful memories of a similar experience I had back a few years. My experience was also pretty crippling. I have had years to think about it, including dozens of counseling sessions. Perhaps my perspective can be of some use.
I was in a several-year relationship. We lived together. We talked about the future regularly. Marriage. Kids. A house. Taking care of our aging parents. He told me that he loved me on a regular basis. Then, one day, I came home from work to a note and a half-empty apartment. He had packed his stuff and fled.
I was in a several-year relationship. We lived together. We talked about the future regularly. Marriage. Kids. A house. Taking care of our aging parents. He told me that he loved me on a regular basis. Then, one day, I came home from work to a note and a half-empty apartment. He had packed his stuff and fled. 
After this, we occasionally talked for about eight months. He did so apparently because he felt bad for bolting. I did so because I wanted to know what the hell went wrong (and because I wondered if his sudden leaving was possibly a toxic freak-out that he would come to realize was an overreaction). Like in CLOSURE's case, all I got was "it didn't feel right". This all shook my confidence. Why couldn't I sense that something was wrong? What am I doing to prevent him from expressing himself? What was so terribly wrong that there was no point in trying to fix things? How could he not have known that his actions would be so devastating? And, is he continuing to be vague about things, knowing how it was hurting me? Why won't he at least help me learn from this experience? These may not be healthy thoughts, but surely you can understand where they are coming from. 
It may seem like blind hope for CLOSURE to think that you might get back together, but when I told friends and coworkers about the breakup, it seemed like everyone had a story about how they and their partners broke up a while back, but now are happily together again. But there is also the flip-side. I spent eight months hoping I could fix my old relationship, and it never happened. I would have been better off spending that time healing myself. It's all a gamble.
Your response to CLOSURE, a la the campsite rule, is that his ex has the right to end things without a debate, and this is true. However as you say, "we should be as compassionate and considerate as possible when ending a relationship." It seems to me that giving someone peace of mind after a breakup is one aspect of compassion/consideration. Unless this CLOSURE guy was abusive, or he poses some current danger to his ex, it seems like the least his ex could do is fire off an email saying why it didn't work. If CLOSURE is that big of an asshole, then his ex should block him every way possible.
Was CLOSURE too fragile when he got into the relationship? For my situation, it was not that simple. When my relationship seemed idyllic, it was easy to fall into a sense of absolute security, that nothing short of a tragic car crash could take us down. Being in that mindset shouldn't be a sign of fragility. It is a sign of strength, that you are making yourself completely vulnerable to someone else. And it can be insanely disheartening to find out that you had placed that level of trust in the wrong person. This hardened me to others, and made me constantly wonder if I could trust anyone.
We do agree on one thing. It seems like CLOSURE could use some counseling, not because he was too fragile, but because he now has to rebuild his own confidence and realize that this was one person who messed with his trust. That doesn't mean others out there will do the same. That doesn't mean there isn't someone out there who will appreciate him, who is willing to build a relationship with him through good and bad times. 
Despite these differences of opinion, Dan, I appreciate your work immensely. I look forward to your next installments.

Could you give my email address to Constantly Lamenting Over Sudden Unexplained Relationship Ending, aka CLOSURE in yesterday's SLLOTD? I just went through a similar thing and had a similar reaction. He probably does need to talk to a therapist but what I needed more than anything was compassion. I'd be glad to offer him some if you want to give him my email address...
Don't 
A few months back, I got dumped hard by my girlfriend of almost two years. We’re both straight and in our late thirties. The break-up was a complete surprise to me, and to all of our friends. The two of us had just got back from a vacation together, after which I was more in love with this woman than ever. Then, without discussion or warning, she ended it. Things were great in bed right up to the end, and we rarely had any arguments. Even friends that we saw on that last vacation commented on how nauseatingly cute and happy we seemed. She didn’t talk to anyone, even her close friends and roommate, that she was unhappy during the relationship. It seems that something was boiling up, and she just exploded one day. This may seem like a shitty move on her part, but in her defense, her previous relationship involved an emotionally abusive asshole, and that definitely gave her a fear of conflict. I knew this early in the relationship, and tried to be inviting and attentive to her thoughts and feelings. I am human, though, and I admit that some stuff may have slipped through the cracks, and I didn’t always have perfect responses to things she said. However, we always seemed to resolve things eventually.
Since the break-up, I have tried to get more info from her about what went wrong. We met up a couple of times, talked on the phone, had loads of email correspondence, took several weeks apart, followed by more correspondence, and another meet-up. Each time we physically meet, it’s fun and pleasant, eerily like things were when we started dating. However, any talk about the break-up just frustrates me. The specific reasons she gives are totally solvable, e.g., “You live far away” can be solved with “I’m open to move closer,” or “We didn’t spend enough time together” can be solved with “Let’s spend more fucking time together.” Other than that, I just get vague statements like “We should be closer than we are by now in our relationship” or “I just don’t see it lasting in the long-haul” or “the more we talk, the more of my suspicions are confirmed,” all without giving actual details. These kinds of responses just drive me mad. I’ve told her that I am frustrated by her lack of clarity, and her response is “I’m sorry that I can’t give you the information you need.” I also found out, through various non-invasive sources like social media and friends (don’t judge me for snooping), that she has been pretty heavily out there dating since we broke up. No serious relationships, but she’s definitely hitting the market hard. For whatever that is worth. So, here are my questions about this whole mess: 1. What do you make of this person and how they ended things? She did not ghost me, and has otherwise “been there” to respond to my prods for answers, even if she can’t/won’t actually provide any. Of course, she is not contractually obligated to give me a writ of break-up, with all the reasons outlined in a table, and references at the back. However, as things are, this seems like a violation of your famous Campsite Rule. I am now left wondering how I contributed to the problem, and am worried that I will have PTSD-like baggage going into whatever my next relationship is, wondering what landmine I will step on that will explode that one. The vague answers I get don’t let me learn from this experience and just leave me helpless.
2. Should I continue to talk to her? Should I attempt to remain friends with this person? Should I write her off and block her from my life? (this would be fairly easy to do, logistically.) You have many good reasons to keep friendly that you outlined back in May. However, I also have to protect myself. 3. Do I hold out some hope that we could work this out? Admittedly, I still love her. This has been the most fulfilling relationship I have ever had. From what she has told me about her past relationships, it seems like she is in a similar boat. However, I can’t ignore this huge communication issue that we have. I would like to think that we could work through it, assuming she is on board. I also get that “the fuse is already blown” as one friend put it, so this will not be a simple fix to get the relationship going again. To be clear, I am not asking if I should put my life on hold and remain celibate until she comes running back into my arms. More if I should keep the option of reconciliation open, or is that just going to fuck with me and any chances of future happiness. Could really use your keen mind on this one, Dan. 
A few weeks ago, my live-in boyfriend (let's call him James) sat down next to me after a particularly stressful week of grad school and said "I have a hard question. A former sex partner (let's call her Allison) wants to have sex with me. Or us." I broke. I felt threatened. I felt inadequate, I felt body shame, and I wanted to run away from our relationship. James spent the evening consoling me. 
I heard your voice in my head and realized how ridiculous I was being about the whole thing. I've always wanted to be in a threesome, but I've been too intimidated. To top it off, I require BDSM elements for arousal, and have difficulty being aroused outside of (at least the possibility of) a long term relationship. So I don't just need a unicorn- I need a unicorn with a crown of stardust that poops rainbows and lays golden eggs. Allison is the first person James explored kink with, and they are very sexually compatible but have very different lives and are headed in different directions, and she lives five hours away. You could not dream a better scenario into existence if you tried.
Two weeks later, we welcomed Allison into our home. It was one of the most incredible experiences of my life. We abducted her, suspended her, and made some of her wildest fantasies come true. She returned the favor by helping James abduct me. Thanks to her small hands and determination, I was able to experience fisting for the first time. We were damsels in distress together, fulfilling a fantasy I've had for decades. Sex with James alone is mind blowing, but having Allison there really magnified my pleasure. Twice the people to serve! Twice the hands to tie me up and torture me! And a rare glimpse onto the other side of the hood, which was illuminating... I ended the weekend feeling serene, fulfilled, and secure. Our special guest star was similarly satisfied, and we are already planning another weekend together!
Thank you so much for helping me wrap my mind around monogamy, Dan. Being attracted to other people does not pose a threat to a healthy relationship. And thank you for drilling the phrase "special guest star" into my head. This allowed me to put myself in a hosting role, embodying generosity, grace, and care to the guest's needs—all good qualities in a scene, too! 
Thankful [for] Helpful Advice & 
I would bet that what I am about to offer is technically illegal but I really don't care because it is the right thing to do: I am in Canada and I do not take birth control myself. If any woman is denied her access to birth control pills I will happily get some for myself and send them to her and I hope others in my position will do the same for other women with the same need, should it arise in the following months and years. If other people have the technical skills and knowledge behind how to set up some sort of exchange program like this (or other related strategies) then I would be happy to work with them to get it set up, running, expanding and so forth. You may not have the support you need from enough of your fellow citizens but I am certain that there are many people all around the world who will do whatever they can to help make up the difference.

Like many people gearing up for the holidays I'm in my own state of crisis. My parents are 80 and 85 years old, live in Los Angeles, and have hosted Thanksgiving for several years for our small family and a number of my friends. My parents voted for Trump and to my knowledge no one else in our group did.  I know my parents to be fiscally conservative but over the years, with all of the Fox News watching, they bought into Hillary Hate. I don't think they like Trump they just hated Hilary. Other than that my parents are amazing and generous people and all my friends really love them—they don't fit the mold of Trumpers at all. Because of the election outcome some of my friends have posted their disgust for Trump voters on Facebook which my mom has seen. She feels personally offended by this talk and this has led to many arguments between us and now I'm getting really stressed out about Thursday's festivities. Both my parents are welcoming my friends and know better than to bring up politics over dinner, but I'm not sure if my friends know that my parents voted for Trump. Should I warn them? My fear is that someone is going to get offended. All I want is for everyone to get together and have a good holiday. I love my parents and have changed my life to move back here to be close to them in their old age. On the other hand I'm upset over the election and side with my friends' feelings in many ways. I can't even wrap my brain around this situation and what to do.

I've been struggling with an issue and I wondered what your take on it was. I have a very old friend (of over 20 years) who a few years ago confessed to me I was his sexual ideal and that he masturbated while thinking of me. At that same time, he was working out a lot and telling me his dick was getting smaller and smaller, and tried to send me pics to prove it. Through these conversations (always initiated by him, to the point where I started avoiding chatting with him as it was very one-sided) I gathered he likes being humiliated by a big curvy woman (which I am). All of this is being done via text chat by the way, as we now live in different countries and meet only rarely, and the issue has never been raised in person.
Fast forward to now. He has asked me directly to become my money slave and sent me some links to look into it. He wants me to order him to buy me stuff.
I haven't questioned him on the details, in terms of what he'd like to receive "in exchange", if anything, because it feels like opening Pandora's box. If he thinks I am interested he won't let it go, and I don't think I am interested. Although the idea of someone buying me nice presents or things I need is quite lovely (I've never had much money and never been in a situation where someone bought me things "just because"). But I am hugely conflicted at even considering this. The whole thing makes me feel uncomfortable, as if I was exploiting him. Ethically speaking, I have no clue. I have told him before that I am scared this is ruining/has ruined our friendship. And he has a girlfriend to boot, and I believe she knows nothing of this.
What is the healthy thing to do here?
I have no fucking idea where to start. It's a long fucking story. Basically, I'm a heterosexual guy who used to really like sex, but how is now living with my asexual ex-girlfriend who really doesn't like or understand sex at all. Being on antidepressants, partly due to our fucked up relationship, left me kind of without a sex drive. That's been a saving grace for a while now. It means I've been able to more or less exist as an honorary asexual, leaving my extremely neurotic asexual ex-girlfriend happy to have a celibate semi-relationship with me.
That said, I still get horny and I'm pretty lonely despite her friendship. I haven't had sex in years. Every now and then I send dirty text messages back and forth with an old flame of mine. Today, while my ex-girlfriend was using my phone for something, she "stumbled" upon my raunchy texting. She has treated this discovery like I am some sort of pervert. Literally, "I've discovered some new aspect of you and I feel like I don't really know who you are," type of reaction.
I've been in this fucked up sexless friend-relationship for so long with this woman that I don't know what is or isn't normal anymore. I have no other friends or anyone to talk to. Is sexting fucked up and weird? Am I a pervert? Isn't it more fucked up that she read my text messages? Do I really need to defend this behavior to anyone—even this person, my ex-girlfriend, who says she has nothing to hide from me, so I should have nothing to hide from her? I feel like I'm through the looking glass here. Please help.
Can't 
I could use some advice. I've been dating my boyfriend for a while now. Since I'm a very sex-positive girl, I convinced him to finally open up about his fetishes—I could tell he was ashamed and torn about sharing them with me, but I've been with my fair share of guys and surfed the net for years, so I was pretty convinced nothing would shock me. Well, turns out he's into soft vore. I'm not gonna lie, when he told me I was a bit put off by it, but of course I didn't tell him. I started looking for information about his fetish and, it turns out, it's not as uncommon as I thought it would be. I stumbled upon many, many websites for likeminded people, and my understanding of it is that vores really long for intimacy and protection. Is my interpretation correct?  Also, after learning about it I realized it's less extreme than some of the stuff we usually engage in like heavy BDSM, so I want him to feel fulfilled. Is there any way I can help him "act out" on his fetish (he would like to be the eatee)?
Fully Understanding Lover's 
Why can't I seem to date a guy who likes anal sex? Is it a Seattle thing? Is it a mid-late twenties thing? Is it because I'm a bad top? I'm a healthy, attractive, twenty-something with a pretty penis and a nice complexion in the gayest city in America who just wants someone to sit on my face and enjoy it. The problem is I keep finding myself in relationships that otherwise have wicked fun synergy, save for the part when I want to play with his butthole; the response is continually less than encouraging. The obvious answer, of course, is to just keep poking around until I find something that fits, but this pattern is starting to give me a complex and I want to know if perhaps I'm doing it wrong. Do shy sphincters abound in the gay community? I love butt stuff and I'd just like to find a nice boy who shares my perverted fantasies. Grindr culture is a drag, I'm not into rando hookups, and I'm not going to Purr because it smells like farts in there—is there hope for a frisky and forlorn queerdo seeking healthy, connected, flip-flop fun? 

About a month and a half ago, I met a guy that I really like. We made out that night, and two days later I woke up with a sore throat. Turned out, it was strep. Since then, we've spent more and more time together. He's sweet, smart, good in bed, basically everything a girl could want. Except, as it turns out, he's a strep carrier. Which has meant that every time I finish my antibiotics, I get sick again, which has included a painful sore throat, falling asleep at work, and waking up over and over at night with dry mouth. They have him on antibiotics at the moment, but both his doctor and my ENT think that that is unlikely to do anything. My ENT thinks the only way for me to kick this cycle of strep throat is for us to avoid each other completely or for him to get his tonsils removed, which seems like a lot to ask. So do I break up with an awesome guy because he keeps making me sick? Do I try to get him to get the incredibly invasive surgery? Technically, he could infect other people he meets along the way, but it would really be for me, a girl he's known for less than two months. And how can I even do that without breaking the nice momentum we've had so far? What should I do?
A 
I think that my husband voted for Trump, and I do actually want to leave him. In two years, when our youngest is two.
I am just done with all the misogyny. I have been wanting to leave for some time, and I told him before the baby was born that I want out by the end of her second year, so we need to get my business to a place where we can afford two households. That's what I'm working on.
But how do I get through these two years? I just see in him all this old white guy crap that is what is wrong with the world. He belittles me, places more value on his paycheck than everything I do to be a mother to our four children. He is so utterly unconscious that I can not even remember having a conversation with him where he actually listened to my point of view. I can't think of a day where he was actually present with any of our children. He just turns the TV on and gets mad at them when they bother him. He's a total conspiracy nut, and just preaches without ever listening.
A few years ago, I realized that you were wise in telling people to get high if that's the thing that makes their sex lives work. I started eating the occasional brownie, and I started fucking my husband again. It was so nice. We didn't deal with any of our issues, but they seemed like they became smaller and we were happier and we worked together to achieve things. He's a much kinder and centered person when he's getting laid! He has this gentleness about him that is so likable when he has that in his life.
But, I keep getting pregnant that way. He keeps saying that he'll get a vasectomy, but it never happens. Hormonal birth control is out for me, and condoms are just, ugh. I can't get off. But he's a self-centered pig of a man, and the snip is just so inconvenient for him "right now" = always.
Add to that that when we were making a point of having sex often, it was really me. I made the time. I severely limit the kids' screen time, so I figured if we were both home and they were watching the screen, we should be getting high and connecting sexually. He never bothered to make the time.
I have two boundaries about sex: not when I'm sleeping, and not when he's drunk. In all these 12 years together, I'm pretty sure he has only initiated when he was drunk or I was asleep. The longer we go without sex, the more he drinks, and the meaner he gets about it and literally tries to force himself on me. I feel so fucking violated. Especially in the light that he can say that it's my fault that it's been so long, when he doesn't even try to put even a little effort into planning to stay sober enough. I find him absolutely repulsive when he's drunk, like not at all connected. Oh, and he also insists on having a giant Duck Dynasty beard which I also regard as a serious turn off and we haven't kissed in the eight years that that monster has been on his face.
What do I do? Someone needs to fuck this man so that he's nice to be around. It used to be that I would recognize that problem, and get swirly enough to do something about it. But I just hate the way men like Trump have treated me throughout my whole life so much, that I just want to tell them all to go fuck themselves. I have read your column enough to know that you might recommend a sex worker. We live in a small town, we pinch our pennies, and he's kind of old school. I just don't see that as a solution. He doesn't watch any porn or masturbate at all either—sorry to burst your bubble there Dan but I would have found out by now.
How can I pull this off? I want my kids to stop seeing me get disrespect from their father, and he does treat me better when we're fucking, and he thankfully has a pretty low libido. Like once a month is probably plenty. As it is now, we've had sex once since the baby was born, and once after I got pregnant. She's nearly six months old, so that's very little. Also, I'm not a stoner. My baby is just starting to dabble in solids, and she's otherwise exclusively breastfed.
You give the best, most thoughtful advice Dan. Please tell me what to do.

I need expert advice. I'm a single woman on Tinder and I recently ran across a friend's husband on Tinder.  I am not extremely close with her but I do have mutual friends who are. Should she be told that her husband is looking to hook up? I checked her social media accounts and she's definitely still married and posts about him regularly. Maybe they have an open marriage? If it were me I would want to know but it would shatter her world, what to do?

I've appreciated your advice for parents over the years, and have stowed chunks of it away for when my son is old enough to need it. I would appreciate your view on this little problem I've had for, well, all my son's life. We gave him a stupid name. It's too unusual. It's from Shakespeare, and it's Italian (my ancestry). It's the one time I feel that my husband let me down, I let myself down by not making a fuss for once when it really mattered, and I failed my son.
My husband is not that unconventional, but his baby name suggestions were Morpheus and Lucifer. I don't remember a single sensible suggestion he made. He torpedoed all my nominations, which were wicked cool, manly names. After a month (literally) he said I could name the kid my first choice, but he hated the name. I let go this opportunity, agreed to the one other name we both thought was okay, and I have regretted it ever since. Our son is now eight, and I can't let this go.
I feel like such an asshole. My son is fucking brilliant. He lets me call him by his "secret" name, the name I always wanted to call him. If I suggest adding it as a middle name in case he wants to take on a more mainstream name one day, like several of our friends from Asia have done, he says, "You can call me that, but it's not my name."
I have to live with the mistake, I know it. How do I stop myself cringing whenever I have to introduce my son? There are many times when the guilt is overwhelming, even though he has never received any negative comment about his name; he likes it. I'm the one risking giving him a complex. 

Bless me Dan, for I have sinned... I slept with a Trump supporter.
A little background. I’m a cis female whose 25-year relationship ended a year ago. It’s been three 3 years since I last got laid. I’ve put on a lot a weight since the breakup, and the idea of taking my clothes off in front of a stranger or having sex with someone who didn’t really fancy me did not appeal to me. I was seriously wondering if I had had sex for the last time. But heading back to my home town for business, I took the opportunity to hook up with a man who has fancied me for 30 years. We know each really well, and we could just be be relaxed together. The first time we had sex was physically awkward and unsatisfying, but friendly and funny and comfortable, so when he suggested coming over to share a pizza, I was happy to give it another go.  
But during dinner he kept telling me about Trump, his good qualities, his superiority as a world leader to Clinton, and then he started quoting Scott Adams. I kept trying to change the subject, to no avail. I wanted to say “If you don’t shut up, I’m not going to sleep with you!” without actually saying it.  Eventually he did shut up, and we had a nice, bouncy time; this time I came and then slept like a baby. (Aside: sharing a pizza is a better pre-sex meal than gumbo.)
But now I feel remorse. Have I broken some primal rule? By way of mitigation, I should mention that we are not in the USA and neither of us are citizens so we can’t vote in the election. Either way, I still feel a bit grubby. On the up side, it turns out I can do the hookup and fuck buddy thing, so I’ve learned something about myself.
Can You Forgive?
I once slept with a supporter of Silvio Berlusconi, CYF, and I've lusted in my heart after a man who voted for Brexit. By way of mitigation, I couldn't understand most of what the hot Berlusconi supporter/apologist was saying to me, and the Brexit-backing object of my lust is a straight exhibitionist I've never actually met and am unlikely to ever lay eyes on, much less lay with. (He's got a hot body and an eye-popping Instagram account that he'd doesn't want me to link—and, yes, I asked.) So let's make a deal: You absolve me of my sins, CYF, I'll absolve you of yours. 
And speaking of Trump supporters...
I have read and loved your column for years. You've taught me a great deal about treating others as adults, about responding to our partners in a calm and rational way, about communication, and about having patience with your partner as part of a healthy relationship. However. I just read your advice to Struggling After Debate.
This was not good advice for someone in her situation. In her description, she lists her husband as a true contrarian. She points out that she is not fighting fair and that she has been calling him names. She doesn't list him being abusive. The two points she lists is that he finds humor in all this, and that he supports Trump and spouts Hillary conspiracy theories. She even points out that she's being a bad partner! And yet, after that, you jump directly on him for supporting the wrong candidate and I'm still trying to fathom why you would say this.
THEN YOU TOLD A WOMAN TO LEAVE HER HUSBAND OVER A POLITICAL ARGUMENT! WHAT THE HELL, DAN?
She knows she's not fighting fair, and while he's supporting a horrible bigot, this was by far the wrong answer. As intelligent, open-minded, and socially-progressive people it is our creed and our responsibility to show people the right way to treat others. Contrarian or no, humorous or no, encouraging fighting and then ending a marriage instead of encouraging open and honest communication is WRONG.  And you know it.
If I wanted close-minded anger over what we know is ultimately a non-issue, Dan, I'd listen to Orange Hitler.  You are far better than that.
Always nice to hear back from the original LW...
I've been giving your advice a lot of thought over the last week and it has already been fruitful. I think the two fold solution of just spending more time by myself away from the computer, along with more intentionally pursing non-PIV time with my wife is going to be a long term help. I should have clarified that we do engage in all those non-PIV options, but I didn't realize how much I unfairly viewed them as a lesser option. I think both my wife and I have been missing out because I had that unacknowledged bias. 
Also, it honestly helps a lot to hear someone else say nothing about my/our situation sounds horribly abnormal and that we're okay. I think people really underestimate how meaningful a solid, "Dude, you're fine," can be (especially in regards to insecurity/jealousy).
As a final note... I should have done a better job expressing that I wanted advice precisely because I don't want to act like a selfish, entitled husband in my desperation for relief to my medical condition. Obviously expecting my poor wife to have PIV every night for my insomnia isn't a reasonable solution. Your answer however, is.
Three weeks from the wedding and I've only just realizing that my man will NEVER stop using porn. It's not just the insecurity thing, but I do admit to that of course. It's this feeling in the pit of my stomach. When I find out he's been using porn, I cant help but feel cheated and that our love is just not that special. Even worse, it deters me from wanting to have sex with him. Sex feels dirty to me knowing what he's doing behind my back. An intimate relationship is a spiritual thing for me and when he uses porn, it kills all of it for me. I can't believe I have to spend the rest of my life knowing my husband whacks off to other women. I don't know how to brainwash myself into not caring. I honestly just don't feel the same way about my relationship anymore, which is horrifying considering we're supposed to walk down the aisle in three weeks. This is probably all to blame because I was brought up Christian (atheist now). 
Help! How do I learn accept this? I'm terrified. He's a wonderful man, but if I can't let go of these sick feelings about porn, I'll lose him.
Can't I began reading WOES letter from this week's column with much interest, as it started out a lot like my situation—resentment, disappointment, insecurity. We also both work full-time and have young children, in an otherwise very loving marriage. Where we differ, and what I hope you can address, is my less extreme desires than WOES. I would gladly accept sex 2-3 times per week, instead of once a month. Also, after being rejected at least every other time I initiate, I have just stopped initiating as often as I would prefer.  Fortunately I have no issues with masturbation and the requisite use of porn to fill the difference in our libido, unlike WOES. And while our sex is pretty vanilla, we do engage in some foreplay, I always give her oral (and never receive), and unless she is faking, she always orgasms first. I'm sure I'm not the first, or last, guy in this situation, but it would sure be nice to be represented by someone other than WOES.
Originally posted on March 5, 2014.
You always take questions from BDSMers and cuckolds and hardcore sexers, but will you take mine? Won't you please offer some advice to me, a simple heterosexual girl having problems with her heterosexual male?!? My boyfriend locks the door behind him when he pees. It hurts my feelings! Being a part of his pissing experience would turn me on! He claims he is pee shy. But he pees in public restrooms in front of other men! Why can't he pee in front of me?!? I would be grateful for your advice on how to get him to relax with his peeing moments a little more because I'm BORED. Thanks!

Mostly straight guy here. I'm not typically in a relationship and am fine with that, so my sex life usually revolves around porn. My go-to option is Chaturbate, because it feels more authentic than scripted porn clips. Yes, I know the girls are doing it for the money and are putting on a play to get guys to pony up and I wish them as much success as possible. My question is, are sites like that ethical? It feels like one of the safest ways for girls to do sex work, but what do I know? Should I avoid some sites, or some types of cams in particular? I'm trying to cause as little harm as possible.

I feel like asking a non partial third party is my best option as you are likely to be brief and to the point and disapproval won't hurt my feelings as much coming from a stranger as opposed to my sister or a friend. 
Here's my query: I went through a breakup back in July. I'm not 100% sure I'm ready to get back out there, but they say if you wait until you're ready you'll never do it. I've had success with Tinder twice before (it's where I met my two previous boyfriends). So I figured, if it ain't broke, don't fix it. The relationships didn't work out, but not because of where I met them, obviously. So I was swiping and landed on a guy named Sam. He's 31, attractive, employed, and actually had a written bio (which was tongue-in-cheek and funny). He had his Instagram linked to his profile so I perused that as well. (No harm in that if he has it up there, right?) I was getting ready to swipe right and my phone glitched or froze or something and his profile vanished. Usually, I would say oh well and just move on, but I still had his Instagram pulled up. He seems like an interesting guy that I would like to chat with.
Long story short (I'm terrible at getting to the point!) would it be weird to DM him on Instagram? And if it's not weird, what would I say to break the ice?

I was wondering if you knew of a place online where we can donate erotic graphic novels. We're moving across country and we can't take them all. We'd love to find them a good home. Thank you!

I'm a 26-year-old female living with my parents. Quick backstory: I failed out of college the first time I went, moved in with my abusive ex for three years, then moved back in with my parents because they offered to pay for college if I lived with them. I just graduated (finally), I have a steady job now, and I'm moving out soon. But my mom has no concept of boundaries at all. I smoke weed and she hates it. She doesn't want to know when I go to buy or smoke some weed but she doesn't want me to lie to her either. She asks me where I'm going when I leave the house. I can't just not say anything. 
Recently I left my phone at home. She brought it to work for me but saw a text from a name she didn't recognize. Instead of being a normal mother of a 26 year old, she freaked out and demanded to know who I was texting (after thinking about it and getting more and more angry). So I told her it was someone I was having casual sex with (which is the truth). Cue panic. Apparently I'm not respecting myself and I'm going to be an "old shoe" (her words) by the time I'm married. 
How do I talk to my mom about the fact that she needs to respect my boundaries? It's exhausting to lie to her, but she obviously doesn't want to hear the truth. She doesn't want to hear that I'm having sex, so I don't tell her. But that's not ok with her either, apparently. I'm really conflicted. My mom makes me feel like shit but I know she's disappointed in me because my life is not where I or her expected it to be. But I feel like I definitely don't need to tell her who I'm having sex with, and I don't have to justify my actions to her. Help.
Daughter's 
I’m a 24 year-old gay man, and I’ve had a problem for most of my life: I always find myself being cast as the role of a bottom in hookups and relationships. When I was going through puberty, and really since then, my sexual fantasies tend to be very much oriented toward topping. But when it comes to the actual act, I find myself more often than not bottoming. It has been especially true and frustrating in relationships.
With one past boyfriend, there was a legitimate reason where he had something along the lines of IBS, and it was always painful for him every time we tried. Other than that, it seems that most guys I get with desire me primarily as a bottom, even versatile guys. I am an attractive guy and don’t have trouble finding sex when I want it.  And I’m not interested in guys who only bottom, because I am versatile and enjoy and want both sexual experiences.
This is playing out in a frustrating fashion right now. I have been seeing a guy for two months now, and things have been going pretty well. And sexually, for the first several weeks we were having sex it was very even, with us pretty much taking turns topping and bottoming. But the past several times we had sex I ended up bottoming, and the most recent time I expressed that I wanted to top this time. He said it wasn’t a good time since hadn’t eaten well over the past day and he has to work. That’s fair, and we’ve talked about that before and I’m ok with it. But then he said that he thinks topping is going to be his default now, and that with me he prefers topping, though with past relationships that has not always been the case, and joked about how that was my fault for being so good at bottoming. And when I kind of grudgingly agreed to bottom he said something along the lines of, "Why are you upset? You like bottoming." And then when we were having sex he tried to make me feel better by saying how cute and pretty I was.
This experience set off all kinds of anxieties, that I don’t fault him for but need to find out how to work through with him. It’s frustrating that I feel like I’m being punished for trying to be good when I bottom, because it makes him only want to top. Hearing that really kills my desire to bottom, and to find pleasure in it and be enthused about it. And knowing that there’s something about me as opposed to past guys he’s dated that makes him want to top more just reinforces the pattern I’ve seen with my sex life. I’ve asked him every time I top how I can make it enjoyable for him. I’ve wanted to have him come before me because I know how good it feels and I want to focus on bringing him to orgasm, but he insists on always coming second. And I find it frustrating that he thinks that since I find bottoming enjoyable I should always be happy to bottom.
And to top it off, he used these very emasculating and diminutive words while he was topping me. I’ll admit I have some insecurities about not being more masculine, but I’m not feminine either. I’ve always identified more with being a slender, poorly coordinated, nerdy guy than with any large degree of masculinity or femininity. I’ve always felt uncomfortable with both of those, and whenever I’ve tried displaying either it has felt unnatural and very much like a performance. But I hate the stereotypes and stigmas that the gay community often puts on bottoms (and the stereotypes and praise it puts on tops). Like that parody song “That Boy Is a Bottom." I hate it every time I hear it. And I don’t like those stereotypes and assumptions being placed on me, in part because I don’t want to deal with them and in part because I don’t feel like they fit me as a person. And I’m vers for crying out loud. I love butts. I love dick. I’m tired of people assuming my sexual roles and desires based on my appearance, and because I have a less dominant personality. I hate how much the gay community labels people like this, and how we place the damaging gender roles and stereotypes heterosexual people have to deal with on ourselves. I guess I’m supposed to not give a fuck about how people view me, but it’s frustrating when it affects how they treat me, and affects my sex life.
I talked to him about some of my concerns, but it didn’t go as well as I had hoped. I tried to focus on how I felt and not blame him for anything, but his response was very focused on himself. He kept saying how none of that was on him, and I kept agreeing and pointing out that how I felt was my issue, but that I wanted him to know so he would understand why I’d like to continue having a fairly equal distribution of topping and bottoming. I also mentioned that it had thrown me off for the whole day, and his response to that was that he couldn’t see how it could have bothered me for a whole day. He ended up being kind of dismissive of how I felt. One of his suggestions was that if I don’t want to bottom then I just say so, and then if he doesn’t want to bottom either we just won’t have sex. Which is fair, but I don’t like the potential standoffs that implies, and if we just stop having sex that’s obviously going to kill the relationship. And tbh I would often rather bottom than not have sex. This is one of the reasons I think I end up bottoming so often; I want to have sex, and the other guy is more inclined to have sex if they get to top, so that’s what happens.
I guess I should be more assertive of what I want sexually. And that if I’m upset enough about not getting to top more, then I should not have sex if that’s not an option, rather than giving in and bottoming. I just feeling like I won’t be able to have as much sex if I insist on topping more, because it seems like guys sexually desire me first and foremost as a bottom. This also feels like a self-centered approach to sex, to only have sex if I can have sex the way I want it. Isn’t part of good sex and a relationship being open to your partner’s sexual desires, and trying to find ways to please them?
This is the first guy I’ve been in a relationship with in at least three years, and I am otherwise really enjoying the relationship. And it is the first relationship where I have had so far relatively equal opportunity in bed. But I am nervous that the equality is quickly going to slip away and I’ll end up in the same situation I’ve been in the past. What can I do to work with him, so we don’t fall into a rut where he tops by default? I don’t want this to be something to break up over.
Sorry for the wall of text. This top/bottom thing has been bothering me for so many years and I am endlessly frustrated by it. Why are these nouns? They really should just be verbs.
Thanks,

I committed to my partner—agreed to plan our lives and goals around the concept of being together indefinitely—and married them (for tax benefits and hospital visitation rights) within the last two years. We don't define this commitment as most do, i.e. we are not religious, we don't want to make babies, we don't think being together forever and ever is that important. Over the last year I have asked my partner if we can write down what our commitment means to us, i.e. what our expectations are, what our goals for our relationship are, etc. He is adamant in refusing, saying that everything is open for discussion and we should figure it out as we go. Basically he does not want rules and contracts. Also: I was honest about my preference for open relationships from the beginning but agreed at the start of our marriage to be monogamous. I did knowing he was OK with being open before we married and that he is supposedly open to negotiation on anything. But when I broached the topic recently he became upset and said I had agreed to a "monogamous marriage."
I have been impressed with the way you look at the constant negotiation of marriage and commitment. Can you please offer some advice on how these negotiations go? Written down or mediated? Why are people so terrible about making assumptions about what commitment means?

I’m a 29-year-old male with no idea what to do about my “relationship." In November 2015 I had a serious accident: a ladder slipped from under me and I fell about 28 feet, crushed my wrist badly and shattered my knee in six pieces. During my time in hospital a friend of almost three years looked after me, visiting me every day and just being the best friend she could be. After I was released from hospital we started a relationship and everything was going great until I had a mental setback with the trauma from the accident. (Post traumatic issues, call it whatever.) So we sat down, discussed my issues, and I my plan to see a psychologist to get my head back in the game. I needed time to think and work through everything, in and outside of the relationship, and she assured me she would be supportive and that she would always be there for me and that we would do this together.
Then in July I came to realize that she had been cheating on for almost three months. For me this was a massive break of trust and respect. She, of course, regrets what she did, and says she will never do it again and she wants to be with me for the rest of her life and so on. They are still friends but she assures me she will end the friendship if I want her to. The majority tell me to get on with my life and forget about her, but we have a deep connection and I still love her. But here is the catch: In my previous relationship of four years, I cheated on my ex on three separate occasions over the last year, each time with a different woman. My ex never found out and I ended the relationship.
I was faithful during this last relationship, even though I wanted other women as well. (My current girlfriend doesn’t know that I've wanted other girls as well.) I told her that we can take it slow and see how things work out, but she wants me to make a decision about our relationship now, saying we mustn’t waste our time if we can't get through this and have a future together.
My questions are:
1. Is it possible?
2. Why do I feel so brutally hurt and disappointed about this?
3. Should we give the relationship another shot?
4. Is it worth the effort?
My family and friends all hate her for doing this to me and I don't think they will ever accept her as part of the family again.
I'll really appreciate your input and advice.

I'm a 30-year-old lesbian. I live abroad in the European country my girlfriend of two years is from. She is seven years my junior. We met in the states while she was on an exchange program. We fell madly for each other. She was adamant I was "it" for her—sexually and otherwise. I was in contact with my ex at the start which was a huge point of contention. She believed that being in any type of contact with exes was horrible. (FORESHADOWING.) I then ended all of that contact and committed fully to her. The other thing she believed in strongly was "no cheating." Most people feel the same way, but she said the only thing that could break us up was if I cheated. Cheating was something she would "never, ever" do. (FORESHADOWING.) I cheated in a previous relationship. It is the worst feeling and I could never do that again. I told her as much. 
Her year in the states ended. She went back home.... where she started to talk to two of her exes wound up cheating on me. The betrayal, pain, and hypocrisy were so acrid. I lost all my confidence sexually after that. I stopped feeling attractive. But I decided to work toward forgiveness. I moved my life to her. Without speaking the language I managed to find a great job and I got my own place. We worked on repairing things. There are a lot of side stories but I think I have digressed enough for one letter. We're still together, we're happy, and she tells me she will never be attracted to anyone else. But the sex has almost fallen completely away.
I have a high libido. I always have. I need to have sex. Once a week at a minimum.
She admitted to being insecure about sex when we first met. Specifically, she was insecure about making her partner come. She is comfortable with her body and has no problem "being pleasured." (I know, I know, sounds like textbook pillow princess, right?) I worked very, very hard back in the states to make her comfortable and our sex life became incredible. She started talking dirty, sending me sexy texts and pictures, and we made a few sex tapes. She initiated then. She was VERBAL about wanting sex and wanting me to come. I loved it. I was clear with her that I like sex, I like having it often, and that I like knowing that my partner wants it, too. And back them it looked like she more than matched my libido level. 
After moving abroad—after the cheating—I fought my fears and tried to initiate sex on many occasions to rebuild intimacy and my confidence. I can count on one finger the number of times she has initiated. I came to find—because she told me as much—that she was only having so much sex with me back in the states in order to "keep me."
I don't know what to do. I have tried so hard to put the cheating behind me. Last night, I surprised her at her apartment after knowing how stressed she was with school. I started to make out with her. She took my clothes off. I moved her to the bed and gave her some intense oral and penetration simultaneously, the way that always makes her come. After 25-30 minutes of her seeming to enjoy it, she stopped me. She couldn't come. She was "too stressed." I respect that. Obviously, I don't want to have sex with someone who doesn't want to have sex with me. But this has happened before. She has stopped me because she's "too stressed" so many times that I don't initiate as much as I used to.
I'm upset. I'm hurt. I'm disappointed. My girlfriend says she's highly attracted to me, she says she wants to marry me and have children with me, but she's obviously not that into having sex with me. What do I do? How can I rekindle this? It feels like I'm in a relationship with friend that I occasionally kiss and see naked getting out of the shower. I need more. I want sex. On a scale of 1 to Forrest Gump how naïve am I being?
A 
I’m a 20-year-old trans man in college. I’ve been fascinated by sex for years, probably mostly because of the fact that my parents never talked to me about it and my school sex ed was absolute bullshit. It’s not that I’ve had a lot of different kinds of sex (unfortunately), but I joked and talked about sex for years and now I can realize that my fascination probably spawns from my lack of information growing up and I can more think about it in a very analytical type of way.
I’ve also been watching porn since I was sixteen and that’s also something I never talked about my parents with. But about a year ago I found the company CockyBoys and I essentially fell in love with everything about them: the production, the models, the people who run the company, etc. I bought one of their films last January and fell even more deeply in love with them because of how spectacular the film was from an artistic standpoint. Now, because I generally enjoy talking to my parents (especially my mother) about things that are important to me, I did mention the company to them a couple of times without getting into explicit detail and last winter, my mother glibly suggested that I become a writer for the company. Which I immediately became set on doing and still want to do.
She later told me that she was wrong for saying that and she thought that porn is wrong and demoralizing and dehumanizing and her opinion will never change. It annoyed me at the time that she wouldn’t even try to look past what she believed to see what I was telling her and that CockyBoys is so much the opposite of the stereotypical porn company but now it just saddens me. Because CockyBoys is such a significant part of my life and represents so much of what I care about and working for them is what I’m passionate about being able to do one day. But I can’t say one word about CockyBoys to my parents because I know that they don’t care and don’t want to hear it.
So my question would be do you think there’s a chance they’ll ever change their views? I don’t have faith that my dad will change (he’s very cynical), but I do hope my mom will. I showed her the YouTube version of their first installment of my favorite one of their films, Answered Prayers, and she grudgingly acknowledged an appreciation for the artistic aspect. But I wanna know if you think there’s a chance she could ever fully accept it. She’s the most important person in my world and I want to be able to talk to her about things I’m passionate about, especially if I do get the chance to work with them. I hope to eventually be making my own films, porn and otherwise, and as of now, I know that no matter how proud of my work I am or how much I would want my parents to see it, they would never want to and would most likely never acknowledge my career.
I volunteer at a phone service that people can call in if they are feeling suicidal or just having a bad day. We talk with them for a few minutes, listen to their feelings, no judgment. However, I had a call recently that kind of tested that. A young man called in and told me about masturbating into his mother's underwear. He told his mother and girlfriend he did this; his girlfriend left him and his mother has no idea how to react. He felt ashamed but didn't intend to stop. 
Now, when I heard this, I immediately had a number of warring reactions. On the one hand, I'm a lifelong reader and listener to you, so I had one shoulder angel that was telling me that this person did not need to be shamed for his kinks—that attempting to do so would be counterproductive, even. On the other shoulder, however, was the angel that said that his mother had not consented to this practice (as though any mother would) and that he was victimizing her by making her feel unsafe in her own home. And of course, in the middle of both these shoulder angels was my stomach just completely turned in knots and screaming AGGGH GROSS. 
True to the intent of our phone service, I simply listened to the young man's story without offering advice or commentary. But it's a few days later and I still don't know if I talked to a harmless kinkster in the throes of socially-conditioned shame or a Norman Bates waiting to happen. What do you think? 
Still Questioning & 
I recently got to enjoy a sexual encounter with a man I have loved and been friends with for many years because my primary relationship status changed to monogamish. This man has lived on a commune since he was in his 20s and now he is in his 50s. He has been with only a very few women as far as I know. He does not like to talk about sex very much and describes himself as having a low sex drive. He and his wife became more and more monogamish in recent years due to her desire for multiple younger male partners.
There are three problems that have taken me by surprise in this situation.
One is that it turns out that his wife is very controlling and does not let him have anywhere near the freedom that she demands for herself and he is feeling somewhat humiliated by this; two, is that he turns out to have a micro-penis; and, three, is that he does not seem to know that he has a micro-penis.
I am torn. First of all, I don't know whether there is any future for us to have another encounter because his wife is so controlling. But more importantly, I can see that his being unaware of his having a micro-penis puts him at a terrible disadvantage going forward in this nonmonogamish relationship with his wife.
One example is that he says she expects him to wear a condom for intercourse with other partners. I asked him whether he has ever had sex with a condom and he said yes, but I was dubious. His penis is not large enough to fill out a condom that would fit an average sized penis, but he is usually an extremely honest person. We did not have intercourse, in part, because I saw that this would be problematic, though I did not discuss it with him. Should I gently tell him somehow?  I feel that our friendship takes precedence over any future sexual relationship, but this is a new level of awkwardness that I'm finding difficult to negotiate.
I hope you can give me some advice.
Originally posted February 18, 2010:
I am a straight male. I have a problem ejaculating with a partner. I have failed to complete the act even when I arranged a session with two well-known porn stars I REALLY wanted. This despite sticking it nearly everywhere—no Greek—and in nearly every position. The only way I can reliably come is when I hump my mattress naked with a towel underneath me. What is my problem? I take Zoloft, which can have the effect of delaying orgasm, but that doesn't explain how I can get off so quickly with my towel, which I do daily, but I couldn't get it done in an entire hour with my favorite big-butted porn star who let me do whatever I wanted.
Originally posted on March 19, 2014.
When I was a teenager, my mother found some dirty stories I wrote on my computer. They were hardcore (bondage, slavery, whippings), and some featured neighborhood MILFs that I had crushes on. I was 14 at the time. My mom went ballistic and terrorized me about my kinks until I left for college. I hated my mother so much during this time. I didn't feel like I could trust her, and I never confided in her about anything. It took me a decade to get over it. I'm now 30, straight, and married. My wife and I appear to be "normal." But we are both into bondage and S&M;, we go to fetish parties, and we've explored cuckolding and forced bi. My wife and I aren't a perfect fit—I enjoyed cuckolding (my fantasy) but not so much forced bi (seeing me suck dick was her fantasy)—but our kinks have brought us a lot of joy. Cutting to the chase: My wife is pregnant. We announced the news to my mom and dad, and they were delighted. I was honestly delighted to make my parents so happy. Then my mother sent me an e-mail saying that I had her to thank for my relationship and my child-to-be. If she hadn't "nipped those dark sexual impulses in the bud," I would "not now have a lovely wife and a morally acceptable lifestyle," and she wouldn't be expecting her first grandchild. Mom thinks her five-year-long campaign of shaming me—and constantly spying on me and haranguing me—cured me of my kinks! I'm so angry. I want to tell my mother that she has my "dark sexual impulses" to thank for her first grandchild! I met my kinky wife on Fetlife! No kinks, no wife! No wife, no grandchild! My wife would rather not be outed as kinky to her mother-in-law and says to let it go. What do you say?
Mad Over Terribly Hurtful E-mail Long time on and off reader for a whole now. So, I have a weird question that maybe you don't deal with and you are you just going to be flabbergasted that I'm emailing you about it, but maybe you have some response and you seem like the best advice columnist to ask. Also, maybe just stating some of this will help me think about it. And now here's a long wall of text for you. Hope you read it!
I'm a 24-year-old guy who uses OkCupid to occasionally meet people for dates. Fine site for the most part, and I've met some really nice people on there, even though I've yet to find a relationship. Recently, I "met"  a girl on OkCupid. (Quotations because to say you've met someone after chatting online seems dubious.) We chatted for a while about going to see a movie, and eventually exchanged numbers. We texted some more, and she sent me some photos (same as on her OKC account) and made some suggestive comments. I played along because, well, I'm who I am, which is a 24-year-old male who's willing to just go along with things as long as it's interesting and not directly illegal or harmful (which I'm thinking is a policy I should reconsider). Then, I didn't hear from her. I sent her a message like a day later, but still didn't hear anything.
Then, a few days later, I got a call from a number in the same area code, same number family (like, the first 3 digits after the area code were the same). I answered, and it was some man demanding to know "why you're communicating with my underage daughter."
In in that instant I half freaked out and half assumed it was a scam. So I just hung up the phone. I haven't heard from him since.
To be clear: The OKCupid account was for a 26-year-old woman. I did not think I was communicating with a minor, nor did I want to be. It feels like a scam, in the sense of, offer something that really is too good to be a true (a woman on OKC who wants to go see a movie and then makes sexual comments!? Basically a black swan event), lure them in, then issue threats to get something.
But that doesn't change the fact that I'm freaking out about the idea that I was chatting an underage girl and might be in legal trouble for it. I took screenshots of the profile for evidence (in case I get arrested and the account has been taken down), but I'm still freaked out and kinda stressed out. I don't know what my question would be. Does it seem like a real thing? Do you think I'm a dipshit? Do you think I'm a dipshit who's probably going to jail? Should I contact the police?
I don't know if this falls into the subject of what you deal with, but I thought I'd send it.
Okay, I get it. You're sick of hearing straight men complain about girls only dating assholes.
But I'll tell you a story. Growing up I was a sensitive guy with a lot of female friends—girls would call me up "just to talk." Literally: just to talk. By my early twenties I was desperate, sexually and emotionally. So I began reading the advice of these a-hole, sexist pickup artists, whose advice was essentially, "Treat women like shit." And for a little while, I did, I'm sad to say.
The response was almost immediate. I had women brazenly hit on me. The moment I started acting like an a-hole, I began to get the sexual attention I craved. And let me tell you: it fucked me up in the head for a while and distorted my view of women. But I couldn't keep doing that and be okay with myself, and ultimately liking people—men OR women—is a conscious choice we make. And I choose to like women.
You have zero experience dating straight women, so I wouldn't have expected you to encounter this phenomenon. But don't dismiss it. A large percentage of women are sexually attracted to dominant males; that doesn't have to equate to "asshole." But often, it does. I don't think women are shittier than men, but I don't think they're better, either, and this is a fact that 1) makes dating women sometimes unpleasant and 2) is not at all irrelevant to a conversation about gender relations.
Want some evidence of this phenomenon, Dan? It's all over your column.
Although your inbox is surely filled with straight males complaining about how women are attracted to assholes, it's also filled with evidence supporting the gist of some of their complaints. The fact that women are generally attracted to dominant (and often shitty, douche-y) males drips out of the edges of a lot of the correspondence that you publish. I immediately thought about the bi woman who wrote to you about her flawed but cute husband whom she loves but has also friend-zoned, in part because he doesn't order her around. There are other ways to read the letter. That's one of them. 
But often evidence of this phenomenon creeps up in the letters you publish. I thought of a particularly illustrative letter, which you published several months ago. The woman was facing a health crisis and was writing to you for advice because she was madly in love with a man you characterized as "shitty, selfish, [and] sadistic." Okay, but she's just one woman, right? The real question is, how do other women respond to this psychopath? The letter-writer supplies an answer: Women throw themselves at him.
Look, you do a fantastic job, and I agree with you most of the time. But honestly, I think that because of the shit you've had to overcome as a member of a persecuted sexual minority, and because you are understandably sympathetic with the real issues confronting women, sometimes when you hear about the issues that face straight men, your gut reaction is simply to say, "Shut the fuck up, whiner!"—even when those frustrations are completely legitimate and rooted in fact. 
It's not simply an issue of a man showing a kindness to a woman and expecting her to put out (though clearly this happens); it's that being kind and pro-social in a way that would be lauded in other situations can actively harm a man's chances of sleeping with a woman, whereas being callous, selfish, or cruel can improve those chances. It's the flip-side of the madonna/whore complex—"he's a sweetheart and I love him like my brother" vs. "He's edgy, mysterious, and 'charming in a way that objective people in other contexts would not find remotely charming, and I wanna have sex with him." Men often act shitty towards women, it's true, but women often actively reward shitty male behavior. 
Let me ask you this: if a large number of your female readers complained about some aspect of dating men, would you treat them so dismissively? I think that you're really missing out on an opportunity—you could give these men advice on how to overcome their frustrations without turning to the dark side (being assholes), and open up a dialog about this in a way that would actually be constructive.
Originally posted on October 15, 2014.
I'm a middle-aged, fat, and happy gay man. My partner has a best friend, and they share everything—including our bed. Most weekends, we tromp through town together, watch TV together, and share waking and sleeping moments together. Recently I referred to us as "poly and in a triad," and I was shocked by my partner's response. He claims that we aren't a triad; I say that if we're sharing home, heart, and bed, we're in a poly relationship. Sign me...
Honest Accidentally Poly Person, 
There are four or five hundred thousand emails in my inbox from straight guys asking why assholes get all the girls, why they keep getting friend-zoned, and why the girls who really should like them (because they're nice!) always seem to pick some other guy (who was either an asshole all along or was suddenly perceived to be an asshole once the girl picked him). I would dig through my inbox for a good & representative example of one of those emails and post it here—to uphold the honor of the SLLOTD format—but I'm about to get on a plane and I'm in a hurry.
Anyway...
Those letters came to mind this morning as I read this terrific tweetstorm of advice for guys who complain about friend zones and assholes:
Hey, so someone DM'd (a younger cat) asking me to do a thread on why assholes get girls and nice guys don't. So I'll do a quick breakdown.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016It has nothing to do with you being nice or a jerk. It might be these two things. 1. She's just not interested 2. You're prolly boring.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016On the first one, everyone has different preferences and interests in someone. No woman (or man) has the same preferences.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016So if a woman or man is not interested in you, that's it. You can't fix it change that and I urge you to accept that.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016Don't keep pestering or hitting up someone that has made it clear they're not interested in you. It's not worth it.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016It's better for you to learn rejection and acceptance. Persistence is key is not advice I would give anyone.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016Why? Cuz in my opinion it's not hard to tell if someone is interested and if they are not, persistence will not help you.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016On the second not, when I see people who lots of people are interested in, I usually don't see if said person is nice or a jerk.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016What I notice is this...said person, whether nice or not, is a non-boring, interesting person.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016You can be a lot of things, but the one thing no one wants is an individual they find boring.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016There's usually something about the person that makes them stand out from the pack. Maybe it's what they do, say, or are.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016But said individual, whether you care for them or not, is not a boring individual.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016So it's not that you're too nice, you're prolly just boring.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016Cuz, I promise you, there are many people who are not jerks, and find themselves with lots of people who are interested in them.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016Which is why I urge you not to be a jerk cuz you think it will get you women. Instead, ask yourself if you're an interesting person.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016And even then, if a person isn't interested in you, just refer to my first point.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016Finally, what I can absolutely recommend you stop doing is complaining or talking bad about WMN just cuz they don't want you.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016No one is going to want to talk to you, if you're boring, AND all you ever do is talk about how no one likes you and you talk sh*t about WMN— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016So that's my answer. Some ppl will just not be interested. Be a more interesting person. Don't complain about women not wanting you.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016✊🏿— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
Hey, so someone DM'd (a younger cat) asking me to do a thread on why assholes get girls and nice guys don't. So I'll do a quick breakdown.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
It has nothing to do with you being nice or a jerk. It might be these two things. 1. She's just not interested 2. You're prolly boring.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
On the first one, everyone has different preferences and interests in someone. No woman (or man) has the same preferences.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
So if a woman or man is not interested in you, that's it. You can't fix it change that and I urge you to accept that.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
Don't keep pestering or hitting up someone that has made it clear they're not interested in you. It's not worth it.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
It's better for you to learn rejection and acceptance. Persistence is key is not advice I would give anyone.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
Why? Cuz in my opinion it's not hard to tell if someone is interested and if they are not, persistence will not help you.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
On the second not, when I see people who lots of people are interested in, I usually don't see if said person is nice or a jerk.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
What I notice is this...said person, whether nice or not, is a non-boring, interesting person.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
You can be a lot of things, but the one thing no one wants is an individual they find boring.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
There's usually something about the person that makes them stand out from the pack. Maybe it's what they do, say, or are.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
But said individual, whether you care for them or not, is not a boring individual.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
So it's not that you're too nice, you're prolly just boring.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
Cuz, I promise you, there are many people who are not jerks, and find themselves with lots of people who are interested in them.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
Which is why I urge you not to be a jerk cuz you think it will get you women. Instead, ask yourself if you're an interesting person.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
And even then, if a person isn't interested in you, just refer to my first point.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
Finally, what I can absolutely recommend you stop doing is complaining or talking bad about WMN just cuz they don't want you.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
No one is going to want to talk to you, if you're boring, AND all you ever do is talk about how no one likes you and you talk sh*t about WMN— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
So that's my answer. Some ppl will just not be interested. Be a more interesting person. Don't complain about women not wanting you.— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
✊🏿— X (@XLNB) April 10, 2016
The reader who brought Xavier's tweetstorm to my attention thought it was a nice compliment to an answer I gave years and years ago to a lonely, horny, hard-up teenage boy who wanted a GF. I've been asked to rerun that printstorm of advice few times:
But don't despair, HUTB. Your awkward/repulsive stage will pass. In the meantime, here's what you need to do: Worry less about getting your young teenage self laid and start thinking about getting your 18- or 20-year-old self laid. Join a gym and get yourself a body that girls will find irresistible, read—read books—so that you'll have something to say to girls (the best way to make girls think you're interesting is to actually be interesting), and get out of the house and do shit—political shit, sporty shit, arty shit—so that you'll meet different kinds of girls in different kinds of settings and become comfortable talking with them.
Probably wouldn't include that lookist/body-fascist bit about joining a gym if I were responding to that kid today—because all bodies are equally irresistible (but still, exercise is good for you!)—but the rest of it stands, especially the "actually be interesting" part.
I wasn't following the writer and director Xavier Burgin on Twitter before I read his tweetstorm today—but I am now.
UPDATE: I want to second what Alice Dreger says here...
As usual @fakedansavage nails it. Straight guys: it's more important to be interested than interesting. https://t.co/ns
I'm on an online dating site (OKCupid) and a woman I matched with asked if I would join her swingers club. I'm suspicious mostly because they claim to have fifteen female members and only five male members in this club. How do I find out if it's legitimate? In addition, I'm 23 years old and a virgin. I'm pretty fit but I have trouble meeting people. Is it a bad idea to follow up on this?
I'm writing to you for a bit of an offbeat reason. I live next door to a couple, a little younger than my wife and I. They have two younger kids in grade school. Recently they also brought in two teenagers, their nephews, whose mother has been having some personal difficulties.
We live in a neighborhood where the houses were built in 1928. Their house hasn't been expanded, and neither has mine, although a lot of people have been able to expand their houses over the years. Since our houses are the same size—about 1,300 square feet, three bedrooms, one bath—I have to wonder where they're putting two extra kids! At this point you're probably wondering why I'm contacting you. I havethree kids of my own, two teens and a toddler, and I know just how hard it is to maintain intimacy with a spouse under these conditions. I cannot imagine having four kids, two of them teens, and attempting to keep up a sex life!
My neighbors are obviously really great people making a sacrifice to help others. They're not rich by any means. With four kids they're probably in the bottom of the middle class. I was wondering if you knew of any organizations, charities or fundraisers or something, which could help maybe just give them a quick weekend away. Just enough for a hotel room and childcare for a day or two. I'm not thinking of a trip to Aruba here—just a quick weekend away from the house to reconnect. They deserve something like that. If you could pass on any ideas, I'd appreciate it.
Nice Eggs In Georgia Haven't 
I'm a 40+ year old woman. I've been practically married to a man who will be 50 soon. No kids. Just a condo. We have not had sex in a very, very, very long time. It's been years.
We had a pregnancy scare eight years ago. Maybe it was a miscarriage. Or Aunt Flow was really, really late. But, I peed on the stick and we made arrangements to terminate. I was able to cancel the appointment a day or so before. We did a happy dance then kept our hands to ourselves. He kept talking about getting a vasectomy. I didn't think it was necessary but he hasn't wanted to have sex since then. I was ok with the arrangement for a year or two, but then I cheated.
I never told him. I live with the guilt but he's finally getting around to making the necessary appointment to get the vasectomy. I haven't asked why, yet. I think it has to do with a fight we had where he kept saying that tries to make me happy. It was a fight about money which means it wasn't really about money. I guess he thought it was about my being unhappy. We so rarely fight neither so of us particularly good at working through the problem. Or we never fight because we don't want to confront our problem. Maybe he thinks that a vasectomy will mean sex which will mean I'm happy. I plan to ask about it soon but I haven't because I realized that I don't want to have sex with him. I do want to have sex with someone, and soon. I'm bored going at it alone.
My problem is, how do I end what's been overall a great relationship? He's thoughtful. He cares about me very much. He honestly really does love me and does so much to show me. And I love him. He really does want me to be happy. But I am squiked out at the thought of sex with him again. We had a nice little companionate thing going. But that's not okay with me anymore.
I know that living alone after 20 years with a partner will be very challenging. We split the household duties and expenses right down the middle. He really does a lot to keep our household going. He's always a trooper for fetching provisions in the middle of winter. Then there's a mortgage for a money pit of a condo that we're upside down in (which started the fight that led to the vasectomy appointment).
I don't want to hurt him by cheating again. But I'm no longer sexually attracted to him. So it's time to end this relationship, right?
Please help. I'm losing sleep nightly thinking about this.

Unsatisfied troglodyte here. I'm a straight regular bloke with a rather high sex drive. I've had both long- and short-term relationships, was even married for a short time, but the sad constant in my relationships is that after the first few months it's all downhill sexually for me. I understand that relationships have to evolve towards a more stable and comfortable phase with less sexual animality, but that really kills it for me. I have always found myself wanting more sexually from my partners than they're capable of delivering after that first adrenaline driven phase, and that frustrates me to no end. I don't know whether it's unrealistic expectations or a seriously biased selection of low sex drive partners, but I'm yet to find a relationship that sexually satisfies me. So the question is, am I a troglodyte that can't be satiated, or do I have a problem selecting my partners? I'm kind of resigned to never finding a good long-term relationship because of this, and it's a bummer. A serious bummer. Any ideas?

I'm a woman in my mid-30s and I've been dating a guy for five months now, having been friends with him for two years before that. For the past three months it's been long distance as I've been traveling. When I left home, he was very sad about  me leaving and we spent a lot of time together. I just wasn't sad about it at all and started to feel claustrophobic, but put it down to the fact that it was me going away—everyone always says it's harder for the person left behind. Since I've been away he's come to meet me twice, for a couple of days each time. On Skype he's been insecure and overly sensitive and constantly picking fights and it's put me off him. I have spent hours on the phone dealing with his meltdowns. When he came to visit I dreaded it, and I was relieved when he left, although we got along ok when we were together. 
This week I realized I want to end this as I can't imagine it being a long-term thing when he's so insecure. I'm heading home tomorrow, so I could do it then, but the trouble is we have a vacation booked together with several mutual friends the following weekend. My question is should I leave it until after that trip or is it better to rip that bandaid off right away? I don't want to be cruel or string him along—he's a great guy and a good friend—but I also don't want to dump him as soon as I get back after he's waited for me for three months. And I don't want to ruin/cancel this trip. 
If I leave it until after the vacation it'll be three weeks from now. Is it better to date him for three more weeks knowing I am going to end it? I really don't want to be an asshole.

I'm a 28-year-old gay male. My current boyfriend recently became upset about the fact that I occasionally looked at craigslist ads for masturbatory purposes for the first few months of our 8-month relationship. The thing is, we met via Craigslist, and two months into dating, I saw he had posted an ad. I actually found it because I had a "feeling" and lo and behold I was correct. I used it as an opportunity to discuss expectations, not to accuse him of anything. He denied he was actively trying to meet someone. That night he told me that he got off to Craiglist ads, too, and we agreed looking was very different from posting naked photos of ourselves with an invitation to our homes for all to see... 
I thought maybe we'd bond over our voyeuristic/exhibitionist tendencies and was excited about this common interest. So of course, his being upset about this confuses me. He also recently got upset when he saw a text of mine that confirmed I had hooked up with someone a week after our first date. What he doesn't know is that I know he was hooking up with people during our first month of dating. There was a separate incident since we got together. What gives? I'm being accused of suspicious behavior when technically I've behaved according to our agreed-upon expectations and he's the one that stepped outside the bounds of it twice? Why?
Confused About Boyfriend's 
I'm a gay guy in my twenties who is reluctantly attracted to older guys. I don't ever see myself marrying someone who is twenty years older than me, I could never be in a public relationship with one either, and I can think of a number of other reasons why I shouldn't find DILFs attractive, but I like them nonetheless. I don't need to think about whether or not I could marry every guy I look at or go home with, but I've never had a boyfriend and I'm tired of it. I want to stop wasting my time ogling guys I can't pursue something substantial with.
I'm in a conservative town in the south where it's hard to come by anyone I'm interested in, let alone someone close to my age, so I'm wondering if I'm just making this struggle worse for myself in the long run by ogling older men and if I should go cold-turkey from DILFs. Or should I accept my fate, try to start something discreet with an older guy, and stay in the DILF closet until the years between myself and my DILFs has narrowed, and just hope a young, future DILF catches my eye before I actually reach that point.

First, thank you. I've read Savage Love for probably 15 years now and I made it out of my twenties disease-free and sane because of you. Thank you for all the guidance.
I'm a bi woman, currently married, and a CPOS. I've been with my husband for 8.5 years, married for 5 of them. I've cheated emotionally and physically a few times and was caught a few weeks ago. I had already been planning on leaving my husband but this accelerated things. We aren't in love anymore and we aren't happy. Sex with him kills my libido. Our needs aren't getting met.
I asked him for a divorce this week, but he had a response for every reason I had to split. And he actually listened to me for once, he didn't just hear me. He opened up (he's extremely private) and he wanted to give it one last shot. I agreed, because I really do love him and wish it would work. My problem is, I don't see him as a sexual being. Yeah he's cute and I know he has needs. I just don't look at him like I do other men (and the occasional lady). So how do I see my husband as sexual? I think this is my biggest hurdle. If I can, then I will be able to not cheat—or at least give it a fair shot.
Originally posted on October 22, 2014.
I'm a twentysomething married trans guy in an openish marriage. In the online hunt for a guy to have some aboveboard, under-the-sheets fun with, I run into snags because I'm trans (I disclose on my profile) and because I'm married. I'm baby-stepping my way toward an offline search for guys, going to events hosted by the local gay pride center. I've been thinking of not wearing my wedding ring at these meet-ups, as I worry it says I'm taken and off-limits. Would it be dishonest for me to present as unmarried as long as I make it clear that I'm not looking for romance?
Totally On-
Half of my extended family are white supremacists and one of them is getting married soon. I have learned it's pointless to initiate fights about their beliefs, but they tend to start one with me every year or two. I am much smarter then they are (which is not bragging—you don't have to be that smart to out-think a white supremacist), so I'm good at ending these fights in a way that leaves them feeling upset and humiliated. The negative reinforcement causes them to attempt these confrontations progressively less frequently, leaving me free to enjoy the company of my non-racist relatives while having only the blandest and most minimal engagement with the bigots, and it seemed like a good workaround for how to navigate our holiday get-togethers. (My friends chastise me for not delivering eloquent speeches about racial harmony to open my relatives eyes, but it's pointless—they've made it to adulthood believing slavery was a great deal for the slaves, because blacks are lazy and what's more relaxing than slave labor? These people are too far gone for any eloquent speeches to reach them.)
The problem is this: Donald Trump has emboldened these relatives.
In their minds, Trump has already won, and a golden age of ethnic cleansing is about to begin. Their confidence is sky high and they're going to want to do a little preemptive gloating at this wedding. On some occasions in the past, they have tried to start with me at inappropriate times (wedding of non-crazy relative, funeral, at grandmother's deathbed). At those times, I just shut it down and refused to engage.
So... to which category does this wedding belong? It's the bride, groom, best man, and parents of the groom who I'm most concerned about wanting to fight with me, so these people who are central to the day. When they start in on how wonderful America will be once all the Hispanics and Muslims have been purged, do I shut it down and step away? Or do I shame, insult, and degrade them, like I normally would if they made the same statements at Christmas or Thanksgiving? As a gay man, it's been difficult to find the equilibrium in which I can maintain both my own sense of decency and my family connections, and it was a relief when I finally found this approach of, "I'm not going to start a fight, but when you bring one to me, I will not hold back." But I also have a drilled-in sense of Midwestern politeness that makes it feel unthinkable to viciously rip into someone on their wedding day.
These confrontations have been decreasing in frequency, but I am so consistently triumphant, I'm always surprised they make any attempts to fight with me at all. How should I conduct myself here?

I’m not sure if you’ll read this but if you do I could use some advice.
Hi, I'm a woman, I live in Utah, I'm 20 years old and I'm NOT a Mormon. I have been in a monogamous relationship for two years. Note, my first. We don’t live together, never have, which I love. Now don’t judge me, but he’s been the only person I’ve had sex with. Not for any other reason other than, I’m picky as hell, and he’s been the only one I’ve been into. I know what your probably thinking “this girl needs to get out and experience other people." Probably, but I don’t really have the desire to, maybe one day... but not today. I’m happy, I like him. He’s been with other girls, before we became serious, and its honestly never bothered me. 
I have never really been that sexual. Maybe its because I’ve been on the pill sense I was 16? I’ve been contemplating getting off it for months now, in hopes doing so will raise my libido. Maybe because Ive been diagnosed with depression & anxiety? I don’t know. But I honestly feel something is wrong with me. I’m convinced I’m broken. Because I can’t get off. I enjoy sex with my boyfriend, I mean I’m in love with the kid, yet I rarely start the fooling around. It's usually him, which most of the time I can get into. But I’ve never orgasmed with there or without him there. I also don’t masturbate. I never have the urge to. And I mean NEVER. I’ve tried, for the sake of it, yet nothing seems to work. Vibrators and old school, nothing happens. I don’t like porn, and I can’t help but only fantasize about my boyfriend because he’s all I know. Nothing works.
Now I KNOW your pro porn! And frankly everyone I have asked advice from is too. So please go easy on me. I hate porn. I think its gross, demeaning towards women, and ghetto! I don’t think its “wrong” as in people shouldn’t watch it, it just doesn’t turn me on. But I want to be able to like it, I don’t want to have such a huge problem with it. Yet, I do. I've tried watching straight porn, lesbian porn, romantic. It doesn’t work, so I’ve just given up.
So, it doesn’t work for me, but it does work for my boyfriend. Some part of me wishes it didn’t. Like duh, every guy yanks their dicks to porn. I know. I know its normal, I know I shouldn’t shame him. But I can’t help it. It makes me sad. I cry every time I think about him getting off to someone other than me. (That's a problem too, huh? Yeah, I know.) I don’t know what kind he watches, which to be honest scares me. Is he into rape porn, other stuff I definitely wouldn’t be okay with? I try to get him to show me, try to get him to open up with me, but of course he won’t. And it's my fault, because I get upset every time this topic comes up. He knows I don’t like it. So his way of fixing this is hiding that part of his sexuality from me, and ignoring it. So yeah, this has been an ongoing issue for us for about a year now.
Sex with him is good. Despite the fact I never come and he’s always coming! Too quickly, I may add. He tries to take care of me but I just get frustrated and we eventually stop. I’m left hanging and he’s feeling fulfilled. I know he’s into me, I know he cares about me. But I can’t help be self-conscious about our sex life, knowing he watches porn. In an episode of your podcast you mentioned how we can’t fulfill everything for our partner, and some part of me understands that. The other part of me gets sad and mad, I feel if I knew why, and watched porn myself this wouldn’t be such an issue.
So Dan… help me. I know this is a lot, but I’m desperate for help.

I'm a 22-year-old woman and my fiancé is about to turn 31. We've been together for three years. In the last year we moved up to Seattle, WA, just as a change of scenery from Colorado. We started out as friends with benefits and merged into a relationship. We've been exclusive this whole time, but over the course of time sex began to dwindle. I tried explaining to him what I liked in bed and it just would never get there and so neither would I for the most part. He also had pretty much stopped helping around the house at all. So I'm over here working full time just like him but I have to do ALL the things that make our lives run smoothly—bill paying, grocery shopping, laundry, cleaning—while having almost NO sex. Oh, and he is obsessed with playing games on his phone and doesn't really like to converse with me. I made many requests for help and for him to be more present in our relationship, to no avail.
Until two weeks ago, I was hanging out with one of my female friends and a male friend of hers joined us and he ended up making an advance... and I didn't stop him... and it just happened. Regardless, I made a mistake and my fiancé snooped and found some things on my phone that were not intended for his eyes. 
And that's where we are now.
I understand what I did was wrong. I should have been up front about what I was feeling. Now we're in the mix of trying to figure out if we can work this out. I suggested an open relationship and he said that's a hard no. Now I feel like I'm stuck in between a rock and a hard place. I'm sure we could work something out and I do love him but am I going to be happy? He did agree to help more around the house but sex-wise? Conversation-wise? I'm feeling quite lost and confused. 

This is now the third time in as many months that I have attempted to write this letter—both my feelings towards my situation and the questions I have keep changing, so I’ve been struggling.
I have been with my husband for ten years, married for six. We have a six-month-old daughter.  When I was about eight and half months pregnant, he admitted to having an affair throughout most of my pregnancy. Rather than end the affair after admitting to it, he tried to find a way to keep both our marriage and his relationship with this other woman intact. I felt trapped by the fact that the arrival of our daughter was imminent, and wasn’t able to do much but sit by and hope that he would figure out that this was not a healthy way (or time) to open our marriage.  About two months into our daughter's life, he realized that his actions were creating emotional chaos for all parties involved, and ended the affair dead cold.
Understandably, we are still working through the aftermath. While the trust is slowly being rebuilt, where we are still struggling is our sexual connection. He met the other woman through Fetlife, and their connection was built on a D/s relationship focused on rough and degrading sex (nothing too varsity—light slapping, restraints, hair pulling, name calling). I have always been GGG, but he never talked to me about these interests, and decided on his own that he needed these interests fulfilled outside of our marriage. This was truly heartbreaking to me, as I would have been happy to explore these kinks with him, but he never gave me the chance.
Flash forward to today. Unlike most new moms, I was ready to jump back into bed early on. The affair has given us a chance to talk about sex and our interests, but my husband has been quite reticent to talk openly about these particular fetishes. I am still feeling incredibly insecure about my sexuality and my ability to keep him sexually engaged, which is why I keep asking him to share with me. We are having sex regularly, typically after me initiating, but he generally seems tired and bored, exacerbating my insecurity. Last night, I told him I wanted him to rough me up, and we engaged in some light BDSM play, but it felt like he was holding back.  He’s said he’s enjoyed it all, including last night.
Is it foolish to keep pushing him to explore these interests with me? Should I take him at his word when he says he’s enjoying sex with me? How do I get back to feeling strong, sexy and confident again, and for him to get back to feeling excited and aroused by me? I really want us to enjoy sex with each other again. Should I just give it time?

My husband and I have been together 17 years, married for two. We are a pair of gay guys facing a dilemma. My husband is the primary source of our income, and he's earned a very nice company retreat through his achievements, which allowed for a spouse to attend. Since we are now married, he opted to include me. However, since this retreat will include many of his clients and coworkers, to whom he is closeted, we are both feeling nervous about how this will affect his relationships with them as he relies on commission for our financial well being. 
His concerns weigh on the idea that he has allowed many of his clients to assume his wedding ring symbolizes a heterosexual marriage, and in the face of his husband, they will view his omission of the whole truth as a trust issue. I don't want to do anything to jeopardize our financial future because he is hauling income at a rate I could never hope to achieve, so I am completely willing to keep myself at a minimum, but the cat will be out of the bag, so to speak. I'm wondering if there is a better way to approach this situation. I have a great deal of social anxiety and am not sure if I can approach the people he works with as myself, or if I should adopt some kind of neutered persona, or recuse myself as much as possible. He assumes the clients attending are mostly conservative. 
I ended my senior year of college this past May, and obviously it was one of the hardest goodbyes in my life so far. Saying goodbye to my friends was difficult, but there was one friend in particular that made the goodbye heartbreaking. I find myself thinking about this one person all the time and I can't figure out if I'm crazy or if he thinks about me too. Sorry if this is long I have a lot to say.
I had been friends with this guy since freshman year, and when I first really knew who he was I told myself I would never have sex with him. Of course I ended up having sex with him sometime around Halloween of last year. I've had sex with friends before, but this time was different because he's a dog. At first I was embarrassed to have hooked up with him, and then it became a regular occurrence. We never talked about it, and we even went through the a short period of time the following semester that felt weird. Still nothing was said.
I was under the impression there was no commitment and that he only came back with me for sex. I started to think that hooking up with someone else might have upset him because that had happened and he started acting differently toward me. Then I saw him make out with someone right in front of me and even though we had not done anything in a while it still hurt. Eventually, one night he hung out and talked to me like he used to. We went home together, and from then on every weekend, sometimes more than once, we would end up with each other.
It almost became a routine for me to watch him hit on other girls and then, when they left, he'd come to me. It happened so often it became annoying to me, but I still continued to let it go on because it was senior year. I knew this was who he was. Not like I didn't do the same thing occasionally.
It became common knowledge amongst our peers that we would go home together all the time. That's when him hooking up with other girls really started to effect me. I would go somewhere, the bathroom, outside, to cool off, and pretend it didn't bother me. I would know some type of flirting was going on, people would point it out to me, and then I had to disappear for a second. I told myself that the way I was feeling was just a consequence of getting into bed with him all the time, and that it wasn't to be taken seriously because I didn't take him seriously. Finally the day came where something happened that crossed the line and I had to face my feelings. 
There was a huge party one Saturday that continued into the night. During the day we found each other alone in his house, and one thing led to another. After we had sex we went to another party, and since we were seniors, everyone collectively blacked out. My best friend who was dating his roommate told me the next day that he brought home someone else. She saw him that morning and told me he seemed nervous. It wasn't until that moment that I realized how I really felt about the whole thing.
I kept saying I didn't want to feel this way, and I didn't want to have a "conversation," but I knew it had to happen. At first I went radio silent because I. Was. Pissed. I was so messed up over him going home with someone else less than twelve hours after he slept with me.
He texted me one day with a question. I answered with, "I need to talk to you." I was scared that he would respond to it how most guys have in the past (even guy friends), but he didn't. We wound up driving around and I told him that it may seem like I'm unaffected by things but I pick up on more than most. I told him that I knew and that I saw him with other girls and how most people would have lost their sh*t by now. I said I didn't ask much of him but it felt like he didn't give a single care about me and that made me feel awful but the worst part was I had so much fun with him and I didn't want to regret spending time with him. I ended by telling him he could do what he wanted because I knew who he was and wasn't going to ask him to change, but I wanted him to treat me with respect because I'm not some random one-night stand. He said that he was a jerk, and he never would wish for me to feel the way I did. He genuinely apologized, and even said if we had more time he would make things legit with me. I brushed that last part off because I didn't want to take it seriously. He was patient, understanding, and kind, and he did not deny a single thing I said. I walked away feeling a greater appreciation for him, and after that talk he opened up to me more. Only small bits at a time, and usually while he was drunk, but he opened up.
When I saw my friends from school, including him, for the first time since May I didn't expect anything from him. I was just happy that I was with him. He ended up talking to me the whole night and, just like riding a bike, I woke up next to him once more. He told me I should move there, and right before he left, invited me to his house for one more night.
I can't help, but wonder if that conversation in the car back in May changed things for him. I don't even necessarily want any sort of "official relationship" with him. However, I am moving closer to him soon, and I would love to get to know more about him. He's not an easy book to read.
I was wondering if you could give me any thoughts on the way things have played out?
I'm a 51-year-old male, married to an amazing lady for over twenty years. Our sex life is great and I love her more than words can express. She's been bi-curious for years and we are discreetly looking for the elusive single female to join us, the ultimate straight guy fantasy as I'd get to watch my wife with another woman and also get to enjoy the new partner as well. We met one person for a drink but she didn't do it for us. I have no doubt we'll one day find our elusive unicorn and have a blast. So far so good.
My reason for writing is that I've finally admitted to myself that I'm bi-curious too.
I'm especially turned on by the idea of joining a male/female couple, especially a married couple, where the other male is also bi. 
I saw an ad a few days ago that got me hard almost immediately—a married couple in my area, in my age range, nice photos of middle aged bodies, and they sound like a lot of fun. They're twenty minutes away from our place. I have non-sexual interests that my wife's not into, so I could make time to have fun with this couple and my wife would never know. On the flip side, there's a part of me that thinks I should show her this ad to see if she's okay me answering it or others like it. The problem is that if she says no to my desire, then how can I ever indulge this part of me?
This is really tough as there has never been anything I was afraid to discuss with my wife until now. Your advice would be greatly appreciated.
Reliable Husband's You are a fucking degenerate and the fact that you actually have people believing you are giving helpful and knowledgeable advice is shameful. I sincerely hope you kill yourself before you drag any more people into that cesspool of a mind of yours.
Here's my dilemma I need your help with: I started dating my girlfriend back in January 2016, things were going wonderfully until this weekend. She owns her house and rents out rooms to three individuals. One of her tenants is a past boyfriend. I've know about this all along and didn't have any issues with their living arrangements. On Friday night, her ex was home and was super drunk when I arrived at her place. He said he wanted to show me something in his room and we went down to his room and he pulled a knife on me and asked me a bunch of questions about my current girlfriend, aka his ex and current landlord.
After I got out of his room I immediately went upstairs and told my girlfriend what had just happened, and I told her I wasn't comfortable staying at her place for the weekend, and that I was going to go home and she could come stay at my place if she didn't feel safe in her own home. We both left for my place and stayed there until Sunday. 
On Sunday she sent him a text message, saying that he has thirty days to move out. He said he was sorry for being so drunk and claimed he didn't remember anything about that night and asked for a second chance. She stood her ground and told him that he had to move out.
Now it's Monday, and I talked with my girlfriend today and she told me that she had a long conversation with him and now is going to give him a second chance. I told her I don't feel safe around him sober or not and I never want to see him again, additionally I will never go over to her house if he is still living there. No physical harm was done to me but it was a traumatic situation and there's emotional pain.
Now I feel betrayed by both of them and this is where I need your help. I love this girl, but now I'm apprehensive about continuing a relationship with her. 
A question, sir, if I may. I'm a bi guy in my forties who enjoys swinging the other way more and more. I rarely do anal, and am always safe when I do, but my question involves oral. I absolutely love giving head, but how exactly do I do this and stay safe? People say always use a condom. But do people give head with condoms? What am I exposing myself to by giving head bareback? I don't want to get some type or oral STI, obviously. Any advice?
Originally posted on November 26, 2014.
I am a bi male in my early 20s who until recently was in the closet. I have been exploring my sexuality for the past year, and I didn't want to label myself and open a Pandora's box of oppression in the American South before I knew who I was for sure. I learned through my exploration that I have a few kinks and I have been acting on those kinks, seeing what I am and am not into. I may have been too trusting, because someone I interacted with decided that he was having none of me. This person took it upon himself to find all the info he could about me, regarding kinks as well as my career and other aspects of my life, and compile it on a website. He then sent links to several of my friends and family members. He never gave an explanation for why he was doing this. My family has been very supportive, and the few close friends I've spoken to have been great. But how do I talk to other friends when I see them? My life is out in the open now. I am trying my best to roll with it and become more comfortable with myself, but it is a struggle. These people are close to me, and I value their friendship. I don't believe they think poorly of me, but I am uncomfortable knowing that they have seen a part of me that I was trying to keep somewhat compartmentalized. How can I approach the situation without making it more uncomfortable and awkward?
Originally posted on December 10, 2014.
I love your column, Dan, but I wanted to clear something up. Recently someone wrote to you that they—or their spouse—wanted to have a threesome, but only if it happened "naturally." You said that was impossible: "Three-ways don't happen that way," you said. But I'm proof that they do. I am a female in my mid-20s, and I've been openly bi since I was 12. I'm not particularly fond of threesomes, but I go with the flow. I've already had three happen naturally, and one "almost" that I stopped due to "timing issues." (Three MFF and one FFF.) My advice: If you can get a three-way massage or a game of strip-anything going, you're in for the gold. Alcohol really helps, too.
Originally posted on December 10, 2014.
My intelligent, lovely, in-all-ways-phenomenal 18-year-old daughter just came out to me: as asexual! I am struggling with my reaction to this. If she had said she was a lesbian, I would have been fine with it, except for all that discrimination and stuff. I will always support her, but I can't help but think that (1) something bad happened to her that (despite my near-helicopter parenting) I don't know about, and/or (2) she'll miss out! Is asexuality really a thing? Can it be some sort of opt-out-of-this-sex-stuff-until-later thing? 'Cause that I get.
Originally posted on December 3, 2014.
This girl just hit a bump with her boyfriend. I offered to do something he secretly wanted to try, and he said, "Urinate on me." I get the fantasy—surrender, being marked, the naughtiness. However, I can't imagine liking it and I do not want to build it into our repertoire. Set aside that I have no idea how to do it so it's sexy, safe, and sanitary. Is it okay to negotiate "one-and-done" and put it on my "No" list afterward?
I’m a big fan, faithful reader or your work, and subscriber to the Magnum Savage Lovecast. I listened to podcast 512, and wanted to write you regarding a specific caller. It was the caller who was a BDSM educator who was hesitant and fearful about how her vocation and choices would affect her daughter.
The gist of your advice was to move. I’ve heard you offer this advice to others in similar situations before. You make it sound so easy. Just move. Then you went on to list more supportive cities—San Francisco (median home value $1,127,400), Oakland (median home value $616,300), Portland (median home value $378,600 and rising), Seattle (median home value $585,400), or Chicago (median home value in surrounding Chicago is $208,300 and rising).
I realize there is a social cost to being openly sex-positive—especially if it affects our kids. However, one needs to be realistic about finding work and being able to afford to live in cities like Los Angeles, New York, or the other cities you listed. Not everyone is so lucky, talented, capable, or rich enough to simply get up and move. There are still a lot of people struggling in the aftermath of the Republican Recession that took hold in 2008. (For many of us the only extended breaks, or “vacations”, we’ve had were the times we’ve been  between jobs.)
I suggest instead that those of us who are sex-positive stand up to this negativity, shame, and oppression and do our best to educate. I realize I may be naïve. It’s an uphill battle—especially for the “think of the children!” crowd. But we cannot continue to retreat to scattered enclaves, especially when in the long run it’ll be to everyone’s benefit to let go of the fear and ignorance that for too long has surrounded consensual sexual expression. Those who refuse to see and be appropriately educated must suffer the social cost of losing out on our support and friendship. (Do we really want friends who are shaming and so judgmental?)
Again, for some people my suggestion may be as unrealistic as your advice. I’ll admit that. We could go into the whole lack of appropriate, consistent, quality sex education issue, but I feel I’ve taken enough of your time. Hopefully I’ve made my point.
I hope you are well. I'm at 27-year-old straight woman, looking to open a sex-positive shop in a fairly large city. There's nothing like it so far, and I know there's a need for one. I use to teach sexual health in high schools many years ago, but all of the funding for sexed was cut and unfortunately I lost my job. Since then I've been trying to find the perfect way to continue work in the field, and contribute in a positive way. Any tips on opening your own sex-positive shop? A This is a short plea for advice. I'm a 30-year-old straight female. I recently started dating a man who, due to a recent surgical procedure, cannot currently engage in intercourse. I am very smitten with him, and open to engaging in sex by other means, but I am not sure how to suggest this to him. We've been making-out a lot, and he is definitely into me, and I would love to give him a blow job, but I don't know him that well so I'm not sure how to mention this without sounding like a weirdo. I know I'm probably overthinking the situation, but my ex was not very sex-positive, and acted like I was super deviant for enjoying sucking dick. Long story short, I guess I'm afraid of saying something that might cause my new beau to think I'm too kinky? Any guidance you could offer would be very much appreciated.
Hesitancy Understandable Given Ex's I am sexually aroused by daddy/daughter role-play. I have no experience with it, but for many years have been extremely turned on by the idea of having sex with a man who pretends to be my father. I have been talking to a man online about this and our conversations are getting explicit. In the back of my mind I'm worried that he may be actually be into children. He has a daughter. Should I be worried that he fantasizes about her? Or actually abuses her?
I have recently started dating a guy who identifies as poly. I never thought I'd be into that lifestyle, however after meeting this guy, I found  myself open to the idea. Intellectually, I can totally get my head around the benefits of a poly lifestyle. And while I have no moral judgements about the lifestyle, I also have zero personal experience dealing with the unique issues that are bound to come up.  
So, help me out with the Unicorn thing.
My partner has been super gentle and patient and hasn't pushed me into anything uncomfortable.So far our sex life has been great but it hasn't included anyone else and he's not actively dating anyone else at the moment. Neither of us is into same-sex sex; we are fully heterosexual. He's communicated that multi-partner scenarios is something he really loves, I want to please him and I'm ready to venture out a bit. I also have zero experience with multi-partner sex. We have decided to go to a swingers club and experiment.  He described the club as a couples-only venue. I checked out the website and it actually allows couples AND single women while prohibiting single men.  
My boyfriend explained that Unicorns—I just learned the definition—are allowed but if single guys were allowed it would just be a bunch of men jerking off. "Not sexy" he says. Well, not sexy for who? This feels like a double standard perpetuated by a patriarchal view of the sexes. Why is it that women can be Unicorns but there is no male equivalent? Why can't the swinger community accommodate single men but welcome single women? I mean this club has all sorts of rules, why not make rules to mitigate the propensity for a circle jerk and allow everyone equal access to the experience?  
I'm new to all this so I'd LOVE to hear your insight, advice and opinion on this topic.
I am a 34-year-old gay male who just came out last year. Long story short, I grew up in a horrible conservative church and felt a lot of shame about being gay for the longest time. I've known I was gay for as long as I can remember, so I've never had a relationship with a girl (I didn't want to risk hurting anyone). But at the same time I was so afraid of damnation that I never allowed myself to have anything with a guy either. Over the last few years I've given up religion, I've come to accept that being gay is okay, and I came out to nearly everyone in my life. Anyway...
So, here I am, 34 years old, and I've never had sex. Up until two days ago I'd never even kissed anyone. The issue I'm having, is that I've met this really fantastic guy. We clicked through text almost instantly, met that night for a coffee date, and talked for four hours. We met a day later for breakfast and spent another three hours talking, and afterwards he gave me my first kiss. (I feel so lame that I had my first kiss at 34.) We met again for coffee the next night, but just sat in my car talking about what we both want from a possible relationship and kissing a bit.
He's really patient, he was giving me tips on how to kiss better, etc., and of course we ended up talking about sex. I've been completely honest with him about being a virgin and let him know that I'm excited but also scared about starting a relationship. But regarding sex... I am literally freaking... the fuck... out. I told him I'm nervous, that I have some body shame issues, and that I'm not sure if I'm ready to have sex yet. He's assured me that he'll be patient and let me control the pace about how fast we move towards having sex, but I'm still literally terrified, and I'm not sure how to move past that. I really like him and I do want to have sex with him eventually (soon), but the fear is pretty debilitating. Should I just give it a week or so and see if we can build more trust before trying anything? Or should I just bite the bullet and force myself through the fear? Do you think I should find a therapist?  
Terrified 34-Year-My partner proposed to me on May 16, 2016, after dating and living together for three years. We had planned a September 2016 wedding. Soon after we got engaged we started trying for a baby. I got pregnant right away. I was shocked and nervous to tell him and his response was, "That's great, that's what we wanted!" On July 18th my partner told me that he wanted to end our engagement and asked me to have an abortion. I was completely blindsided by this. He said he has been ignoring how unhappy he's been and at times feels alone in the relationship. He doesn't want to be with me anymore and thinks there is someone better for him. He is unwilling to work on our relationship, he has moved out, and he doesn't want to participate in the pregnancy. Is this normal? 
This is in reference to the second letter in your column today (it was also the July 27th SLLOTD on SLOG). I am a good friend of the writer's wife. I'm writing this of my own volition, though I got her permission before sending.
I am writing simply because I am sick of this prick's manipulative actions and believe you should know the whole story (and how he involved you in it). He didn't just cheat before they were married; he cheated multiple times with multiple women after they were married and never disclosed. (Note: the women he cheated with were sex workers. While I am 100% pro sex worker, there is a higher risk of STIs that comes with that profession and I am angry he continued to sleep with my friend without her knowing that she faced that increased risk). The cheating was both physical and emotional. A few weeks prior to the cheating coming to light, he had moved out to "work on himself and their relationship." She was being supportive of his needs and giving him space. 
Once she found the evidence she was incredibly mad, but got into therapy and was still open to reconciliation. To his credit, he sought treatment for sex addiction and substance abuse and also got into therapy. Now here's the kicker: He never told her the relationship was over. She was still open to reconciliation, and was trying to work towards forgiveness to see if they still had a shot. SHE FOUND OUT IT WAS OVER BY READING HIS LETTER TO YOU. When she asked him about the letter, he would only communicate with her via text, casually mentioned that he is going to date other people, and feigned surprise that she didn't know it was over. At every turn he has manipulated reality to fit his needs. He's obviously too big of a coward to admit he doesn't want to do the work to repair the marriage, and is now acting out in hopes she will divorce him. Thankfully for those of us who love her, I think it worked. That small bit of hope she had is now gone.
Your advice to PGMN in this week's Savage Love reminded me of my own situation, but my point-of-view is similar to the husband's—with some key differences. Instead of being years old, my girlfriend and I have only been together for six months. Things started out great but we moved too quickly. 
I'm in my early thirties and, despite sometimes crippling anxiety and a non-traditional "career", I have my shit together and have always prided myself on my independence. She's a bit younger and still in college and had been living in the dorms until this summer. Instead of moving back home (eight hours away), we agreed that she would stay with me between semesters as kind of a test run to see if we could live together. When I told her recently that this wasn't working for me and she should move back into the dorm, she informed me that the deadline for that had already passed. Now she is looking for an apartment but she doesn't make enough to afford one on her own.
I feel like she has taken advantage of me (she pays no rent, but does help, a little, with chores) and that she has become co-dependent on me (a huge turn-off). As a result, I've grown emotionally distant and taken to long walks playing Pokemon Go to get out of the house and away from her. Likewise, my anxiety is as bad as it has ever been and I'm drinking more than I ever have (which still isn't a lot, but is worrisome since I come from a family of alcoholics). It's true I don't want to break her heart, but even more than that, I don't want to fuck up her future by kicking her out (which would mean she would likely have to drop out of school and move back home), but I feel like continuing to help her is harming me. I don't know that I even want to break up, but I definitely need a break and some time to myself to level out. I'm trying to honor the campsite rule, but I am at my wit's end and just don't know what to do.
I'm a mostly heterosexual woman in my mid-30s in a very vanilla relationship with my husband for the past 14 years. My husband is a great guy. We get along really well as do our families, which is so important to me. Our domestic lives and the day to day are comfortable, easy and we make a great team. We've had relationship issues all along, and we've never really resolved things in a way that makes me feel like he's taking my concerns seriously. 
For years I've struggled with our sexual relationship. He takes and he does not give. He touches me in intimate areas in a way that feels like he's a teenager—hedonistically groping with no intention to give pleasure with his touch, and incapable of discerning the difference when I call him out on it. He does not make eye contact during sex, and indeed feels like he is not at all present. He insists on wearing a condom because he doesn't like sex to be messy. He won't put his hands or mouth anywhere. Intercourse lasts about 5 minutes and after he comes he apologizes and asks where my toys are. Not for us to play together, but for me to go off and satisfy myself, by myself. He makes me feel like a blow up doll. He doesn't like to talk about sex. He refuses to engage in any entendres, saying that that kind of talk is "rude."
He is not GGG (not even one G) and whenever I've begged him to be even just a little bit GGG, such as going down on me, he is really not into it and so I cut it short, feeling like I've violated the campsite rule and asked too much of him. Tired of this one way street for so many years, I stopped having sex with him.
About six years ago, I did what you've suggested to so many of your readers: do what I gotta do to stay married and stay sane. I had an affair. Followed by a string of affairs—some FWBs, some casual, some long term.
I've been seeing someone on and off for the last three years. What started out as a casual thing ended up catching feelings in a big way. Naturally the sex is mind-blowingly good and he's GGG as fuck. He makes me feel like giving me pleasure is his favorite thing in the world. We talk about everything and our views align on so many things. We've talked about starting our lives over together. But this man has a family with young kids and to top it all off they've moved to the other side of the world. He's in no position to begin again with me, and there's no viable future together in the short or medium term, but we can't stay away from each other. He has jealousy and paranoia issues which sometimes flare up (not completely unwarranted as we did start out as an affair), and he's not great at self-moderating those feelings, sometimes at great cost to our relationship. 
Last year my husband and I separated for some months and we saw a counselor but never got around to talking about the sex. He begged me to come back, and when I did, the counseling stopped. All the old issues have crept back in and I'm left wondering whether I've made a huge mistake. 
So now I'm back in my sexless marriage, having a sexless long distance affair. I feel stuck. Where to from here?

I am a 28-year-old homoflexible woman. My girlfriend/partner of eight years (who I co-own a house with) has dumped me after falling for her fuck buddy. I am such a wreck. We decided to open up our relationship about six months ago. It was a mutual decision because we were actually in a good place and both felt secure enough to do that. She has a higher sex drive than me and I wanted her to feel fulfilled so I encouraged her to find someone she could have sex with in addition to me. Well, she found this girl about 2.5 months ago and now has decided that she doesn't want to be with me anymore. Throughout those two months, she was really inconsiderate whenever she spent time with this girl: not telling me when she would be home, coming home hours after she said she would, spending the night with her even when I asked that she take a break from spending the night. I guess I should've seen it coming. But it still hurts so much. 
I know that the end of the relationship doesn't mean that the relationship failed, but it feels like the last eight years were wasted because of how she has treated me recently. I feel so hurt by her that looking back at the good times we did have, they seem tainted. The main thing I need help on is how to move forward. We bought a house together so I have to see her all the time. It's really difficult to do that. She gets to have someone but I'm left pretty isolated (she was needy and I slowly gave up my friends over the years without realizing it). So I don't really have anyone to talk to and I have to see her every day. What should I do? I'm completely lost and I haven't eaten or gotten out of bed in three days. Life just doesn't seem like it's going to get better at this point, even though logically I know it will. Any advice you have for me moving forward would be so appreciated. 
(And I hate to have an example of an open relationship not working because I still believe in them. I know that this failed not because of the fact we were open, but because of how inconsiderate my girlfriend was.)
I have a kink f-buddy who I get together with to act out "kidnap" role play scenarios. A typical scenario is that we arrange for me to be walking down some deserted road or alley and he drives up in his leather cop outfit and arrests me or offers me a ride or something, only to overpower me, cuff me, and take me back to his dungeon for an interrogation. That’s all fine and good and we have a great time together. For a change of pace, my buddy has suggested that he actually knock me out.
He found a chemistry site that sells chloroform, and says he’d like to perform a scenario where he lures me to his SUV, then gets behind me and shoves a rag into my face, knocking me out and then tying me up and taking me away. I won’t try to deny that the idea of it doesn’t totally turn me on. I fantasized about it more than a few times, but I never actually thought I would get the chance to do it. Now, I’m not an idiot—I can’t imagine it is as easy and quick as it looked like when I watched “the Dukes of Hazzard” (Shut up! I was only 8!), but I am also slightly concerned about the safety of it. All the ‘torture’ stuff we do in my buddy’s basement I trust him to stay in control with. This however gives me some slight pause (but still also turns me on.) How safe (or dangerous) might it be, and does it even really work? If you could shed some light upon the topic I’d appreciate it.
Originally posted on June 2, 2014.
I am a single woman, 31, in LA, and on OkCupid. (We all are.) I've gotten a number of unicorn requests. (Maybe because I mention being a subscriber to the Savage Lovecast magnum version in my profile?) I've never responded—until the other day. One unicorn request stood out. I wrote back. They seem like cool, smart, interesting people (a 40-year-old liberal married couple). Their profile is funny, and they're quite attractive! And here I am, not doing anything else or anyone else... and I'm thinking... this could be cool. It could be an awesome experience. Why not play around while everything is still slim and perky? But! I have some concerns!
1. Uh... what now? I gave them my number, but I can't say that I'm definitely a YES on this. I'm also not a NO. What happens now? We meet for drinks? Then what?
2. I've never even had a one-night stand. I've pretty much always had boyfriends. I don't know what my question is here, it's just something I've been turning over in my head. I just don't want to feel like a hooker! (Not that there's anything wrong with being a sex worker!)
3. I'm not bi. I don't say that I'm bi on my OkCupid profile. I cannot imagine a scenario in which I would want to put my face in someone's twat. (I know you understand the feeling.) But I don't think I have any issue with being on the receiving end. (Maybe? I've never been a unicorn!) I've done the college playing-around-with-girls thing—topless make-outs for a boyfriend's viewing pleasure—but nothing crazy.
I think, if I meet them, and if it goes well, I should ask them what their thoughts are about this, if they've done it before, what their boundaries are, etc. I would confirm that if anyone feels uncomfortable, everyone involved has the green light to call a stop to the whole thing. I'd also lay out my limitation in regards to the wife. But... should I go for it? What should I do or say?
I am currently separated. A few months after I moved out, my estranged wife found out that I cheated on her before we got married. I was a CPOS. I feel horribly guilty and would like to think I'll never do it again.  The question is when and what should I disclose to future partners?
I am a 52-year-old straight male, married for almost 30 years. For most of those years, we've had a satisfying (albeit vanilla) sex life. In the last decade, my wife’s once quite healthy libido has dwindled considerably, to where sex is now 2-3 times a month, and, more often than not, she seems to me to be not very engaged. A few times a year, we'll have a flurry where it’s twice in the same weekend and she might seem a little more into it. I try to be GGG, but she not only doesn’t seem to care all that much about it being great for me, but she also doesn’t appear to care all that much about it being great for her. She always seemed to reach orgasm pretty easily, but now usually says no to me going down on her (which I’m very happy to do) and to foreplay in general (which I also enjoy). It feels to me like she usually just wants to get it over with. I often can't last long enough for her to come from intercourse alone, so it usually ends up frustrating for me, and I assume, for her, too.
Now, I am not another writer asking you to make my wife want sex more again.
I know you’re very powerful, but I don’t think you can do that. (Or can you?) Nor am I another guy asking if I should demand an open marriage or asking for your permission to cheat on my wife. I’m a dedicated monogamist who really has no interest in sex with anyone but my wife, except in my fantasies, of course. I love her, and while we've had our ups and downs, I'm completely dedicated to the success of our marriage.
Here’s my real question: She's kind of a dicktease. She engages in a lot more sex talk & innuendo than most middle-aged women seem to. She will frequently say things around the kids (who are adults), and around friends and acquaintances, that I’m sure everyone interprets as an indication of a healthy sexual desire and that we have a satisfying sex life (in terms of quantity and quality). She will fairly frequently say things to me that would be flat-out propositions if I said them, but more often than not they turn out to be bluffs. She also will grab my crotch or ass sometimes (not even all that discretely), but, again, it doesn’t seem to signal actual interest or intent. She’s an attractive and outgoing woman who has aged well—people undoubtedly think that she’s some kind of sexual free spirit and that I’m lucky as hell.
I’m trying to be reasonable about this whole thing: I know that libidos change, especially around menopause. I’m OK with masturbation being my primary sexual outlet, although I’d obviously prefer more (and, especially, better) partnered sex. We’ve communicated (reluctantly, on her part) about all of this, but I don’t constantly pester her for sex—that seems rude to me. When we were first together way back when, she wanted it every day, and I remember not liking to be hectored if I passed occasionally.
So, is it reasonable for me to ask her to either start walking the walk on the sexy talk or else shut the fuck up about it? I’m not entirely sure why it matters so much to me, but it irritates the shit out of me knowing that while I'm sexually frustrated and she's sexually disengaged and inattentive, everyone probably wishes they were getting it as much as they assume that I am. Of course, I'm not going to actually correct any of those misconceptions: that's between her and me. And you. And perhaps your readers. But doesn't she owe me at least this?
I have a troubled relationship with my mum but I try to make it work most of the time. She's not very nice to me and will make hurtful comments without even knowing they're hurtful. I've talked to her about it but she refuses to acknowledge that her words and actions are hurtful, let alone change her behaviour. What's worse is that she treats my partner of 8 years in a similar way. My partner feels pretty uncomfortable when she's around. It's not just us, my brother's wife has recently decided after 20 years that she doesn't want to be around her anymore and she no longer attends family gatherings.
I think mum has some mental health issues but she'd never acknowledge this or get help. Her mental health is the way it is largely due to a series of traumatic events - three of my siblings died (not one event, years apart) and my dad died young at 48. He was an abusive alcoholic. So mum's been through a lot. It's no excuse for her behaviour but it helps to understand the way she is the way she is. I've tried to get her to see a psychologist but she refuses. 
This is all background to my current dilemma.
I'm currently living in Europe on an overseas work posting with my partner and three kids. We're in our final 6 months of the posting and we're planning a white Christmas ski holiday before we return to the Southern hemisphere. My sister-in-law (not the one discussed earlier) and her two children are going to join us, which we're excited about. The problem is that mum wants to come as well. My partner's feeling nervous already at the thought of her coming and I'm feeling nervous because my partner is nervous. It's already causing conflict between us. On the one hand I love the idea of having a big ole white Christmas together including mum, but on the other hand she's bound to behave in a way that's hurtful to my partner and me, even if she's on her best behaviour.
When faced with a dilemma my partner often says, 'What would Dan Savage do?' As I feel really torn with trying to make a decision about whether to say yes to mum, I thought I'd ask you for real. So, over to you.
And thanks in advance.
Thirty-two-year old, married straight male. I have a problem that I don't know how to deal with. I'm an alcoholic, and my wife is too. We met 5 years ago at the beach. I had never drank more than three or four drinks in a day, and never before 5 o'clock, but I was crazy about her and had a blast day-drinking. We hit it off and are now married.
When we started dating we lived in separate cities about two hrs away, so we would spend every weekend together. Drinking. A lot. After we moved in together I've had a spate of jobs, but nothing that would be called a career. Now I'm a certifiable alcoholic, I wake up to a beer three days of the week. She has a great job, but she still comes home and drinks until bed. I don't know how she does it. This kind of substance abuse is hurting our relationship, I don't have her tolerance, and I cannot be productive in any way, shape, or form the day after drinking. 
What do I do? She's not going to stop drinking, but I can't live a normal life drinking like this. I don't have the willpower to not drink when she does it too. I've talked to her about it, I've even been in rehab for a week, but the minute I slipped she happily had a beer right beside me. She's a superhero when it comes to alcohol, but I'm not.  It's ruining my life. Any advice?
Don't I'm a 34-year-old gay male in a new relationship with a 28-year-old bisexual undocumented immigrant. For a year we were friends with benefits, and he wanted more, but I was reluctant because he would say things like "if you are my boyfriend, you need to know I am possessive," and I would back off. I was also co-dependent emotionally with an ex.
Two months ago my ex moved across the country, and as you might guess, I latched onto this guy. I asked him to take me back after I'd broken up with him, and he had stipulations: he wanted to meet my parents (done, even brought him to my sister's wedding), he wanted monogamy (no problem), and now it looks like he wants me to ask permission before scheduling plans with my friends.
He is Latino, and he will say, "I am the man here, you need to ask my permission for things, but I don't need to ask you." (English is his second language, and while he understands well, it's not like I can have a super-nuanced conversation with him.) I balk at asking permission for anything. He hasn't pushed the issue, and sometimes brushes it off as a joke, but last night he said, "I'm serious about this," and I said, "That's not fair." He also said, "I don't want to control your life, just know what you are doing." I said that was fine, but he had to, too. He didn't want to talk about it anymore.
Other possible warning signs: he thinks my dad doesn't like him (not true), he will go through my phone if I let him, he likes to control when we have sex, and he has said he enjoys being verbally mean to people (but never with his boyfriend, he says). He says things like, "Don't ever change with me, like others change with me." He also, uh, likes to put his finger in my belly button when he knows it causes me discomfort.
He hasn't introduced me to any of his friends or family. What family he has here isn't accepting, so they're off limits, and he doesn't have many friends except at a homophobic workplace. He says he's told friends and some cousins about me, but I suspect they might think I'm a woman, or just a friend. But I could be paranoid—I think the language barrier contributes to my insecurity with him.
Now for the good: We have a lot of fun together. We're very affectionate, and the sex is amazing. I generally top, but he's also one of the few guys I get off on pleasuring. In life he's outgoing, unafraid, energetic and active. He has me biking, eating better, and thinking about the future in a positive light. He wants to move out of the small city where we live in and find a new place to live together. (Or so he says.) He's never asked me for money. He reads literature like me, he's educated, he compliments me and has never verbally or physically abused me. (Not that I would expect any different, just listing the positives.)
I know he's not been treated well by family—he was raised by his grandmother after both parents abandoned him and started new families in the U.S., he was sexually abused by an uncle, and he fled Mexico because of threats of violence.
We've talked about marriage (it came up because of my sister's wedding) and at first he said he didn't want to get married because he didn't want me to think he was doing it for citizenship. But later he admitted that his greatest wish with me was to be married. He's also said he wouldn't live with me unless we were married, which he later relented on (but we're not, yet; I haven't offered and he said he's worried he would be fired from his job, as he lives with a family member/coworker). I get the feeling sometimes that he wants to be with me, long-term, but he doesn't have faith we'll stay together, or he's not serious about being with a man.
I haven't been the best to him, I think, but I don't want to be a pushover. That said, I'm getting older, I'm handsome but fat (I've lost 60 lbs., and may lose more, but There Will Be Skin), and I have never been so into a guy. I don't really care that much if he is monogamous, and I don't have reason to suspect he's got another boyfriend, girlfriend, etc., as he spends most nights at my house.
Is there a way I can accept his controlling side, or Pavlov's-Dog him out of it? Is it even serious? I wonder how insecure I would be if I were an undocumented citizen with a language barrier in a country that's possibly about to elect a anti-immigrant president. Or should I just wait and see if he tires of me or crosses a line? I don't think I could just run, because this is a good thing in my life and I would regret the decision. Besides, I can be jealous, too: once he let me run through his phone, and I did, though I don't speak Spanish so that was pointless. (I'm learning, though.)
I'm a 24-year-old bi woman confused about how to proceed in my relationship. My partner and I have been together for four years, and we have one child. I love him dearly, and we have a really good sex life. Still, there are problems in our relationship that I feel helpless to fix or to endure. 
A couple of months into us being together, we were long distance. He struggles with depression and became totally derailed. He would talk constantly about hurting himself and refused to go to therapy. He needed constant reassurance that I would never leave him, often needing to be told this nonstop for hours each day. I felt totally alone and scared, and I became too emotionally involved with a male coworker. Although there was never any physical intimacy, it really damaged his trust in me when he found out that I was talking to a guy about our relationship and the guy developed a crush on me.
That was about four years ago. For over a year after that, my partner would rarely touch me. When I could get him to have sex, he wouldn't go down on me or show any interest in giving me pleasure. He forbid me to wear makeup and would lash out at me if I wore anything even slightly sexy outside of his company/supervision. He would also sometimes read my emails and go through my phone, although there was never anything wrong to find. I felt as though I would go through the rest of my life robbed of my sexuality and lonely. 
A little over a year ago, I got totally fed up and could not take that anymore. We had some serious conversations about it, and our sex life really improved. We also started going to a swing club, which has been really fun for both of us.
Then, about eight months ago, our financial situation became really desperate (I'm in grad school) and I started escorting with his consent. While he constantly reiterates that he doesn't want me to stop doing it (which would entail me dropping out of college), his behavior around it has made me miserable. For a few months, he would read every work-related email and insult me if I said something flirtatious to a client. That's part of my job! He installed a GPS tracker on my phone, presumably for my safety, but would check it when I wasn't working and question me about why I took so long getting somewhere, etc. This was really degrading, and I was able to get him to stop tracking my location and reading every email. But still, he will become really distant and interrogate me about the details of my sessions if I see a client he thinks is attractive, and it feels really shaming.
And now for the current crisis. Since we started swinging, I've become comfortable with him showing interest in other women and try to support his sexuality. He talks about other women he is into, but totally loses it if I seem even a little attracted to anyone else. I brought up this inequity about a week ago and said I really needed to be able to express interests and feel free within the boundaries of our relationship. He agreed. We talked about a bi guy I had met recently who has been talking about swinging with his girlfriend, and I got the green light to start a conversation about possibly playing with them. After all, we have rarely found bi couples close to our age to play with, so this sounded like fun for both of us!
I'm regretting ever saying anything. The next time I ran into this guy, I started a conversation about swinging together, and I asked my partner if we could all go out for drinks. He agreed, and we talked about it at length. Despite lots of talking and reassurance, he started going through my phone while I was in the shower, opening up all of my messages and emails. He's done this several times over the past week, even though there hasn't been anything in there that wasn't agreed upon. I get seriously triggered by breaches of my privacy and have never done anything like that to him. I had parents who would read my diary as a teenager and punish me for anything sexual that I wrote. So, having my phone searched and emails read is a deal-breaker for me. I don't know how to get him to stop. We have had long talks about his concerns and he will say that he trusts me but then invade my privacy every chance he gets. He doesn't seem to think this is a problem and will argue that it's okay for him to do once in a while. 
Thanks for reading, and I would love some advice!
Just wondering what the wisest way to handle discovering gay porn on my son’s phone would be. At the moment he’s not aware I’ve found it—and I wasn’t looking for it, Dan. I wasn’t snooping at all actually. He came to me having a WiFi issue and I tried using Safari on his phone and it was one of the three open windows. I don’t want to handle this badly so any guidance/advice would be great.

I am a 65-year old circumcised male. I’m not as spry as in my earlier years, but my penis works fine for sexual and urinary functions. I am healthy, relatively fit and vegetarian. Starting about two years ago, commuting to work on my bicycle, my penis would frequently retract into itself (“like a frightened turtle,” to quote a popular TV sitcom). I’d have to stop dig it out in my pants. It was uncomfortable and weird, but not painful. Lately, it’s happening often no matter what I’m doing, and I have to survey my surroundings before sticking my hand down my pants. I’ve tried wearing boxers instead of Jockeys, pajamas with no undies, but nothing helps. Any recommendations, or should I see a Urologist?
I'm a bisexual, hetero-amorous 38-year-old single mom of two boys, and six months ago, I got back together with a 50-year-old man I am head-over-heels in love with. He had been recently divorced after 20+ years of marriage when we first dated, which started as just a sexy hook-up,  and we broke up after two years when things got serious and it was obvious to us both that he wasn't ready for serious. We stayed casual friends, having lunch together once in a while. After a year, I discovered I needed urgent surgery and he had a bit of a freakout. After the surgery, he said he realized when he thought my life was in danger that he wanted to be with only me for the rest of our lives, and he proposed (third time's the charm?). I turned him down, and insisted on counseling and dating for a year before revisiting getting married. He agreed whole-heartedly, happily paid for and participated in all of the counseling sessions for months, and things have been amazing.
I'm writing because a girlfriend of mine recently told me that she felt uncomfortable around him when we were dating before.
She said he was just too touchy-feely and that two other of our friends felt the same way. She gave me two instances: he greeted her and it looked like he was going for an open-mouth kiss and she stopped him, and he greeted her on a separate occasion with a hug from behind and a kiss on the neck. She said that second time could have been because he couldn't reach her cheek from behind (she's taller than him). I could write off one friend being uncomfortable—but three? She said that nothing has happened since we got back together. I insisted she let me know if ANYTHING he did made her uncomfortable again, or if any of our other friends informed her of any recent overly-affectionate greetings.
When we first dated, he had this "vibe" of being "available" that I couldn't quite put my finger on. It was the primary reason I felt like we should break up, because my instincts told me he would leave if something better came along. My instincts tell me his "available vibe" has dissipated. I LOVE the way he touches me and his intensity is one of the things that attract me to him. I can understand how some women would be put off by this intensity. I can think of only one occasion where I thought his flirting went too far. We had an adult conversation about it and I haven't seen any repeats since. And I felt validated when the counselor we were seeing said she could see he was utterly enamored with me. 
I am aware that I view this man with rose-colored glasses, and I don't want to make excuses for him, so I need advice to help me see things clearly. Is he just a touch-feely, flirty guy? Should I ask all my other girlfriends if they felt the same way around him? This was from almost two years ago, should I bring this up with him? If so, what the heck do I say?
So I'm having this problem with my girlfriend. She is very jealous of my ex and this is making our relationship a nightmare. My ex is currently going to Harvard and she was top of her class in high school when we were dating. I have only seen her once since we stopped dating and it was a very awkward and uncomfortable encounter. We stopped dating in 2009. My ex and I did have sex one time, it was the first time for both of us. My current girlfriend has never met my ex.
A little background on my current girlfriend. My girlfriend is of Asian descent and she says that all her life she has been told to be better. We have been dating for a year now and this problem has been making us argue for the past six months. My girlfriend knows that I don't love my ex anymore. My girlfriend is jealous of my ex to the point of hating her and wishing her the worst pain possible, "A slow and painful death" she has said.
She wants to be better than my ex in every way possible but the intellectual part is what really makes her explode. She cries constantly and I'm always trying to be there to tell her how special she is to me. How she is better than my ex. (I'm not lying, I really do think she is better than my ex!) It doesn't work however. She feels like a failure and being better than my ex is then most important thing in her life. One time she asked me for my ex's Facebook profile so she could see all her achievements. (I'm not friends with my ex on Facebook and her account is set to private, I noticed that no one can see anything she posts.) Knowing fully well that she is harming herself by being this way I gave her a choice: my ex's name or me. She chose my ex. I broke up with her but we got back together a few hours later, she told me she was sorry and that she would try to change.
A few more important things: My girlfriend is always asking me why I don't hate my ex like she does, she also says that when she closes her eyes she sees me having sex with my ex. Honestly, I'm starting to hate my ex. I'm not sure if it's because I really do or because I'm starting to feel like it's her fault, though she has nothing to do with this. I just hate the way my girlfriend cries and the pain she's going through. It hurts when she hurts. Now I'm starting to blame my ex. I know, it sounds irrational.
I need help, please. I love this girl, she is amazing and sweet when she's not feeling like this. She loves me with all her heart. I know she does. And I love her too.
I'm a 55-year-old hetero woman, I've been married for 28 years. Twenty-One years ago my husband told me that he was gay. At that time, we had three small children. We decided to stay in a companionate marriage, he did what he wanted and I raised our children and turned off my libido. We've raised three thoughtful, interesting, independent children, two of whom are gay. I made a point of raising them in a very open-minded manner in a very gay-positive household. Four years ago, after going 17 years without sex, my libido switch was suddenly turned on as a result of need to have a hysterectomy; I suddenly wanted to have a sexual connection again, especially having heard horror stories about post-menopausal women completely losing interest in sex. So I found a regular FWB.
But while I was recuperating, at a time when I couldn't have PIV sex, I went online looking for something else. I met a man who had a foot fetish. We explored that. He also told me that he would like to be dominated and forced to wear woman's lingerie. Surprisingly, after trying this I found it extremely arousing and I have had a Femdom relationship with him for over two years.
My husband absolutely does not want to tell our children that he is gay. He doesn't feel like he will ever need to, especially because he doesn't feel that he would ever want to be in a relationship with a man. I'm fine with the status quo, and if he ever came out to friends and family I would support his decision. But I would prefer that he was honest with his children.
Now the current problem: The other night I was texting my foot guy and I sent him a text saying that I had some new sexy lingerie and stockings for him to model for me. Afterwards I realized that I accidentally sent that text to my heterosexual son. He did not respond but I'm sure he read the message. I'm not sure what I should do. My straight son probably thinks I'm cheating on his father with a woman. Do I out my husband and explain my situation with his father and tell him I like to dominate men? Or do I leave things as they are?
I'm a bi female in a relationship with a man. I'm seeking a female playmate. Where on the net can I find females like me? I’m in Alaska and it seems particularly hard to find someone up here. I've looked around but maybe I’m not looking in the right places. Craigslist don't help, and there was nothing on OKCupid either. Can you help?
A I'd appreciate your thoughts on a matter of sex worker etiquette and social boundaries. Someone I'd describe as an acquaintance/casual friend recently let me know that she is working as an escort. I've known her for a few years, and have always been more than a little attracted to her. We dated very briefly when we first met and have had an intermittent friendship in the years since. We're close enough to talk about subjects like sex work and our mutually non-judgmental attitudes toward it, though this is someone I bump into fairly rarely—maybe a couple of times a year. If there's an appropriate and respectful way to bring up that I'd be interested in her professional services, I'd love to do it in the right way. Or would you advise me to leave this alone? We're well enough acquainted that I could broach the subject in an in-person conversation or by text (as opposed to, say, booking an appointment anonymously and saying "Surprise! Remember me?"). Any thoughts?
The first question in Savage Love this week is from HAD, aka "Heartbroken And Devastated," a man who discovered 17 years into his relationship—and 14 years into his marriage—that his seemingly loving & wonderful wife was cheating on an absolutely epic scale throughout the course of their marriage. No one would blame HAD for leaving his wife but he wasn't sure he wanted to leave and he wanted my thoughts on making it work. It was a tall order—his wife introduced their kids to one of her lovers—but I gave it my best shot:
A long-term relationship is a myth two people create together. It's not chemistry, it's not math, it's not engineering. It's a story, HAD, a story we tell each other, a story we tell others, and a story we tell ourselves. And sometimes it's a story we have to revise.
Right now, it feels like the story you've been telling yourself and others about your marriage is a lie: not partly, but wholly. You thought your marriage was a loving, committed, and "completely loyal" one, but it's not—it can't be, and it never was, because she was cheating on you from the beginning.
But loyalty isn't something we demonstrate with our genitals alone.
While working on my response for HAD—you can read my entire response here—I ran into Esther Perel in a tent in Colorado. Perel is a psychotherapist, a couples counselor, and the author of a wonderful and important book on sex in longterm relationships: Mating In Captivity. (I ran into Perel at the Aspen Ideas Festival, la de da, where we spoke on a couple of panels together.) I shared HAD's letter with Perel and asked if she thought HAD's marriage was doomed. Her response: "No, I don't."
Perel's response honestly surprised me. We spoke for 10 minutes, and I recorded our conversation. There wasn't room in my column for Perel's thoughts so I'm posting them here as the Savage Love Letter of the Day.
After the jump: HAD's original letter and a transcript of my conversation with Perel.
My wife and I have been married for 14 years and in a committed (I assumed) relationship for 17 years. Sex between us (often kinky) has always been great. We have a wonderful life together and two perfect children. I thought we were good; turns out things were too good to be true.
I learned recently that my wife has been unfaithful to me throughout our marriage. She began an affair with an older man soon before we were married, and they were physically intimate for five years, including bondage and a Master/sub relationship. The physical sex stopped, but phone sex and online flirting continued up until I discovered this two weeks ago. This is a man I know. She has introduced our children to him.
There's more: She slept with another man (just once, more bondage) but also flirted with him online and met up with him while I was away. She slept with yet another man she works with (just once, vanilla this time). She had phone sex with at least two other men and flirted with still more on Facebook. This came out because I was jealous about something that now seems minor and checked her e-mail. (Not proud of that.) She is repentant and relieved that I finally know, and she promises that she will be faithful from now on. I'll always love her, and I know she loves me. We had one session with a counselor and another is scheduled. Results were mixed. One thing that came out was that she has never been faithful to a romantic/sexual partner.
I could forgive a one-time drunken fling, but this is a consistent pattern of infidelity that runs from the beginning of our marriage, and I had no idea. I cannot process it. I thought she had always been as loyal as I've been, which is to say completely. I can't put my wedding ring on—it feels like a lie. I have no one to talk to. For the sake of our future, the love we still share, and our children, we are committed to fixing things, but we're not sure how.
I hate to bother you with this issue but I lack the relationship experience to properly understand what is going on right now. 
Heterosexual male, 22, dating a heterosexual (assuming) female, also 22. 
Met volunteering at her work, and we hit it off immediately. Second time meeting her was actually on her birthday, and I took her out for dinner after. We’ve been seeing each other for six months, and have talked about very longterm things we would like to do. My definition of who I was as an individual changed to include her. I’ve secured much better employment, have been making different, conscious decisions that include or lean more towards what she would like. We are very sexually compatible, get along great. I told her the third time I met her I was looking for a best friend and to invest in and adventure through life with. She has been that and more, more than I could have ever asked, until very recently. 
Two weeks ago today she started us on a "break."
She needed a break because she told me her heart and her mind were in different places. I don’t know what a break is supposed to look like; even if she told me she needed to just have another guy a few times, I could work with it. Not talking to her, being left in the dark, is extremely frustrating and confusing.I texted her lightly for the first week, she made it clear she needed space that was entirely isolated from me, and I was silent for a week. I texted her today, and left a voicemail, asking to talk perhaps this weekend. I’m very confused about what this means. Is it likely we will pickup our relationship where we left off? Or has she been lying to me for the entire time? Did she met someone and couldn't tell me  or did she just lost interest?
I’m crazy about this girl, and we get along really well. We make about the same money, and I have treated her very well in my opinion. She claims to have loved just about everything about me since the beginning. I know she is wary of firearms, which I carry and/or own, for sport, hunting, and personal defense. We both believe in LGBT equality, pro-animals, pro-choice, and for the most part seem to land around the same spots politically. Our experiences in the world are very different, and as such our opinions of people differ, but I had been led to believe we balanced each other out well. I don’t open up to people generally, but she totally slipped past my guard; I’ve never been so sure about someone before.
Do I just wait it out in silence? I’m very good at being an asshole, and anytime you know personal things about people, its very easy to be a cruel piece of trash, but I’m trying to not embrace all of that. She made me a much better person, and I don’t want to lose that.
Thanks for your time. Can’t promise I’ll vote Dem, but if you can give me some effective tools to engage this blockade, I would happily commit to not voting for Trump.
My wife and I have an open relationship. It works, we're happy — but that's not what my question is about. We're both cool with other people, but we're discreet about it, and we've agreed to a rule of "nobody from our small city, and no dating sites/apps." And I completely agree with those terms—our little city is one of those rather religious, southern places where if someone doesn't know you, they know someone who knows you. We want people out of our business.
We both travel for work, so that's where our opportunities are. I often rely on Craigslist, which has become much less reliable than it was five years ago. And it seems that whenever I post a m4w ad, 80% of responses are spam, 5% are from actual women, and the remaining 15% are from men. These men always go with the same general line of "if you don't find what you're looking for, would you let a guy blow you?"
I find this behavior obnoxious. I've mostly ignored it until recently. Out of frustration, I've started replying, asking why they think it's okay to respond to my ad, when my ad was very clearly looking for a woman. The responses I get from that line of inquiry are either hostile or mocking:
Grow a thicker skinYou should be flatteredWhy are you so insecure?Just let me suck your cockCome on, you know you want to try it
I don't get it. Not one of these men has once acknowledged that their behavior is incorrect or bordering on sexual harassment. Look at it another way: if I responded to a w4w ad, I'd have my ass handed to me, so I don't do it. I love pussy, but I'm well aware that if a woman places an ad looking for another woman, she's not interested in my cock.
If this were a scenario at a bar, and a guy hit on me, I'd laugh it off, say thank you, and explain that I'm straight—this hypothetical man at the bar didn't know if I was straight or wasn't sure, and gave it a shot. No harm, no foul.
But when a man answers a m4w ad, he's ignoring my established sexual preferences and hitting on me anyway, and that just seems wrong. Am I making too much of this practice, or am I right in being wholly frustrated by it?
I am a long time listener of the podcast. I am from Europe, hence the email rather than the phone call. My boyfriend and I (we are a male same-sex couple) have been abroad for a while and are back home for a few weeks before heading abroad again. During this time we are staying with good friends of ours, a hetero couple. The boyfriend is away for the duration of our stay and we are staying with the girlfriend. 
My partner and I have been together for five years and we've discussed in detail the boundaries of our relationship and take a similar approach to you: We are monogomish, down for fun as long as both of us click with the third party. It has taken a lot of work to get to this point and we are really happy with our ability to communicate and work together to achieve sexual gratification and satisfaction. 
We have both had hetero relationships, so we are still attracted to females and have often fantasized about introducing a cute girl into the mix. There has always been chemistry between the friend we are staying with. She finds us both attractive and visa-versa, and we always joked about hooking up. We have a really close bond and an amazing friendship that has been built on over many years of good times. The three of us ended up out on the town, completely drunk and well before we knew it the three of us were hooking up.
By the time we got home we all agreed how bad an idea it would be to take things further, nevertheless we became a hot writhing mass of bodies and I would be lying if I said none of us enjoyed it. It was really fucking hot to say the least. I just don't know how it happened. 
The next day the three of us talked it out and debriefed agreeing not to tell another soul as long as we lived and that if her boyfriend found out it would not only ruin her relationship but our friendship with him also. So now after the fact I am feeling really guilty, this is really out of character for all of us and I feel like a really really shit friend. I am genuinely scared of the repercussions if this ever got out and how betrayed our friend would feel I know I would if the shoe was on the other foot. 
We are staying with our friend for a few more weeks and as far as I can tell the three of us are happy to call it what it was and move on. There is naturally a bit of awkwardness between us but nothing so serious we can't laugh it off. 
I guess my brain is just trying to process what has happened. I feel really guilty for enjoying an experience that has so much underlying deceit, mistrust, and infidelity attached to it especially knowing that her boyfriend is very traditional and views monogamy as the standard. 
Our girlfriend did say that she can now tick off "threesome" off her list of life goals and that she would happily marry her boyfriend now that it's done.
I'm just not sure how I feel, it's not like me or any of us to let things get so out of hand. I feel guilty for enjoying it and for wanting it to happen again. I'm sure it won't and I would like to think that would be due to my better judgement. I hope you can give me some sort of guidance here. I want some genuine constructive feedback. I don't need to be told that I'm a bad person even though that's probably what I deserve. Hope you can give me some perspective. 

I'm a 37-year-old man, who has been in a monogamous relationship with the same woman for six years. Shortly after moving in with me in the house I own, she quit her job. She's been unemployed for five years now. We've had sex once in the last three years. Even though I care about her and want her to be okay, I'm ready to DTMFA. In fact, I already have. Four times in the last three weeks. I can't seem to get it to stick with her. I don't want to just throw her out. She'll be homeless. I've offered to help her out with some money, but she refuses. Eventually, she either asks me to give us more time or simply pretends like we haven't broken up, forcing me to restate our breakup and breaking her heart again. It's wearing me down. What can I do to help her get out on her own without being a monster? 
My husband of six years and I have been dating a woman since February. She moved in with a friend a few doors down in October, and it took us to February to realize the attraction was mutual. She and my husband have always had a stronger connection than she and I; I am her first female relationship. We are her first couple, and this is the first time we have felt such a strong connection to another (we have dated couples and women before). At the beginning of the month, she moved to a place about 30 minutes away to save money and commute time.
We have her to thank for a re-ignition of our sex life, and in May we learned I was pregnant with my first child. Soon after, I was pretty sidelined thanks to some pretty constant morning sickness. I also felt her withdraw from me, both physically and emotionally. My pregnancy is a sensitive topic with her; she wants children, but ended a pregnancy because the partner and timing weren't right. It’s hard for me to tell whether the distance is because I have been sick for two months, or if I am a reminder of what she has lost and so desperately wants (a partner and a child).
This has been a source of stress that has become a more frequent argument between her and my husband lately: she wants a partner and a child, and no matter how much we reassure and invite her to share our experience and our lives, she feels we can’t give that to her. She worries we won’t have time for her, and about the practical aspects of a long-term relationship with us. She feels isolated in our relationship because she feels she can’t be open about it with her family. Despite this, she says she can’t imagine her life without us.
This feels like a pretty serious conversation to be having after only four months of dating, but I think my being pregnant has thrust these issues onto our plate prematurely. It feels like my due date is a looming deadline for decision. I regret that this pregnancy has put her relationship with me on hold while she and my husband have fallen in love. It’s hard to hear that she feels she can’t be fully open with her feelings with us because my husband and I are “supposed to be so happy right now.” It’s harder to watch my husband grow frustrated with these recurring arguments and feel crushed that she sees a difficult future with us.
I feel lately like I am watching this happen from afar, and often I am, both physically and emotionally. I don’t feel like I have as much stock in this as they do, so I don’t feel like I can push anything too hard. At the same time, I know I can’t (and won’t) be on the sidelines forever, but I worry that by the time I can contribute anything, it will be too late.
Is this the kind of thing that will get better with time and work, as we all get to know each other better? Or is this the beginning of the end?
I don't expect a reply, as I'm sure you get a zillion emails a day. But, I figured it's worth a shot.
My wife and I have been together for going on four years now. We started off as an open couple, and gradually became more exclusive as our feelings for each other deepened. Up until relatively recently, the sex was quite amazing. Pretty much anything went (except scat play and super gross stuff), and she gave the best BJ's ever—and I mean that.
My Mrs. has a genetic condition which affects the soft tissue in her body: everything from ligaments and joints, to her skin and digestive track. I believe I do my best to be as supportive as possible, but it's certainly challenging. Our sex life has taken a dive, and we're not nearly as adventurous as we used to be—it's pretty much just vanilla missionary these days, as it's all her body can handle. Her pain has become a major turn-off for me. We don't do any of the stuff we used to. Frequency is also an issue. We used to do it multiple times daily, and now it's less than once a fortnight. Because of these issues, I feel like we've been drifting apart.
It all came to a head the other day.
I found a cache of her old dick-sucking pictures, which I'd seen before, and thought she'd deleted after I asked her to. Why would she need them, right? Needless to say, I was, and still am, very angry, and hurt. Why would she keep them? Reminiscing about better days and better cocks?
I deleted them. That probably wasn't my place—but  on the flip side, I don't give a Tally-ho fuck.
As a result of this discovery, I'm now 100% disinterested in sex. To make matters worse, I feel like I can't even open up about it, as her pain can make her quite irritable, and I'm sick of getting yelled at through no fault of my own. I feel like I can't talk to her about anything anymore, let alone our sex life.
Let me say for the record: I'm not a selfish lover. She always orgasms multiple times if/when we ever have sex. I love cunnilingus, and I love foreplay. Nor am I a neglectful husband. Our roles have been switched for some time—for reasons I won't delve into—and I'm essentially the housewife now. I do all the chores, 100% of the cooking, most of the cleaning, laundry, walking dog, etc., while she works. I think I'm a pretty damned good partner. 
You're probably gonna say this is all my fault anyway. How dare I be such an insensitive prick, etc. And maybe you're right. I just don't know what to do anymore, and I'm sick of feeling this way.
Hopefully you can help.
This is a pretty serious issue that I've been grappling with for my entire adult life, really. And I am currently in therapy, but I'd also like your perspective.
I'm a very kinky guy and always have been, since a young age. I also feel like I am a sex addict, and have used sex as a way of anaesthetising myself from difficult feelings ever since I was around 10. (I'm now in my early 30s, by the way.) My "addiction" was mainly to porn, sex chat rooms, going on web cam, etc. Alongside all this I've had relatively good long term relationships with women.
I've been working on a lot of my issues but where I am right now is that I realize how much I need to have a strong intimate, close, lasting loving relationship with a woman. And to share my kinks with her, and not keep them hidden and secret, as I had been.
This is possible, and I have been doing this. But I think my sex addiction is actually an addiction to sexual humiliation. I feel I have eroticized my shame and sought out acts and behaviors that are "shameful" and "humiliating." A large part of this is in speaking to, or even once or twice meeting, older dominant men. I get turned on by basically being bulled by them. Made fun of, insulted, humiliated, spoken down to.
I'm very sex positive and open minded, and I'm OK with being bi. I'm also OK with telling a GF or a future wife that I would like to occasionally see men. But considering that this kind of relationship with a woman, and starting a family, etc., are my priorities, I'm concerned that this kink of mine might actually not just be a simple sexual outlet, but might be a way of sabotaging my relationship.
I am concerned that the kink—in drawing insulting and humiliating comments from people—might be negatively affecting me. Might be contributing to negative feelings that I may have deep down about myself, even thought my self-esteem is pretty high. I also fear that, as i can get so completely sucked into that world, that it might take my energy away from the relationship that I'm in (when I'm in one). And I really want to make sure that I'm not behaving in a way which is destructive to that future relationship, while also not suppressing my kinks.
I don't think I can simply block the idea from appearing in my head. I don't think that works. But I also don't think that indulging it works either. Naturally I'm quite conflicted, and I'm not really sure how to manage these conflicting feelings—the sexual thrill of being humiliated, usually by a man, with my deep sexual and emotional needs for the love and companionship of a woman.
Your thoughts would be seriously appreciated.
In wake of the terrible tragedy in Orlando, I wanted to share with you a positive experience I had on the weekend at church. Like many Liberal-minded progressive Catholics, I struggle with many of the church's teachings. So I was pleasantly surprised by the priest's homily last Sunday.
He started talking about Orlando and I admit I started to shift uncomfortably in my seat. I had no doubt he would condemn the shootings, but I wondered whether there might be an undertone of "Oh, but homosexuality is still wrong" to his message. He is new to our church and I know nothing about him so I didn't know what to expect. I have always been an LGBT ally and a Savage Love fan so I thought about your words that allies need to stand up for the community, and sometimes that means leaving churches in the middle of services.
Thankfully I didn't have to do that.
Not only did he condemn the shootings, not only did he speak of tolerance and acceptance of the LGBT community, he urged the congregation to actively love and support the community. He spoke of how members of the LGBT community are our brothers and sisters and how we all came into this world the same way and how we are all essentially the same. He urged the congregation not to engage in hate-filled homophobic conversations and behaviors and to call out those who do. Finally, he asked his parishioners to spread the message to their friends, family, fellow churchgoers, and community members.
I teared up. I was touched and a little surprised that this white-haired elderly priest would stand up at the front of a Catholic church and show that he isn't just tolerant—he's an ally—and encourage his congregation to be allies too. And I was touched when I looked around and saw many people nodding their heads in agreement and again when I heard a woman tell him how much she enjoyed his homily as she was leaving the church. I wish I had done that too.
I know this is the way it should be, Dan. I also know the church has an incredibly long way to go and some serious changes need to be made. One homily from one priest certainly doesn't make everything better. But it's also reassuring to know that some Catholic priests aren't afraid to publicly disagree with the church's teachings and to take a stand at Mass. It was reassuring for me, anyway, and I thought it might be for you too.
I'm in a wonderful 4.5 year relationship with a fantastic guy. He's in his mid-twenties, I'm in my late twenties. I could see myself spending my life with him.
The issue is moving in together. He sees it as a step between being in an LTR and getting married, and I see it as being much closer to marriage and not at all an in-between. Ideally, I would like to be engaged before moving in together. I'm not religious or anything, I just feel like it would help us avoid a lot of drama—god forbid we break up after moving in together—and ensures that we are on the same page about what we want and where the relationship is going. Also, I live in one of the last affordable areas in our rapidly-gentrifying city, and if we broke up and I had to find my own place again, I have no idea where I'd go. On the other hand, if one of us got a job in another state, I wouldn't have a problem living together. That just makes sense to me.
The last time we discussed this, he said he definitely saw a future with me, but just wasn't ready for marriage yet. I'm totally okay with this. We're young and I only began to feel I was ready for marriage a year or so ago, and since he's a tiny bit younger, I get that it could be a minute till he catches up with that feeling. I would never, ever want to pressure him into that. But I feel like living together is much more similar to marriage than he might realize. I know it's a thing that "everybody does" these days, but I still see it as a very serious step, even if we have been together for so long.
There are a lot of practical reasons for us moving in together. We're doing the thing where we see each other at least 4 days a week, usually more. We waste a lot of time going back and forth to each other's places to take care of our pets, change clothes, etc. He's house-hunting and splitting a mortgage payment would save both of us a lot of money. Also, if we were to get married, he'd have to buy a house in his name beforehand anyway because I have a crippling amount of student debt that would make it impossible for us purchase a home together.
Unfortunately, I feel like the practical reasons aren't good enough. That makes me feel like a roommate, not a romantic partner. I'm not looking for convenience, I'm looking to build a life together. 
His house hunt is getting more serious, and my lease is up in the fall. I know this conversation is going to come up again soon. So I guess my main questions are...
1. Am I just being silly and worrying too much?
2. If I'm not being silly, how do I have a constructive conversation about this?
I tend to avoid talking about this because I do not want my "I'd like to be engaged first" reason to sound like an ultimatum. I have expressed this to him before and he was a bit upset and didn't really seem to understand my reasoning. The discussion ended in disagreement with no progress. I'm not trying to "just get a ring," I'm trying to do the right thing to keep our relationship healthy because I am absolutely crazy for this guy. Mainly, I'm just afraid of going into this with different expectations and then resenting each other for it.
Thanks in advance if you have time for a response, and also thank you for everything you do. Reading your column has made me a better person.
So my husband and I are both bisexual 30 year olds. And — spoiler alert — this one won't be about sex, though we do have a good amount of sex and it's not always just us two. 
This is more a question about trust. My husband lies to me, not about sex, but about his weed addiction. We've talked about it, gone to therapy, and fought about his lying to me for the last four years of our five years together. Well tonight, after months of me thinking we had finally come to a good place of understanding and building back trust, I found his "frequent flyer card" for the local dispensary when I was doing the laundry. His initial reaction when I brought it to him was, "Oh, I found that on the ground." Unconvinced, I went to his home office in the backyard shed and found that he had indeed been buying and consuming weed. 
At this point I have to stop, because I probably seem like the crazy anti-drug type. I have a history of parents with abuse issues and honesty around drug use is something I need to feel safe in this relationship. I am not anti-weed, I like to do edibles from time to time, and we both drink alcohol regularly. I just want him to be honest with me about when he is smoking and I have repeated that sentiment every time we've fought about it. 
Some back story on him: History of depression/self-mutilation. Used weed to self-medicate for years. He's now in therapy on his own — thanks to my encouragement/finances — and he's now on anti-depressants prescribed by a professional and doing really well. I've totally camp-site-ruled the shit out of him and he's amazing now... save for this one big thing, aka lying to my face about smoking weed. 
So back to the most recent episode of me giving him a chance to regain my trust for the nth time. Here I am, post-fight and I don't know what to do. I love this guy, we have a life together: a house, pets, no kids (yet). I want to trust him, to give him another chance to be honest with me. And I also have this nagging feeling that I'm being an idiot. 
Should I DTMFA?
I'm a 30-year-old bisexual woman. I was dating my girlfriend (also bisexual) for three years. Our sex life started out amazing but it became kind of a mess. I am a lawyer, the kind that does a lot of trials, and my work is very high stress. I have had a chronic stress/tension condition for about the last 1.5 years that causes my pelvic floor muscles to be constantly tense and sore—which means that it hurts to have penetrative sex. This used to be the main kind of sex that I was into. I do like fucking her, but it turns out I am an inconsistent switch (tend to be more of a femme bottom), and I just don't feel like fucking as often as she wants to, and I am not very dominant and she finds my attempts to top her not adequately confident. She's also interested in kinky sex including pain play, which I am not very interested in. Also she thinks several times per week is the right amount of sex while I feel like having it once every other week, or once a week, and only sex where I am not being penetrated. I gave her a free pass to hook up with men, and she was doing that to supplement our sex life, but when she started wanting to hook up with women I got super jealous and sad. 
At this point, I feel like your advice to her would be to dump me already—and she did, recently.
I just don't know what to do about dating right now. Because I am really not at my normal sexual self, but I haven't been in a long time. Should I look for someone who has a low sex drive who would be happy with my current sex drive? But what if I manage to fix my vagina and want more sex in the future? I don't even really feel attracted to anyone right now—except, sadly, my now-ex-girlfriend—but I really miss intimacy. Is it cruel to date people when I'm in this place? I still also want to win back my ex by trying to be more sexual, but I'm afraid that there's no way I can be the partner she is looking for. On the other hand, I think she may end up realizing that she will always need more sexual outlets than one person and I could work on my jealousy issues so that she could actually fulfill her sexual desires in a poly relationship with me. Am I dreaming here?
I'm having a tough time making some relationship decisions, and I was hoping you might be able to offer some perspective. I think part of why I'm having a tough time is my relative lack of experience with the situation I'm in, and I don't want that to lead to me making an unnecessarily hurtful decision. 
Bottom line, I don't know if the relationship I'm in can be fixed. If it can't be fixed, I don't know how to make it work well enough so we can live with it. And if I can't live with it, I don't know how to break up with everyone without breaking their hearts.
I'm a middle aged, middle class woman. I've been married to a man for 20 years; we have two kids, age 11 and 12. We've had our problems in the past, most notably a history of chronic depression on my part. His response to that left a lot to be desired. I lived despite an almost total lack of support from him, largely because of my best friend, who has been able over the years to offer me the support and love I needed when I wasn't able to return it or even appreciate it.  I literally owe her my life, several times over.
She spent about two years after her divorce, which I held her virtual hand through, exploring her sexuality and having a grand old time for the first time in her life. I held her virtual hand through a lot of those learning experiences, too. She now identifies as bi and poly, and is really happy: her kids are doing well, she's on good terms with her ex and they coparent beautifully and I'm really happy for her. 
She got involved with a couple, and introduced me to the male partner of their triad, thinking we'd like to know each other. I fell in love. So did he. So my husband and I opened our relationship, and I started seeing this guy. She was a little upset when he and I started having sex, and after a couple months admitted it was because a) she wanted to have sex with me, which she had always denied and b) she was jealous that he had successfully eradicated my depression in a way she had never been able to.
From the beginning I worried that he and I being romantically and sexually involved might strain both the friendship, and/or their triad, which had only been together for 6 months and is a long distance relationship (my friend lives on the other coast, the rest of us live in the same city).  
Upshot being, she enjoys sex with women, and now she was admitting she wanted to enjoy it with me. My boyfriend likes threesomes, (we'd done several with various girls he brought around) and I love her, so we started sexting, and the next time she was in she and he and I all spent the day together. 
Because of time constraints and the third person in their triad not enjoying spending time with me, that was the only time we spent together. I guess I should be grateful, because normally I wouldn't get to see her at all; they always have a packed schedule of things to do and people to see when she's in, and I don't fit in with their circle of friends. We continued to sext and carry on long distance. My boyfriend and I continued our semiregular interactions
Not long after that, I decided to accept a full time position. It was and is a financial necessity, and an emotional one. My husband, with the unwitting support of his girlfriend who is physically and psychologically *exactly* like his mother and sisters, is defaulting back to some really negative behaviour patterns toward me and the kids.
So knowing I had a rough eight weeks ahead of me, with working double shifts and trying to construct an exit strategy from an increasingly untenable situation which involved separating our finances and moving to a new apt, I told my boyfriend and my best friend that I wasn't going to be very available, and would need to walk back from getting together with them the next time she was in. I thought I'd get some support, but instead I got a lot of anger and recrimination for canceling my plans with them on short notice. My boyfriend walked back from that pretty quickly and said he'd be glad to help however he could. And then he started a new relationship. It took my best friend a while longer, but she apologized and explained why she reacted the way she did- my withdrawal triggered her fears that my depression was returning- and we forgave each other. 
I remember one night I had to leave the apartment and lock myself in the car to get away from my husband. The same night, my boyfriend couldn't return my texts because he was comforting the woman he had started a new relationship with, because her drug user ex was sending her skanky texts. 
I had to return something to his house not long after that, and his live in girlfriend was home- normally they make sure she's not there if I'm coming by- and she asked me how I was doing. I broke down 
She offered to let me sleep there but I've got my pride and I despise drama and I didn't want to disrupt things to where the kids would notice (I hide most of the conflict from them) so I pulled myself together and said that while I appreciated it I really just needed to learn to deal. Honestly, I was ashamed that my boyfriend had been sharing the details of what I told him. Since she doesn't want to know me, I don't think he should have been telling her teh details of my personal life.
So, fast forward to now. With my boyfriend being unavailable, and my best friend less available, and my husband being not someone I want to be with, I'm really lonely plus I'm not getting laid. I don't want to disrupt his new relationship (or his old ones) by being around them when I'm feeling so bad and struggling to deal with so much negativity. So I thought I'd check out Tinder. I've never been on Tinder, my boyfriend was an active user when we started seeing each other and had encouraged me to check it out. 
I asked him if he'd feel ok about me hooking up with a few guys on tinder. Since my boyfriend was an active tinder user when we met, and he and I have quite enjoyably threesomed a number of people (some just once, some on a semi regular basis, one being the girl he started a new relationship with) I figured we were on the same page regarding casual sex and just needed to work out the details.
He said that if I had any sexual contact with another man, it would bring the physical aspect of our relationship to a screeching halt.  I was gobsmacked that he would feel this way. He said that the women he and I had sex with were ok because he only picked out women he intended to have long term relationships with, and only picked out women he was sure the rest of his partners would enjoy having as part of a poly family. 
Well, yeah... except for all the ones you didn't keep, dude Some weren't a good fit. Hell, based on the evidence of how everybody spends their time, *I* am not a good fit.
So he is partnered with four other women, and having unprotected sex with all of them, then having unprotected sex with me, but won't so much as kiss me again if I have sexual contact with another man. We didn't even get to the part of the discussion where he said under what circumstances he'd be comfortable with it- no unbarriered sex, no penetrative sex, no genital contact at all, whatever.  He wasn't having any of it.  He said it would be different if I wanted to find a guy to bring around for him to meet, to make sure he and his partners would like him. If my goal were to add a guy to the closed poly group, then maybe he'd consider it.
I'm just at a loss.  I wasn't asked if I wanted to be in a closed group, or even an open one; two of the people in this group I've only met once, another has been over the course of a year consistently unwilling to interact with me. I get he wants to build a poly family, but I don't think this is what that looks like.
I approached my best friend and she said (as she usually does if there is conflict between me and him) that she needed to remain neutral. Neutral means she is completely uncommunicative and doesn't respond to my texts or emails.
When I told him I was angry and needed to step away so I could cool off before we continued the discussion he said I was so inept it was abusive to him and my best friend, that I needed to quit using them as transference rods to get my cortisol hit to self medicate for my depression, and several other things that seemed equally angry and unkind. Even if it's true, *especially* if it's true, I would think that merited being supportive and compassionate. I have to assume he's hurt or angry and lashing out. 
Then he followed up with an email that we proposed all be a closed fluid bonded group with q2month testing and if any of us had so much as skin to skin contact with someone outside the group- either accidentally or on purpose- we would be immediately kicked out, would have to immediately be retested and not readmitted until the tests came back clean. 
So....I'm just at a loss. I feel inadequate, and like I just don't know how to do this and I'm hurting the people that I love. I know I brought a lot of this on myself with bad communication habits, not sticking up for myself and tolerating behaviour that I shouldn't have. I'll own that.  But I don't know how to set us right. What can I do to make this better? 
I know this is insanely long and complicated, and unlikely to even get read. So if you did make it this far, thanks. I appreciate it. 

I'm 24, and a female in a relationship with a very lovely, sweet, slightly depressed 24-year-old pansexual guy. We have been together a year, and he has introduced me to a whole gaggle of his friends. He's one of those people who has managed to keep his friends from childhood still in his immediate circle and they are obviously very important to him.
About six months in, one of his closest friends—I'll call him "B"—confessed to the both of us that he is an exhibitionist and invited us both to undress him and do as we wished with his body. He's a personal trainer and I kid you not, Dan, the David would be jealous. My boyfriend was into this, as was I, and there was a lot of touching, kissing and spanking going on. I have always sensed an attraction that he had with B, and I'm not jealous—if anything it turns me on. We had some of the hottest sex we have ever had afterward, feeding off that sexual energy. After this incident my partner has refused to talk about it, insisting that B is like an older brother to him. That was weird to me, as it felt like an inherently sexual experience, he fully participated, and I saw real evidence that the experience turned him on.
A month or so later, B and I ended up alone together and we talked about the experience. He confessed that he often thought about that night and jacked off a little bit in front of me. I became uncomfortable at some point and told him to stop, and left the situation. It felt wrong without my partner there, even though we are in an open relationship. I continually chickened out afterward when I tried to tell my partner what had happened... so I just didn't.
Last night my partner, B, and I were all talking, and B asked me to drive him home. I did, and when we were alone he confessed that he had a major attraction to me and that he thinks about me when he masturbates and gave me some sexy BDSM scenarios that he would like to act out. I was quite insistent that we would not act out what he had in mind, but I did confess the attraction was mutual. However, we both knew we could not betray our partners. B begged me not to tell my partner what he had said.
I hate hiding what happened from my partner. He's quite sensitive, and B is more attractive than 99% of humans and statues, so there is some insecurity there. Furthermore, B has helped my partner through his depression and is a very important figure in his life. I am very worried that if my partner learns about B's advances he will blame me for them, or lose B as a friend, because friends of friends are typically off limits and so much of this has happened when we were alone. I don't want to set off a depression in him. This has the potential to explode both our relationship and one of his oldest friendships.
I'm confused, Dan. This whole situation is deeply uncomfortable to me. I almost feel preyed upon, even though I feel I am also in the wrong for not immediately telling my partner what happened. Like idiots, we never defined the rules for our open relationship, just that it was open. I'm definitely regretting not having that conversation now. What do you think I should do?
Boundaries & Originally posted on July 23, 2014.
I am a gay man and have been in a relationship with my GGG boyfriend for more than three years. We are in our early 20s and have a good sex life. I just discovered that he has been engaging in what can only be described as cyber infidelity. He had a secret e-mail account, posted on Craigslist M4M, and also had an Adam4Adam account. About once a week, while I was at work in the evenings, he would exchange photos and engage in conversations with other men. He claims he never met with any of them and it was just to exchange photos. He let me look at his secret e-mail account, and there was nothing that pointed to any physical meet-ups. I asked him to delete his accounts, and he did. I am completely shocked, as we have an intimate and loving relationship. He is ashamed and understands that his behavior is wrong. I understand if he wants to look at porn on his own time (I certainly do), but the quantity and secrecy of his actions is obviously not healthy. We have major life plans together, and I don't doubt that he is committed to me. Where do I go from here, and what steps should I take to make sure it stops?
I’m a 20-year-old lesbian in a loving relationship and I have a problem. I’m crushing on one of my close friends—and she’s seriously dating someone. In high school I would always just store these feelings away under the assumption that whoever I was crushing on wouldn’t reciprocate and I didn’t want to make things awkward between us. No one wants a friend crushing on them because then things get awkward, especially after you throw homosexuality into the mix. (I was closeted until about two years ago.)
But now things are different. This girl is bi so she and I weren’t outside the realm of possibility before she started dating someone. And it’s fair to mention that my partner and I are in an open relationship. We love each other, but she wants to explore and feel like she’s not tied down. Me, I want to be able to kiss people at parties and get more experience because my partner’s the first girl I’ve dated. We’ve agreed casual sex is fine, but we haven’t discussed dates with other people. To me, dating someone else would mean things could get serious in a betrayal-like way.
What do I do with these feelings I have for my friend? I don’t want to mess things up between her and her girlfriend, but it feels weird to constantly be checking my actions so that she won’t know I like her. I feel like I’m betraying my girlfriend by admitting I like this friend, but I do. I just don’t want to lose my girlfriend in the process of me following my feelings, because I really do love her.
Should I keep hiding these feelings away and continue being friends with my friend that I'm crushing on? Or should I stop talking to her to remove the possibility of me making things awkward? Or is there a third option I should take?
I've been dating a guy for a month or so. Sex is really good, faulty compatible in other ways too. Nice guy really. But he has told me he likes to wear diapers sometimes. Not in a sexual way, and he said he doesn't want me to do it with him. It's just that every now and then he likes to wear diapers because they make him feel "safe."
He says this behavior isn't actually sexual for him but I'm having trouble believing him. And I'm not sure how I feel about it. I'm trying to think of more questions I can ask him since he seems open to telling me more about it. He's told that this embarrasses him and that he wishes it wasn't something he needed. 
Please, if you have any insight into what to ask him or how to make sure I can keep this guy satisfied sexually as we move forward (if we do), it would be greatly appreciated.
I’m a hetero male in my late 20's. I have a smaller dick. It’s not a micro-penis, as it’s around 5", maybe 6". I honestly don't mind that aspect of it—whatever, it’s “average,” right? The issue for me is that I am 6'5" tall, and thickly framed and naturally muscular. I'm apparently "really hot," as I’ve been told since my teen years, and if girls are interested in me, they are quick to incorporate my height into their flirting, and sometimes taking the innuendo further. Basically, women have a preconceived idea of what they’ll be getting when I drop my pants.
I’m in a long-term relationship of eight years with the girl I love. I’m going to marry her soon, and we’re going to spend our lives together. She loves my dick, she begs for it at times, and she has never made me feel bad about it. I feel totally comfortable with her—although, it took a few years to get to this point.
A year ago she gave me a few “hall passes,” permission to mess around with other women once in a while, yet my insecurity has led to me not using a single one. It sounds amazing—it sounds thrilling—to experience sex with other girls, after going through my 20's being completely monogamous. But I can't get over my fear that when the pants drop, there’s going to be disappointment, or even worse, mirth, and that it won’t be concealed.
I have the go-ahead to fuck new pussy but my own head is holding me back. This is excruciatingly frustrating. Again, it’s not having an average sized dick that I mind, it's being a giant guy with lots of muscles but an average sized dick that’s frustrating me.
Please Ease Numbskull’s Longtime reader and listener but first time advice-seeker. 
I am a 36-year-old gay man in a wonderful monogamish relationship with my partner of seven years. We are sexually compatible in most ways, but he has a taste for kinkier, rougher play that I am usually happy to outsource to any number of wonderful play partners he has had over the years.
Recently we decided to invite a guest star that is a friend of his from the local gay kink community—they were two tops in search of a bottom. I was in a playful mood that day and ended up volunteering for the job. It was great. My partner was visibly excited to see me into the kind of scene he often enjoys and was egged on by our guest star—it helped that in the role play he got possessive and ruled that my face was off limits to anyone other than him... and he proceeded to slap me around. I loved every minute of it... until the next day. Thankfully it was a weekend and I could stay in the house to hide my bruised cheek, busted lip, and black and blue neck. I looked crazy. Being less the rough and tumble gay used to this predicament—I'm more the spa and facial type—I thought the weekend would do it. It didn't. So I attempted to cover up the bruises with some makeup. My skills with coverup and makeup weren't good enough. I looked like a victim of domestic violence trying to hide the bruises.
I went to work on Monday hoping that no one would notice. Now, I am not the most fabulous of my gay brethren, but no one would call me butch. There is no way anyone would be imagining a scenario with my 145 pound frame in a bar fight or getting injured doing something athletic.
I cringed at every look I got that day. I should also mention that I am the most junior partner in a medical practice where the practice culture skews towards the conservative. Outside office activities skew towards the God and country club variety. While not overtly homophobic, I have never been comfortable shining a spotlight on my sexuality or relationship. However, everyone at my office knows my partner. Now I worry they think he's a brute who beats his waifish Asian mail-order gayshaboy. Which bothers me on so many levels.
What do I do about the work situation? What do I say?
I'm a trans guy currently comfortably exploring my sexuality. At a gathering of friends, who all know I'm trans and are mostly queer men themselves, in casual conversation a statement was made that all gay men like fucking ass. I'm not sure how I identify right now or in the future, but I paused at this because I might eventually identify as a gay man, and even if I had a dick I happen to have no interest in fucking an asshole. I voiced this aloud ("not all gay men like fucking ass") and a response from one was, "no, all gay men like ass" with a room full of laughs. While no one else in the room noticed my reaction to this at all, I felt forlorn that my opinion had been "corrected." I am perfectly interested in men without being interested in a single body part or act using that body part. What really bothered me is I think if I had been a cis gender gay guy and said that, the discussion might have ensued with more folks expressing their interests that weren't stereotypical. But because I'm trans my opinion felt lesser and was rejected, and I took it as a judgement that I was somehow not (possibly) gay by their standards, and hence an outsider even in this small queer group.
Or perhaps I'm just seeing it wrong? I still have trouble deciphering if I am hypersensitive. I try to go with the notion that if something feels off, it probably is. This feels off — or am I overreacting?
No Ass For Me, Originally posted on October 8, 2014.
I'm 25, I'm virgin, and I find it quite difficult to relate with girls. My main problem is I can't accept my sexuality. I'm into fetish SM. But it seems like there are two parts of me. The first part of me wants to lick women's feet and be humiliated. The second part of me can't accept the first part and only wants to love and be loved by a girl. I would say there was nothing wrong if I could just lick feet to get the relationship a bit more "spicy," but the problem is that I think I can't excite myself the "traditional way." I had a few girlfriends in the past, and when it was the time to penetrate, I got instantly limp. I'm going to a therapist now. In my past, there were issues with parents divorced in a horrible way and a violent father. My therapist said there is an Oedipus complex and I could be freed if we work on this. So this is why I hope going away from home will make things get better. I want to have sons with my future loved woman and, finally, to have sex. Fetishists are considered perverted and are mocked in the country where I live, so it's really difficult to find girls interested in this stuff to try to explore.
I've never written to Savage Love before but I've read it plenty and I'm out of Ideas. 
I'm a 19-year-old Bi woman who works in West Seattle. I went to college but the school wasn't right for me so I left and now I have a great job but basically no friends. I work with people exclusively older than me full time—about four people at a time in the office—and all my other friends are off at their colleges. All I want to do is meet people, make friends, find a partner, etc., and have the fun I should be having in my teen/20s. I've tried Tinder, Bumble, and Her to find friends and romances and have come up with nada. 
The issue is that I am under 21 and until the year and a half till I can be in bars passes I have no idea how to tackle making friends without a school around me help me find like-minded people. And although Seattle is large, its hard to find places and activities where I can be around other people my age. It seems like all activities anywhere in Seattle are 21+.
So please, please, please. Help me with some ways to go find friends and romances.
My boyfriend and I have been together for about seven years and have an absolutely wonderful relationship. We have the same values, interests, and have a deep and understanding connection. Our sex is earth-shatteringly great—we like doing the same things and with the same frequency. Basically the relationship is ideal for both of us and we make each other very happy. The only drawback is that I am 50 and he is 30. This did not worry us at the beginning because it started as a short fling, but it didn’t take long for us to fall in love. My biggest issue is thinking about the future and how our relationship might evolve. I’m very fit and youthful with very long-lived, healthy family genes. People guess us at being about 10-12 yrs apart. But I worry about him being 55 one day and not wanting to fuck my 75-year-old ass. We’ve talked about this before, fairly openly.  He does worry about having to spend his final years alone (probably true) and I worry about being engaging and attractive for him. I’ve even told him he can find a hot fuckbuddy if I get to where my physical appeal or desire wanes. In other words, I’m willing to try to do whatever it takes. He says age doesn’t matter and I want to believe him, but does he really know what’s coming?
I’ll admit that I don’t want to start over at my age, and I know he’d find someone new in time. So, there’s certainly some fear there on my part. We are so in love that it’s hard to see being apart. Breaking up for no other reason that what the future “might” bring seems foolish. Should we just live for the present or is some long term realism too hard to ignore?
Originally posted on December 24, 2014.
I am a straight male who has never been in a romantic relationship. I am not a virgin, but every romantic relationship I've tried to pursue has ended in disaster. A few things you should know about me: While I am not a full-on clinical psychopath by a long shot, I am on that scale and do have psychopathic tendencies. I know this makes me sound like an asshole (and I probably am an asshole), but I am often the smartest person in the room. I wish this wasn't the case. Bottom line: I am extremely lonely. I have trouble relating to people, and they have trouble relating to me. I want to change how I relate to others, I want to be in a healthy relationship, and most of all I want to stop feeling so lonely, but I can't remember a time in my life when I didn't feel isolated. I don't even know where to start. Any guidance would be appreciated.
I'm a woman in my mid-twenties married to a man in his mid-forties. We've been together for over seven years. Our relationship is monogamous. We have sex often enough in my opinion, but not enough in his. My problem is this: I've just began realizing how attractive I actually am and I'm finding myself not being sexually attracted to him more and more.
It's not that I don't want to have sex, I just don't want to have sex with HIM. We have a good marriage, and I like my life with him in all other ways. He's way more open and diverse sexually about what he likes and what he wants to do, where as I'm closed mouthed about this stuff. But he is a territorial man who gets jealous easily, so I'm not sure if he'd be open to the idea of me going out specifically to fuck other dudes. I don't want a three way or any kind of relationship with the guys I'd seek out, just a hot, sloppy, sexy man on sexy woman fuck sesh. I don't want to hurt his feelings but I'm tired of having sex with his old, flabby, achey body.
What do I do?
I'm a heteroflexible 26-year-old woman. So a year ago I met this married couple and in a few weeks of meeting them we had a threesome. The sex was fine and I was willing to have sex with them again until the husband got sketchy.
A couple days after the threesome the husband was dropping his kids off at a park near me for a couple of hours (their kids are young teens, so old enough to leave alone for a while) and asked if he could come over for a beer and hang. I said sure. He immediately tried to initiate sex after he arrived. I guess I shouldn’t been so naive to think he just want to actually hang. I stopped him and asked what this wife would feel about this (about her not being here). He said that he doesn't want her to know but it is okay for him and I to have sex because he would eventually tell her. I told him I was not okay with that and kicked him out — because I don't need that drama. I thought about telling her what happened but I figured to leave it alone — again, because I don't need that drama.
I slowly distanced myself from this married couple, never had sex with them again, and eventually un-friending them on Facebook. The married couple and I run in the same social circles. So one night, a week ago, a mutual friend of ours says to me, “So I heard you had a threesome with [the married couple].” I was surprised. I asked how the mutual friend knew and it turned out they were out doing a wine tasting, and the mutual friend agreed to be designated driver, and my friend drove the married couple home. The wife was drunk and super upset because I un-friended them on Facebook and she told our mutual friend about the threesome and my “cold shoulder” immediately after.
Now, I'm not ashamed and I never hid that I have sex with men and women from friends or family. But privacy is privacy. And I don't want to explain the reason why I didn't continue being a third in their relationship.
I haven't had sex with them in over half a year. So the wife is clearly still upset over me cutting ties with them even after so long. Should I contact the wife and ask her to please not share that information with mutual friends? Or do you think that might just set her off and make it worse?
I would love some guidance on when and how to disclose to a man who is seemingly a very good potential match for me, that I have a serious health issue. We met online — I am 53, he is 69. During one of our early phone conversations he mentioned he was "healthy as a horse" and does not take any prescription medications whatsoever. It seemed to really be a point of pride for him. I however, am not so lucky and was unfortunately diagnosed with congestive heart failure at age 49. I have a fantastic cardiologist who literally saved my life with just the right cocktail of drugs. So far my condition is under relatively good control, hopefully for more than just the time being. If in the future the drugs begin to lose their effectiveness the only option left for me would be to be put on the waiting list as a candidate for a heart transplant.
Last week we had our first date and it went really well. We went to a beach party hosted by his country club, after which I felt comfortable enough to go back to his place with him. We had a magically hot session of spit swapping during which he not only commented what a great kisser I was, but also took my hand and put it on his very impressive erection. He then mentioned again he does not take any drugs of any kind. After an awkward moment during which I contemplated sharing my "secret," I thought better of it and instead  enthusiastically said, "Wow!" We didn't end up sleeping together (my choice) and he did ask me out again for this coming weekend.
It has been so long since I've been so attracted mentally and physically to someone and we have really good chemistry. We have so much in common — we're both foodies, love live music, love to travel, etc. I felt it was too soon during the conversation before we met and on the first date to bring up my serious health issue, but in light of the fact he openly shared he had no health issues/takes no medications at all not once but twice, how and when do I tell him about my situation without it then seeming like a lie of omission?
I am a 40-year-old woman who came out when I was 16. When I was 17, I met M and we dated for 8 years.  M was a horrible human being—emotionally and occasionally physically abusive, lots of gaslighting, controlled my friends, my finances, my calls to my family, etc. It was a significant part of my life but it was also long ago. We now live very far away from each other (I think) and we don’t have friends in common.  However, M still sends me the occasional (creepy) email, wishing me a happy birthday or giving me updates on people I don’t really recall. I don't respond.
Then, a few years back, I got an email saying that M was now "Mike."
I think it’s super important to use the pronoun people want you to use for them. But Mike wasn’t Mike when he was in my life. He was someone I was very close to who I thought of as a woman. Changing his pronoun when describing him feels like I’m changing my identity—my first real long-term relationship was with a woman, or at least that’s what I thought during those years. So Mike has a new pronoun that he’d like me to use but I don’t have any desire to use it. Mike caused a lot of damage in my life—does he get to fuck up (or complicate) my identity too?
It’s not like the subject of Mike comes up daily or even weekly. When it does, I skirt around the topic and/or feel like a liar. If I use “she,” I feel like I’m lying to others; “he” makes me feel like I’m lying to or about myself; and stopping to explain everything derails conversations because people want to discuss that, rather than whatever point I was attempting to make. And it’s not like I’m being a great trans ally when a conversation gets sidelined by something like, “Hi, random coworker whose only trans point of reference is Caitlyn Jenner, my ex is trans, and he’s a psychopath!”
Any advice?
Mike's Originally posted on October 15, 2014.
Four years ago, I met a man on a "married but looking" website. We exchanged fantasies, which included wanting to have threesomes and a D/s relationship. He was 19 years my senior. I was 42 at the time. For three years, we met twice a week for drinks or sex. The sex was amazing. We had several threesomes. One year ago, we separated from our spouses. We have lived together now for four months. It isn't what I imagined: the merging of kids and dogs, a D/s relationship turning vanilla. And due to some health issues, he can perform only once a week. And now the real problem: His desire to bring another woman into our relationship borders on obsession. He searches daily on several websites for that "elusive woman" to become "our friend and lover." I have access to the accounts, and his chats are pretty straightforward. Nothing that indicates a desire to cheat. He truly seems to be searching for a woman for a regular threesome. The problem is that I am questioning whether I want another woman in our life. I asked him why he is so obsessed with finding someone, and he simply said that it would be "fun and hot." Since he is much older than most men on these sites, women tend to pass him over. I have this fervent wish that he doesn't find someone. So do I sit back and hope that he doesn't find another woman, or should I be up-front with him and tell him that I'm not interested in threesomes anymore? I'm afraid that if he finds someone, my jealousy—which I work very hard to hide from him—will break us up. I am almost getting obsessed myself, checking the sites and his chats constantly. It is bordering on the ridiculous. What should I do?
I am a vanilla soccer mom in the suburbs, very happily married with two kids and a gaggle of pets.  Super, duper vanilla.  I know there's other flavors out there and I respect all flavors, I just prefer my vanilla. My next door neighbors are an early retired straight couple, perhaps late 50s/early 60s, a little chunky, looking like they just walked out of Walmart (not that there's anything wrong with that), and appeared to be pretty vanilla too—but we only know them superficially from gardening, chatting over the fence, mostly about our cats, etc.  We all kind of kept to ourselves.  
A few weeks ago we started hearing these noises at night, between 11pm and 5am. Originally we thought it was the other neighbors, a very fun and flamboyant older male couple who would love to invite y'all over for wine, dinner, and a look at their sex room. But the voices weren't right and in all the years we've lived here we've never once heard the boys going at it.
Holy Mother of God it sounds like a rhinoceros is being violated by all of Noah's Ark with a Moose dominatrix running the show—and the noises no longer sound pleasurable. And we haven't seen her in weeks. We still see him doing gardening and all we can wonder is, "Is she okay?"
I am not a nosy neighbor. But Holy Fuckwads, Batman, we can hear them with the windows closed and over the sirens and the teenagers smoking pot and the regular dulcet tones of our relatively (for the suburbs) busy street. My husband is worried that they have a sex slave being held against their will. I don't know what think. I'm now afraid to pee at night because the sounds are loudest in our bathroom.
Noah's I wanted to comment on your May 4th article, both to What's Wrong With Me? and Very Indecisive, Really Gettin' Naughty. Why? Both questions could have been written by me not long ago. I lost my virginity at age 28, and entered my first committed relationship JUST EIGHT MONTHS AGO. (I'm now 31, female heterosexual).
Like them, I was also a late-bloomer. Not really interested in dating nor piquing any interest during the "appropriate" de-virginizing/relationship age. By the time I was ready—holy shit, I'm the weirdo old virgin. I wish I could reach out to WWWM and VIRGN. Take them out for a drink and commiserate. Instead, here's what I would say to them:
1) You aren't going to lose your virginity to the Love Of Your Life. So, find someone halfway-decent. I had a COMPLICATED relationship with My First. He was a friend/someone I nursed a crush on for years. When I realized he wanted to fuck me, I took full advantage. Even though he was and is a messed-up individual who ghosted me months after we started having sex, I don't regret it. He helped wipe away that "old virgin" stigma. I could move on. Also—consider not telling Your First that you are a virgin. It worked for me. Who cares? The aren't the Love Of Your Life.
2) Date. Fucking date. Get your ass on OkCupid/Tinder/Grindr and go out to meet people. If they don't seem like weirdos, set up that coffee date.
3) Know you are going to get rejected. And boy, did I. Ghosted. Dumped via text. Dumped AFTER SEX! And it was probably the best thing for me. There was all the bad dating experience I had missed out on. I wasn't so afraid to go on that next date. Hey, how could it get any worse that the 26-year-old who dumped me because "he really wanted to focus on his jiu jitsu"?
4) Take the occasional break for some self-repair. Hardcore dating is exhausting.
5) When a particular date seems like it's going in the right direction, embrace it. You might get rejected again. But you might not. 
I was lucky to meet an amazing guy through this process. And we would have never met if I sat at home, pining for my Prince Charming. Dating and sex is messy. It is complicated. But you aren't going to get get laid or find a partner if you fucking do nothing.
Send my love to WWWM and VIRGN.
Originally posted on September 24, 2014.
My wife and I are in an open relationship. It started because my wife found flirtatious text messages I sent to a coworker. She confronted me calmly and said she knew our sexual relationship hadn't been great. She was not that interested in sex, as she'd gained about 50 pounds. I was still attracted to her, but I was rejected half the time. The other half, we had good sex, but nothing new or interesting. She said she was willing to try an open relationship. I offered other solutions (porn and toys), but she said she just didn't have the libido for it. We talked it to death before deciding we should move into (open) uncharted waters. I had a yearlong relationship with my coworker that ended when my wife and I moved. During that time, my wife never had a sexual experience with anyone else, but she started losing weight and we started having better and more frequent sex. Now I'm not looking for anything on the side. But she has embarked on sexual relationships with several people, including threesomes with her best friend and best friend's husband, a neighbor, and a coworker. I know I sound like an asshole, but I am insanely jealous. I feel like she's getting to know our new city by sleeping with everyone in the neighborhood. Four partners in two months seems crazy to me. Do I deal with this by ending our agreement to share information about outside partners? Or do I tell her I don't want an open relationship anymore, which seems like a dick move considering my past long-term relationship and the newness of her explorations?

I'm exactly 40 years old and have started seriously dating again for the first time in 8+ years.  Go me, I'm proud of myself for doing this! I'm going on a date tomorrow for the first time in over a year. Since I've started dating, I keep running into an issue...  I have 2 DUIs in my past. Now, because I'm so good at my job (HS teacher, helping to keep future generations positive) and have such a fabulous family support system, the only consequences I've suffered have been financial. I'm one of the most "stable" dudes on Grindr, even if I only make five figures. So when and how is it appropriate to tell a potential partner about my past legal troubles? (There are other issues, too: not being able to bottom without poppers; not being able to top, period... but those I can work through with my shrink.)
Although there are more issues, which you shouldn't have to deal with, the crux is this: when and how do I say "I have 2 DUIs, and I haven't given up alcohol, but I never, ever have a drink when I have to drive and I never, ever will?" And, in the last 10 years, that has become obsessively true: if there's even a chance I get behind a wheel, I abstain for 24+ hours.
Love the podcast, Dan.
I'm in my very early 20s, gay cis male, living in the Emerald City. I've been seeing a guy for a few months now and I really love spending time together with him. He is a total catch: great personality, sane, good looks, etc. We're not really a couple, but we are spending several days a week together: going to parks, bars, events, getting dinner, things like that... I'd really like it to evolve into something more long-term.
Unfortunately, it's been horribly awkward when it comes to sex. I have zero sex drive when I'm spending time with him and I cannot get that hard at all. It's fairly embarrassing and problematic because he has a fairly high sex drive compared to my other/previous partners. I've never had this issue and if I'm hooking up with someone else, I can get harder than a rock and will hump practically everything that moves.
I don't really know what I should do. I feel like if I just tell him, "Sorry, my wiener doesn't really like having sex with you," it'll just ruin the relationship... or perhaps he might think it's my way of telling him that I'm not interested (when I really am). What do you think I should do? Is there anything that I should be doing differently? Should I tell him about my problem? Should we just part ways?
I've been low-grade cruising this beautiful/smart/interesting woman for about 3 years.  We cross paths professionally and every once in a while will have a meal or a drink together.  There has sometimes been the hint of something more happening but it hasn't. UNTIL, a couple of weeks ago I was surprised to hear from her late one Friday night suggesting we meet for a drink. We did, and eventually ended up at my place fooling around. Super fun. Three years of thinking about this moment and it finally arrived. BUT (there has to be a but or else why would I be writing this?) I couldn't get hard. We did all the fool-around stuff that doesn't involve a penis and I was really happy to get to explore her body without the distraction of my cock. She was involved and willing to stimulate me as well. Nevertheless, it would have been nice to at least have the option to involve my penis/orgasm in the proceedings at some point.  Whatever. Next time, maybe.  If there is a next time.
There are a few reasons I may not have gotten hard. The most obvious being that I had jerked off a couple of hours before hearing from her. I'm in my early 40s so maybe that's starting to be an issue. Also I hadn't really slept the night before, maybe an hour or two. I had a couple of drinks with her but not anywhere near enough to preclude a boner. Also, I was pretty nervous being with her, as you can imagine. The really long build-up had created all sorts of expectations and had me putting lots of pressure on myself. But actually, I don't really care too much why I didn't get hard.  It has happened to me before but isn't usually an issue and I am confident that it won't be a recurring problem.
My question is: should I say anything about not having gotten hard? Should I offer her the possible explanations that I just outlined for you? On one hand, I don't want her to feel that she has to assuage me in any way. On the other hand, I don't want her to think it was a question of not being into her or not being stimulated by her. I'm fine with not addressing the elephant in the room, but is that the best course of action? I have tried to think of a light-hearted way of explaining of suggesting that that won't happen again, and there are many possible things I could say, but SHOULD I say any of them, or just leave it to her maturity and experience to assume something plausible?
Feeling Low And Can't Cameron Esposito wrote in with some bonus advice for Undercut. You'll find it after my advice.
I just got dumped. 
The back story, I'm a lesbian in my mid twenties, and I had been seeing this girl for about 10 months. At the beginning of the relationship, she said that while she liked me and wanted to continue seeing me, as a masters student (and someone dealing with a lot of personal/family problems in the last two years) she wasn't able to commit to a full on relationship, and had to prioritize school and herself. This all was fine with me, since my previous relationship had been deeply co-dependent, and I have had a bad habit of putting my relationships first, and myself second, so dating someone who had other things going on in her life seemed like a good and healthy change for me.
Fast forward to the nine month mark.
I've gotten myself accepted to grad schools, gotten a promotion at work, and have some exciting projects coming up. She quit smoking, was doing great at school, and while her financial situation was a little unsure, generally she seemed to be doing well. We were spending 2-4 nights a week together, usually one weeknight and the weekend. As her time was more restricted due to school, I usually asked her when/if she had time to hang out, and I would work around her schedule. We had a great sex life, I felt independent, and I also felt in love. While we hadn't talked about it getting more serious, it just naturally seemed to be getting more serious. While I know I was definitely holding back, I refrained from planning things too far into the future, or counting on her too much. Then she started making plans for the summer, talking about camping, and renting air BnB's, she introduced me to her family, and we had plans to meet my family in a few months. She also proposed we plan a trip together once she was finished school. Everything seemed great and easy. I was stupidly happy.
Then, not three weeks after I met her family (which went really well, and she said I got along with them better than any of her exes), we get in a fight about a haircut of all things. Specifically, I said my hairdresser might do a  bit of an undercut to help me grow out my Cameron Esposito style side mullet. She had been planning to get a side  mullet, then said I'd be copying her, and that I always copy her. When I told her that accusation hurt my feelings, she didn't acknowledge me, and then refused to talk about it, and basically stormed off. 
She didn't message me for over 24 hours, and so I initiated contact and asked if we could talk about our fight. 
She agreed, and I went into the conversation expecting an apology. Instead I got a "I feel unsure about where our relationship is going, and am feeling pressure for it to be building towards something, which I can't commit to." I felt completely blind sided. I told her if she didn't want it to be more serious she was sending mixed messages, to which she replied that she wasn't quite she what she wanted, and had been trying to "test out a more serious relationship" before realizing she wasn't ready for it, and didn't want to waste any more of my time.
I still can't quite figure out what happened. Was she never THAT into it, and had been seeing if taking it more seriously would change how she felt about me? Or did it start to get serious and she freaked out? I know if this was her response to an argument about a haircut, that this is for the best. I just can't help but over analyze where I might have gone wrong. I can't tell if she had been secretly resenting me for months, or if she was making up reasons to push me away. Do I dare hold out hope she'll change her mind?
I appreciated Jen Senko's advice in this week's "Savage Love" on how to talk to friends/family who are addicted to FOX news. However, when I visited the site she recommended—hearyourselfthink.org—it just asked me for money. It looks like a for-profit special interest group, and I had a hard time finding practical advice anywhere on the site. Their Twitter feed is pretty angry itself, just from an opposite-to-FOX point of view.  Senko's documentary looks great, and I'm glad that they're getting support for it. I will see it if it comes around here. But the website she recommended was disappointing. I will have to look elsewhere for advice on how to handle my Mom's obsession with Fox News.
My wife and I are newlyweds of eight months and our sex life has been non-existent for nearly eight months. It all started when she confessed to me that it sometimes hurts when we have sex and that she doesn't really enjoy having sex in general. We only really do it missionary due to the fact I have a smaller-than-average penis, caused by a defect at birth, and experimenting with other positions was unsuccessful. Now when we have sex I'm so worried about hurting her it's difficult for me to maintain and sometimes even obtain an erection. It doesn't help that my wife isn't really willing to help me in the foreplay department. When I ask for help it's like asking a teenager to do her chores—even after I've spent 20-30 minutes getting her revved up, as that's the only part she says she enjoys. It's causing undue stress in our otherwise great marriage, we connect great on every other level. My wife now thinks I'm not attracted to her anymore and that I'm cheating on her which is not the case!
My boyfriend is currently going through a divorce. He has been separated from his "hopefully-soon-to-be ex-wife" 17 months (November/December 2014). She officially filed for divorce 13 months ago (March 2015). The process of their divorce has progressed at a painfully slow speed. For instance, it took them almost five months to separate out their credit cards and the debt on each card. They have three kids and own a house together, which they recently sold. The next step in their divorce is to separate retirement and investments, and then theoretically the divorce will be final.
Here's my question. I feel like their divorce has taken an unrealistic amount of time, given their circumstances (pretty normal divorce), and there is no end in sight. My partner has no idea when the divorce will be final (6 months? 2 years?) and it doesn't seem to bother him one way or the other. When one of them contacts the other one to move along the process, it's always months in between steps. My partner does not have a lawyer, because he initially agreed to pay for his "hopefully-soon-to-be ex-wife's" lawyer, and can't pay for two lawyers at the same time. Whenever I ask him for an update on the process, we end up arguing and not speaking for an entire day. There have been several instances where we have almost broken off our relationship over these arguments. So, how long is too long to wait for a divorce to be finalized when you can't see the end and you really can't see much forward movement?
There are a few important details to consider with my question. Prior to their separation, my partner and I had an affair together. I was also married at the time, but my divorce was finalized within six months. We carried our affair on for approximately three months prior to the story coming out. My partner lost his job over the affair and I eventually resigned from mine. For several months, we didn't have much contact, and in May 2015 we officially began dating and started a new life in a new state together. Because of the affair, my partner tends to provide his "hopefully-soon-to-be ex-wife" leniency when she tries to play tricks on him, keep the kids from him, or draws out the divorce. However, he certainly doesn't take the bull by the horns and push things along either.
So, all that being said, is 14 months too long to wait when the divorce is pretty much a normal divorce?  When do I put my foot down and tell him to give me a call when his divorce is final? Or, am I being unrealistic about this?
This letter will raise any number of red flags with you and your readers so I would understand if you decide not to publish it. It proves that some stereotypes are not true and that some taboos can be broken.
I used to be a school teacher in London. I did it for almost two decades in some of the toughest areas of the city. It was challenging and fulfilling work but I was barely able to make ends meet. Every month I struggled to pay the mortgage, the bills, and put food on the table. I was married to another teacher and we two children but we eventually fell out of love with each other. Circumstances being what they are, we still live together as a family but my husband and I have gone our separate ways emotionally. It was during my second pregnancy that my husband stopped touching me. 
Five years ago three things happened. I picked up that "masterpiece" by E L James and read it in one sitting by the light of a torch in our garden. Then I met a man who was the first to touch me with passion in years. Although it was a short-lived relationship, he transformed me and made me believe in myself. I lost a stone and a half and started paying attention to my appearance. Then I made a decision that life was too short to live in misery so I hung out a sign on the internet and transformed myself into a mature escort. I did this with both my husband’s and my mother’s knowledge. It was something my husband actually encouraged because he knew I would bring more money into the household. I knew I would be a success because I enjoy sex in all its permutations and men can sense that.
Escorting is not as glamorous as one would think and it is certainly not as horrible as some imagine.
In reality, I am just an upscale prostitute, albeit a few years older than most of the women in the business. I work out of a flat in London. Over the years my clientele has grown to the point where I see four or five regulars a day and maybe one curious newcomer. I make about £700 a day, which is more than I made as a teacher in a week. The sex doesn’t fit the stereotype that many people imagine. It can be average and it can be mind blowing. I don’t do this work just to make money; I honestly enjoy giving physical pleasure and receiving pleasure in return.
The one stereotype about being an escort that does ring true is that virtually all my clients are married and cheating on their wives. That the stereotype was true for my first two years as an escort up until one day three years ago when something truly magical happened: an American man walked in the door and gave me the honour of being the first woman to touch him erotically since his wife passed away a number of years previously. He came to see me because he wanted a physical relationship with no emotional ties. That’s not how it worked out at all.
I don’t know how to adequately describe the American. Let's call him "Barack." He is six years younger than me, five times brighter, an expat living in London, literally the sort of man that make women gasp when he walks in a room. He is not tremendously wealthy but he is very well off and his success comes from his creativity and his wonderfully complex mind. I didn’t fall in love with Barack first, but he fell for me the moment we were first together. It didn’t take long for me to follow suit. The truth is that we didn’t have full blown sex until a week after we met. The first time he saw me we just talked for three hours straight, touching each other. It was our third appointment when he gave himself to me fully. Barack is the sort of man that takes pleasure in giving pleasure and our physical relationship is right off the scale. Although this may sound like mystical rubbish, right at the start, Barack felt it was if he was destined to be with me. I knew from the beginning that I was the one chosen to heal his heart. 
Barack is not conflicted about what I do for a living. In fact he finds it tremendously erotic and, to this day, he generously pays for his time with me, always in an envelope with a nice card. He also showers me with gifts, takes me shopping and we holiday together. I spend two or three nights a week at his flat and have met his children and his friends, all of whom, up to recently, were completely unaware of how I make my living. We have been seeing each other for three years and he has remained faithful to me. As hypocritical as it sounds, it would break my heart if he slept with another woman. 
When we are out together with his friends, both male and female, I have always been aware of the barely concealed envy the women in the room have about me. Here I am a few years older than Barack, of dubious origins, and I’ve snatched away their prize. There has always been a lot of curiosity about me. The fact that I am still married but obviously in love with another man who dotes on me has brought out the green monster of jealousy in many of the women, particularly those who were friends with his late wife.
What Barack and I knew would inevitably happen has now come to pass. In the last few days I have been getting phone calls through the number I work through from women I vaguely know through Barack. They have become increasingly nasty and vitriolic. They claim that my relationship with Barack has stopped him remarrying and finding happiness and they have called me all sorts of derogatory names.
The fact that I am now "outed" doesn’t bother Barack in the least. I admire that in him so much and makes me love him more. The truth is I know that Barack would propose to me at the drop of a hat if I hinted to him that I wanted us to be married. He would love to know that we will be together for the rest of our lives.
As unusual as our relationship is, it works. I don’t want to disrupt my children’s lives. They are happy with the arrangement between my husband and me. They have never met Barack but they have heard about him. I know his children and their nanny although they have no idea what I do for a living, but they are aware I am married. I do tuck them in at night when I am over and do in many ways feel that they are now my children too.
The question I have for you is this: Should I divorce my husband, prompt a proposal from Barack, and marry him? It would have to be a sort of hybrid marriage for a few years, at least until my children were mature enough to deal with the situation. If I were to do this I would split my time between Barack and my home and carry on with my work. I know Barack would love this to happen and it wouldn’t break my husband’s heart, as long as he knew that I was paying the mortgage.
It is my 46th birthday coming up and if I told Barack to get me an engagement ring it would make him the happiest man in the world. Furthermore, I would love to flash it at those bitches who think I am not good enough to have their golden boy.
Hi Dan. I follow you in Savage Love from Internazionale.
Now i talk about my problem (sorry for my not perfect English). Now i’m in a strange mess from about two years with a girl, she have a boyfriend. I must be sincere with you: i love her and i have a strong feel for her and she told me the same thing but she can’t leave her old relationship (is a long distance relationship)  because her boyfriend is a problematic person, with a difficult past, and some big troubles which she try to resolve with him. Her sexual life with him is not existent (5/10 in a year)  but is very intense with me (5 for a week). When i talk with her about it she says to me i’m the right person for her but for now she can’t leave him because there’s to much unsolved problem but she can see a future with me.
Of course i’m very confused about it and i don’t know what i have to do. Can i have a suggestion from you?
Tx.
I’m a 22-year-old straight cis woman. I was raised Unitarian and went through years of the OWL sex ed program growing up. So, my sex education has been very liberal and very thorough. I’ve been taught that size doesn’t matter, and I know it’s because only the first two inches of the vagina have concentrated nerve ending, etc., etc. Despite being taught that size doesn’t matter, some of my experiences have left me wondering. Is it possible that size matters for some vaginas more than others?
I was in a two-year relationship with a man who was very well-endowed and particularly girthy, more so than any other man I’d been with before him. I’d been sexually active for four years and had several different partners before meeting him. But I never had an orgasm during sex until I met him. That relationship unfortunately ended a few months ago. About a week ago I felt okay enough to try getting back up on the horse. I went on a date with this super-hot, good-looking, well-muscled, really nice, fun guy and we ended up having sex. His dick was average in length but was very skinny—much skinnier than my ex-boyfriend. I barely even felt it go in. I barely felt anything. I was not stimulated at all. I was actually waiting for him to put it in when I realized, to my horror, that he was, in fact, already in. It was so dissatisfying that I left immediately after. I did, of course, make up a plausible excuse to leave because I didn't want him to feel bad about his body or his (lack of) abilities in bed. 
What gives? I thought size wasn’t supposed to matter?
Also, this might be relevant: the way that I’m able to orgasm, both during sex and when I masturbate, requires a lot of pressure, particularly on my g-spot with simultaneous clit stimulation. Getting eaten out does nothing for me (which I’ve always been frustrated and confused by after looking up statistics that most women can only come from oral but I can’t) and I’m pretty sure the reason is because tongues are soft and can’t apply the necessary amount of pressure I need to come. So maybe skinny dicks can’t either? Is it possible that my vagina is picky and needs girthy penises in order to come, even though that contradicts what I learned in OWL about size not mattering? This guy has asked to see me again, but the sex was so dissatisfying that I have been pretending to be really busy this week to avoid seeing him, which I feel really guilty for, since he was really nice and very attractive.
My boyfriend is a kinky bisexual who has had many varied sexual experiences. I am a vanilla woman who is that way because it was all I was ever exposed to. He tells me he has had a hard time talking to me about kinky desires of his because past girlfriends have been put-off by them. I have tried telling him that I am open to trying new things but he needs to start slow. I've always been concerned that if he wasn't getting these needs met from me, where would he be getting them met? It was hard to know that he's had such wide-ranging sexual experiences given that  we don't have sex as often as I would like and I'm under the impression that standard penis-in-vagina doesn't do much for him. 
Cue to three months ago and on our shared computer (we live together) I find a secret email account with racy emails between him and other women/men/non-gendered individuals he finds on Craigslist. He would talk about having a mid-afternoon blow job session "while my girlfriend is at work." I confront him, he says those things never actually happened (he never gave out our address, but did receive an address once to meet in a parking lot and I have only his word that he didn't actually go) and that this is "his porn." I called bullshit and said that, to me, this is at least e-cheating since he was purposefully hiding it from me and it was a lie of omission. I felt like I handled it pretty well, all things considered. He deleted everything from the account and an old cell phone which he treated as an old "trophy case" filled with old explicit texts/photos and which I had previously found but which I had left alone until all of this came to a head. 
Now I feel like I'm having some kind of regression. I am anxious all the time about him not getting what he wants from me, even though I try so hard to tell him that I'm open. I've been hurt badly by partners in the past and I know that hurt comes primarily from the lies involved in their actions. The regression went into full-swing when two weekends ago he went out with his friend and flirted with a girl—he told me about it—and drunkenly gave her his phone number. She texts him the next day and they chit chat (not in a weird way) but he never mentions me and was perplexed when I got so upset about it. I feel like I'm crazy for being so anxious. I have an anxiety disorder (fairly under control) so it's hard for me to tell if what I'm feeling is legitimate or if it's "just my anxiety talking." I desperately want to give my otherwise loving, supportive boyfriend what he needs to be satisfied sexually (he says we don't have the kind of sexual chemistry that he might prefer in what is our otherwise really satisfying relationship, which breaks my heart a little), but I don't know how to get over this anxiety. I feel like if he doesn't break us up with his flirtations/inappropriate actions, then I am going to destroy us with my brain's inability to let this go. What do you think? 

I'm a queer girl living in Vancouver with my male partner. This weekend we found ourselves in an after-hours club, made some friends and ended up at a house with two other guys and a girl. Things were getting pretty playful with everyone except for one of the guys. We all wanted him gone to get the show on the road but he wouldn't take the hint. He had bought all the booze for this after party so we were a little unsure of the etiquette of asking him to leave. Neither I or the other girl was interested. I made it clear that penetration was off the menu for me because I had an IUD inserted the day before and had just started my period. Everyone respected this except this one guy. He asked if I would do anal and I refused. He then shoved his fingers in my ass and I stopped him. Things continued. I positioned myself away from him but he somehow got behind me again and put his bare dick inside—though barely. The host pulled him off of me. For a reason none of us can understand, we didn't kick him out. We were admittedly all a bit fucked up from partying. I had a stern talk with him about respecting consent but when I felt his dick enter me from behind for the second time I got really upset. My boyfriend threatened him and the guy punched him a couple times and broke my sweetheart's nose. The host had been getting drinks and ran back in. He threw the guy out with no pants, so he had a well-deserved walk of shame. We don't know the guy's last name so we can't charge him. 
Obviously, all of this is shitty. My question though is this. We enjoy threesomes/moresomes/swingers clubs, etc., as a couple, but this isn't the first time a fun night was ruined by a persistent dick monster who wouldn't listen, albeit never to this extent. Do you have any suggestions for creating a strategy to deal with pricks like these? Sober and not horny me has all the answers, but when I'm feeling violated and vulnerable, and distracted by whatever dick/pussy that's in my face, I'm not quite the loud-mouthed feminist bitch I usually am. We all agree he should've been kicked out before the offenses added up. Maybe he should've been kicked out when we all agreed we weren't so comfortable with him playing around with us. What's the etiquette of telling someone they can't join in? If things turned out differently, I'd feel a hell of a lot less shitty for trying not to make him feel insecure and excluded. I'm done dancing around assholes' feelings now.
I'm 40 and newly divorced. Our sex life was in the toilet and had a large part in our split. I've dealt with ED for the past few years and have had limited success with meds and right before my wife ended things, I was scheduled to visit a urologist and start some kind of alternate treatment to get things back on track. Turns out my testosterone is very low and I'm about to get on a program with my GP to get that up to better levels.
I own that I did not take good care of myself and a recent stay in the hospital really opened my eyes about what dire straits I was in. I came out of that long recovery with a new "life's too short" attitude and want to get my sex drive back up to normalish levels. I believe I have an opportunity to do just that with an old friend I've reconnected with in the past month or so and we've already made plans to have me visit in a few weeks time. I'd love to make this a memorable experience instead of a tearful confession about my currently non-functioning junk. And I think I have a solution. 
About four years ago, when it was obvious how little my wife and I were having sex, I purchased a strap-on harness for men (this one), which I had no idea existed until you mentioned it on the podcast a while back. I was proud of myself for being proactive and attempting a solution, even going so far as to take a trip to She Bop together to pick out a cock. She chose one and we promptly went to the hotel and... did nothing. She apparently wanted nothing to do with a fake cock attached to her husband and, I believe, waited four years to admit that out loud.
Whatever. Water under the bridge. 
Point is, I still have this harness and and cock and, spurred by the possibility of sex with my old friend, I'm excited to finally try it out. It has nothing but great reviews and I think I'd really be empowered by using it, a feeling I haven't had for years. Which leads me to my dilemma. How do I let my future partner(s) know that, if I'm going to fuck her, it's going to be with a strap-on and my own dick probably won't enter the equation? I can still jerk off to largely unsatisfying orgasm, but it's usually a frustrating process and I do so rather seldom. However, with my new attitude, I'm determined to not let this stand in the way of a potentially really satisfying sexual encounter. 
I rolled out my kinks early with my ex-wife and I know that confidence is the key. But even you have to admit, Dan, that this situation is fairly unique. I think my potential partner could be on board, but I'm kind of at a loss as to how to bring it up to her. Any advice, Dan?
I am a little embarrassed to reach out but I am at a loss. My wife and I have been married for 15 years and are both older (50). I love her dearly but, once she went through menopause about one year ago, we have had virtually no sex (not Woody Allen's definition). She occasionally gives me oral sex but will not allow me to touch her at all. She has terrible hot flashes and vaginismus but cannot take oral estrogen.  This is making me a little crazy.
I started watching porn often, I masturbate often, and, now that an old friend has moved back into the area, I am trying not to cheat. My friend and I met shortly after my wife and I moved in together but I always found her sexy. She seems to feel the same way about me. There is a lot of tension between the two of us. She has a lot of baggage and it will likely affect my marriage. I find myself fawning over women at the gym and often feeling inappropriate. I am quite frustrated. Any suggestions?  
Mid-Last week on the Savage Lovecast, you went over your rule on Secret Perving: It's OK so long as it remains secret. But does the rule apply to voyeurs—that is, to people whose secret perv involves violating other people's privacy, rather than simply perving on them without their knowledge during public interactions?
This question came to mind today while I was reading Gay Talese's New Yorker essay on Gerald Foos, a committed voyeur who purchased a motel in Denver back in the 1960s for the purpose of watching his guests from specially constructed ventilation shafts in the ceiling. It's a fascinating piece for a million reasons, but at the moment I'm interested in it as a limit case for your theory of the Secret Perv. Is it ok for a motel owner to systematically invade the privacy of his guests for some twenty years so long as he takes adequate precautions against their ever finding out?
Interestingly, Talese and Foos violated that last crucial stipulation when they went public with the story last week. Twenty-five years have passed since Foos sold the motel, but it's just possible that someone who stayed at that motel back in the 1970s now knows their privacy was invaded, and there's no question that would be a terrible shame. But what if Foos had been less eager to achieve recognition for his "sociological" observations? Or Talese had been more insistent on publishing the piece with no clear indication of the motel's name and location? Would the victims' lack of knowledge mean that Foos had done nothing wrong? Would his elaborate modifications of the hotel's attic to create viewing platforms count in his favor as a sign of decent consideration, rather than of monstrous perversity?
Really interested in your thoughts on this topic. I always enjoy your principled moral reasoning on difficult questions of sexual expression. Do let me know if you address this in your blog, as I usually follow just the column and the podcast.
I guess the quickest way of saying this is that I discovered about a year ago that my wife of almost 10 years and the mother of my two kids has had nine separate one-night stands with strangers she met off of Craig's List and I really don't know what to do about it.
This all happened about a year and a half after our first son was born. I was working crazy hours to support the family (she decided at almost the last minute to be a stay-at-home-mom) and we had almost nothing in savings. The time that I had been spending with her before our son was born was split between 70 hour weeks at the office and helping her to take care of our young daughter. 
She became convinced that I didn't love her anymore and that the marriage was over and decided to start responding to ads on CL. At first it was just cyber- and phone-sex but eventually it escalated and she started meeting people in cars and in hotels for sex. The oral sex was not protected, the vaginal and anal sex were. I've been checked out and I do not have any STIs and we are trying to deal with the emotional fallout with individual and couple's therapy, and we get along just fine except when it comes to sex.
Our sex life was never ideal. I tried all sorts of things to find out what turned her on but I was never able to find anything that worked with consistency (me taking the reigns, her taking the reigns, me as a sub, her as a sub, porn, erotica, etc, etc). Finding out that what did it for her was "literally anyone but me" hurt a lot. The fact that the sex was at least partially unprotected and that I was exposed to STIs without warning has left me completely un-attracted to her. It borders on outright disgust. The thought of touching her sexually makes me want to peel my skin off. But bluntly, I feel sexually assaulted by her and I don't know if I will ever want to have sexual contact with her again.
I have raised the issue of formally opening our marriage so that we can each feel fulfilled but she got extremely insecure and refuses to allow that to be an option. Ideally we would stay together (we are great co-parents and are otherwise good friends) but I'm not going to spend twenty years in a sexless marriage. What do you think I should do?
Craig's My husband and I had a mutually satisfying sexual relationship before my pregnancy.  However, after my first trimester my parts stopped working—no matter how much I wanted to have sex mentally or emotionally the physical act of touching my genitals no longer felt arousing. We tried it a couple of times but it was not exciting for him that I was getting basically nothing out of the act. So we didn't have sex for those six months. Then of course as you know, we didn't have a lot of time for each other through the sleep-deprived fog of the newborn months.
Now our son is six months old and sleeping through the night and taking regular naps. My sexual appetite is voraciously revived—I have been masturbating sometimes twice a day while at home alone with the kid. I was excited about reconnecting with my husband and having sex with each other as much as our son's schedule permits us. But I found myself cajoling my husband into coming to bed, which wasn't really necessary before.  And he would never have left me without having an orgasm before, but now sometimes once he gets off he falls asleep or says that he is too tired to continue. And he is still very tired—he's the one working full time and also doing as much as he can with our son when he's at home.  
He has reassured me that his attraction to me is not changed it's just that he's feeling less sexual desire overall. And I trust him despite still working on getting my body back to where I want it to be. Should I just be patient? Try reconnecting in other physical ways that don't require the pressure of the sexual act?  Just keep on masturbating while I wait for my partner to get to where I am? I've read your column for so long that I'm answering my own questions, but I guess I worry that this is the first step to the cheating/divorce spiral some couples go down once they have children.
Post-I'm a 32-year-old straightish guy dipping a toe in the bi waters with my girl's blessing. (She's GGG as fuck!) I'm not interested in a relationship and am not a "scene" guy or frequenter of gay bars. I just want some quick and easy dick so I've been looking online: Craigslist and Grindr.
My girl and I agreed that condoms for everything, including oral sex, were a must outside of our relationship.  I realize the risks of STI transmission during unprotected oral sex are comparatively low but there is still plenty of nasty shit out there. Without fail, every single fucking guy I've talked to balks at my insistence that we use rubbers for oral. Am I taking crazy pills? Why does it seem like the all these guys are hell bent on getting an STI?
I've been shutting down the pushy assholes who give me a hard time for wanting to be safe but should I be?  Should I not be as concerned as I am? Any advice for how to attract sensible people from the get go?
Dan Savage, sir, there is no correct way to introduce kink in the middle of a relationship. The correct time to introduce kink into the middle of a relationship is at the beginning so that the moral boundaries of the vanilla person will be present and respected, and they have the option to reject your kinky ass and go find someone healthy. Trying to introduce someone proudly vanilla to your kinks after they have emotionally invested in someone, is a violation of their personal boundaries and their right to stay as vanilla as they like. 
It's like someone confessing that they eat scorpion peppers and want me to do it too, to keep them interested in my cooking. How about hell no, I have a palate that can discern 10,000 different flavors of NOT HOT, and I like being able to enjoy flavor subtlety that hasn't burnt out my taste buds at 3 million scoville units. I am not obligated to be open minded to eating scorpion peppers when you finally get up the nerve to say all my lovely cooking is bland. Tell me you prefer scorpion peppers before I cook for you, so that I don't waste my time flavoring the meal with subtle sweets and savories with all the effort involved, and just boot your ass out the door. Because if someone's palate is blasted out, everything tastes like vanilla. I don't want to cook for you then, because it'll get all up in my eyes and burn like hell. Don't ask me in the middle of dinner. Seriously.
I don't need to waste my time cooking for someone with no palate, or get hooked into blasting my own palate. Fuck the scorpion peppers. If someone respects me, they'll tell me they don't want what I have to cook for them, and leave before I feel inadequate or morally compromised.
10,000 I am a faithful reader of your column. I appreciate the advice you give others whether I agree or not. I've also learned a lot and become more open to different experiences that people have. I am a 46-year-old woman who has been in sexless marriage for the last ten years. I've been with my husband for 25 years. Wow! More than half my life.  I know what you're thinking, not another letter looking for advice in a sexless heterosexual marriage. That's not the case here. I read your advice in all those sexless marriages and ran with it. I've been asking my husband for more than a year to be in an open marriage and he always told me I was crazy. I asked him about intimacy and I always got the same answer, not tonight, I'm tired, I have a headache, the kids are still awake. You name the excuse I've heard it.
In December I made the choice without my husband's approval to seek a lover. Not knowing much about online dating I went to AM. There I found many men, mostly over the top strange men. I did a lot of blocking, saw tons of dick pics, and more. I happened to click on the picture of a guy who lived relatively close and had a simple profile similar to mine. We started to communicate and eventually met up for lunch one day in February. We had an instant connection. Since then we have become lovers. I am loving life and I am having the best sex ever. So thank you for the advice to have an affair. It has changed me for the better. I'm taking better care of myself, working out, losing weight, managing my depression, and I'm just happy.  I've changed so much that my coworkers are noticing and I'm doing my job so much better. My husband hadn't noticed any changes. He oblivious. I stay for the kids since we get along pretty well with the exception of sex. With that being said on my birthday last month I approached my husband one more time. He said he would never be intimate again, he's not that into it, and I could do what I needed to do. I haven't shared the affair but maybe one day I will. 
A GTFO here from Nov. 4th's SLLOTD. First off, thank you so much for your quick response to my plea for urgent help. I was so surprised and grateful to open the app the morning after emailing you to find exactly the response I expected and needed. I talked with the Awkward Boy that day (though sadly left out your sage suggestion that he find others' beds to sleep in, as I knew he'd be more offended than encouraged by that) and ended up finding him a cheap flight home for the following week. That actually worked out well for him, since he was able to find holiday work and start paying his parents back/saving up to go back out traveling. 
It also ended up better for me than I ever could have hoped. Shortly thereafter, I connected with a local sax player who I've been crushing on at shows since I first saw one of his bands 2 years ago. I'm now in the happiest relationship of my life, with someone who is all the things AB turned out not to be - talented, driven, inspiring, intellectually compelling, and both sexy and sweet as can be. I'm starting to get the feeling that I'll be thanking you for that push every day for the rest of my life. So thanks, and much love to you!
I am a 30-year-old man. May 3 would have marked my one year anniversary with my girlfriend. It has been a week since we split. Funny thing is she is in an open marriage. We made it work really well for a year. Like any other couple we had our issues and we worked on them. She met my family and friends. Even though we met as strangers she became my best friend. Frist time I told her I loved her was something out of a corny sitcom but so natural. I had asked her to marry me, and she said yes. She tried leaving him for me but could not. She tried leaving me but she could not. She wanted to be with us both. Ultimately I saw that her feelings changed from week to week—one week we were talking about having kids and getting married and the next it seemed like she was dating someone else behind my back. I am totally lost. Today is her birthday and it is killing me. I feel like I should not be this heart broken. Everything was falling apart and breaking up with her was the best decision, I was never going to get what I wanted. A part of me wants to get up and fight, but I do not see anything coming from her. What do I do? 

I'm a 26-years-old Italian girl and I've always refused to watch porn because even as a teenager I felt it was primarily geared towards men and mostly unfair to women. I didn't even know what feminism was back then, but I found porn mildly disturbing and couldn't get off watching a woman being fucked in every orifice by oversized men with oversized dicks. Now that I've matured into a full-blown feminist I understood porn doesn't have to be bad if everyone involved has given their consent and is ok with doing what they're doing. I still have a feeling, though, that the porn industry is dangerous for women and a lot of the content that can be found online isn't really consensual and ethical. 
I've recently moved to Sweden and started dating a Swedish guy. The sex is great and we have very open and anxiety-free conversations about our sexual preferences and stuff we might like to experiment with together. We were talking about porn, and I told him I would like to try watching some. However, I know I won't enjoy it unless I'm 110% sure that nobody was harmed or pressured into things they didn't really want to do. He agrees with me that it's a fucked-up industry unless one only watches celebrity pornstars, so I decided to turn to you for advice: where do we find feminist porn? And since I'm at it, and I'm a complete beginner, how do I find ethical straight porn which is meant for women? I mean something with a bit of a storyline and some erotic depth, not just sexy housewives, plumbers and PIV. 
I know I could've googled this myself, but I really wouldn't know where to look and I don't want to end up seeing stuff that would deliver the death blow to the aforementioned already wavering faith in humanity. I figured you're kind of an expert and could point me in the right direction from the start. 
I hope you will find the time to reply, although you probably receive hundreds of emails every day, and I'm looking forward to watching some good-quality, respectful porn with my man :)
Previously Orrified, I'm a 27-year-old straightish girl who likes a little dominance in her life. I'm not into being humiliated or extreme pain, but I like to be lovably forced into rougher sex. Lots of talk, caressing, and deep fucking. 
I've recently met this guy who's dominant—and holy shit is he hot. Before meeting with him I was very clear that I don't like anal; in fact I reiterated it several times. When we met, he had the perfect loving dominant attitude, something I've never experienced before despite my efforts to explain to men what I want. During our first meeting, he wants me to do anal. Not that day but eventually. Tonight, our second meeting, he wanted to put something in my ass. Let me tell you it is very awkward to tell a Dom no in the middle of a scene. I've agreed to try it though, after a proper cleaning and slowly—but 100% because he wants it so much.
Outside of the bedroom he's cool, respectful and loving. I just don't know how to assert my boundaries or even if I should. Should I just do it? Making him happy makes me happy but god I really hate anal.
I'm not smart enough to come up with an acronym. Let's just go with...
North Carolina's Anti-I am a lesbian, and have been in a relationship with the same woman for twelve years, and though we have shared so much good stuff, there has never been a sufficient amount (or at least the right brand) of romance or sex for me. We were never compatible, sex-wise, and part of the issue has been that that’s been OK with my partner, who lacks much of a libido… whereas sex and romance are both extremely important to me. When we initially got together, I did realize that this was an issue, but the good far outweighed the bad, and my needs at that point were very different than they are now, so I rationalized it and then rationalized it again. But my fundamental needs have caught up with me, as they do, and a few years ago I had an affair, which got busted open, and resulted in me and my partner separating (in a fairly dramatic way). I did not want my relationship to end, certainly not like that, so we got back together and worked on rebuilding trust (lots and lots of couple's counseling), but the “sex” (or lack thereof) still fell very flat. There is so much tying us together, including owning a store together, and so there have been countless reasons to make this work. Last year, I met somebody—also in a wrought relationship—and, despite my trying to avoid it, we fell in love. But my new love and I did not want to be unduly unkind to our partners, so we decided to try to deal with the issues in our marriage as much as we could, and keep those issues separate from the fact that one of the reasons our relationships were perhaps doomed to fail was because of our newfound love with each other. But every time I tried to wrap my head around leaving my primary relationship, I would become frozen with fear and sadness, since there is so much to stay in it for. My partner and I had discussed open relationships, but, after many lengthy discussions, my partner said it wouldn’t work for her. Knowing I was unhappy, she kept asking me what I wanted, and I kept saying "I don't know." Yet I'd continue to fall deeper in love with my new person, still unable to confront my partner with my new truth. Finally, after months (actually, years…) of this loop de loop, my partner has boldly decided that we should live separately and work on “restructuring” who we are as a couple—but neither the words “divorce” nor “separation” have never been uttered. We are taking it one step at a time, but we are now "allowed" to have sexual and romantic relationships with others, as long as we tell each other. (I cannot imagine telling her about my new love.) My partner has an alternate place to stay for now, thanks to friends who are traveling, and we are managing, at least for now, to run our business mostly remotely. Yet I think I’m in some kind of deep denial, and my partner and I continue to talk and text throughout the day. Sometimes I even manage to convince myself that nothing has changed, but in the quiet moments, I realize that nothing will ever be the same. 
I can’t figure out for the life of me what I want my primary relationship to become, or what I want it to “restructure” into. Why can't I make a decision and then own that? I’m so very sad at the idea of losing the person I thought was my “life partner,” and I know that the day she finds out about my new love (even though I suspect she knows, on some level)—who is now in the middle of a divorce herself—my partner will be devastated and not want to talk to me. My new love, who I am really passionately in love with, lives far away, and so any relationship we would pursue would require one of us moving. We are open to that, but is it realistic for me, at 42, to just up and leave my life like this? To leave my marriage which works on so many levels for the possibility of a new love, and all the risks that come with that? It’s been posed to me that my new love is simply a catalyst for me to get out of my marriage, but I don’t feel that’s true—I’m completely head over heels crazy about her. 
But where does that leave my partner and me? Is it possible that me and my partner could transition into a relationship where we are still family—maybe even the most important people to each other—while I am pursuing this other relationship? Should I stay or should I go? Feeling Unable(to) Originally posted on August 6, 2014. 
I am a 38-year-old married woman. My husband of 18 years is 22 years my senior. I credit my husband for giving me a good life and helping me pursue goals. But my husband is a type A professional, and that has played out in the bedroom. He has always been disinterested in my pleasure. When our kids were little, I did not want sex as often as he did ("only" twice a week). I suggested that he masturbate in the shower if he wanted a morning quickie. His answer: A married man "should not have to pleasure himself." That attitude about my wifely duties also translates into myriad other household tasks that fall into my lap. Hubby, by the way, does not fall into my lap. If I ask for oral, he tells me to "clean it really, really well," then he'll "think about doing that." This makes me feel disgusting. I have tried to spice up our sex life. For years, it has been penis in the vagina, missionary position or doggy style. It can feel pretty "rapey" a lot of the time, as he typically comes at me rounding third base and then—bam—it's over in five minutes. If I initiate or get on top, he loses his erection because I am "attacking him." A few months ago, I told a friend that I had never once received "enthusiastic oral." She said it made sense that my husband didn't enjoy doing it because it was a "domination thing" that mostly submissive men enjoy. A little information can be a dangerous thing. I started visiting online domination forums. I hinted about these interests to my husband and got shot down (of course). This is a huge contrast to my new "online friends," who would love to meet and orally service me. Two of these "sub males" want me to "own" them. This is heady stuff. I have spoken to each of them on the phone and exchanged hundreds of e-mails. (Meeting strangers sounds scary, I know, but I have kept my identity secret and have insisted on knowing these gents' real and verifiable info.) I want to take this into "real life." This is the happiest I have been in my entire life, and I want to act on these desires. My husband is my only concern. He is my best friend, and I don't want to lose that. I feel like I can't even tell him about the online stuff. He is so rigid. I am stuck. How do I deal with this?
Don't My boyfriend and I have been seeing each other for a year. Six months into it he told me that he participated in a MMF relationship with a couple of his friends. He said that it went on for years but that it hadn't happened for a while and that he usually only hung out with them as a friend now from time to time.   I'm monogamous so I asked him if he needed to participate in something like that in the future and if he felt okay about the way the situation currently was with his friends. He said that he was content with being monogamous with me. We left it at that. 
Recently things have changed. I just found out that I'm pregnant. When I told him, he was happy about it, so was I. Then a few days later he told me that the friends he referred to in the past were actually his two closest friends and that it was important for him that they play a major role in the baby's life.
His friends were traveling a lot this year so I've actually only met them a few times. And now I don't really understand what's going on. They are back in town and my BF wants us to start a business together and buy a home together. This is way out of my comfort zone. I told him that before I make any decisions like that I'd need to get to know them first. He got really emotional and told me that if I didn't completely embrace their presence in my life then I don't love him. He basically said that they are his family and that if I'm not into sharing time and space with them in the capacities he's suggested then we won't be spending any time with them until I accept what he wants. He said that I was insulting him and them by needing to suss things out for myself because their relationship was special and that I should just trust that.
I think that this is f#@&ing; crazy talk, Dan.  At the end of the discussion he told me that I am just a jealous insecure woman and don't know how to be open to other people's preferences. When in my mind I'm not understanding how this suddenly becomes a package deal. (Him, them, me... and our baby? Huh?) I should note that he said he'd be fine with a platonic arrangement. This isn't about me not wanting to have sex with them. This is me not understanding why  someone who rush me into sharing finances and living space with people I barely know. Every time I think about it my chest gets tight because the ways he's dealing with it makes no sense to me.
Full Speed Ahead?
Sometimes I gut check my initial reaction to a question by forwarding the letter—with identifying details removed—to a trusted friend.
"Get an abortion" is the only right answer here, isn't it?—I'm writing with a few questions about a relationship that has already ended, namely whether or not I dodged a bullet. We were together just over a year and a half. I'm 27, he is 30. We met over Fet, and our (monogamous) relationship encompassed D/s as well as S&M; wherein I was the submissive masochist. It was both of our first D/s relationship, though I'd had a lot of experience with a longterm play partner before we met and he'd had a serious long term relationship with a vanilla girl some years prior. I worked full time throughout the duration of our relationship, and he was a full time law student who worked in the summers but not the school year. I paid for all of our dates and much of almost all of our mutual travel expenses. I saw it as an investment in our mutual future because he will come out of law school with such an obscene amount of student debt (more than double mine), and I didn't want him to have to take on any more of it to pay for fun stuff we did when I just had money in my checking account and could take care of it.
He brought up the idea of threesomes early in the relationship when we were first getting to know each other ("is this something you're interested in?"), and I initially agreed. After a while, when he wouldn't stop talking about how much he wanted to fuck other women, I told him I was no longer comfortable with the subject and did not want to put it on the table, at least not anytime soon, but he never really stopped talking about it. I tried to grin and bear it in the name of letting him express what he seemed to feel was part of his sexuality (though he'd never had one in the past, whereas I had and didn't care for it), but it really worked my nerves and made me feel inadequate. I'd bring this up with him and he'd tell me some nice things to comfort me, then go right back to talking about it the following week.
In the course of our relationship, he broke up with me three times. Once I had coming, as I drunkenly blew up at him after he worked every single one of my nerves by taking a summer job in a town about three hours from us, refusing to not hang out with a coworker who was very clearly on to him, etc. We wanted to move in together at the end of the summer (it'd been a year and a few months at that point), and he was pushing for us to move to the suburbs so he could take the bus to school in a neighboring city while I took public transit to the large city in which I currently live and work. He owns a car, I do not, and I offered to buy him a parking pass and put gas in his car for his final year of law school if it meant we could stay in the city. He wouldn't consider it. Long story short, I had too much booze in me when I was hanging out with one of my cousins from out of town, and I blew up from all the mounting tension. He dumped me and took me back after a month, but we did not move in together as planned. A few days later he told me he was very certain about wanting to pursue threesomes with other women, even though that was a subject I had made amply clear I was not interested in, at least not yet. I asked if he would stay with me if I said I was not interested, and he said he wouldn't know until I took it off the table, so I took it off the table. He dumped me again and said he didn't want to be with a partner who gave him ultimatums, then apologized a couple of hours later and said it was stress from school, being broke, the job hunt, etc. I forgave, but he broke up with me for the third time the day after Thanksgiving when we were discussing my discomfort with him spending the night with his female friends (who I have not met) when he went back to the west coast to visit his parents for the holidays (and did not invite me). I had been pretty clear about my boundaries, those being that I was not comfortable with him spending the night with other women, not telling me if/when he finds one attractive and we're out together (I realize this happens and I do it too, but I don't need my nose rubbed in it), etc. I considered all of these reasonable, as did my friends when I asked them about it, but he told me they were unreasonable and that I just needed to work more on my jealousy issues and just trust him. He changed his mind about breaking up after maybe half an hour and told me he would commit to not breaking up with me on a whim anymore (thanks, asshole?), as it was now the third time and I did not feel at all stable with him. In retrospect, this is when I should have departed for good, but you know, hindsight, 20/20, etc. 
To that end, my major flaw here was my sometimes crippling but always present jealousy, which came mostly as a result of a guy I dated a few summers ago. (We'd spent every waking second together, he took a two week trip to South America, came back, dumped me, and a year later told me he hired two Peruvian sex workers to have a threesome with him. It made me feel that once I was out of sight, I was also out of mind, which produced some pretty severe separation anxiety and some jealousy issues that weren't really there before that point.) As it manifested with my ex, I was  intensely jealous of his female friends after a while (though not initially), both the ones I did meet (to whom I was very nice and tried to be welcome and relaxed) and the ones I did not meet because he never invited me back to his hometown to meet them. Initially I liked the idea of him having purely platonic female friends who he'd never slept with or dated, but over time he gave me small reasons to believe he'd done one or both those things with a few of them (namely the ones I never met). (I don't think it's appropriate to keep exes around, as all of mine are long gone and did not contact me throughout the course of this relationship.) It was also around the time that I asked him to stop talking about threesomes because it was making me uncomfortable that I noticed the jealousy began to intensify. Also keep in mind that I never once told him he could not or should not hang out with these women, just that I was not comfortable with him spending the night with them or doing things that most people probably wouldn't consider okay if their partner was doing/would do. I never interfered with his friendships, as he never interfered with mine; I just got anxious when I knew he would see them. This past Fall, he called off moving in together a second time when I had a jealous outburst about his female friends in his home state. 
I was also really jealous of his other long term ex girlfriend, who appears to be very different from me in every imaginable way but is very similar to the other girls he had dated before that. It seemed like I was not at all his type if he could go for someone who was so radically different than he is (vanilla, not as smart as he is, not politically engaged, watched and listened to whatever film and music was popular, etc.) when he and I had so much in common, even aside from kink. The fact that he did not stop harping on fucking other women for good until only a few months before we broke up for good (so maybe October 2015, as we broke up in January of this year) did not help the jealousy or the feeling that I was inadequate even though I (figuratively) broke my back trying to keep him sexually satisfied, was routinely told I was the best lover he'd ever had, that he'd never emotionally, physically, or intellectually connected with a partner so deeply and was never more himself, etc. All of which were things he told me somewhat regularly.
However, I absolutely agree that jealousy is an unhealthy emotion, so I did what we both agreed was best for me and I put myself in talk therapy in June 2015. It helped a lot with some of the communication deficiencies I inherited from my mother, and I felt that I was making slow but steady progress on the jealousy front. Now that the relationship is over, I'm still in therapy twice a month with no plans to discontinue my regimen. 
He often told me I was the love of his life and that he absolutely wanted to spend the rest of his with me, that he had never been more himself with a partner, that I was the first girl he'd ever dated who was as smart as he is, etc. The kicker here was the kid situation. I was on the fence about wanting kids and he was sure he wanted kids when we met; we both disclosed these things to each other and pressed on, figuring we would have a more serious talk once some more time had passed in the relationship. A major reason I was on the fence about kids is because I have a medical condition that for the first 25 years of my life I was led to believe made me sterile. I never really wanted kids but softened to the idea maybe six months before I met my ex (I was being genuine with him about my indecision), but I had not had enough time to really make up my mind about it. We saw my endocrinologist here in January 2015 and asked point blank if I was able to reproduce, and she said I could, that it would require a medical intervention and would be a high risk pregnancy but that women with my condition gave birth regularly. Within maybe a month of receiving that information, he told me that if I was not willing to commit to having a biological child, he would leave me. (He said he would stay if I'd commit to trying but ultimately could not.) In light of my terrible genes and his similarly terrible genes (mental illness and substance abuse issues on both sides of his family, alcoholism on my father's side, we both have bad joints, and my endocrine disorder is heritable), he also would not consider adoption, which was always the way I assumed I'd become a parent, if I ever did. He was initially good with it, which I felt good about, but then read some articles talking about higher incidence rates of behavioral problems in adopted kids, how sometimes they're nothing like their parents, how sometime parents don't bond with their adopted kids, etc., and changed his mind. (Now that everything's said and done, I consider the unwillingness to adopt/insistence on reproducing to be a moral failing, and I won't put up with it again with any future partner.) I waffled a lot about reproduction, but at this point I just don't think it jibes with my politics and doesn't seem like a reasonable expectation given my debt, the fact that everyone has debt, and that the political climate the world over is so dire. I also asked him if he was single at 34/35 and had no kid by then if he would adopt and just be a single dad, and he said no. 
I consider myself to be very assertive and strong willed outside the bedroom and outside this relationship I'm very much an Alpha. As is the case for archtypical Alpha submissives, I enjoyed being able to give him that power for a change; I find it relaxing to take instructions in my personal life instead of having to call all the shots myself, which I find very stressful due to my generally neurotic disposition. However, I always felt like he pushed for more control than I willfully ceded until we found ourselves fighting about who had control over what. Every time I told him I was not comfortable with him being in control of a thing I never told him I wanted to give up control over, he'd tell me I was probably vanilla and that I should go date someone vanilla. This always struck me as ludicrous because I had considerably more experience than he did when he and I met; he dated a submissive for a month two years prior to us meeting, and I'd had a six/seven month play partner relationship with someone that only fizzled out a couple months before we met. I emphasized the fact that D/s was what we wanted it to be and that we did not need to follow a prescribed pattern or regimen to do this effectively, that we needed to figure out and negotiate what worked for us, etc., but it felt like it always fell on deaf ears. He accused me of trying to turn it into a vanilla relationship when I insisted that I did not need or want to be micromanaged or ordered around with no niceties. I'm very service oriented and love, love, love being helpful, but you still need to treat me like a person you claim to love, you know?
I've told you nothing but bad so far, so in the interest of full disclosure, I should say that this is the first person in my adult life I've been in love with. He is brilliant and creative, he's hilarious, he's the single most beautiful man I've ever laid eyes on, he is amazing in bed, he is very talented in the kitchen, and he is the most politically congruent person I've ever dated (I lean hard left/Green, so I disagree with a lot of people about a lot of things). He is thoughtful and well-spoken, and he was my number one cheerleader throughout a career change I made last year as well as different academic paths I pursued while we were together. He's at least as misanthropic as I am, and he sees the world mostly in ways very similar to the ways I see it. When our D/s was working and I felt that my boundaries were respected, being his submissive and girlfriend was the happiest and most cared for I've ever felt in my life. I've never felt more cellularly attracted and connected to someone than I did when things were good, so it was worth something to me to try and stick it out to see if things could get back there. 
The questions I am writing to ask are as follows:
1. Is this emotional abuse on his and/or my part? Several of my friends have used that phrase completely independently of each other, and I confess that I am not adept at spotting it being that this was my first real, adult relationship. I've done some Googling, but I thought it'd be worthwhile to ask your opinion as well. 
2. Did I dodge a bullet, or do we just want different things in life? Most of my friends (again, independently) said I dodged a bullet; no one said we just wanted different things. They all said he was nuts for making those kinds of demands of me, not respecting my clearly communicated boundaries, and being willfully delusional about the atrocious law market, his debt, our genes, etc. 
3. What can I do to continue to work on my jealousy issues so that they do not impact a potential future relationship? Stay in therapy obviously, but anything specific? If you don't have suggestions, that's totally cool.
4. I know you've said in the past that a person doesn't have to be in 100% working psychological order to have a successful relationship, just that they should be in mostly good working order. What might that look like based on what I've told you? How un-jealous should I work on trying to become before "putting myself out there" again? Is there even an answer to that? I do not want to repeat my mistakes with someone else, though I'd like to think that in the future I won't pick someone who gaslights me left and right and knowingly or unknowingly feeds that jealousy.
5. Is it necessary/advisable to apologize to him for my jealousy further down the line? I feel occasionally overwhelming guilt about it even after having been broken up for a couple of months, even in the face of the fact that I believe he manufactured it (consciously or not). 
6. Was the feeling of being loved and cared for I mentioned I felt when our relationship and its D/s was working Stockholm Syndrome? Do you see a lot of that illustrated in your letters from kinky writers? 
I'm a long time reader/listener. This is my first time writing so I wanted to be thorough, as I'm trying to work through some shit before I declare myself clean of this relationship and its fallout. Thus, I apologize for the length of my letter.
Bondage Undulates Love/Originally posted on February 26, 2014.
I'm a 25-year-old bi girl in the Southwest, and I've been with the same hetero guy for almost three years. I miss being with women. We made an attempt at being monogamish, but feelings were hurt and we went back to monogamy. He still parties like he's in college and is a bit dependent on me—socially—whereas I crave independence and, quite frankly, pussy. I've started to withdraw and resent him, not just for the lack of sexual freedom but also because he drinks too much and acts like a slob. I want to move out when our lease ends. I'm willing to work on our issues, but I fear that when I have this conversation, it will break his heart and he will break up with me as a defensive approach, rather than seeing the breathing room as a way to work on our relationship. How can I express my need for other sexual partners and more space without sounding like I'm calling off the relationship? Is it even worth attempting dating, post–living together?
I'm a man in my late 20s. This might sound weird but I got into this dating app Tinder and I chatted with this one girl. Her picture was a butterfly and my picture was a rhinoceros—I guess seeing our animal choices made us like each other's pic. She told me that she is on Tinder trying to get a date of her own age because she wants to get her thoughts away of her own dad. She admitted she had a crush on her dad but never told him. She thinks she has strong emotions for him because he's very fragile and unloved by her mum.
And she said that her mother confessed to her that she's in love with her own son—which means her mom is in love butterfly's brother. So her poor family lives in a complete Electra and Jocasta complex. I felt sorry for this disaster she lives through. I told her that I totally understood because my mum goes to a sex addiction clinic because my father and mother have a platonic relationship which enrages her never-dormant libido. Butterfly sounded so honest and kind that I really fell in some kind of blind love for her. I even started dreaming of her and my subconscious started forming her face in my imagination. 
After chatting for a few weeks we decided to meet and that's where it all started going wrong. She didn't look at all what I imagined. Because when I walked into the Starbucks where we agreed to meet who did I see sitting there in a yellow pullover? It was my own sister.
We were both totally shocked. This meant my sister was in love with our father. It also meant that my mum was in love with me. A complex complex. Knowing that my blind love had been for my own sister, Dan, I tried to cancel it in my head straight away. But it's not that easy to find the "cancel" neuron among billions. So to speed the process I decided to do something brave to shake things up. I knew that my dad and mum are older, DBB folks (dogma-boxed-brain types) so I organized a family meeting where lied to my parents. I told them I am gay. We had a fight and my dad kicked me out of the house.
My sister hates my dad now for doing that, so she isn't in love with him anymore, and my mum re-fell in love with my dad because she saw in him a force of integrity that she hadn't seen for a long time. It's magical how just a few different actions can shift one's character and resurrect forgotten chemistry. Some mutual friends told me that my parents seem happier than ever and that my mother's sex addiction was cured by her re-born feelings for my father. I hope you think I did a good thing, as the vicious circle is now clockwise and our lives are ticking in a good direction!
Want To Hug You, 
Two related questions.
1. Are both the first of May and May 8th days that recognize the fun that is outdoor sex? 
2. Assuming the answer is either yes or no... how does one have outdoors sex in Seattle and not get caught? 
I'm all about sex outside, but not so all about getting caught by police. Or spotted by random 15-year-olds (my sexy lover and I teach high school Spanish) or, well, anyone really. Last year on the first, we found a shady tree and celebrated the holiday, but also got eaten alive by mosquitos. So we went back on the 8th, and I brought mosquito repellent, which stinks and is not sexy, and there were beer cans under our tree in Discovery Park and people—people not having sex—were walking around everywhere. We went and got cheeseburgers instead.
Dan! If anyone understands how exceptionally underwhelming a cheeseburger is (even a good one) compared to hot outside tree sex with a Spanish lover is, it's you. Where can I safely, privately get my groove on in the great outdoors? 
My husband and I are in our mid-30s and have a happily open marriage. We date other people casually and sometimes less casually, but it's important to us that the people we see are friends and not just people to fool around with. We've been together for three years and have been open longer than not. We told my pretty traditional friends about the open marriage two months after we started and everyone thought that it was either going to be a passing thing or that it was the beginning of the end of our marriage, but we're happy and our relationship grows stronger all the time. I haven't felt affected or offended by their questions and criticisms and I think that they have a right to voice their concerns and opinions, but since there has been some negativity from them, we've kept most of the details of the dating among ourselves.
We host a party at our home every month. I recently hadn't been able to connect with someone (and their partner) that I see, so I invited them and it quickly came out during the party that that's how I knew those guests. They also brought a friend that they date who I hadn't met before. They may have been affectionate, but I didn't really notice and I personally don't think it makes a difference. Soon thereafter, I overheard a friend of over a decade say that she had to leave because she was uncomfortable with the situation, confirmed that I knew these people through dating, and was out the door minutes later.
I understand that our situation isn't for everyone, but we're all just people and it didn't even occur to me to warn our guests in advance that they might meet strangers from this other part of our life. Should I apologize for putting my long-time friend in an uncomfortable position? It's easy to compartmentalize this part of our life, but if I'm having friends over, I don't really want to exclude some of these great friends that I've made. I'm starting to wonder if I'm going to lose some friends because of this.
After many years of being in a sexless marriage with my wife (female), I (male) started exploring more "content" online to get off to, got bored with never getting my needs met, and decided to finally meet real, warm, breathing people who liked sex, orgasms, and touch. Do what you have to do to stay sane.
After a couple of Craigslist Casual encounters with women that I felt guilty about, or felt I needed to pay for (I'm cool with that but just don't have the $$$ on a regular basis), I started gravitating to the m4m section as I'm curious about what other people like. I'd never been with a guy, and have never really felt attracted to men, but am very open with accepting people for how they identify. Until, one day a few years ago, curiosity got the cat, and I decided to message one of these guys.
I blew him in a bathroom at his work! He was definitely not attractive to me, but I really enjoyed doing it, and masturbated when I got home. I was really surprised I got so hot from the experience. Was I hot because I was being dangerous? Being naughty? I enjoyed cock? Not sure, but it opened up my eyes that the world is much more open to fun that I had been experiencing lying next to my beautiful wife who won't touch me.  Since then, I've been with about a dozen guys.
I've found that I am much more a bottom, but enjoy mutual oral sex with guys. I think I've channeled my pent up sexual frustration I've had with my very sexy hot wife, and have been hooking up with guys as my outlet. Which is really fucking weird for me. Because I don't find guys attractive in a sexual way. Or do I? I rarely get erections when I am playing with men (hence why I feel more a bottom). It feels good to get fucked (I cum sometimes from it), and I get turned on when I blow a guy. But that's where it ends. I can't kiss guys, don't want to cuddle, etc...
So, my question...
I don't feel bisexual. I find women hot and guys, not so much. Except I like their hard dicks. I feel I identify as heterosexual but how can I if I just wrote, "I like their hard dicks"? And if my wife would have sex with me, I'd probably put my explorations behind me. I love her and desire her to this day. Is there a term for guys like me? Sexless, high libido guys that let down the hetero guard and start fucking guys they aren't attracted to so they can have a sex life?
Originally posted on August 7, 2013. I'm a 25-year-old male. After a tragic set of circumstances, I am now the legal guardian of my 15-year-old brother. He's gay. Fortunately, our parents took care of "the talk" and taught him how to use condoms. Unfortunately, he has started dating a senior at his school who is about to turn 18 and is a fucking sleazeball. You know the type: entitled, narcissistic LA type, drives a BMW paid for by his rich parents. This asshole has no respect for my brother. He grabs my brother's ass or says disgusting things like "You really look fuckable in those jeans." I told him to stop that behavior, and he just replied, "Sorry, I can't keep my hands off such a hottie." A keeper for sure, right?
My parents would probably know what to do, but they're dead. I don't think he's mature enough to be in a sexual relationship, but I'm fairly sure he is already sexually active. I laid down the law and told him that he couldn't see his boyfriend anymore, but he has continued to see him behind my back and now doesn't tell me anything that is going on with his life. I don't know what he's doing with a guy like that. My brother is smart, plays lots of sports, and is really involved at school. I'm afraid this loser is going to destroy all that.
I'm new to all of this parenting stuff, but I know that he can't continue to see this person. I know that my issue isn't what you usually deal with, but as a parent yourself, what would you do?
I'm a thirty-something hetro female, married for almost 16 years with three kids. Like many couples who have been together a long time, my husband and I have grown apart. I know this can be improved but there is part of the relationship that I am not sure can be fixed.  Specifically, I have zero sexual attraction to him. But I don't know if this is related to us not making enough effort to maintain a good relationship and the attraction can come back with effort or if it gone forever. I don't want to split up my family but I also don't see how I can stay in this marriage when I never want to fuck my husband.
Making it all worse is the fact that I had a brief affair with a coworker and of course, the sex was amazing. I have never had such a strong physical attraction as I do to him. We've ended it but I still see him frequently at work, so it's a constant reminder of the sexual passion that is lacking in my relationship. I'm committed to trying to make things work with my husband but in your experience, is it possible to save a marriage when the physical chemistry is lacking for one partner?  
I have an amazing sister in her mid-30s who has been with her husband for nearly half her life. He's a great guy that is a few years older than her, who also has an adult daughter from a previous relationship. They talked about having kids for years: he always said it was up to her if they had any, and she always said it would happen when she was ready. Recently he seems to have become more aware of his age (he feels too old to have kids) and his income (no longer having to pay child support has given him a lot of freedom), and he has decided he doesn't want any more children. My sister still isn't quite ready for children, but she always planned for when they had children, not if.
I have tried to convince them to speak to a therapist together but while they have agreed they've never followed through. My sister now talks about how she won't be having children, though I feel mostly she is trying to convince herself that she is okay with it more than her believing it (she doesn't want to divorce him and thinks she's too old to find another partner with whom to have kids anyway). It breaks my heart because while I love them both she is my sister first and foremost and I want her to be happy. I'm also angry that he has changed the rules so late in the game.
Maybe it's none of my business, but we're all close and they both confide in me. It's heavy and upsetting and I don't know what to do.
Sister, I'm a gay man in my early 30s and living with my boyfriend of the same age. We met over ten years ago and had a short fling. It was amazing. I'd never felt more connected to anyone. But , then we moved cities and then states apart due to jobs and school.  I'd often wondered what could have been if... things were great but neither of us was willing to commit at that point to a long distance relationship.  We kept in touch on and off and about two years ago after a series of visits and lots of conversation he moved to live with me. I couldn't have been happier to be with him. I felt like I got a second chance on the guy I'd been fantasizing about for years. He was the one who got away. And yeah, I'm a hopeless romantic. 
I'd recently been in a sexless and emotionless four year marriage with a woman (thought of myself as secretly bisexual for a long time because I didn't think my family would accept me as gay- now that I'm out they still don't) before and was cheated on twice that I know of before I filed for divorce. As such, I had expressed to him my need for a very sexual and close relationship. I also said I was open to an open relationship, but he didn't want that. So I've grown accustomed to monogamy, and honestly, that's probably what I prefer. I think my offer of an open relationship was mainly to protect myself being cheated on again. Like if you condone it up front, you have nothing to fear. 
He moves in and honeymoon period... love and sex every night... it felt amazing. Skip forward to a few months in and he's not interested in sex or being intimate. He says I just have a higher sex drive. And while I do, I'm OK with not having sex or being intimate if my partner isn't feeling it. But he began to reject me rather harshly for a bit.  About a year ago I discovered he's staying up late at night watching porn and talking to dudes on grindr and has accounts on other apps as well. I also had a few apps- never hid the fact, but once he moved I only used them for networking and to be social. I asked him about it and he explained he felt like he didn't have enough alone time... meaning to enjoy porn and solo masturbation and I assume sharing those moments with other dudes on grindr. Even though he knew I was OK with these apps as long as it wasn't a physical hookup, he always nervously hid his phone or iPad when I'd come into the room. I'd log on and see he'd just been on. Didn't care, just seemed weird for him to act suspicious over something we'd set boundaries for together. 
I told him I'd never try to control him or his body. That's a buzzkill and honestly not who I am. However, I expressed an interest in being open about sharing porn with one another, watching together, etc. And not being secretive about hiding things. I'm just asking for honesty. I don't need to know about every time he jerks off (I enjoyed my own alone time with and without porn and feel no need to answer to that) but I also have found overwhelming evidence of him jerking off and watching porn every time I leave the house for an hour. He knows I'm available and eager to please him, but he pushes me away and I come home to a cum-stained bedspread.  It's gotten so that I feel miserable leaving knowing it is going on and he's not being considerate by leaving the evidence around. I used to enjoy porn and solo masturbation and now I feel like I don't even want to indulge in those activities. 
He's also addicted to video games. Sometimes playing 10+ hours a day. He's gained weight and doesn't want to leave the house or be active. I lost 55 lbs to try to have an awesome body for this guy, and weight gain or no, I still love his body and mind and I frequently tell him. But now that I'm doing all the housework, cooking, paying for the majority of expenses,  I just feel like a straight girl with a video and porn addict boyfriend. And while I'm more empathic and tend to be somewhat more "feminine" in my emotions, I'm starting to feel like an emasculated housewife. I'm sorry if I'm coming off as a misogynist or gender biased. I guess I'm still finding myself and trying to understand myself since coming out a couple years ago.
On the weekends we have a great connection sexually, but during the week days he gets home from work before me and watches porn and leaves the evidence.  I've asked him to be more discreet or at least cut it down a bit to not every single weekday... but maybe I'm being too controlling. I probably am. I just want to feel wanted and appreciated. 
I guess my question is should I just accept that weekends are for us and weekdays are for him and porn? He's not cheating, we have sex a couple times a week, which compared to my past marriage is amazing.  If I'm being ridiculous and need to get a grip, please let me know.  And if so, what can I do to feel OK with his habits and empower myself to feel OK on my own? It's taken me over 2 weeks to try to write this. I know you get a ton of mail and I don't expect a response. But I really need to know if I'm being controlling and need to change. 
If you did read this, thanks in advance for doing so. And he knows I have this app so I'd rather not have this published. Any advise would be greatly appreciated.
Maybe I'm I just started dating a great guy who has a Prince Albert. I cannot express how much it hurts when we have vaginal intercourse—and not the hurts-so-good kind of hurt. It’s the first time I’ve been with a guy who has a piercing. He has a couple of different pieces of jewelry and we tried them both, to no avail. Also, we are no longer using condoms because we both had STI screenings, but condoms did not make a difference. Then we had sex without it, and boom, it was amazing. So he seemed pretty fine with not having it in, he definitely preferred having sex with me when I enjoyed it.
But I want to be GGG and I know he loves his piercing. So I feel bad thinking that if things work out, he simply won’t be able to have it in during intercourse. Also, while I was Googling a solution to this problem (none found!) I saw stories of people getting cracked teeth from giving head to someone with a piercing, which didn’t even occur to me. I would be bereft to think this is a DTMFA situation, because he’s so great!
I am a late-20s single woman living in a major city who hates housekeeping. I use a popular app to book monthly cleaning appointments. (You request availability on a particular date and whoever has time in their schedule picks up the booking. Think Uber for Hoovers.) It's generally a different person each booking. Recently, I had a male housekeeper for the first time. I saw no reviews in the app, but I didn't care, I just wanted my shower scrubbed. I was at work all day while he let himself in, cleaned, and left. Late that night, he messaged by text message (instead of using the app) to give me his personal info in case I wanted to contact him again. I thought this was odd, but I assumed he was fishing for bookings outside the app (they take a cut).
Like many folks, I have a box of goodies under my bed. Condoms, lube, a few toys—stuff like that. To into get to it, you'd have to lie on your stomach, fish around under my bed, drag it out, remove a heavy folded blanket from on top of it, and take off the lid. (Several friends visit with their kids, so I try to keep it discreetly away from prying hands.) The day after the cleaning appointment, I pulled it out and discovered the housekeeper had taken everything out, re-organized it in a "tidy" fashion, and left me a suggestive note inside. I felt SUPER freaked out and violated—someone who had no sense of boundaries knew where I lived, what hours I kept, where I stashed my spare house key, what my phone number was, what I did with my personal time... ick.
I called the customer service department, reported the incident, and deleted the app. (They suggested I file a police report, but in today's rape culture, how in the hell would THAT help?) I suddenly felt too creeped out at never knowing who would be there. But when I recounted this story to a friend, he told me I was being incredibly sex negative. Why react poorly if I wasn't secretly ashamed of my rabbits and butt plugs? He also said that my sex negativity had contributed to the moral panic over female sexuality and probably gotten someone fired. He pointed out that "independent contractors" who work for those kinds of services tend to be disadvantaged economically, too, so a "harmless prank" led to my failure to embrace my sexuality was contributing to the wealth gap in our country.
I still feel gross and violated that someone I way paying to clean my house thought I was paying him to have opinions about my sex life.
Dan, can I claim to be GGG/sex-positive and still take this seriously? Who's right, me or my friend?
Here's my question. With a bunch of convoluted background to preface it...
I'm going trough some pretty crappy break up type stuff right now. Married almost eleven years. Separated for about a year and a half. Pending divorce. Long story, bad marriage, I was too young, he's not really that nice... blah blah blah
Been messing around with another guy for well over a year. This other guy is married. It was a bad call on my part. But it's been going on nonetheless. Truth is, I think he's a dick. I like the attention he gives me (even if it's not as much as it should be), but he really is just a selfish prick. I know this. And I'm trying to just stop seeing him. I'll get there eventually.
But here is my actual problem/question, now that you have a little background.
I've noticed that after masturbating (maybe to a little porn), I'll come just fine... but then I start to cry. WTF is that? I go into these masturbating sessions wanting to come, wanting to get some release, but then I start to cry right after I do come. I have been dealing with some depression issues—for all of the above bullshit—and I've noticed that I cry a little more than I used to in other circumstances. But this after orgasm cry fest? I don't get it. Can you help?
Good morning Mr. Savage. I thought your advise to SNAFU, the DC guy who found his partner researching meth, was spot on. I'm a former user myself (10 years using, two years clean), so I wanted to share with you some thoughts.
Please tell SNAFU to get himself tested. I had a high-level job in a high-profile industry and I had a great boss who helped me get into rehab when I finally decided to get help. But neither he nor anyone else knew I was using until I came clean. So it is absolutely plausible that the writer's partner is using and hiding it well. In fact, crashing for 15 hours and being depressed are typical signs of someone coming down from a meth high. And because meth (in lower doses) increases focus (as opposed to something like cocaine or Molly, which affects your personality to a far greater degree) it's again plausible that the boyfriend's partner has been high around him. If the boyfriend has never been around meth before, he may not recognize the symptoms—if SNAFU is like most people, Breaking Bad is the extent of his exposure to people on meth. 
I wanted to share my (unfortunate) insights with you because this is a huge problem in the gay community. I was given meth the first time by someone who I considered a mentor, who got me drunk and then convinced me to try it. And I know others who had the same sort of experience with others who were equally predatory. (FWIW I know I'm the one who kept going back to it, so I don't blame him for my addiction, but I do believe it is a dark side of the community that needs to be talked about more.) 
I'm a 20-year-old bi girl and long term reader (your column was recommended in my Unitarian youth group!) in a happy, kinky, monogamish, long-distance relationship. I'm also an ambitious college student headed towards a mathy businessy career. My question: How worried should I be about my naked pictures? Only my partner has them, and I trust him completely, even if we were to break up, but I know that security stuff happens. Are a few sexy sexts from the context of a serious relationship really still a career wrecker? My thoughts after the first were "in for a penny, in for a pound," but should I stop? Thanks! 
I'm seeking some guidance on some things. If you wouldn't mind too much, I have many questions for you. First I want to ask you how to become a role model for younger kids. I myself am just about to turn 18 and I haven't really had any gay role models that I knew personally. Also, I wanted to ask your opinion on how to deal with my fairly conservative family and bringing boys around. I have zero experience with that.
I just listened to Episode 486 of the Savage Lovecast. This is specifically regarding the woman who wondered if she could learn to like giving blowjobs.
When I first met my husband, I identified as lesbian—I was young, I've since learned that I'm bi, and that you don't have to just choose one—but when I met him I was extremely uncomfortable even looking at his dick, let alone going down on him. However, I have learned to enjoy it. And I disagree with some of the advice you gave—specifically to put just the head in her mouth. I would say that that's really the hardest part of the dick to suck, because of pre cum. The rest of it is like licking/mouthing any other part of the body, so I'd say, run your mouth up and down the shaft to start, lick it, suck at it, go at everything but the very tip, keep that part in your hand, and if needed, wipe away any dripping pre cum because really that's the thing that made me the most squeamish at first. (I did this with my husband and he found it very pleasurable, and in fact thought he was all the way in my mouth until he looked.) The other thing that worked for me in developing a "taste" for giving blowjobs was reading a lot of erotica—but that may have worked for me because I have a thing for being submissive, and seeing it in that light (which is really really easy to find online) helped me eroticize giving blowjobs.
I do have a question of my own, about sex toys.
I have an imminently realizable fantasy, which is to be double penetrated with an anal vibrator while my husband fucks me. He's totally game for trying it, but I'm having trouble selecting a toy. I'm wondering what you'd recommend? What (if anything) is the difference between anal vibrators made for men and those made for women? We've had anal sex before, which I enjoy, but I've never had an anal toy before, so what should I be looking for? I know I want something that will easily stay in place and not get in the way but I don't know what style would be best for that.
Loyal Ex-I am a women in her 40's. A male friend of mine, who I have been having a sexual relationship with for many years, is dying of cancer. On his bucket list, he has requested for two threesomes—one with both me and another man, one with me and another woman.
I haven't found a girl yet but I have found the perfect guy. I had a sexual relationship with him in the past. Both men have always treated me with respect and kindness and both are clean of disease. They are both open to exploring and experiencing being with a man for the first time and all that it will entail; kissing, mutual oral sex, and trying to both be tops and bottoms for anal. Neither one of them has met the other but based on my recommendation and an exchange of photos, both are good to go. I've been doing my best to prepare them. I really would like for them to enjoy themselves and get the fullness of whatever they are seeking out of their first same-sex encounters. For our rendezvous, I've told them both to practice ahead of time with a dildo, to make sure they evacuate, to be clean shaven both on the face and in the privates, and to be slow and gentle at first when going in from behind—and, of course, to bring lube.
Do you have anything to add? Any suggestions?
A Wish Not Covered By The Make-A-Last week I got a phone call from an ex-girlfriend after several months of no communication.  During the phone call, she told me that she had a miscarriage from a pregnancy that happened while we were dating. She has an IUD and while the chances of getting knocked up with one seem REALLY small, I'm inclined toward believing her out of the desire to err on the side of being a nice guy. We don't have a friendship, per se, but I would describe our break up as amicable. During the call, I tried to be as supportive as possible.  
I don't really know how I feel about the whole situation, but I don't really want to explore my emotions on the subject with my ex. She has expressed interest in talking about all of it again in the future and is really upset about it—even though she stated she would have had an abortion if she had found out about the pregnancy before the miscarriage. I'm currently dating someone else and the ex is dating someone else, too. I don't want to make a habit of talking with my ex about an unplanned pregnancy that resulted in a miscarriage, but I also don't want to be an asshole and blow her off. How do I be a caring human being on this issue and still set a firm boundary about me not being the one that can provide her with emotional support?
"Hello I would like some advice on how to stick a metal rod up my boyfriend's dick..."
Dan Savage: "OK, here are some helpful pointers!"
"Hi Dan! I want my girlfriend to fist me with one of those toy Hulk hands, what lube should I use?"
Dan Savage: "Be sure not to use oil-based lube as it will damage your toy Hulk hand!"
"Dan, I would like my girlfriend to be bukkake'd by 50 homeless guys in the subway. How do I bring this up with her?"
Dan Savage: "Communicate to her how you would love to see her covered in the jizz of multiple men and see where it goes!"
"Hi Dan, my girlfriend gave me a blowjob while I was on the toilet, cool huh?"
Dan Savage: YOU ARE HISTORY'S GREATEST MONSTER!
Really... THAT is where you draw the line??
Regarding blumkins...
First off, I always visualized the word as blumpkin. Tomayto, tomahto. But blumkins are not necessarily fake, or bullshit, or automatically sexist! I only have a single experience with them, but let me tell you about it.
In college I had a three year relationship with a lovely young lady. She was a year younger, I was a horny young guy, and she seemed too good to be true. Ours was an intense, possibly clingy, fairly traditional MF relationship. Twelve months in we decided to move in together. For the next two years, we had a good time playing house and thinking we were far more mature than we actually were. Good times/missed hedonistic opportunities.
After a year or so living together, we had become very comfortable with each other. So comfortable, in fact, that we'd often use the bath off the bedroom with the door open. Even pooping was not an issue, we'd just hit the fan. Then one evening, while she was on the bed studying, I went to the bathroom to drop a deuce. After the first big push, I caught my breath, looked up, and she was lying there in bed, giving me some serious come-fuck-me eyes. I returned the glance, and then it just happened—not a word was exchanged. My cock was in her mouth, with a turd floating just 9" below her face. I was shocked, a tiny bit disgusted, and very turned on! I honestly can't remember what we talked about afterwords, and if memory serves me well all I said during was a very Keanu-esque "whoa."
As I said, we had a pretty traditional, Midwestern, went-to-church-on-Sunday-and-said-fuck-that-noise-upon-entering-college, completely-vanilla relationship: I was usually the decider, but she was a very strong, opinionated young lady. No weird power plays, nothing out of the ordinary. And I don't think we'd ever talked about blumkins before that day or after. I may be the odd exception, but I thought I should at least share my story. God knows my friends have always gotten a kick out of that one!
I am a longtime listener/reader/general admirer of yours. Largely credit my healthy, satisfying sex life to self-acceptance stemming from your advice. 
Lately, though, there's one thing that's been bothering me, and I notice it in nearly every episode of the podcast: Your go-to explanation for when someone does something shitty or even just kind of inexplicable is often that they're "crazy." Look, I'm not one of those people who wants to nitpick every colloquial expression, but I cringe every time I hear you say it. Dan, I generally think of you as such a thoughtful individual, so it baffles me to hear you telling people that the subjects of their calls and letters are crazy psycho nutbags. For folks dealing with mental health issues, including depression—which, given that millions of Americans suffer from treated and untreated depression, I have to assume makes up a stout percentage of your audience—words like these really sting! 
I so admire that you're such a straight shooter, which often just means telling someone when they (or the person they're asking advice about) is just being a straight-up asshole. Maybe some of the crazy psycho nutbags are suffering from depression, or maybe they're just assholes. Either way, I think you could probably find a kinder and/or more accurate way to address them.
Originally posted on January 21, 2015.
I'm a straight 18-year-old girl in my first sexual relationship. Things are a little awkward, and I could chalk it up to inexperience, but here's what I feel conflicted about: I have a vore fetish. It was a fascination for me as a young child and became a sexual thing around the time I hit puberty. I'm wondering now whether this is something I need to get off. It works well when I'm on my own, but I always thought "regular stuff" would work too once I was actually getting some. I've told my boyfriend about it, and he's more than willing to role-play with me. But these fantasies are in-my-head-only, as they rarely feature human beings (think anthropomorphic monsters and dragons, strange as this may seem), so I don't know if I could actually do this. Maybe we just need to hold out a little until we know what we're doing and regular stuff will cut it after all? I have a mounting suspicion that it won't, and I'm having trouble coming to terms with what seems to be a really warped, messed-up fetish. What if this is the only thing I can get off to? Am I doomed to solo sex forever?
My new girlfriend blurted out the other week that she had a cuckold past with her ex-husband.  She told me when I was recounting a party I had attended and noted that it appeared a threesome would occur with one guy and two girls. (It was just an observation.) She says her ex badgered her into arranging "dates" with strangers and that he picked the guys. Her ex would then watch her having sex with a guy in a hotel room. The ex only watched, he didn't take part.
I am really bothered by her past. She says she only did it because her ex pressured her into it and she wanted to save her marriage so she agreed. But I suspect she may have enjoyed it and think she may have been testing me in order to see if I wanted to be a cuck.
What should I do? I am really torn by my feelings towards her.
I’m a 30 something, married female. I had figured I was bi since high school, but had never had the opportunity to really put theory into practice. Well, about 6 months ago I met a married woman and, with the consent of both of our husbands, we hooked up. I went into it with the idea that it would be a one-off thing just for me to satisfy my curiosity about myself and my identity. Instead, we really hit it off and have been meeting up ever since. The sex is amazing, we enjoy each other’s company as friends, and she is so, so smoking hot. I lucked out big time.
My question isn’t what you might think—everyone involved is happy with our FWB situation and we’re both devoted to our husbands. The thing is, I have always felt the desire to be out about being bi, but felt I lacked the certainty or cred to do so with confidence. Now that I'm there, I'm finding that I don’t really want to let people in on the private details of my marriage. So how does a socially monogamous, bi, married-to-a-dude lady without a lady-loving past to refer to, go about coming out? Or does it even matter at this point? Should I just let people assume I’m straight and keep on keeping on eating pussy in private?
Too Little Too Late?
Bisexual invisibility/erasure is a thing:
Bisexual erasure or bisexual invisibility is the tendency to ignore, remove, falsify, or reexplain evidence of bisexuality in history, academia, news media and other primary sources. In its most extreme form, bisexual erasure can include denying that bisexuality exists. It is often a manifestation of biphobia, although it does not necessarily involve overt antagonism.
Bisexual invisibility/erasure causes harm:
Bisexual erasure or bisexual invisibility is a pervasive problem in which the existence or legitimacy of bisexuality (either in general or in regard to an individual) is questioned or denied outright.
 Source: My best friend and I (straightish/not giving a fuck-ish female and asexual/gay agender) are in a rather codependent relationship. We are roughly equivalent from a psychological perspective, which is a rare find for such fucked up people. The differences that we do have tend to complete each other so that in many situations it is easier to function as a unit. One might think such codependency is unhealthy, but having a constant friend security blanket has made us both happier and calmer. I wake them up in the morning and help them with their makeup, they calm me down when I have panic attacks, and we hang out in the evenings. On weekends we are even more inseparable because we don't have school and can enhance our friendship with substance use. Essentially we function as a hive mind.
As one might imagine, such a clingy relationship is not conducive to dating. Given that my hive mind companion is asexual and I am terrible at selecting mates, neither of us are keen on spending less time together to pursue romantic interests. What our otherwise perfect ecosystem does seem to be missing a source of oxytocin, e.g. a boy to fuck/kiss and hold hands with, respectively. Naturally, it would be convenient for us to share the same boy.
It seems unrealistic to hope we will find a theoretical boy who is both kissable and who happens to be attracted to two people of significantly different aesthetic/gender and who is down for a particularly weird variation of polyamory. But we are hopeful. In fact, we may have located a potential candidate, though we don't know him especially well.
We have discussed the possibility enough that I think our friendship would survive any outcome of the situation. However, it is extremely difficult to ask someone, "Hey, we want to date you, but only as a unit, how do you feel about that?" Such a proposition can't really be executed in a typical dating format as it requires such explicit exposition. Then if the idea appeals to him we will need to provide further exposition about the exact sexual or emotional relationship between each party. (Essentially my friend probably won't be down for sex, I will be, threeways are unacceptable but we may want to make out with him concurrently, and we will always be closer to each other than to him.)
Do you have any advice on how to execute such a conversation?
My husband is attracted to non-op trans-women. He's a big Bailey Jay fan, and we've bought and used pegging toys that allow him to (at least partially) experience his fantasy. It's a part of his sexuality that I've always known about and never questioned, until we recently considered opening up our relationship to meet needs that the other person can't. (I'm bisexual, he likes women who have dicks.) We thought about creating OKC profiles but I wondered, would it be wrong for him to include his interest in his profile? Would stating, "I'm married to a cis-woman but interested in meeting and fucking trans-women" be awful? He wants to let (non-op) trans-women know that he's open and interested, while also letting cis-women know that he's not looking for that right now.
Is this type of specific searching a way of fetishizing trans-women? Is there something wrong with the desire to meet and sleep with a penis-having woman? I know you've condemned discriminatory language in online dating profiles before, but this is different in that it is explicitly inclusive.
Prioritizing Essential Need Intelligently, Gay male in my late twenties here. I recently ended things with a guy I had been dating for about two months. Our relationship started as a strictly sexual one. We're both involved in the kink scene in our city and have interests that align in a particularly great way. Very quickly it became clear that there was more of a connection than just a sexual one. The next two months were pretty great! We spent several nights a week together, me often spending the night at his place, I even had a toothbrush at his place within three weeks. Everything was poised to make this into a great relationship.
Early on I noticed that he was a much more extroverted person than I was. He would laugh loudly at movies, works the room at parties, says wild things about kink in the middle of crowded restaurants. I, on the other hand, prefer to blend in with the scenery, and tend to get uncomfortable when people call more attention to me than I'd like.
Initially I thought of this as a price of admission I was willing to pay, but it soon became really tiresome to hang out with him. Add into that a tendency to behave like an excited five year old, and it was just too much. I ended things telling him that there were just conflicts with our personalities that made a relationship difficult, not specifying what. He has definitely fallen for me—he's stated it over and over again—but I don't want him to think that he has to change who he is to be with me. 
I'm confused, Dan. I loved the feeling of being in a relationship again (I've been single for a VERY long time). When he's being down to earth and just talking to me like an adult we have a ton in common. The sex is great, and finding someone who shares your kinks and you're attracted to emotionally is rare. He's asking me to reconsider. I've told him I need some time. What do I do? Should I find a way to not only tolerate, but love his loud personality? Or should I accept that I was right to end this?
I could benefit from your sage wisdom regarding the unique situation I find myself in.
Wife and I got married super young, very religious families, yada yada. We’ve had a great marriage, but the last couple years she has struggled with depression and has acted out by being unfaithful, first via text and then physically with a couple of people. This was more of an escape from life thing, as she has never been a particularly sexual person. I understand her struggles and we’ve come to a place where I don’t expect her to be someone she is not. However, I’m still an affectionate, passionate person and at this point we’re having vanilla sex like twice a month. To complicate matters, our gay (or so I thought) best friend and her have basically fallen in love. He is living with us in a poly-ish set up. I love him, though it’s not a situation I would have chosen. I don’t necessarily identify as fully straight, and am open to exploring the three of us, but she is too sexually hung up and won’t go there.
So, I find myself with half my wife’s attention, even less sex than the less-than-satisfactory amount I was having before, and I’m just not sure what to do. I consider myself poly, but I’m almost certain that if I hooked up with someone else it would end my marriage. Wife is deeply insecure and has a jealous streak, despite me being pretty goddam motherfucking understanding and supportive about her stuff. My options as I see them: Have a discreet affair with someone I can trust, so my sexual and affection needs are met without blowing up my life; status quo and keep asking for more from her, which I may or may not get; ask her to allow me to be poly and look for another partner to connect with who can fill in the gaps in my life and hopefully add more happiness for us all, which risks her flipping out and god knows what else.
Oh yeah, did I mention we have a 15-year-old kid? Yeah, I’ve really jumped head first into shit’s creek in an attempt to save my marriage. Any advice you can offer is greatly appreciated. I've been with my husband for about fifteen years, married for seven years. He recently announced that he wants to separate so he can think about whether he's able to stay in our marriage or if he needs to explore his fetishes without being tied down to me.
I have known about his fetishes since early in our relationship. The bone of contention is that I would only do it sometimes but I would not indulge his many sexual fantasies all of the time, as I'm not really into them, and this caused him to suppress his desires. Since the birth of our third child he hasn't been happy and we sought counseling with a counsellor who specializes in fetishes. We did this because my husband got depressed and wanted to end his life and—yes—that got my attention. Now I want to fulfill his fantasies and fetishes. I would be his "mommy," as he has a diaper fetish, and I would follow the long list of role-play activities he likes (all communicated in an email), which include changing his diaper, humiliating him, spanking him with different instruments, feeding him, etc.
He also wanted us to go to munches and to fetish parties so he could meet other people into his fetishes. I was okay with munches. I didn't want him to see a dominatrix or have his own play partner so I agreed for him to go to fetish parties. We have gone to five in two months; at these parties he has been spanked by different woman who he meets there. He is now conversing with a Dominant woman via email who he had been spanked by at one of the parties. They now have an email relationship, which I'm not entirely comfortable with, as he is doing this in secret through an email account I don't have access to. He says he wants a "mommy" and doesn't want me to do it anymore. At first he wanted to pay this woman and do it at her home (she has a nursery), but now he's met a couple of different women who enjoy being mommies and he wants to explore his baby fetish with these women
His fetishes are very sensual, intimate, and sexual. When I do it with him it involves a lot of sexual acts and he is very submissive. He wants to be diapered and babied and fed and humiliated and breastfed. He wants to do all these things with these other women—including being breastfed. Also, he wants to give oral sex to them as well. I am not okay with this and this is where we are at odds. He now says he will divorce me if I don't agree to this.
I love him and I admit I wasn't supportive of his fetish needs for a long time. He is very angry about this and feels because I forced him to suppress his needs for so long that I should let him do this with other women. But this is against everything I want. It feels like he would be having an affair if he went to some other woman's house and role-played his fantasies, which include oral sex, but he's saying it should be fine as he's not having "actual sex," i.e. like penetration, and because he doesn't love these women. I keep saying that I will meet baby fetish needs but he says I'm only doing it because I love him and that I don't really want to do it. He also says he doesn't want to do it with me because there's a nine-month-old baby in the house and he doesn't want to do it with me until our new baby is out of diapers.
I am stuck and don't know what to do. I love him and don't want a divorce but he wants me to be okay with him doing his baby fetish with other women and this this behavior does not belong in a monogamous marriage. Help!
Mulling Over My Mate's I have an idea for those in sexless marriages! I know, I know! This topic is overworked! But I haven't seen mention of something that has been a wonderful discovery for us: WEED!
My husband and I are a pair of cis-gender, hetero, white, middle-class, middle-aged, unexceptional folks. My libido dwindled (as they evidently often do), from about age 45 to 55 or so, until it was nearly gone. He's ten years older, and his fell off almost as much over that same period. This bothered him a great deal more than it did me, and he did some fruitless exploring and experimenting in efforts to find ways to keep his interest up.
Then about three years ago, he revealed to me that he's always (since age 12 or so) been into cross dressing. This shocked me, but I knew right away that while shocking, it really shouldn't be a big deal to our relationship. Binge-reading your archived Savage Love columns online confirmed my initial take on things, and also re-kindled my own libido—I think because I thought more about sex over those few days than I had in the previous ten or so years. THANKS, Dan!
We got mighty frisky for a time, but his libido tapered back off pretty quickly. Leaving me pretty frustrated, since mine didn't as much. For a year or so, I was trying sooo hard NOT to be harsh, whiny, angry, or anything but supportive and patient. But I've been confused and hurt, and told him as much. He and his Drs (GP and urologist) couldn't find any physical reason for his lack of interest. Viagra and Cialis aren't the answer when there's no desire to begin with.
Then an old friend, in for a long weekend, pulled out some weed as we sat around visiting. Husband and I hadn't toked for years. It just hadn't been something we ever thought about. It's still illegal where we live—no medical MJ allowed or anything—so not easily, readily, or openly available. But WHOA! Our friend left us with a small supply, and after a couple of evenings of red-eyed snacking, we discovered that my husband's desire and capacity for sex was back! That was late in the summer, we've since found a local supply, and we've been happily toking every couple of weekends since then, and fucking about one out of every two of those nights. 
Can I get a great hallelujah?!?
So there's something that other loving couples struggling with this issue might try. Weed doesn't do anything for me in that department—when I smoke, I just want to drift and giggle, not focus on the kind of effort needed to achieve or give sexual release—but it might affect some women in the way it does my man. Worth a try, huh?
I'm a 27-year-old male engaged to a 26-year-old female. We have been together 6 years. We met at college. We've lived together for almost three years. We have been saving to buy a house together. Well, I have been. She makes less than me and has a lot more debt than me. We got pre approved.  We found a house, loved it, got the offer in. Offer accepted. Home inspection went well. Now we are at the stage where the bank needs us to sign 60 documents in order to actually get the house.
Last night I found out that she has $90k more debt than I thought—$170k total. I found out this information from the bank's loan application, not from her. I asked her countless times to sort out all of her debt and to figure out who she owes and how much so we can make a plan for a future. Wedding, children, schools, house, etc.. So, I developed a ten year plan to pay off our loans, buy a house, save for children's future. Now with this new debt, we can't pay her stuff off for twenty years.
Her lack of knowledge about her finances comes from laziness and apathy, not malice. She didn't lie on purpose. She simply never bothered to do what she needed to do to make a plan. I'm pissed. I don't know if I want to commit another ten years of my life to paying off her education, especially when now we can't afford a house. I want vacations. I want a car. I want furniture. I want to go out to dinner sometimes. I want a wedding. I want college funds for my children. I don't see any of this happening now. What should I do?
Longtime reader, Dan. Just wanted to ask why you never publish questions or comments from happily married hetero folks? Too boring? None ever come in? I love to read your advice and think what you've done in your career and for the advancement of gay rights is incredible—but I'd love to see some diversity in the Q&A; department!
So! My husband and I have been together for 24 years—I'll be 42 in July—and despite normal ups and downs, we're happy together. We have great sex on a regular basis (at least twice a week) and both enjoy trying different things with each other (inside and outside the bedroom). We've talked about swinging, opening our relationship, etc., and neither of us is into it. Are we freaks? Two normal, nice happily married middle age folks content to fuck each other and no one else? Just curious!
I feel like I should add something shocking but really don't have any ideas, Dan. Our biggest problem is we're binge eaters and often find ourselves demolishing pound bags of peanut M&Ms; in our bedroom late at night after smoking bowls. So even our shocking details are pretty lame. But as a regular reader and a longtime monogamous couple, Dan, I'd love to see some letters about how it CAN work—not about how it's destined to fall the fuck apart. Might give some hope to the other saps out there wondering wtf they are doing wrong cause they aren't planning a wild threesome or fantasizing about fucking the neighbor!
Happily Married, Happily Fucking, 
34-year-old woman here, married for 10 years, with my husband since I was 19. I had very little sexual experience before I met him, and he was also in the same boat. When we started having sex it was great although I wonder a bit how much of that was due to the excitement of having PIV sex for the first time and having my first serious relationship. I had really low self-esteem and was absolutely cripplingly shy, so even though I can see now I had interest from men I either didn't notice or was too scared to respond. We managed to get together because my husband is incredibly kind and friendly and I didn't feel intimidated by him. Anyway, it was good, and I was attracted to him.
In my mid to late twenties, I had a severe depressive episode, put on a huge amount of weight, lost confidence and therefore libido. I explained it was me, not him. Husband was very, very understanding. The depression got cured although I'm still very fat and with some disordered eating problems and trying to work on that.
But my husband and I don't have sex. And I'm finding him less and less attractive. I've probably felt this way for the past five years but recently I don't even like to cuddle or hug or even spoon in bed. When we got together he was a cute fresh-faced young looking 20-year-old. He's now 35 and still looks 20. He's short. He's skinny—and skinnier than when I met him since he runs marathons now. He's almost hairless. He has a small face. He's basically a twink. And I'm just not into him. Especially now I'm fat I hate feeling like I could snap him in half. I want to be with a manly man! He thinks I avoid sex because of my body image issues which was the problem when I was depressed. He sometimes asks for reassurance that I find him attractive and I say that I do, but I'm lying and I feel awful. Meanwhile, I'm the one whose appearance has changed )for the worse) and he's still quite clearly crazy about me. I gently floated the idea of non-monogamy once but he's very against it. Monogamy actually turns him on. And even if we agreed, I'm really not attractive at the moment and I'm still pretty shy. I can't see myself finding anyone.
I love my husband, although it does feel platonic. I wish I'd played the field before settling down. But he's the greatest husband anyone could ask for, and so devoted. I can't see myself divorcing because we've been together so long and he's a good guy. I'm getting too old to find someone new and I doubt I'd do better. He'll be a great life partner, a great father.
But what in the hell do I do about the sex? I've speculated it could be partly because I was on the pill when I met him and went off it a few years ago, but I can't go back on it. Is it possible I'll become attracted to him again? I really really wish I was. I really really wish I could fuck someone who turned me on.
WHAT DO I DO, DAN? WHAT DO I DO!
Irritated At My Husband's Overly Reasonable, Nice, Young Demeanor; Please don't roll your eyes and forward this to your not-again folder. I really want to get your advice.
Married over fifteen years, professional businessman in forties, very healthy, still fancy my wife. But it's always been a relationship where I had to initiate any intimacy. But here's the challenge: her health has deteriorated somewhat over the last five years and sex is off the menu. She won't discuss sex and I'm made to sound like some sex-crazed person, so it's become a tricky subject to bring up. Leaving her is not a favored scenario—we have children and she is dependent on me.
A female friend recently confided in me that she is a "fuck buddy" for a guy who, like me, has a sick wife. This man, however, has his wife's consent—or claims to have her consent. I could not get that consent. Going astray would be extremely hurtful to my wife. Can you see any reasonable compromise or way out of this?
I have a friend who's 30 and only just coming out of the closet. I'm eighteen and I've been openly gay for a few years now, so I've been helping him along the way. There's one thing I can't help him with: he reckons he's a top and wants to try fucking me. I'm more than happy to let him try, and indeed we have tried, but as soon as he gets close to penetration he goes soft. He's very insecure in his identity as a gay man, and I'm almost certain this is an anxiety-induced performance issue. But what can we do? I've never topped so I can't help him. You have argued that society's position on cheating is logically incoherent. Society says, on the one hand, sex is not that important, so living in a sexless marriage is not a big deal. On the other hand, society says cheating can never justified because sex is that important, so important you shouldn't do it with anyone else, not even if your spouse won't do it with you.
I think you're being unfair to society, Dan. There is no inconsistency in saying the pain caused by infidelity outweighs the pain/frustration caused by forced celibacy. The problem for the prospective cheater—or the current/former cheater trying to ease his/her conscience—is that you're weighing your own, known pain against the unknown pain your spouse might potentially have to endure. So society really needs to know: Would the average person rather be cheated on or trapped in a sexless marriage?
This is where you might actually provide a real service. We need a survey! So what do your readers say? Which is worse? Let's settle this question once and for all, so you can get back to answering questions about parrot masturbation!
I read your response to the person hoping to recycle their used toys in new column. A few years ago, I donated the sex toys and other items I no longer wanted to the Aliveness Project for their annual fundraiser. Before donating the sex toys, I ran them all through the dishwasher so they'd be clean, and the Project was grateful to get them. I have no idea what sold and what didn't, but felt good about the contribution. Perhaps the person who wrote that letter could donate them to a business like the Aliveness Project to auction off at a fundraiser as well.
Don't Long time reader, first time writer. And I should probably begin by saying I'm pretty fucked—in the sense that everything has kinda blown up in my face. I should start at the beginning.
I was in a very vanilla relationship with a woman for nine years. A woman who I loved and who really loved me. The problem was that we were more of less friends who fucked sometimes, and there was never a real passion or urgency. We literally went the last year we had together without sex. I didn't know how to turn her on at all. And I greatly felt I was not her type. There was no spark. I found a spark with a girl met and really fell in love with. The catch is that I remained with my girlfriend-in-name. I tried to be a supportive father figure, I guess, to my girlfriend-in-name while also trying not to be a distant, fly-by-night asshole to my girlfriend-in-my-heart.
Then my girlfriend-in-name discovered a package from my girlfriend-in-my-heart. She exploded and cut bait, moving across the country within three days, returning to her family. I see now that I was a chickenshit coward and I tried to tell her I still loved her. And I did. I do. But I couldn't find a way to tell her I loved someone else too. She's gone now.
While I was focused on my girlfriend-in-name—while we were talking whether or not we should breakup—my girlfriend-in-my-heart became increasingly impatient. I'm sure she was waiting for me to make my choice. Then the choice was made for me and my girlfriend-in-my-heart took it personally. I was in a bad place, mentally and emotionally, and I sometimes iced her out and I didn't feel sexual or in a place where I could be a boyfriend to anyone. So I sent the girlfriend-in-my-heart a letter explaining I needed to break up with her because it was all driving me crazy. She took it badly and showed the letter to her therapist. Her therapist confirmed that, yeah, I was probably right and that I wasn't good boyfriend material at the moment.
Time passed and I got my wits back. But my girlfriend-in-my-heart grew colder and more distant. Unbeknownst to me she was dating guys on the side. And on her birthday she told me she was making it official with one. I know I was the one who broke up with her but it hit me like a sledgehammer. I feel terrible now because she really was somebody I truly loved and I didn't realize it until she was was gone. She says she's happy with the guy she's with now but I feel like a pathetic lost puppy. I'm still talking to her, now more than ever, desperate to prove to her that the slap-in-the-face wakeup call was all I needed to realize I should have put her first all along. 
My question is: Should I cling to the sad, small morsel of hope I'm still holding on to? The hope that I can stay with her again? Or should I give up and try my luck with someone else? 
I'm a 40-year-old hetero woman. (I may possibly be bi—but that's not relevant here.) I've had surprisingly good luck on Craigslist finding good FWBs. I have two partners that I met through Craigslist that I've been seeing for ten months. We have so much fun! But they're irregular, so I thought I'd search out an additional, more regular partner. I met someone who seems very nice. (We met online only so far.)  He's busy like me and he doesn't want any kind of romantic relationship, purely NSA. Great! But early on in our emailing he wanted to know what I would like for my time. I explained that I'm not a sex worker but if paying me for sex is something that gets him off, then I would consider it. He said he knows others who have such an arrangement and that it just makes things simpler and more straightforward, but it's not obligatory. I guess he means it will make me more committed to our set one-hour date each week. I am a student and single mom, so it would actually be really helpful to get a "gift" for having fun each week. He wants to know how much and I'm clueless. I'm also a little uneasy about the whole thing. Would this make me a sex worker? Should I avoid it simply because I have a custody agreement with a vindictive ex-husband?
Luckily (or unluckily) for me, Dan, your pledge to "swear off answering letters from people trapped in sexless relationships/marriages" doesn't apply, because that's not the case. In fact, quite the opposite. 
I'm a straight female in my mid-twenties and I've been in a happy, longterm relationship for ten years. In my teens I found a guy I loved, and we've been together ever since. We have a great life together. Although I'm in the "monogamish campm" (and altogether more liberal than my boyfriend in other ways), he's firmly monogamy camp. Still, we have a happy, suitably sex-filled relationship that works. I find other men attractive but I haven't felt the need or desire to have sex with anyone else because I've always been happy and content with what I have in our relationship. And although I’ve always been prepared to deal with the natural sexual attraction I will feel towards other men—and how I must remain monogamous for my partner—I recently found I'm not prepared for dealing with feelings beyond sexual attraction.  
Maybe you can see where this is going ...
Through work I met a guy. An amazing man in his early thirties who is long-term happily married. Instantly we clicked (for lack of a better description) and became fast friends. We have the same life views, same interests, similar life dreams, etc. We are both pretty blown away by the connection we felt almost immediately; it felt different to other relationships we have experienced with other people, friends or otherwise. Stupidly or perhaps inevitably, we wound up admitting we had developed feelings for each other beyond that went beyond friendship. We are both "soft" people: we care a lot about other people and the world in general, about the sense of right and wrong, and about the people we love. So after admitting to each other how we felt, we also discussed how heartbroken we were. Heartbroken because to avoid hurting the people we love we would have to hurt each other—we would have to ignore our feelings and never explore a relationship that could be great.
Then the inevitable happened: we were sat chatting at work and then we were kissing. The sexual tension between us had been building for a long time. We've kissed a couple of times since, always feeling terribly guilty between these make-out sessions, and trying to return to being the "good" friends we know we should be, rather than the cheating, deceptive, hurtful people we have become—and hate. We've never had sex. But we are both cheats. We do not have permission to do what we've done and we both agree that it is very wrong.
Do you have any advice for us? We both knew that as soon as we admitted our feelings to one another there would be no 'good, happy endings' or solutions, but do you have any advice to make it less excruciating? If polyamory was an option in our relationships we might be able to make that work. But not even monogamishness is an option for either of our partners. 
Do you have any tips on how to be better "good friends" rather than "bad" cheaters? Or tips on how to deal with feeling sexually frustrated because we just want to jump on each other so badly? Should we not even attempt to be friends? Are we just tempting fate when we already have good, happy lives and good, loving partners? I know I'm young, and have only been in one serious relationship, but I like to think I'm pretty mature and generally make good life decisions, but could this mean part of me growing up and realizing things about myself?
Do we chalk this up to life experience? Do we try and find different jobs far away and cut each other out and try and forget? (Heartbreaking but probably the safest option.)  Or do we try and continue to be "good" friends and stick to our new rules? Or would we just kidding ourselves? Or do we have crazy hot amazing (or not, who knows) sex and then deal with the terrifying consequences? Or is this just something we are going to have to struggle through individually and become stronger people because of it? 
I wish this hadn’t happened. I wish we could've met and just been friends, without thinking about each other constantly in "other ways" and without wanting to fuck each other's brains out all the time. Neither of us were seeking this, neither of us wanted this, neither of us ever expected anything like this to happen. But now it has happened and we don't know how to deal with it. 
Sorry for the novel. It was therapeutic to "spill."
I'm a straight 30-year-old man, and I've been living with my girlfriend for 10 years. Yes, 10 years! We've been having this long, mostly monogamous and fairly vanilla relationship, only interrupted for half a year or so, years ago (we studied abroad for a while, met people, then got back together). Our life right now is fantastic on many dimensions but our sex life is kind of dead. Strangely though (or not), we've never been so comfortable together. So we talk about it quite openly: she recently told me she didn't feel any desire to have sex with me. This will sound terribly delusional, but I'm still really into her so I'm trying to rationalize. 
My understanding of the situation is, first, she's not so much into sex. She's into being seductive and attractive, and sex is for her a way to get self-confidence from the fact she's hot (she is), but in fact I don't think—and in fact she tells me—that she's ever really enjoyed herself having sex for its/her own sake. Second, I'm not giving her really good sex. It's this kind of a circular situation. 
I'm contemplating different solutions to these two problems. We could switch to a completely open relationship, in the hopes of us getting horny again together (although I suspect it would in the same time completely modify the rest of our life and eventually have it explode it into a thousand pieces). Or we could just renounce sex—with each other, with anyone else—and find solace in pure sublimation of sex into studies and work. This has proven an intellectually enriching (although not entirely satisfying) way of managing things to this day.
Maybe I'm just too much into living with someone, and too attached to our cozy life, and in fact it's all hopeless and we should break up? Or maybe we should try and become a polymorphous, fluid and sexy entity, living for and by pleasure into a dazzling web of multiple happy relationships? But how is such a thing done? 
I recently found a new LMP that I really liked, but I had a questionable experience with him this week.
I had seen him once before, last December, and went in for my second appointment on Monday. Near the end of the massage, he was working on my neck and asked me if it would be ok if he worked on my chest. I said yes, because in general I think bodies are bodies, so not every form of touch has to be sexual, and my pecs were sore, so yeah—help a sister out. I really do think touch, even in areas deemed "intimate areas" by American society (aka breasts), is not necessarily inherently sexual, and I was willing to forget the social norms in favor of what I hoped was a more clinical approach to actual anatomy (plus we cis-lady folk tend to get ignored in that area precisely because I think so many LMP's are afraid of stepping over the line, which is totally understandable, but no one had ever offered to work on my pecs before and I was eager to give it a go).
He kind of dug in a little bit, and then as he got more and more invasive, asked me two more times, "Is this ok?" I responded with verbal consent both times. However, shortly after that last time I said yes, I sensed a change. It was becoming less of a pectoral muscle massage and more of just... a breast massage. I started to feel pretty turned on by his touch, which in the moment I regarded as a positive side-effect of a good massage. However, it kept going long enough for me to get the sense that he was also really turned on and the touch changed in ways that made me like he was actively trying to turn me on. (Less muscle massage, more light stroking and squeezing—he even tapped my nipples at one point.) This change happened so quickly I didn't really have time to react and tell him to stop, and I think the fact that I was so relaxed made it hard for me to realize what was happening until after I felt like a line was crossed.
I finally got kind of nervous and just pulled up the sheet, and shortly thereafter the massage ended. He made some sort of comment at the end about how we did good work and how those "hormones released are good for relaxation." I kind of think that is bullshit, because I definitely do not feel more relaxed when someone is turning me on—those feelings of relaxation come later, after the "happy ending." I was kind of wigged out I beat it out of there pretty quickly.
A few things struck me as odd.
1. I felt uncomfortable, which sucks, especially because I have been sexually assaulted in the past and it brought up some pretty nasty memories.
2. I looked at the clock as I was leaving and we were 20 minutes over time—meaning that most of that part of the massage happened "after hours." So we were alone in the office.
3. This was only my second appointment with the guy, which, even though I'm pretty open and accepting to touch, it seems odd to go that close to the line when you don't have an established trust with your patient (like, it may have been different if this was someone I had been seeing regularly for 8 months and we worked up to that level of intimacy so I didn't have to question whether he had ulterior motives).
Now that you know the whole situation in detail, Dan, my question is this: Even if I offered verbal consent, did something shady take place? My eyes were closed and I have no way of proving that he was being voyeuristic or inappropriate in any way, but I also feel gross and dirty about the whole thing. If you think there was foul play, should I do anything? I recognize that me saying anything to either him or the clinic he works at could have disastrous effects for this guy's livelihood, but I also know there is a risk that this has happened to other women. Then again, maybe this was a one-time thing, and he got carried away and didn't realize what was happening either until he was over the line? I don't know what to do, but I'm not sleeping very well since then and I can't stop questioning my sanity about what really happened. 
I would greatly appreciate your advice. Thanks for everything you do for everyone everywhere.

Let me start by saying that we love your article and have learned a lot over time. My co-workers and I have a debate going on. What, in your opinion, is a blowjob? If I suck on my partner's dick for ten minutes before we have sex, does that count? Or does he have to cum from my sucking? What if you are doing the deed for thirty minutes and he never cums? Your expertise would be greatly appreciated.

I am a relatively attractive woman in my early thirties and I have a question about my budding exhibitionism. My question is two parts: first, is it okay to walk around naked in my bedroom/apartment with the blinds open and the reasonable expectation that someone might see me? My windows do not face a street but rather a small cluster of other windows from buildings near mine. I mean it is my house and all, but I worry sometimes about getting an angry letter from a mother whose children have been "scandalized" by my smokin' bod. Secondly; assuming it's okay to walk around naked, what about deliberately posing erotically or masturbating where someone might see me? The idea of it gives me a killer thrill but I'm wondering if it's 1) too creepy and 2) safe? If I was at a hotel I wouldn't think twice but this is where I live, would I be inviting a stalker into my life? Should this remain the stuff of my fantasies?
I am a 21-year-old lesbian. I have a question about a friend of mine. I have this guy friend. We were very close in high school. He was my best friend for a long time and played a big part in me being comfortable coming out to other friends and family. When we were 17 we were at a party, everyone was very very drunk. It was a party celebrating my very, very recent ex-girlfriend's birthday. I shouldn't have gone to the party in retrospect but I wanted to be supportive of her. So everyone was very drunk—except me, as I had decided to not drink at all. I was sad because of the break up and I was also going through  serious depressive episode. This good male friend came and found me and gave me these very long hugs all night and had been very touchy-feely with me.
Later that night all of us friends were sleeping in a tent together, and this friend and I ended up being put next to each other on the very edge of the tent. During the night we got very physically close, as it was a cold night. I didn't mind putting our two sleeping bags together to be warmer. Sometime during the night my friend, being very, very drunk, tried to shove his hand down my pants. He was making sleepy drunk slurred comments about how I was so sad and how he wanted to make me feel better and so on. I told him to stop and he continued to attempt to finger me there in the tent with all of our friends passed out around us. He never did anything to me but I had to nearly break a few of his fingers to stop him. He never remembered doing this after the fact, I assume, because he never brought up the subject.
We were close throughout the rest of high school but I never really felt safe around him after that.
He recently asked if we could get a drink together because we went to separate colleges but I am feeling uncomfortable with this. I am not sure if I feel safe or comfortable or if I have even forgiven him for attempting to do that to me all of those years ago. I am not sure what to do. I may be overreacting and sometimes I think I should just forgive him. He was drunk and I don't think he wanted to hurt me. But I just want some advice on what to do. Should I forgive him? Should I forget it? Should I ignore him?
Thanks for reading this!
I hope this finds you better than I'm doing. I feel awful for doing what I did, but I can't take it back. My boyfriend's phone was blinking and I looked. He was responding to a m4m Craigslist ad. The ad was looking for a JO partner, STD- and HIV-free, to watch porn with. I don't know what to do with this info. We haven't slept together for a while. I thought it was just because I'm pregnant. Now I have so many thoughts filling my head. To make matters worse: There is something wrong with the baby and I have to terminate the pregnancy. I haven't felt it in a day and I think it's already gone. So here I am with his dead baby inside of me and he is looking for a hook up. I was hoping for us to sort it all out and try to have another baby, but with this new turn of events, I just don't know. Should I bring it up or just try to forget about it? I was snooping and am in the wrong. I hate this.
I met Long Distance Girlfriend two summers ago; she was 31, I was 25. Moved to a big city in her state after six months. Saw each other every other weekend. Met friends, parents, etc. We'd likely cancel out each other's presidential votes in most normal years, though even she wouldn't vote for Trump. Talked about marriage, some lifestyle compromises (eg: urban vs rural), etc., though not as fully as we probably should have. Big roadtrip over the summer, I asked her to marry me, she said yes. We didn't tell anyone. I came back, met Someone Else. I told LDG about feelings for SE and we came back to this as a frequent topic of conversation. A month or so later I had a conversation with SE on the matter, broke up with LDG, and started seeing SE. FWIW, I see SE as more intellectually compatible, bolder, brasher, less empathetic, and better in bed. 
Question: How big an asshole am I?
We are all in our thirties: my wife, her younger sister, and myself. My wife and I have been together for almost ten years. I deeply love my wife, the sex is great and we've never lost our connection. The thing is: I have the same feelings for her sister.
These two sisters are best friends to each other. The three of us are very close: over time we've developed a unique and intimate connection, even though we've lived far away. My wife nurtures that intimacy, she loves to see how much close her sister and I have become over the years. A couple of months ago her sister moved to town. It is like a dream. We now spend most of our time together, the three of us.
One evening my wife's sister and I went out together. We got drunk and kissed. It was not an ordinary kiss. It had all the passion and frustration of years of emotional but not physical reach. It was in that very moment that I realized she is as much in love with me as I am with her.
Now things became quite tricky.
My wife's sister got scared. Obviously she doesn't want to harm her sister. Her solution was to cut back on communication with me. She is now very distant. Everything seems normal on the outside but there is no emotional closeness anymore. Even those this is damn painful, I understand her choice and I respect her choice. But the demon torments me. It seems to me that this distance is not the only option. As absurd as it may sound to outsiders, I believe we could have an open threeway relationship. I can say with certainty about myself that my love for my wife has not been affected by my feelings for her sister. Not in the least.
If I was 100% sure that this arrangement would be a no-go for my wife, distancing myself from her sister would be a tough but straightforward solution. But I don't think this is what my wife or her sister would really want.
Questions for you: Should I just give up and live a half-fake life next to the two persons that are dearest to me until the end of my days, repressing what I feel and work on "un-loving" my wife's sister, even if I see her everyday? If not, how could I try to find out what my wife could think about all this without running the risk to hurt her or sister?
A Originally posted on January 22, 2014.I'm 45, female, and married to a smart, funny, intelligent 50-year-old man. We've been together nine years, married seven. The sex was good for the first year and then dropped off to nothing. He says, "I've had plenty of sex in my life. I'm just not interested anymore." During my first marriage, the sex was so bad that I thought, "If I could find a man who loved to cuddle, I could go the rest of my life without sex." Perfectly describes husband number two! Except now I feel more sexual than I ever have! I've discussed this with my husband endlessly and have mentioned open marriage, but nothing ever comes of it. I'm not an instigator, although I have tried a few times and have been rejected. Yes, he has had his testosterone checked. It's normal. Not even going to a therapist helped. What do I do? He's a great guy, he loves me and my grown kids unconditionally, but we are more friends/roommates than husband and wife. We have a safe, comfortable life, but I'm too young to go without that for the rest of my life!
Originally posted on January 22, 2014.Five years ago, my wife and I decided to pursue her MFM threesome fantasy. Part of her fantasy was that the other chap have a BBC (big black cock), so we advertised and met this great guy who we've seen three times a year ever since. He is nice and open-minded, and we've become so comfortable with our BBC that we meet at our home now instead of a hotel. So there are respectful and safe people out there to be found! The issue I'm writing about is a problem with me. After our BBC ejaculates in my wife—everyone is tested and free of STIs—I enjoy going down on her, he enjoys watching me go down on her, and she enjoys having me lick the interloper's come from her pussy. That isn't the problem. The problem arises when our BBC isn't in the picture. We enjoy talking about our dirty threesomes, and we both talk about how hot it will be when I go down on her after I've unloaded in her myself. Unfortunately, once I've made my deposit, I have zero desire to go down on her. It's like someone flips a switch in my brain and something I couldn't wait to do is suddenly repulsive to me. This problem doesn't arise in our threesomes because our BBC always comes before I do. What is my issue? Is there a fix?
Can't Really Eat All My Pecker's Originally posted on December 24, 2014.I am a college student just trying to get through my senior year with some halfway decent grades and a smidge of sanity. As such, I have basically given up the social scene. I avoid sexual or romantic interactions. The problem is, while I recognize that I will have plenty of time for social stuff once I graduate (and some far better prospects available with a degree to my name), the rest of me is having trouble getting with the program. My weekends are a lot quieter and my wallet is more comfortable, but sometimes I can't help feeling lonely. Is there anything in your bag of tricks for this self-imposed hermit?
Originally posted on December 24, 2014.
My last relationship—abusive—ended 13 years ago. I've been single for the last 10. I enjoy my life! And I get to wake up in the morning happy, not afraid! However, I would like to share my life with someone. I have not been asked on a date in years—sad—but I go out to movies, dinner, etc., on my own. Do I have a list? Yes! My love should be happy, be self-actualized, be capable of communicating without violence, and have a sense of humor. I am physically fit, and although I'm not a beauty, I'm pretty enough! I snowboard and ride horses—I have lots of energy for 52.5! But is this it? Am I to be alone now?
Originally posted on December 24, 2014.I'm a short guy and I need advice. I don't want a small paragraph's worth of advice, like you gave "Below Their League" a few years ago. I need advice beyond "Women like men taller than them, get over it!" I get it. I'm short (five foot two), and most women are taller than me. And women like tall dudes just like I like slender women. Fat women may have it hard, but at least they have their fans and their own sex-object abbreviation: BBW. But where can a short guy go to feel appreciated? Is there an abbreviation or a dating website for us?
Jesus Christ, I'm Originally posted on December 30, 2015
Longtime reader and listener (magnum podcast subscriber!) here, and I have a conundrum. My partner and I have a DADT agreement in regards to extramarital relations. I'm a fortysomething woman who travels a lot on business, and I find those trips a great opportunity to have NSA flings with younger men, all in good fun. So far, Tinder seems to be a good way to meet people, and I try to take precautions to ensure they are who they say they are by checking them out on social media and meeting them first in a public place. But a girl can't be too careful. Sometimes I wish I had someone I could call and just say, "Hey, I'm hosting a stranger tonight at my hotel. Could you call me at a specific time to check he hasn't chopped me up into little pieces?" My partner can't be that person because of the whole DADT thing. My friends don't know about my flings. And the front desk seems inappropriate. Is there an app out there providing this kind of service? Or does someone need to create one?My husband is bisexual.
When we first began our relationship he told me he hadn't expected to fall for a woman because sexually he preferred men. He broached the subject of having an open relationship but I wasn't cool with it so he dropped it. Fifteen monogamous years later we're married with two kids, three dogs, and a mortgage. I thought we were happy but something seems to have snapped in him this summer. In just the last few months he has cheated on me three separate times with three different men. Then, he gave me your speech. You know, the one where you advise people who are trying to stay in relationship that's missing something in the bedroom. He said he wants to stay with me, but he feels like he's denying a part of himself and he's afraid he'll end up resenting me. I can understand that. I'm even willing to give it a try—theoretically. But putting that idea into action broke my heart, and it was I who began to resent him. I want to keep our marriage, but I also want monogamy. Is there any way I can learn to accept this as our new normal?
I've been in a heterosexual relationship with boyfriend for almost a year. In conversation, he has told me that he has conditioned himself to not feel sexual attraction for women as he feels that it is degrading to them. While I appreciate that he doesn't ogle other women, sometimes I want to feel that he is sexually attracted to me. I think attraction is important in relationships; is it enough that it's not sexual? We do have a healthy sex life, but this has made me considerably less confident in myself. 
I had sex with a second cousin—our mothers are first cousins—a few years ago. We were not raised together. We had only ever met twice. Then we wound up "hanging out" for a week or so. Had sex several times. We swore it was a one-time deal and that we would never to tell anyone. A couple months later I moved across the country and married someone else.
Well, a couple years have passed, I'm getting divorced, and I've moved back to the area. Now we are talking a lot and both want to meet back up and fuck a lot more. Problem is... he cares more than I do if family finds out. Or at least he says he does. I adore him. He's an asshole but at least he's honest about it. Also there are a bunch of other problems with the relationship. But... on a physical level, he has everything I've ever wanted and never had in a partner. 
TBH I never stopped thinking about him even while I was married. (Nothing to do with the divorce, I swear.) I don't know where this is going but I do know that we are family and will always be in each other's lives. I know it may make problems for us in future relationships. Or maybe we will just keep doing this. I don't know. I feel drawn to him in a way that i can't explain. I am very conflicted. Should I be doing this? Not just because the cousin thing... but all the other complications? A semi-large age difference. I'm mid divorce and probably need to just, I don't know, be alone and learn to be ok with being alone.
Before you answer I think you should know a couple other details. I always wanted to be with someone way bigger than me. My exes have all been little guys. Either short or really skinny. And never much taller than me. And I've accepted them because "love." My cousin is like 6'6" and 275 pounds. He is really big. In a super delicious way. And honestly I could list about half a dozen reasons why we definitely should not be in a relationship which I have not mentioned. Can you help me out here? I need clarity, what I have is fog.
Can't Since Mr. Savage had the ability to make Santorum who he is today, would he promote the new meme that Trump = dump? As in, "I have to take a trump," or, "I just took a major trump—like a transatlantic-cable trump."
Just asking.
You've help put a lot of things into perspective. I wanted to discuss with you my current and convoluted situation to see if you have any sage wisdom to impart to me.
I helped open a business with my brother some eight odd years ago. Though we've always been relatively close despite our five year age difference (him older), our sibling dynamic inevitably came to a head by working so closely with one another and so I left three or so years ago. I left for several reasons, one which was the fact that I felt our working together changed our relationship into something unhealthy (it's not easy working with family at all!) but also because I had learned about his multiple infidelities with women he worked with and with women outside of work. Fast forward three years: I was coaxed to come back and work for him under the condition that I would no longer be asked to cover his tracks, etc. This was fine for awhile until it started happening again and again and again. I tried to speak with him logically, and he's even since started seeing a therapist, but nothing has changed. And I would even say it's gotten worse.
Not only do I have a brother who is foolishly cheating on his wife (and they have kids), he's doing so without care or fear of repercussion, which in turn has affected how my respect for him not only as a boss and a brother, but as a man. This is not only juvenile behavior, it's legally foolish. It has also begun to affect the way I look at men. I've developed a lack of trust in those closest to me, seeing how easily a man can lie and expect others to lie and cover for him. (I'm currently in a relationship and pretty happy. I don't have trust issues with this person but this whole ordeal has left a bad taste in my mouth with regards to long term commitments, etc.)
I know when it comes to cheating you've said that it's no one's business but the persons involved and I agree. But his cheating is not only affecting my personal relationships, it's affecting my livelihood. I've decided to leave my comfortable position here because again I don't want any part in this. I don't know how to help my brother and I'm tired of lying to cover for him. His wife is constantly texting me and cornering me and I don't know what to do or say anymore. My parents are also at their wits end. Do I just let him crash and burn?
He's Originally posted on December 31, 2014. 
Vanilla straight guy here. As a fellow Washingtonian, I feel proud to live in a state that was among the first to legalize marriage equality by a popular majority vote of the people. I avidly follow the NFL and eat fried bologna sandwiches and do lots of other manly things. However, I have always loved musical theater. Whenever I go to New York, I have to see at least two or three big shows. My question: Is it socially acceptable for me to good-naturedly say, "I'm totally gay for musical theater"? Or is it a slur that I shouldn't say, no matter how playful or well-intended?
Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
I've recently discovered that I am a panty sniffer. Though since I'm a gay man, maybe I'm a briefs breather? The smell gets me hard and gets me off. I discovered this when a fuck buddy left his shorts behind, and for the next few days I jerked off sniffing his shorts. That brings me to the young millennial techie guys at my work. They are fucking slobs, and they're always leaving their underwear and socks on the floor of the company's gym in our office. The janitor picks them up and puts them in a lost-and-found bin. I started checking the bin, and nothing was being removed. No one ever claimed their shorts. So I started taking a pair every now and then. At home, I fantasize about who they belong to, and when I'm done with them, I just toss them. First question: Am I stealing? I assume the guys aren't missing them, since they've been in the bin for a week or more. Second question: Have I become one of those perverted panty sniffers from those old Chester the Molester comics?
Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
What is your stance on maintenance sex? I'd never thought about the issue until reading Amy Poehler's new memoir. I didn't find anything she said controversial, and was surprised when this quote blew up in the feminist blogosphere: "You have to have sex with your husband occasionally, even though you're exhausted. Sorry." I'd never realized many people firmly believe one should have sex with their partner only when they are in the mood! Some articles even made it sound like maintenance sex is a form of nonconsensual sex. I have sex with my husband pretty often when I'm not in the mood. He would prefer sex every day, and I'm more of an every-other-day or twice-a-week girl. I'd say about 25 percent of the time we are having sex, I am doing it for maintenance purposes. I always enjoy it and I get off the majority of the time, but I don't always go in wanting it or needing it. Is this wrong? Am I not the feminist I thought I was?
I, and my husband, have followed you for over a decade. I think we grew to become very open minded, subconsciously, because of it. We never planned to open up our relationship, I had sworn off my attraction to women, but after kids and life, we didn't really have sex for several years. It has been quite unfulfilling when we did. We get along quite well in every other department, but his low libido and my raging one was bound to end badly if something didn't change. So, because of all of your advice, swirling around the back of my head, I just recently asked, "Can I please meet my needs elsewhere?" and you know what, it's fine that we both do, if we choose, and we've had a lot of amazing sex this week because it's brought us closer than ever. Thankful for my open-minded guy who isn't threatened by my raging bisexuality and need for variety. Thankful for all of the future amazing sex on my horizon. Damn, Dan, thankful for you this Thanksgiving. 
I'm a 27-year-old male who has been recently submerging myself in the poly lifestyle. I've been maintaining multiple relationships with various degrees of seriousness. Some of my partners are people in the local kink scene that I play with at parties. One of them is a recurring playmate I have over to my house to tie up and consensually torture. I was even seriously dating a married poly person who was a lifestyle slave to her husband, but wanted to explore topping.
Recently though, I've started chatting with a person I met at one of the kink parties. We've been calling each other for hours at night, exchanging messages all the time, etc. However, despite the fact that we both enjoy roughly the same things, she claims to not be poly, where I do. We've discussed this, and it seems we practice roughly the same thing.
I consider being tied up and beaten a form of sex, because mentally it's every bit as stimulating and that's what matters to me. She does not. So while I maintain only one fluid-bonded partner at a time for STI-risk-management purposes, I don't really consider this practice monogamy. She, however, only considers penetrative sex to be sex, and thinks that play parties at the local dungeon don't count against monogamy.
Should I be worried about the semantics here? I'm not sure which counts more for compatibility: our practices or our beliefs. Is this fundamental disagreement something that should preclude us pursuing a relationship?
I've been dating my boyfriend for almost a year. He's 25, I'm 27. I asked him to have Thanksgiving dinner with me and my mother at my house. He said no. I also invited him to have dinner with my father, my brother, my stepmom and me the day after Thanksgiving. He said no again. His reasoning: "It would be too awkward." He has met both sides of my family before, and I have met his parents as well. His parents are having Thanksgiving dinner with family friends and he doesn't have other Thanksgiving plans. This is not the first time he has turned down invitations to spend time with my family. I've told him the only way for us to feel less awkward with each other's families is to spend more time with them. He just said "I know" via text.
I believe he loves me, he is a wonderful partner in many areas of my life, but this is bothering me. What should I do, Dan? At this point I am fighting the urge to tell him that maybe our relationship is "too awkward" and we should part ways before Christmas rolls around. What do you think?
I'm a straight female in my mid twenties. I've been dating a wonderful guy for two years—but I recently found something that has put me on edge.
Before we met, he was in a relationship with a terrible, alcoholic, and mentally-unstable woman. They got pregnant early in the relationship and stayed together for about five years. We met a year after they broke up. I feel like I'd come to terms with the ugliness of his past, with his trying to stay in a bad relationship for the sake of his child, and the rest of it. But recently, thanks to the vastness of the Internet, I came across a suggestive photo of my boyfriend with his ex's sister. I asked him about it and he admitted to sleeping with her while he was with his ex. He says it was during a particularly bad period, he was very drunk, she made the first move, etc., but I'm just so grossed out. Cheating is one thing but fucking your girlfriend's sister? And it's not like this was a 19-year-old's mistake. He was near thirty and the father of a child. He also fudged a little about whether it was just one time or a few times. They were a pretty tight family, he spent a lot of birthdays and holidays with them before and after, and he stayed with his ex for another two years after sleeping with her sister. And he never told her about it!
I feel like now I'm questioning his integrity. This is something that I just wouldn't have thought him capable of doing, regardless of how fucked up his relationship was. What do I do?
I’m a married woman and reading your column with my husband helped us create a healthy sex life together. Thank you for that. Now I have a question.
My kink is having my husband come in my mouth. It’s not a wild kink and it's not one many women share. But I have the best orgasms as my husband is coming in my mouth. My biggest fantasy is to have his come in my mouth while he is fucking me—or, more accurately, having him come in my mouth as he fucks me. I've used a dildo while he comes in my mouth, and that's pretty good, but I want the real thing. And we're not willing to invite others into our play at this point.
Putting his come in a jar and drinking it while we're getting it on seems so sterile. I think it might ruin the mood. Plus, I would want it warm, so what do you do? Freeze it and microwave right before we start? Any advice for someone who wants her husband to be in two places at once?
For a total of nine months, in my 40’s, I made my living as a "high-class call girl" or prostitute or sex worker—whatever one likes to call it. I chose to when getting out of a consuming and abusive relationship. At the time I did not want to be truly close to anyone yet desired a lot of sex. It led me to a whole new world that I was very happy with. I felt I had mutually respectful interactions and the clearly defined boundaries and my new financial and creative independence helped me feel strong and gave me a new confidence.
Eight months ago I met a beautiful man, by chance, when I was in a pub despite the fact that I don’t drink. We have a strong love for each other and moved in together.
After two months I told him that I had been a high-class call girl. He says he's haunted by it, disgusted by it, and almost every single day since I told him—months now—he says something insulting to be about it. He says this will never change and he cant stand that I won't say how wrong it was or is. He says I sold my soul and the least I can do is express regret for it. I had not felt dirty about this until this happened. I cannot say I feel that way—like I sold my soul—but maybe there were certain deceptions that took place during this time that I was a party to (men cheating on their spouses). I never asked about the men I was with about their private lives.
I would like to know your feeling about this subject and just how much is true love worth sacrificing for or going through some temporary by flagellation for?
I wanted to pass along a thought in response to your remarks to NGAA in your most recent column.
In your reply, you wrote, "You're going to need a gay dude to act on the advice I'm about to give you... the kind of gay dude who obsesses about Broadway musicals." I was surprised to see you endorsing a stereotype about both the LGBTQ community and those who obsess over musicals. I myself am a heterosexual man who has been obsessed with musicals my whole life (You'll be happy to know Mame is in my collection—on vinyl—and I too find the OBC of Joseph to be a special kind of torture.) I pass this along because I am part of a statistical minority and have often had assumptions made about my sexuality based on my music preferences. I'm almost forty now and in recent years I've stopped caring about such things but in my twenties I kept my showtunes away from my paramours and when they did find out, I would play down my obsession.
I'm sure my various girlfriends have loved me in spite of musicals, though I am happy to report that my current girlfriend is different—when my friends asked her how she felt about the whole "musical thing," she told them she loved it. And she does; her iPod is stuffed full of Broadway playlists I've made for her. 
It strikes me that as we fight for equality for the LGBTQ community, we should work towards eliminating all stereotypes, no matter how minor they may seem.
As one of the rare straight dudes into theater (particularly Shakespeare [PBUH], though I have dabbled in musicals), there was something I wanted to mention about the advice you wrote this week for No Good At Acronyms.
So much of our culture (particularly Hollywood, though Broadway isn't always much better) tells us hetero guys can't have any emotions other than (1) rage, (2) mad passionate love for a woman, which is really not enough to express the range of human experience. Broadening what we allow ourselves to feel can be difficult, but it's so worth it! In particular, I know my life got better when I learned to accept that I can love my friends (even the female ones!) as friends in a truly meaningful way without it having to be about sex and romance. Sometimes the logistics of people's lives just work out so that's the kind of love that fits, and thinking of might-have-beens doesn't really help anybody. However, expressing how you feel to a friend can be a good idea, as long as it's an in control kind of love, not a painfully-exploding-really-all-about-gratifying-your-desires kind of love.
As much as I love show tunes, Dan, that's what I think most straight dudes actually need to hear.
Can't I'm 32 y/o and I've been with my fiancée for 3 years along with her 5 y/o son (with us half the time). Our love is strong most of the time and we have common interests, we laugh, have very good sex, and she's devoted to me, and her son and I get along great, but she (fiancée) struggles with extreme jealousy. Most notably about my ex-girlfriend who I was with for nearly four years. I have not talked to my ex in two years and she has since married and clearly moved on with her life (in a far away state no less). When I broke up with her we exchanged some emails that were positive and supportive of each other moving on and my now-fiancée read them (without permission) and often cites them in her belief that I still love and want to be with my ex. While I do care for my ex on a respectful level, I have moved on as well, but my fiancée clings to this, and I'm just not sure why, at least on a practical level she must know that it's hurting our relationship. 
Furthermore, she had made scenes around other women she perceives as threatening, or at minimum is snarky and unkind to woman (particularly white woman who vaguely resemble my ex). Her "feelings" about things tend to determine everything we do, and at times I'm almost constantly reassuring her that I love her in order to get through any kind of social event or being out in public in general. She is taking some anti-anxiety meds, and she's seen a therapist a few times, but these issues continue to arise. My hunch is that you'll tell me to walk away, but I'm afraid to leave and of the drama that will unfold with her and her son with whom I've grown close, and I also do love her and feel that this is the biggest thing standing in our way of being happy and having a solid relationship. How can we get past her jealously before I officially commit to spend the rest of my life with her?
Originally posted on October 23, 2013.
My girlfriend always responds positively when I initiate sex with her, but she hardly ever initiates sex with me. I'm a no-beat-around-the-bush kind of guy, but I realize that this can be a sensitive topic, and I don't want to scare her by saying, "Please initiate sex more often!" So I do small things to coax her and let her know that I want her to initiate. I will lotion up in front of her after we shower. Or I'll say something like "I wanted to fuck last night-maybe you can wear one of your sexy bras and thongs one day soon?" But it hasn't worked. The only time she'll initiate is if I haven't initiated for a while and she's sexually frustrated. But that can take days!
I bet you get a lot of emails like this one but I would love to hear your thoughts.
I am a 23-year-old man I met a girl at school in January of 2014 and we went out a couple times never did anything and I left out of state. She was single at the time. When I came back we reconnected randomly and instantly fucked. While I was gone I looked her up on Instagram and saw pictures of her with a man. After we had sex she confessed that she was in a relationship and also said that her boyfriend is 35. She is 18. We continued casually having sex on and off until June this year. I took her out to a show and we ran into her boyfriend's friend. She stayed over that night and her boyfriend called my phone number about twenty times. Apparently he already knew about me. I let her stay another two nights cause she was not prepared to go deal with reality. He continued calling. I did not answer. When she went home he got slightly physical with her. I had already left for the summer to work and they stayed together. I see this as an abusive relationship. She doesn't have much experience dating, she was abused before, they have bills and shit together and she told me she feels trapped. I actually like this girl despite her behavior. As far as I know me and her BF are the only people she's had sex with besides a relative who raped her. I don't know whether I should drop this like a hot potato or go ahead and be a home wrecker. Since I got back a month ago we have been talking over email. Her boyfriend snoops thru her phone and blocked my number. Any advice?
I'm in an awkward situation and need advice ASAP. I'm a grad student in my mid-20's, and this summer while studying in another country I met and thought I had fallen in love with a British guy. When I returned to the US after spending 2.5 months together, he ended up following me home, which I was excited about at the time. He planned a stay of 90 days, the length of his tourist visa, and he's relying on me for accommodations though supplying his own food/drinking money through minimal online work and borrowing from his parents. Within the first weeks that he was here, I already started to realize that I didn't like him as much as I'd thought. Since then, I've become increasingly annoyed by him and stressed by his financial issues and constant presence. We haven't had sex in weeks and I no longer want to. The next month is very work-heavy and I don't know that I can handle having him here anymore, but even cheap options like couchsurfing would likely force him to borrow even more from his parents, something I know he would hate to do. Can I uninvite someone who I encouraged to visit me? Or should I suck it up and let him stay for the last month?

I went on PrEP recently. I’ve always had plenty of safe fun and had never felt the need to put PrEP into the mix, but a few months ago a poz guy hit me up on Grindr. He disclosed his status and while the logic side of my brain understands all the things I should understand about undetectable viral loads and such, I can’t quite get myself past the mental gymnastics of engaging a poz person sexually.
I understand the issues with this (it makes me kind of a borderline "just my preference” guy which makes me feel like crap, I’m otherwise an open door/set of legs!) but the fear is deeply rooted for me. When I came out, my family was very supportive and literally only concerned that in pursuit of living my life openly (which they supported me doing) I would get HIV. I have always safely guarded against that vulnerability and at this point I’m making excuses, I guess, but suffice it to say that sex with an HIV positive person is not on the menu for me.
I politely declined and the guy was totally cool with it. The interaction was civil and respectful. He reminded me right at the end that I should be extra careful out there because I wasn’t on PrEP and most new infections come from guys who don’t know they’re positive and so my choice to have sex (even with condoms) with “negative” guys is in some ways more risky than having sex with a guy who knows he is positive and is under proper medical care. 
That’s something I knew, but there was something about his phrasing that called me to action. So, I went to to the doctor and now I’m on PrEP. I want to thank the guy—I keep spotting him on Grindr—but I’m uneasy about it because I still don’t think I feel comfortable enough to have sex with him. I don’t even know if he’ll make the jump to that, but I want to know if you think it’s worth it for me to reach out to him, or if you think it’s a silly idea. Part of it is self-centered for me I suppose (I feel guilty about rejecting him and want to provide validation, or something) but truthfully I do appreciate his advocacy in the face of my rejection. 
I'm a 49-year-old gay professional. I'm a PhD and a college professor. But I can't seem to find anyone who will take a second look at me, much less go on a date. The last two guys I asked out both cancelled at the last minute with bullshit excuses. I think I have a lot of personality and I'm really funny and obviously smart but I'm not handsome in the way that one needs to be at this age to get dates. It's as though a 49-year-old gay man is invisible. It doesn't help that I live in a city where one either needs to be beautiful or rich to catch a dick. I'm neither and I've just about given up on ever finding anyone who will look past superficial things and see the real me. (Unfortunately, I also do the same thing—which makes me a hypocrite, I know.) The dating apps don't help. I'm too ugly for Grindr, not buff enough for Jack'd, too preppy for Scruff. It would be awesome if they had a dating app for academics with acerbic senses of humor.
What the fuck should I do, dude?
I'm a 23 year old female from central Florida (believe me, I don't like it either), and I've been happily married for almost six months now to a man I've been with for about three-and-a-half years. I've only recently started listening to the micro version of your podcast and absolutely love it, and each time I listen I come up with all these questions that I simply never had anyone to ask. Thankfully, this won't be about the relationship with my husband, but mostly stuff I'm not comfortable with asking anyone because almost the entire spectrum of sex, the reproductive part of the body, relationships and such was not (were not?) openly spoken about when I was growing up. I never really thought of myself as a sheltered child and the more time I spend with my husband, the more I learn I actually was. I apologise in advance for how long this will be (I tend to babble and rant), but I will do my best to make it as short as possible.
1. I work in retail...
...and I have a co-worker that for some unknown reason loves to give me her opinion on my life choices. It mostly started with me adamantly telling her I don't want kids now or ever and that my husband is in the same boat. "What if he changes his mind? What if you change your mind? You're just saying that because you're young. You'll change your mind some day" yadda yadda yadda, I get it all the fucking time with this girl. And I do mean girl—she's maybe a year older than me. I used to work with her once a week and she'd ask me every fucking week about whether or not I wanted kids, even though I'd given the same answer every time. Part of me feels she would do it to push my buttons and I still try hard not to give in to that and simply ignore her every criticism, until early spring this year when she told me I was doing my wedding wrong. I had planned (and had) a small, intimate wedding at a county park this past May and it was wonderful, but she felt that since I didn't want a big wedding and make a big fucking deal about it, that I was doing my first wedding (as if there'd be another!) "wrong". Fast forward to a month or so ago and she has since stopped asking me about kids, but she still freaks the fuck out about my decisions. I recently got promoted (which she got "offended" that I didn't tell her right away) and now I have no idea how to handle it should she basically start harassing me about this again. I am terrible at confronting people, I don't like it, and if I don't say something in the moment (the rare times I have said something in the moment, it was not nice), I tend to not say anything at all. This whole thing gets me fired up whether she says anything or not, to the point where I hate working with her (there are other work related reasons for that, too, but this is long enough already). Any advice you have or a direction you can point me in for this situation would be wonderful because I'm at my wits end with this girl.
2. The most recent podcasts I have listened to include you talking about men hitting their sexual peak in their teens and women in their late twenties or early thirties, this being related to men "discovering" themselves at an earlier age than women. I can't personally speak for other women, but I know I started some mild form of masturbation at about fourteen, moving on to fingering at about fifteen or sixteen. With that said, I am no expert on the female body despite being the owner of one. I have some abstract/loose ideas of what pleasures me (which I make sure to articulate as best as possible to my husband), but I don't know my turn ons/offs as well as my husband knows his. I know you are a man who thinks the female body is icky, but I was wondering if you had tips for a sheltered girl who would like to get to know her own body better. I have a vibrator that I have used and I love that, but I personally don't like using my fingers on myself. My husband likes using his own fingers and the vibrator on occasion and since he actually gets a chance to look at my lady parts, I mostly want to know my body better to help him get me off because he legitimately like to.
3. I'm not sure how to phrase this, but I am only good at one relationship at a time. I graduated high school pretty much hating everyone and everything and was diagnosed with depression in 2011. I've been in treatment ever since and though I don't think the two are linked (shit relationships and depression), I do think not knowing I had depression was the reason I didn't have too many friends growing up. I've gotten past all that and have a great relationship with my husband, as I've said before. I honestly couldn't care less about having friends of my own, though I do encourage him to hang out with his friends whenever he can. My only problem with this is that it is also affects the relationships I have with my family. Before meeting my husband, my one good relationship was with my mom. Granted, we didn't have big discussions on anything and if she ever brought up "life", I'd shut down, but we hung out all the time and it was nice. I think at first she was really hurt that I kind of stopped hanging out with her when I met my husband, but maybe let that go once she saw how happy I was. The other problem I have with this is that I couldn't care less about being close with my siblings (two sisters, one brother) or my dad (which wasn't a great relationship to begin with). I think that more than anything hurts my mom, and I know it hurts my brother that I don't exactly get along with my dad. My question is this: since I currently believe that my "one good relationship" thing isn't going to go away, how to do I get my family to understand this about me without hurting anyone?
I'm sure I could have sent you three separate emails about this, and I truly apologise for how long-winded it is. I guess I should add I'm incapable of concisely expressing my thoughts/feelings. Anyway, if you can only answer one of those questions, or even if you tell me to fuck off for taking up too much of your time, any response would be great.
Originally posted on November 13, 2013. 
I'm a heterosexual guy in my early 20s. I've been dating my girlfriend for about six months, and we've been having some fights recently. The problem: I have a high sex drive in comparison to hers. I want to be intimate on a weekly basis (at least!), and she's told me that she's more of a once-every-three-weeks-or-so person. I'm trying not to put pressure on her. I don't want her to feel uncomfortable—she's a virgin (no penetration), and the thought of the pain of that first time scares her a bit. That said, physical intimacy with her—developing that bond, even without intercourse—is important to me and a key part of what I believe is a healthy relationship. I do my best to be understanding, but I'm not sure how to bridge this gap.
Originally posted on November 27, 2013.
I'm a bi woman in my mid-20s in a great monogamish relationship with my straight boyfriend. We occasionally invite other women into our sex life, which is really enjoyable for both of us. He isn't threatened by other women, only by other men, which isn't an issue since I'm not interested in any other men. So on the occasions when we find a lady we're both into who's also into us, anything goes, and it's awesome. We've hooked up with both friends and strangers, but always as a couple because it makes us both feel safe. That's all lovely. Enter the problem: I was visiting some friends of ours I used to live with before my boyfriend and I moved in together. After going out for drinks, we were playing an alcohol-fueled card game that turned into an alcohol-fueled strip card game. This is in my former home where I am very comfortable, feel safe, and was frequently in various states of undress while I was a housemate. One friend soon had her lovely breasts out, and she made a few comments that were direct and inviting and turned me on a little. I touched her boobs and sucked on her nipples, but that's as far as things went. Her boyfriend witnessed this but wasn't involved. It was a fun, playful moment, and soon after, I went to bed—alone. It wasn't anything my boyfriend would've objected to had he been there, but he wasn't there. Should I tell him about it, or is this a case where he has the right not to know? I'm not interested in pursuing anything further with this friend, and I'm not sure what talking about it would accomplish, other than being honest at the expense of my boyfriend's feelings, and probably making me feel bad for something that, although it seemed innocent and harmless in the moment, I shouldn't have done.
Non-Originally posted on September 18, 2013. 
Straight male here. I took a writing course, and some of us students created a writing group. We meet and workshop the things we've been working on. One of the guys in the group is gay, and a while ago, he confessed that he had very strong feelings for me. I didn't have a problem with this, but I told him that I wasn't into guys. The other day, he sent me an e-mail telling me there was something he wanted to discuss. We met for dinner, and he told me that despite the fact that I claimed to be straight, he felt like I had been sending him messages to indicate my interest in him. He said that this was cruel and that he felt like I was teasing him. When I asked him for examples, he told me that when we had originally been in class together, he noticed that I had started to dress like him, and that this was sometimes a way closeted men showed interest in other men. He mentioned that one week he had worn a red sweater, and the following week I had worn a red T-shirt. He also said that he felt like the stories I had been workshopping in our group were secretly about him. I admit I'm not the stereotypical straight guy—I have good taste in shoes and I like art—but I know what I'm into and who I want to get naked with. I never showed any interest in this guy, I never led him on, this entire thing has taken place purely in his head. I told him all this, and now he says he is hurt and doesn't want to see me at the group. He suggested that we share the group, alternating meetings, but I refused. We're both adults who should have the emotional maturity to handle this. Am I being too harsh?
Originally posted on December 12, 2012. 
I had a conversation with a friend who is an emergency-room physician. He told me about removing something—I can't remember what—from a gentleman's ass. My immediate response was to ask whether he had the flared-base talk with the gentleman after the fact. His response? "What are you talking about?" I explained that if the gentleman had used a butt toy with a flared base, he wouldn't have been in the circumstances that brought him to the hospital. He had never thought of that and thanked me for the advice. My partner is a physician and has treated patients with anal "encumbrances." He gives the flared-base advice to anyone who seems like they might benefit from it—but he tells me this isn't something they go over in med school. This shocks me because it seems like a topic where a little education could do a lot of good. You should use your column to bring this to the attention of medical school administrators.
I’m so fucking fucked. I really hope you can help me. I just don’t know what to do. I’m in a fifteen-year relationship with my (now) wife. We met when I was very young and unsure of myself. Despite a large age difference (I’m younger), I convinced her to take a chance on me, and together we have built a life, a successful company, and she has stood by my side and supported my own career, which is now flourishing. I have also blossomed personally, only in recent yeas. I’m nearing 40 now, and I find it hard to even believe I’m the same girl my wife met so many years ago—though she herself is pretty much the same, solid and unwavering. Our sex life has always been terrible. It’s inconsistent and unfulfilling and there’s not really any attraction…but she doesn’t really have attraction for anyone, and this has always been an issue for her. I, however, am very attracted to attraction. For the sake of making a long story short, I had a pretty significant (though short) affair a couple years ago with someone who pursued me and then promptly fell in love with me. It was exhilarating, and I loved her too, but I hated myself throughout the process. I hated that I had become a cheater, but I didn’t know how to end it, and I don’t think I wanted to. My marriage nearly ended, but I pleaded and begged for a second chance, unable to live with the pain I had caused my wife. I temporarily entered therapy, and we also were in couple’s therapy. I thought we had become stronger, that I had become more self-reliant, and that our fundamental needs were being addressed. I love my wife so much. I love the life we have.
And now, here I am again. I met a woman at a conference, and we hit it off. But there was an intensity there, and that intensity has taken over our “friendship.” I live on one coast and she’s on the other—and she’s also in an unfulfilling relationship. We have plans to see each other again. For the first time in my life, it all feels so RIGHT with this person. We communicate constantly, and have had every kind of sex that we can have from afar. We have told each other we love each other, and we do. Despite how this sounds, it doesn’t feel obsessive. It feels real and sweet. And scary. I don’t want to betray my marriage, nor do I want to lose it. In addition to a lot of logistic circumstances that I won’t get into here (though there are no kids involved, thankfully), I am financially tied to my wife, and would be broke, and lose my business, without her. All things considered, that is minor though, and that is not my driving force. The thing is, I really, really love my wife. I love our sweetness and our shared hobbies and our connection. I’m just not in love with her, there is no vavavoom, and she’s not in love with me… or at least, not in the way I need. The “other person” is applying no pressure. She knows that we have to each be in our respective marriages and situations for the time being for a variety of reasons, and so we have adopted a sort of “see you down the road” attitude, though we hope for moments of lovemaking and connection along the way. My wife is older. Can I just let time play out or am I being a horrible partner and betraying the person who believed in me when no one else did? Do I need to end all contact with this new person who fills me up in ways I didn’t know were possible? I just don’t think I can do that. I feel like this is all unmanageable. Many people who contact you with similar stories are in unhappy marriages. Mine is not unhappy. I honestly don’t see a way forward. Help? I met this hot couple recently with a sex swing in their house, and they have some kind of game they play with it, and it sounded fun so I made some plans to meet up with them. The day of, we were discussing logistics and one of them mentioned a coconut oil lube he had from Hawaii. This sent up a red flag (oil based lube + latex condom = trouble) so I asked what types of condoms they had. His response of "the ones you get for free from the bar" (so, obviously latex) turned me off, and I canceled. 
From my standpoint, not knowing that oil based lube and latex condoms don't mix is an indicator. Either, it's an indicator that they aren't safe sex experts, or that they're trying to dissuade condom use all together. If I pick up at any point that someone may have a pattern of unsafe sex decisions, I exit the situation because it seems likely to me that one bad decision comes after a series of other bad decisions.
Any deficiency in understanding of safe sex puts me at risk. Sex is always a risk and I understand that, but I like to take risks that are as well informed as they can be. I have a lot of sex, but always with partners I've interrogated to my liking without revealing any red flags.
I was discussing this with a friend who said I was overthinking it. What do you think? Am I being to harsh by extrapolating things and making broad assumptions? Am I being to harsh? I really did want to try that swing!

My husband and I have raised our kids (22 and 18) to be sex positive. For years, your column and podcast have played a significant role in that, so thank you! The four of us are close and communicate openly. My daughter (18) has expressed an interest to me in eventually becoming a cam girl when she reaches her twenties. She is athletic, smart, pretty and confident, and I imagine she would be very successful.  I can tell she wants me to give this idea a thumbs up. I'm hesitant about her viewing her blossoming sexually as a way to make money given the complicated messages our society gives young people, yet I want to be supportive. If your son were of age and wanted to pursue a similar course would you give him your blessing? 
I know that family issues aren't exactly your specialty but I am a huge fan of your column and would love to hear your advice. I am an almost 30 straight-ish woman.  I have a brother "Ed" in his early 20s who is gay. I knew when he was about 12 because he frequently used my laptop to look for porn. He came out to me when he was around 16. I told him I supported him and that when/if he wanted to come out to our parents I would be there. 
He officially came out a few years ago. I'm happy that he is able to live openly. But since coming out he has turned into a major asshole. We were close prior to him coming out. Now he is rude, manipulative, passive aggressive, and lies constantly. Worse, if anyone calls him out on his rudeness he immediately plays the victim/gay card. Example: He showed up at my kid's birthday party high on speed, talked graphically about hooking up with strangers, and then cussed me out when I asked him to keep it rated G. 
He lives in a different city than me, so we do not see each other often. In the last year, I have noticed several relatives who live close to Ed distancing themselves from me. Last week, my other sibling told me that Ed has been telling people that we are estranged because I'm homophobic. Dan, this couldn't be farther from the truth. I was in a relationship with a woman when I was his age and consider myself to be an ally. Although I disapprove of MANY of his recent actions, I could care less about his sexual orientation. He is very charming when he wants to be and I suspect that several relatives believe that I mistreated Ed in some way. How can I set the record straight? I can't just say, "By the way I'm not a homophobe, Ed's a liar" in the middle of Thanksgiving dinner. Even if I could, I still have hopes that Ed will grow out of this (being an asshole, not being gay) and I don't want to speak badly about him. I also don't want anyone to think I'm the type of person who would disown my brother for being gay. 
I'm Sure You'll Originally posted on September 25, 2013.
My girlfriend and I have a vibrant relationship. Sex is great and adventurous when we have it, but I have one small issue that clouds up the sexual chemistry and turns me into a somber theologian: Since the earliest days of my childhood, I was told by my family that abortion was a horrible, horrible thing. And that thought has complicated my relationships. I simply don't know how to get past this thought and indulge my partner and myself sexually without feeling uncertain about the possible outcome of our getting funky. I feel awful that my girlfriend has to deal with this moral panic of mine, and I'm sick of putting her through it. Help!
I am a straight woman in my mid-forties. I have been seeing the same man for six years, he is a similar age to me. About a year ago we officially moved in together. There are several problems. 
I like to socialize and go out to see movies and bands, eat dinner with friends and family, and take trips away for leisure. He is usually reluctant to do any of these types of activities with me and seems content to spend most of his time in the house aside from work and essentials e.g. going to the grocery store. He almost always refuses to accompany me out socially. He did take me to dinner on my birthday and very occasionally will come to a movie. If we do go out he usually feels stressed and wants to go home early so it isn't really fun anyway.
He will not sleep the night with me in the same bed—we have our own separate bedrooms. He has sleeping problems and is a light sleeper. I do snore, not all the time, but he never sleeps with me. We have not spent one night in the same bed since he moved in. I feel lonely in my bed by myself each night, especially if we have had sex and then he is quick to leave back to his room.
The sex can be really great but is sporadic—could be anywhere from twice per month to 2-3 times per week. This depends on energy levels and how well the relationship is going. We both work long and demanding hours and can be tired at times. He can only orgasm from penetrative sex which is somewhat limiting but I have accepted it. I have not had a problem bringing other partners to orgasm by hand or blowjobs and enjoyed these activities a lot but it doesn't work with him. I do miss being able to do this. He puts in the effort to give me a good time sexually however and is generally GGG.
He gave up smoking which is awesome, but after a few months of being quit took up a nicotine vapouriser instead. I asked him not to use it inside my apartment when he moved in, and he often steps outside, but he does still use it inside when I am not home despite my repeated requests not to. It leaves an odour and affects my breathing as I suffer from asthma. I need to use my inhaler more frequently due to this. I have asked him to consider giving up the vapouriser but he doesn't want to do that.
The final and most significant issue is that he has poor dental health and hygiene, causing at times severe bad breath. He has spent a lot of time at the dentist getting repairs which has made intermittent improvements. He recently got some work done, but more is needed. He leaves long gaps before going to the dentist even when he knows work is due, and waits until the breath is really gross again and I ask him to go which causes a huge upset. He does not seem to get that he needs to brush and floss before sex or kissing. I have asked him nicely to do this but he usually forgets. He drinks several alcoholic beverages every night and this along with the vapouriser is not helping the breath problem. He does not brush before bed and not even every morning. 
When we are having sex I have developed ways to avoid smelling his breath (never doing it face to face, keeping my face down when giving oral etc) which detracts from a relaxed and natural experience. I feel so frustrated and ashamed. I have been as kind and tactful as possible around this issue but I have begun to think it will not change. I seem to have developed an aversion to kissing him now; last week he had actually brushed his teeth before he got in bed with me but when we kissed it made my stomach turn. This has not happened before, I think I must have reached a point where I have lost attraction for him. 
I have been contemplating moving out into a new place as I do not feel happy. I am not afraid of being alone really, but I feel sad at the thought of our relationship failing after having dedicated so much time and energy to it. Despite the problems I feel love for my partner and I know breaking up will hurt us both. I know my description of our problems make him sound unappealing but he is a kind, loving and thoughtful man who is a dear friend to me as well.
I know the answer seems obvious but I am struggling act decisively. I would appreciate your assessment and advice, Dan. Give it to me straight.
Originally posted on November 13, 2013. 
Why am I such a slut?
Girl, A friend of mine stumbled across this Tumblr that I thought would be right up your alley: thingsmydickdoes.tumblr.com. It's the secret life of what a guy's dick does while he's asleep and it's very funny indeed. If you post it on Slog could you leave me, the tipper, anonymous? 
My Friend's I'm in a bit of a pickle. I am a 33-year-old hetero female in a monogamous relationship with a 30-year-old hetero male for about a year and a half. He is a wonderful person—kind, gentle, funny, intelligent, and, more importantly, thinks the same of me. We get along swimmingly except when it comes to sex. He has had issues with sex since his first time when he was 19. He can get it up, but has trouble maintaining an erection, and can only come very occasionally and only by his hand. This apparently has always been the case. I could probably deal with that, but my real problem is that in his haste to get to the performance, he bypasses foreplay and pays little attention to whether or not I'm getting turned on. Yes, I have brought this up and we have talked about. We both see a therapist regularly and so pay pretty close attention to our communication. We even did Sensate Focus for a few months. It helped a little bit at the time, but once we started having intercourse again, he slipped back in to his old ways. I have been very verbal with him about what I like and what turns me on, but it's like his anxiety and insecurities around sex trump everything else. He is good at oral sex and can make me come almost every time, but if I'm giving him oral, or if I want to be on top for a while, he quickly goes soft. I have had quite a bit of sex in my life and I feel like I want to be with someone that I can explore further with, not someone I have to school. On the other hand, I feel like a fool to give up such a great guy because of physical desire. And to further complicate matters, most everyone I talk to about this is downplaying the issue, so I don't know if I think it would be foolish because it would be foolish or if I'm being influenced by a social construct. Dan, please help!!
A Dear Readers: It’s Sherman Alexie's birthday—happy birthday, Sherman!—and by some strange coincidence... it's my birthday too. And while I’m taking it easy today (just three flights), I don't want to deprive you of your daily dose of Savage Love. So here are two not-very-complicated questions pulled out of today's emailbag—queries I could answer quickly—and one listener response I wanted to share.—I'm a 34-year-old male and I've been dating a woman on and off for the past eight months (she's 27, though I'm not sure that matters much to the story). I really care about this person, and she opened up a serious can of worms recently when she opened up my sketchbook/journal one morning when I went to work. I completely believe her when she says it was an accident. It was right on top of my desk and she says she was looking for paper to write me a note. That said, she read through it, and she did not like what she read. 
What she read specifically was from the first time we broke up was back in April. I was upset and I gave a pretty harsh commentary on her. I think I was trying to convince myself that I didn't feel as strongly about her as I did. A lot of the things were fair, but some were less so. She has some pretty heavy body image issues due to a significant weight loss that left her with excess skin and I talked about how it bothered me. I got over it, because I really value this person as a whole, but my own prejudice was a hurdle for me to get over. I never let it affect my ability to be intimate with her.
I think any trust we could have had is lost and I don't think she'll ever feel comfortable around me again. She's understandably upset, but do I have a right to be mad how deep she went into my private thoughts? And is she right to frame those thoughts as a inexcusable slight to her? Is there any way to salvage this relationship?
Betrayer/
I'm 24 years old and I've been traveling around Europe for the past 10 months. Recently I've had some pretty traumatic sexual experiences and I guess I'm not sure how to wrap my head around them. In January a friend (boy toy) came to visit me from Berlin while I was in Mallorca. The morning he left I fell back asleep and woke up to the feeling of a dick pressing itself into me from behind me. I was clothed so it didn't fully penetrate, but I was still half asleep and as I regained more consciousness I realized that my boy toy had left and this was not him. I opened my eyes, nobody was there and I could not move any part of my body. I could feel pressed hands on my chest making it's way up to my neck and fingers massaging my shoulders. After a few moments of trying to wrap my mind around what was happening, I finally got mad and said, "Who are you!?" And as soon as I did the energy began to back off and I could feel it peeling itself off of me and moving away. I couldn't sleep for weeks without being scared I was going to invite it back somehow. I guess I'm wondering what your take on incubus' are? Some say they are demons, and some say it's the person's own mind creating the experience. What is your opinion on this?
Then, about a month later (three weeks ago), I left for Barcelona. Last week, I went out to a massive night club crammed with people at every inch. I was with friends, but then went to the bar to get a drink and met a guy who I really liked. 
Instantly I felt like we were really good friends, I'd been traveling for 10 months and to be honest, I hadn't met anybody until him that I felt like I could completely be myself around. He lived in the town next to mine, quite a bit outside of Barcelona so we decided to hang out and he could take me home later. Long story short, I was already pretty drunk but I can take my alcohol well, we get back to his place with one other friend of his, we take one shot of jaeger and half a beer and I black out. Before I blacked out I remember coming onto him and him being a gentleman about it and saying no. Then seconds later I can barely stand up straight and I remember going to his room. I vaguely remember my underwear coming off. And after I remember him doing his best to walk me to the street, setting me down at some random doorstep, and maybe telling me he will be right back. I regained consciousness at 8 or 9am sitting out on some random doorstep on a busy street in broad daylight, missing my underwear, and my phone, but had no bruises and it didn't feel like I had sex (maybe a small dick?). I've tried to rationalize the situation and think about every possibility. Did I regain consciousness and leave before he got back? Did I really just get that drunk? Did I invite this?
Barcelona is known for people crafting elaborate scenarios and manipulating you to steal your shit. Was this the same, but taken to the next level to satisfy someone's crazy sexual need? This guy got into my head, Dan. There were two things that should have gotten my attention that make me think that this was a con. One, he shared his drink with me at the club, maybe to gain my trust? Two, when we were leaving I told him I had to go tell my friend that I'm leaving and he didn't want me to. I thought it was because he didn't want to lose me, but looking back it was probably because he didn't want anyone to know where I was going. I've never felt to conned in my life, Dan.
No matter what way I think about it I still have no idea what happened, and I probably never will. How do I deal with this? 
I have listened to your show and read your column for many years. I like that you cut to the chase. My husband and I have been married for fifteen years and have three children. Our twelve year old suffers form a chronic medical condition which requires me to be a full time caregiver and homeschooler.
I will do my best to sum up how I became a CPS and how I have attempted to move on with our lives. My husband and I had an amazing sex life—up and until our wedding night. Afterwards, he was unable to perform sexually. I begged and pleaded for him to get some help either with an MD or a shrink or both. He refused. Seven years into a totally sexless marriage, I became close friends with a college buddy of his. Lots of common interests. We also shared a common wound: we were both in sexless marriages. I tried, cried, and begged my husband to get some help because I could not stay in a marriage with no sex. Long story short, his friend and I started out with casual outings to book stores. (We're both big readers.) We soon had our inside jokes. I tried to warn my husband at one point about how this relationship was spiraling out of control. Husband shook it off assuring me that his friend would never do anything improper. 
His friend became physically affectionate and I found myself falling head over heels for the guy. The attraction was dynamite.
One weekend, we spent the night at the guy's house with his wife. She had to be up at 5 a.m. and left us to a night of heavy drinking. My husband passed out in the guest room and the friend and I started groping. The next thing I knew my husband was pulling me off of his friend. He asked what the hell we were doing and I was so drunk I told him I wasn't really sure. The next day we had to travel to for his sister's wedding. A tense situation to say the least. He ranted and railed at me for the entire twelve-hour drive. He threatened to kill himself, to kill his friend, to destroy both of us in the community. I took the blame and promised to end it. Which I did. I had developed emotional feelings as well as sexual feelings for the friend. I never told him that. My husband wanted to sweep it under the rug and move on. There were signs he was handling it poorly. He became an alcoholic. He would become angry and verbally abusive. I felt like I deserved it. He would continue to ask me for nitty gritty details and I began to evade his questions because the more I told him, the more enraged he became.
We had been trying to have children for many, many years and had been unsuccessful. As soon as I became pregnant, this barely consummated affair seemed to be water under the bridge. That is, until the guy's wife found out we were having a baby and mailed us a gift. My husband was enraged again and decided to call her and tell her the truth about her husband. I begged him not to do it. He told me that I wanted him to suffer in silence. I became pregnant with our twins five months later. We now had three babies who required everything we had.
My husband I attempted to go to counseling and it basically came down to this: either my husband has to accept his part in this tragedy or we had to divorce and move on. Due to ages of our children, we decided to sweep it under the rug and move onwards. At this point I was gravely inured in an accident and needed 24/7 nursing care for months. During my convalescense, my husband refused to engage in sexual contact with me. I met a man online through a porno site and we had cybersex. It was a great release for me. When the guy expressed romantic feelings, I ended it. It turned out my husband had placed tracking software on my computer and saw our messages. More rage.
Jump ahead several years. My husband and I went though extensive counseling and I thought things were ok. Now, seven years later, he has started having flashbacks and nightmares. He is inconsolable. He was so sure that I was lying to him that he contacted our former friend for all the details. My former friend made it sound like it was all my fault. He said I was the sexual aggressor. Now my husband says the scab has been ripped off, that he always knew I was a liar, and that he doesn't know what to do now.
Having a special needs child with critical health problems means all hands on deck. I have tried everything I can to get my husband to understand that I have been faithful to him through this time and WHY I was unfaithful to him. He wants to go back to couples counseling. I am fine with it as long as he understands the circumstances that led me to stray in the first place.
Dan, I am really lost. I will stay for the kids. I am bound and determined to care for them. My question is: can he get past this?
I am married and have a simple question: Is phone sex and webcam sex considered cheating on my spouse or is it not because the other person is not actually physically present? 
I’m a straight woman in my late 20s and I have a problem and it’s your fault.
Let me back up. I feel great about sex—conceptually, personally, interpersonally, in practice, all of it. This is largely your doing, as I’ve been reading your column for almost 15 years and your perspective was integral in helping me avoid the hang-up landmines that littered my religious upbringing. In fact, the only residue of religious judginess that stuck around as an adult was a sense of getting away with something illicit... which I like!
Here’s the issue: I am so well-adjusted that it’s hurting my otherwise fantastic sex life. I just don’t feel like there’s anything naughty about having sex anymore; sans the cultural baggage, anything one does in the bedroom is just consenting adults making each other feel great. Which is wonderful, but what’s dirty (in the good way) about that? Even the sense of “getting away with it” is gone since the boyfriend and I live in our own place and no longer have to fuck on the sly to avoid scandalizing our respective roommates.
How do I get that feeling back? Please don’t tell me we should bang in public, we already do that sometimes and it’s great fun but hasn’t done the trick.
Remember this guy from earlier this morning?

I wrote him back. Our long email exchange... after the jump.
You are a disgusting piece of shit! I am and forever conservative who believes in GOD! I am against all you fucking faggots and I will continue to destroy everything you try to create. I will fight you and your fag agenda forever! Come down my street you fudge packing coward. You won't because you are scared, you are a spineless, sick, repugnant and disgusting piece of shit. You will NOT win, you and all the other fags & dikes will lose and you will lose in a huge way. Eternity in hell will be a wonderful place for you!—Originally posted on November 11, 2012. 
I am a 22-year-old straight female. I used to babysit for a wealthy family, but their children have outgrown babysitters. The dad of this family is very into martial arts/fighting and has invited me over several times for "self-defense training." I have accepted his invitations a few times, and it has always started off as a normal workout in their home gym-treadmill, weights, swimming laps-but he is always pretty anxious to get to the self-defense part. Often he will blindfold me and then come at me, and I must then wrestle my way out of the situation using the moves I've learned.
I did this a few times, Dan, but I found it a bit unsettling. However, he never touched me inappropriately. Last time we did this, he told me he wanted to see how much pain he could take. He asked me to kick him in the groin with no protection until he couldn't take it anymore. I thought, "This is strange," but I was curious, so I did it. He was able to take it for a surprisingly long time. I haven't been back since, but for the last six months, he has been pestering me to come back. Recently, he suggested that we have what he calls a "competition." He will stand there, and I will kick him in the balls-or anywhere else I want-and if he gives up, I get $150. If I give up, by getting too tired, I give him $20. His wife knows about the workouts, but he said he doesn't want me to tell her about the fighting.
My question is this: Is there a sexual component to this? I have never heard of anything like this before, and I find it odd. But I am a poor college student, and for $150, I'll stand there fully clothed and kick this guy in the balls! Please let me know your thoughts.
Originally posted on December 19, 2012.
This is a touchy and gross subject. I am a 17-year-old girl growing up in an adoptive family in Australia. I was sexually abused by my birth family, and I think it really fucked up my sexuality. The only thing that gets me off is the idea of people absolutely destroying their lives for an orgasm. I started with mild S&M; stories and then moved on to grosser stuff like murder (stories and online images), pedo (stories only), and lately I've been thinking about my (adoptive) parents. The thing is, it doesn't have to be a particular category. As long as it's the most vile thing I can think of, it will get me off. There isn't a pattern as far as gender, age, or relationship to the people I am fantasizing about; it just has to be horrible, the kind of thing that would destroy you in real life. These fantasies alone are scary enough, but because they are literally the only things that get me off, I can't even really tell if I'm attracted to boys or girls or none of the above. I'm scared to talk to a counselor about this because I don't want to freak my parents out. I mean, I've got my quirks, but overall I seem like a pretty healthy kid, and I try not to worry them. I don't expect you to solve this problem via your column, but do you have any ideas for how I could get help with this without messing up my family?
Originally posted on January 22, 2014.
I'm 45, female, and married to a smart, funny, intelligent 50-year-old man. We've been together nine years, married seven. The sex was good for the first year and then dropped off to nothing. He says, "I've had plenty of sex in my life. I'm just not interested anymore." During my first marriage, the sex was so bad that I thought, "If I could find a man who loved to cuddle, I could go the rest of my life without sex." Perfectly describes husband number two! Except now I feel more sexual than I ever have! I've discussed this with my husband endlessly and have mentioned open marriage, but nothing ever comes of it. I'm not an instigator, although I have tried a few times and have been rejected. Yes, he has had his testosterone checked. It's normal. Not even going to a therapist helped. What do I do? He's a great guy, he loves me and my grown kids unconditionally, but we are more friends/roommates than husband and wife. We have a safe, comfortable life, but I'm too young to go without that for the rest of my life!
Originally posted on February 19, 2014.
I am a straight 19-year-old girl in college. I broke up with my boyfriend of several months a week before Valentine's Day (a WHOLE nother situation), and during that relationship, I met this other guy, one of his friends. This friend has been in a relationship for 2.5 years. But his girlfriend cheated on him, and now he has a free card to go fuck someone else. He wants that person to be me! We have fooled around some, but even though I am not looking for a relationship right now, I have reservations about fucking someone who is in a relationship, even if it's on a Go Fuck Someone Else card. Advice?
Originally posted on October 30, 2013.
I'm a youth who identifies as asexual. That isn't my question. I was born female, and I've been binding for a while and identify as gender-neutral. But I'm afraid to tell others that I'm gender-neutral for fear of being told I'm wrong because I wear dresses. Does wearing skirts and dresses mean I'm not gender-neutral? I just think I look better in dresses than flannel.
Gender-
 I screwed up. Here’s the deal, though. I have been dating a great guy for FIVE years now, but we have ALWAYS been long distance. 2,000 miles. Some months we don’t even see each other. That means no sex and I am not the best at taking care of my own needs. He has zero desire to move to be with me and because I have children and am a single mom, I can’t move to his city. For the last year he has been unemployed, but still with means, and he STILL didn’t decide to come my way. It left me feeling undesirable and depressed. Frustrated. Lonely. Like I take antidepressants now. I'm talking serious depression. Suicidal, overwhelming-thoughts-depression. Sooo….
I decided to do something secret to boost my self esteem. I wanted to experiment in loving myself, loving my body, and feeling desired. I started a private Instagram account and posted sexy photos of myself. None with my full face. Very artsy. Beautiful. I got some attention. It felt GREAT, but then my boyfriend found out about it. Now he says I'm not the person he thought I was and that I have completely shattered his trust. The thing is, I had stopped feeling bad about not getting attention from him because I was getting that through comments on Instagram. It wasn’t like I was sexting these people.I wasn’t emotionally involved with them. I didn’t meet any of them. AND I only had 15 followers!!! I was just being a muse and if I am honest, I loved it. It made me feel sexy, beautiful, and desired. He makes me feel lonely and like I am not good enough to choose to spend his life with. What should I do? DTMFA? I have invested FIVE years in this relationship. My children adore this man (when they get to see him). Was it really such a big deal that I got some needs met by posting some sexy photos? I get that I should have discussed it with him first, but is it ever ok to keep something private?
I need your advice and I need it NOW. Please, please, please. He is coming into town in two days and I really don’t know if I should grovel for forgiveness or be angry.
Originally posted on February 12, 2014.
I am an 18-year-old pansexual girl. I'm currently in a relationship with a guy. He is a bit younger, though mature for his age. We get along great, our friends like us together, yada yada. He wants to do the waiting until marriage thing for religious reasons, which I mostly agree with. We met in youth group, after all. Here is the kink. I lost the big V a year ago. He knows, isn't happy about it, but is willing to date me anyway.
What hasn't come up is the subject of porn and masturbation. He doesn't do either (or won't fess up to them) and doesn't approve. I, however, do both. Especially since my breakup (and thus no more sex) last year, I've come to rely on masturbating to take care of my sexual needs. The porn I am willing to forgo, but I don't want to give up pleasuring myself. This guy knows nothing. He has talked about how we ought to "keep ourselves pure." (My thoughts on purity: I've already screwed that up!) Is there any good way to communicate to him that I'm not going to give up masturbating without him going crazy? It took long enough just to show him I wasn't the spawn of Satan because I like girls as much as I like guys. Should I go along with his standards and try giving up masturbation? Or should I not tell him anything about what I do in the privacy of my own bedroom?
Originally posted on February 5, 2014
I'm a 30-year-old straight guy 18 months into a relationship with a 30-year-old bi woman. We get along wonderfully and fuck wonderfully. Have you ever tried to see who can out-rim whom? Fun stuff. We want a life together. The snag is that she has a certain dedication to Catholicism and wants us to marry. I'm agnostic on God, but I don't care at all for his earthly representatives; the idea of a priest giving me permission to kiss her is repellent. A secular courthouse wedding isn't much more appealing. I know that a marriage license doesn't automatically come with a dead bedroom, but it seems utterly unnecessary. It's also a binary sort of thing, and thus our go-to solution when we have a conflict—compromise—doesn't work here. I suggested flipping a coin as a sort of probabilistic compromise. She wasn't interested. Breaking up over the details of your future life together seems like a dumb thing for two smart people in love to do, but that's the outcome we're inexorably moving toward.
Originally posted on January 22, 2014. 
Five years ago, my wife and I decided to pursue her MFM threesome fantasy. Part of her fantasy was that the other chap have a BBC (big black cock), so we advertised and met this great guy who we've seen three times a year ever since. He is nice and open-minded, and we've become so comfortable with our BBC that we meet at our home now instead of a hotel. So there are respectful and safe people out there to be found! The issue I'm writing about is a problem with me. After our BBC ejaculates in my wife—everyone is tested and free of STIs—I enjoy going down on her, he enjoys watching me go down on her, and she enjoys having me lick the interloper's come from her pussy. That isn't the problem. The problem arises when our BBC isn't in the picture. We enjoy talking about our dirty threesomes, and we both talk about how hot it will be when I go down on her after I've unloaded in her myself. Unfortunately, once I've made my deposit, I have zero desire to go down on her. It's like someone flips a switch in my brain and something I couldn't wait to do is suddenly repulsive to me. This problem doesn't arise in our threesomes because our BBC always comes before I do. What is my issue? Is there a fix?
Can't Really Eat All My Pecker's Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
Vanilla straight guy here. As a fellow Washingtonian, I feel proud to live in a state that was among the first to legalize marriage equality by a popular majority vote of the people. I avidly follow the NFL and eat fried bologna sandwiches and do lots of other manly things. However, I have always loved musical theater. Whenever I go to New York, I have to see at least two or three big shows. My question: Is it socially acceptable for me to good-naturedly say, "I'm totally gay for musical theater"? Or is it a slur that I shouldn't say, no matter how playful or well-intended?
Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
I've recently discovered that I am a panty sniffer. Though since I'm a gay man, maybe I'm a briefs breather? The smell gets me hard and gets me off. I discovered this when a fuck buddy left his shorts behind, and for the next few days I jerked off sniffing his shorts. That brings me to the young millennial techie guys at my work. They are fucking slobs, and they're always leaving their underwear and socks on the floor of the company's gym in our office. The janitor picks them up and puts them in a lost-and-found bin. I started checking the bin, and nothing was being removed. No one ever claimed their shorts. So I started taking a pair every now and then. At home, I fantasize about who they belong to, and when I'm done with them, I just toss them. First question: Am I stealing? I assume the guys aren't missing them, since they've been in the bin for a week or more. Second question: Have I become one of those perverted panty sniffers from those old Chester the Molester comics?
I'm a man and I just slept with Marco Rubio. Marco didn't say a word the whole time and he hardly looked at me—and he was all thumbs.
Want the details?
I was flying Miami-LAX, and I noticed my generic-looking businessman seat-mate was busy on his phone, so I didn't pay much attention, and didn't do my usual introduction saying it was ok to tap me awake or jump over whenever he wanted to get out. Then the wheels started clicking and I realized is was Marco Rubio, one of the seventeen republican candidates for president! The guy being touted as a top tier candidate/potential nominee if/when the GOP get tired of being Trump'd.
He didn't say a word the whole flight. Initially taking a nap (me too), then not eating his breakfast or having anything to drink (is that why he's so famously parched?), until he asked for coffee when he woke up. Then he got out his iPad and started working it rapidly with his thumbs, going thru what appeared to be sports & political sites, including Drudge Report.
My question: Should I have engaged him? And, if so, what should I have said? My impression is that he's a Knows Better/Doesn't Do Better type (he must know that climate change is for real, that we needed to end the ridiculous embargo of Cuba, that same-sex marriage isn't a threat), so "educating" him is of little value. So should I have said something? Engaged or not?
Our son, who is almost 30 years old, was married four years ago. He just shared with us that for the last three years he and his wife have been practicing polyamory. They are committed to their relationship, but have each had relationships with both men and women over the last three years. We are trying to get our heads around this, as we come from a more traditional background (we've been married 40 years in a loving and respectful relationship), and we find ourselves feeling very sad. We are accepting and non-judgmental, just trying to understand how he came to this decision. He feels that to make love "finite," to love only one person, is "not being true" and that this kind of relationship prevents dishonesty and is based on truth. He also shared that his wife was the first one to broach this idea three years ago and after many long and deep conversations he eventually overcame his jealousy and now is embracing this practice. They do not have children and do not plan to ever have children.  Any guidance you can provide to us would be greatly appreciated.  
I greatly admire you and your work, and thank you for all of the caring guidance you have provided over the years.
So here's a relationshipish question about remaining friends with your ex following a break up.
My ex dumped me about six months ago. We ended in a long distance scenario and remain that way now, and will remain that way for the foreseeable future. We don't really have any mutual friends. Due to the distance, there isn't a chance that we'll really run into each other again unless something is otherwise planned. Essentially, us seeing each other in social situations or something is not likely.
I've reached out to friends about this, and other more experienced people with mixed results. Some say it's time to move on. Others say that just because you don't love each other romantically anymore, it would be unforunate to throw away somebody you cared about and loved a lot. Importantly, our relationship did not end well. It ended horribly actually. And it was horrible for the last nine months of it. The longer we dated the more we grew apart and the less I liked her as a person. I was forcing myself to be somebody who I wasn't so that I could cater to her needs while neglecting my own. I was an absolute prick to her and treated her like shit as a consequence. And all this was happening simultaneously with my job in the Army crumbling in front of me. Needless to say it was a dark time that I did not enjoy.
However! I get out of the Army in three months, I will be moving to Oregon from the shithole of Tennessee, and I will be spending my time traveling and fucking around. All the things I missed out on doing in my twenties. I am very happy with where my life is at right now. But is it worth trying to salvage a friendship? I am trying to move on from that chapter in my life and take with me all the lessons learned, but at the same time I do have a lot of very fond memories of my ex and I don't want to throw them away.
A Relationship's Background: an early-twenty-something cousin of mine came out to me over a meal a few months ago. The discomfort around the uncharted territory of coming out was apparent in both our behaviours. I think his exact words were, “Oh, so… I’m very gay.” It was all sort of nonchalant and in the same tone as, “Oh, so… I’m switching majors.” He gave me no time to sense what he might be about to share with me, Dan, so it completely blindsided me. So the first thing I said was, “I know!”, which was stupid! (But I also did know, and had suspected for many years.) I went on to express what I hope was genuine happiness to hear the news. I think I did all the right things through the rest of our meal including listening a lot.
Thinking back on the moment over the last few months though, I felt strongly that I’d said the wrong thing at first and wished that it had turned out better. He was away all summer on vacation, and we just got together the other night. He told me that he felt I’d said the wrong thing, too. I apologised and said that it was great news and I was happy he told me. But I was definitely sad that he felt I’d said the wrong thing, because it’s an incredibly vulnerable moment and you should be able to expect graceful support from your family.
I’m wondering what your take on it is. If you could come out all over again, what would you want to hear from the people you came out to?

Nice week we're having. FBI investigations, terrorism,  teachers sleeping with their students. Looking on the bright side... Senate Democrats may have located their spines, blowjob cafes are coming, HUMP! 2017 is on and wannabe porn stars and other creative types can check out the Call For Submissions here—and ITMFA gear is hotter than ever (new merch)! Also this week: lots tons of fantastic and/or odd feedback from readers. So, getting to it...
First, some responses to Washington Kinkster Wondering:
A long time admirer here. BUT… one of the worst things about the current Islamophobia is that any random old Muslim is taken by journalists (ahem) as an “expert” because their name is Aisha or Ahmad.
It’s true that, under the influence of Victorian-era colonialism Muslims tightened their sphincters (in all senses) in the 19th-century. Reading somebody like Mawdudi, a very influential Muslim activist of the 20th century, is like reading some clenched English parson from the 1850s. Ugh. But was totally at odds with Islamicate cultural history. If you look at the millennium and a half of Islamicate culture you’ll find that Islam has been the least sex-antipathetic of the Abrahamic religions. The straightforward Islamic attitude to sex formed one of the core points of Christian polemics against Islam, in fact.
Both religiously and culturally you’ll find that Islamdom was a lot more fun than anywhere in Christendom. Islam is/was patriarchal and often misogynist, but every pre-modern religion was, for the post part. But in terms of “Is sex good; should you have fun” Islam was BY FAR the most open of the so-called Abrahamic religions.
Your expert can report on HER experience, but to generalize about the most widely-spread of the world religions, over 1500 years, from HER experience, is, well, kinda dumb. For the best account of sex NOW in parts of the Arab world, read “Sex and the Citadel” by Shereen al-Feki (sexandthecitadel.com). It’s not a pretty picture, but at least it’s reliable and data-based.
 In your column today answering a question about Islam and kink, you included Judaism in a list of "sex-negative" religions.  Jewish people celebrate how sex-positive our religion is. The Talmud, a compilation from the first few centuries after Jesus, contains earthy jokes and stories about sex, including comparing penis size, and the story of a man who hid under the bed of his teacher while his teacher was having sex, saying, "This too is Torah, and I want to learn." The ancient rabbis permitted a range of different sexual positions, including oral, and considered foreplay and pleasure a woman’s right and a man’s responsibility. Sex on Shabbat is still considered especially necessary, and according to Kabbalah, is a way to bring together feminine and masculine aspects of the divine and the divine with humankind. Because Christianity and Judaism share some of the same source texts, sometimes people lump them together. But the sin of Sodom and Gomorrah, according to the rabbis, was inhospitality to strangers and a lack of acceptance of diverse bodies. 
The tradition is very heteronormative, which is different from sex-negative in my view. And the Jewish acceptance of pleasure, the lack of shame, the allowing and celebration of questioning, and the emphasis on social justice have led to early modernity and modern Jews being in the forefront of queer liberation.
In response to a question on Savage Lovecast Episode 542 about finding liberal friends, support, and sanity in a dark red chunk of an otherwise blue state...
I wanted to reach out in response to the guy living in a conservative area after living in Seattle, hopefully with some recommendations. I live in a red region of Illinois, and the day after Trump was elected I was immediately invited into multiple Facebook "support groups" from fellow liberal friends where we share links, talk through issues, and plan marches and social events. I bet there is a community similar to this taking place in private right now where he lives. Most of these are secret groups and require an invite, so the struggle is finding those people that can extend the invite. I mostly know these acquaintances from many other (probably stereotypical) liberal activities such as (but not limited to) grocery co-ops, bike advocacy or social bike rides, community gardening, art gallery openings, local democratic offices and their volunteers, farmers markets, indy newspapers or magazines (within reason), university/college events and lectures, gay bars, that-small-but-kind-of-fancy-dark-bar-that-doesn't-have-thirteen-tvs, your local Black Lives Matter group (if applicable), your local Planned Parenthood (if applicable), hippy coffee shops, etc. 
I don't mean to paint these places or people with a broad brush or assume that every city has ALL these things, but attending events hosted by or at them will increase his likelihood of finding people closer to his political/social leanings, and maybe get a hook into something more regular that can sustain his inner fight. Few Trumpeters are going anywhere near these places. 
Some pushback to the unhinged (but sometimes hilarious) hate that was directed my way after I criticized Melania Trump on the Savage Lovecast...
I am writing to you after listening to episode 542. A little background: I met your voice in 2000 in the SF weekly. I am from the UK, married a San Franciscan.  Back then you made many a dull bus ride bearable (Im sure thats what you were concerned about). I now write to you while living on a hillside in Camogli, Liguria in Italy. Your Savage Lovecast is part of my weekly routine and your voice has been a part of my life for 17 years (longer than my marriage).
I was disheartened to hear the negative comments directed at you from your last episode and I just wanted to provide you with the entirely opposite kind of feedback. I know you are strong and smart enough to not let any of these unintelligent criticisms get to you, but it is still all so unnecessary to have to listen to that bullshit. Anyway, I send you support and admiration and please continue doing what you do. Please know that from a remote hillside in Italy you have so much love and support. If the bigots ever get too much, let me know, you are welcome to use my villa for an escape vacation.
A listener persuasively argues that my response to a caller on this week's Savage Lovecast wasn't helpful...
I agree with your advice 99.9% of the time—but your response to the lady whose father has been communicating with Russian "mail order brides" was wrong, wrong, dangerously wrong! These are professional scams run by organized crime in Russia. These schemes are NOT the equivalent of sex commerce as you supposed—there is never any payoff, either sexual or marital. Older Western men are lured, wooed, endlessly led on, and bilked of as much money as can be pried out of their wallets. She said he's already spent "thousands" online with these scammers;clearly he is naive. If he goes to Russia, it will be much, much worse. She should intervene forcefully and immediately before his bank accounts are drained. All of this information is easily found in numerous credible stories, online and in the mainstream media.
And, finally, this...
Dear Dan,
I have a beautiful penis.
Sincerely,
I'm home for the summer from college and will go back in a few weeks. I have two little sisters and an older brother who lives across the country. I've always thought my parents had a great marriage, but last week I came home to find my dad tossing my mom around the living room. He found her email address on Ashley Madison, confronted her, learned about affairs, and went berserk. My dad has never been a violent man and has always been in control of his temper. But what I saw last week terrified me. I found a hole in the wall at about the height of my mom's head and the shattered remains of a heavy glass ornament, too, and think he threw something at her before I returned. My parents have both apologized to me for what I saw, and my dad has sworn he will never lose his temper like that again. By some miracle, my mom doesn't have any injuries, and I guess they want me to be okay with what happened because of that.
But I don't think I will ever look at my dad the same again. I don't care what my mom did—and he's definitely blaming his rage fest on her infidelity—because what my dad did was, to me, unforgivable. I'm the only kid who was home at the time, and I have been sworn to secrecy. It's eating me up inside, and I'm scared to go back to college because of what might happen when I'm gone. My parents don't want to talk to me about it, and I'm at a loss as to what to do. 
I have a question. I'm half-Mexican, 40's, gay, and male. In my youth I was a weak nerd who was made fun of by jocks—and now I am very attracted to young white straightish jocks. So much so that they're all I go for. And when I find one that lets me have sex with them? It feels amazing, like incredibly fulfilling, I feel so special that he's letting me into his bodies and his realm. I'm only in for the short term, obviously, and so this is only briefly fulfilling. My adult sex life has been a cycle of finding these guys and I'm really only turned on by this one type. Do you think this cycle can be broken? If I maybe learned to "love myself" and no longer needed the attention of these guys to feel good—maybe I could broaden my spectrum of attraction? Or is it pretty hard "coded" at this point? Obviously this is going nowhere.
I've been married to my husband for one month now, though we've been a couple almost six years. We are in the process of moving and I've stayed behind to pack up, while he's looking for apartments in our new city. We agreed that I should go through our old iPhones and get any pics off of them and just toss them, or try to sell them. Well I found no pics on his, but I did snoop on his email to find out if he had pay stubs in there and saw a folder called "work." I opened it and found on four separate emails to himself of four different pics of his old co-worker, and she's posing naked in all of them. They were dated two years ago—about 4 months before he proposed to me! Needless to say it felt like a punch in the gut. 
I immediately confronted him. At first he couldn't be honest with me. He admitted that he had the pictures, but thought he deleted them a long time ago. He played the blame game a bit, saying we were in a rough spot in our relationship and we weren't having much sex and that he wasn't sure where we were going at the time. I believe that he did delete them from his new phone, but the old phone still has that folder.
Long story short, after a few days of crying and many interrogations, he came clean about the whole thing. It only lasted a couple of weeks. It started out as innocent flirting and it escalated to sexting. In the heat of the moment he emailed her pics to himself and deleted them from his phone. He said he thought he got them out of his email box. He never made it clear to this girl that he made a mistake and he has continued to be friendly with her since. He said the mistake made him realize that he really needed to decide if I was what he really wanted in life, and he obviously felt I was because he proposed to me a few months later.
We have always been very open with each other and try to stay creative and spice things up. We regularly listen to sex podcasts and read books, articles and talk about what we learned from them.  Ultimately I feel that he cheated on me and completely disrespected me by lying about it. But I also knew that I had to find out why he did this—what did he get from her that he couldn't have gotten from me? And why did he choose not to tell me? And moreover, why didn't he cut ties with her?
I have decided to try to work this out with him. He has admitted to having a lot of issues. He said he didn't cut ties with her because he has huge insecurities about what other people think about him and he didn't want her to "not like him." He said he felt he could sext with her, and be open with her, at the time, because he didn't care what she thought because he didn't really know her and felt safe doing that with her. And when it was all said and done he felt so much shame that he buried it, and basically pretended it never happened. Finally, he insists that there were no physical acts between them. I believe he is remorseful. He cries every time we talk—and I have only seen this man cry once in six years. But I'm worried that I won't be able to get over this. That it will eat me up inside.
I just want to know what your thoughts are on our situation. 1. Do you think he should be forgiven? 2. How can we recover from this if he is? 3. What are your thoughts about his sexting relationship? 4. Do you think this was cheating? 
We have been together a long time now, but our marriage is still young, and I'd hate to see the last six years go down the drain. Help!
I'm coming to you because your sage advice makes me trust that you can help me out.
I'm a straightish, pregnant 33-year-old in Colorado. I've been married for two years and with my husband for six. Here's my dilemma/issue: my husband and I seem to have very different ideas about male/female friendship boundaries. I will be the first to admit that one of my prices of admission is my jealousy. My husband has used this as justification for lying about female friendships he's had in the past, which, as I'm sure you can imagine, did nothing to help my jealousy. He now has a new 22-year-old friend—a girl from work—and I'm struggling. After the previous incidents I alluded to before, one of the things I'm allowed to do is check his text messages if I feel so inclined. (I know you're rolling your eyes, Dan, but please stay with me.) This 22-year-old has made me inclined.
Nothing they have talked about is so extreme that it has me confronting him immediately, Dan, but I am still VERY uncomfortable with the subject matter. For example, her talking about doing homework naked and him asking "for his friend Jordan" if she likes guys who wear women's underwear, which is actually something we enjoy together. (And when she said she thought it was gross he agreed—what a turd!) Now that I am pregnant, I am feeling like the stakes are even higher and finding these messages has me questioning if I can accept this blurring of boundaries as my husband's price of admission. Should I just write this off as my husband being pathetic or should I confront him? This seems like a very slippery slope to me but my husband probably won't see it that way. I could wrap my head around forgiveness for cheating if we had been together for over a decade, but if it were to happen only two years in, we would be done.
I'm trying really hard not to be crazy pregnant lady, but please feel free to set me straight if I am. 
I'm sure you get a lot of these messages, but I just have to thank you for the work that you do. When my husband and I got married five years ago, we had already discussed things like "What happens if one of us cheats?" which we knew to talk about thanks to reading your column regularly. We frequently revisit the idea of opening up our marriage, though we haven't done it yet. And you know what? We might never do it. But being able to talk about it and be honest about meeting each other's needs (or not) has been a lifesaver to our marriage.
This week my husband approached me to let me know that he had a free profile on Ashley Madison. I would have never searched for his information, but he wanted me to know just in case. He said it fell under our "don't ask, don't tell" rules regarding flirting with other people and porn use. And even though I was initially kind of hurt, I agree with him. I can't overstate how thankful I am to have this kind of open communication with my husband about our sex life.
Oh, and we were both raised in super conservative households and consider ourselves Christians. I have a better sex life than any of my friends, too. THANK YOU!
Originally posted on January 30, 2013.
I recently caught my boyfriend watching porn. We have talked about it before, and he said he didn't watch it while he was in a relationship. But when I caught him there with his dick in his hand, I lost it. I have never felt so hurt or betrayed. This is my first serious relationship. I can't get over how sick and sad I feel. It feels like he was cheating on me. Should I be as upset as I am? It was interactive porn—it was like he was cybersexing with one of his ex-girlfriends. What should I do?
Here’s my situation: I’m 27, straight, and female (and GGG, or trying to be anyway), and I’ve been with my partner, male, for six years. A little over a year ago he came out to me as bisexual. To keep a long story as short as possible: We got through it (part of getting through it meant that I went to counseling, and it was one of the best things I ever did), we have had a few threesomes (with other men), and after the first one—at least—when everything was fresh and new and reinvigorated we both felt that it had brought us closer together as a couple, and as people who love each other, and who are committed (but monogamish!).
In addition to navigating all that, we have been living long distance for about a year and a half now. We manage to visit each other every 3-5 weeks. I cope with this pretty well (I’m completing a PhD, and I like my space) but he hasn’t coped quite so well. In recent months, his tendency to guilt trip me about being where I am, and having made the choices I have, has really had an impact on my happiness. Things got really bad, to the point where I almost ended it. We managed to pull up our bootstraps though, and so far things seem to have improved.  
My main issue is this: Where I once was more or less 100% sure he was "the one," over the last year and a half, after rebuilding the level of trust several times (threesomes can be tricky), and having some disagreements about the future (I’m not so keen on marriage, and am pretty ambiguous about kids—he wants both), I am, shall we say, less than 100% sure he is the one I want to build my future with. That’s hard for me to say, because I love him dearly and passionately. But, among other things, I don’t think threesomes are in my future long-term. I’ve read all the books and still can’t shake the feeling of being less-than or not-enough completely. (I don’t think I want to feel this way, even off and on, forever, you know?) I sometimes feel like I’m just not cut out to deal with THIS particular set of problems. I hope that doesn’t make me sound shallow—I have exhausted myself over this for over a year (working at it, communicating, reflecting, going for it, etc)
So, do I tell him this? Do I disrupt the harmony, shake the boat, and let him know that I’m just not sure anymore? That week-to-week is pretty much as far ahead as I can look? Or, do I just go with it, (potentially wasting more time in this relationship) and wait until I know for sure that I want out? Or that I don’t? 
I’m a gay woman in my mid-forties and I would like to know your thoughts on a man in his 50s blurting out to his teenage daughter that the reason he sees and now pays for the boyfriend services of a male escort is because his wife, the young woman's mother, wouldn’t have sex with him.
This heretofore straight married man is my best friend's husband. He and my friend had an arrangement—he was free to look elsewhere. They are now finally in the process of divorcing. I’ve always known the man to be quite cold, but he is now totally infatuated with this 30-year-old guy who walks all over him. The whole situation is quite sad and very complicated but I’d really like to arm my friend with some sort of answer for him when this is undoubtedly throws in her face again—that her withholding sex is to blame. The truth is it was a marriage of convenience but that is a whole other story, though his lack of drive when they first got together now makes perfect sense—he is gay! I doubt he will ever say it in front of their daughter again though I’m still sickened by his callousness.
Without going into too much detail... they had separated and moved back in (a misguided decision in my mind) for their daughter's sake. Before the split there was no sex because he didn’t want it and when they moved back in together he all of a sudden said “let’s have sex” and my friend said no. They agreed that he should be able to go outside of the marriage for sex but he took it a step further and introduced this young man as his mentee with the intention of having him welcomed into the family. The rest of the story is so outrageous I’d need hours to do the situation justice.
I’d like to know how you might explain someone who justifies things in such a way. He is very good with his words, thanks to his profession, and my friend not so much. What worries me the most is their daughter but thankfully my friend has taken her to a good therapist.
A This went up really late yesterday—I screwed up the scheduling—so I'm reposting it this morning for those who missed it and because I'm kinda proud of the headline.
This was scheduled to go up at 5:30. Don't know why it didn't—but better late...
I'm a bedwetter and am super embarrassed about it.  My boyfriend knows and I know he doesn't mean to hurt me but he makes jokes about it. He even once saw me wet myself and made a joke. I know I should say something but I'm afraid too.

I have been seeing this guy as a friend with benefits for years. He recently told me that we seemed to be in a relationship. I thought that meant he would make more of an effort to communicate and spend more time with me. We went to a dinner and concert after this discussion. It was late and I ended up getting very tired. I could tell this annoyed him. Instead of telling me, he unilaterally decided he needed a break and then didn't see me for about two weeks. I asked to see him about four days after as I was leaving town for a few days for a weekend but he said he didn't have time—that he had a happy hour and "didn't know what he'd get into after." Then a week later we saw each other on a Saturday, then talked the following week at which point he told me about being annoyed I couldn't keep up and feeling that he needed someone who could keep up with him. When we had the relationship talk he told me that I could ask him for things but then it seemed like he would still be calling the shots. Why is he doing this?
Seeks Insightful Guess, I'm a 35-year-old woman married to a 50-year-old man. We have been married for three years, together for seven, and have a 18-month-old child. I recently discovered that my husband has slept with at least six other women in the last five years. He seems to be a compulsive liar and serial cheater, and my question to you is whether he can ever really change. 
The backstory is that we met when he was still married to his now-ex wife (they have two older children together). He told me they were essentially separated (living in different bedrooms) though I no longer know if I believe this. We had a fun whirlwind sexcapade affair in hotels around the country. We both traveled a lot for work, and attended a lot of the same conferences and work events. After he got divorced, we moved in together, and had a good relationship for a number of years. We got engaged, got married, etc. Shortly after our wedding, he started acting weird, staying out late with his 23-year-old assistant, etc. I confronted him and asked if he was sleeping with her, and he looked me in the eye and told me No. I chose to believe him, but we ended up separating for six months to see if being together was what we wanted. I wanted to be married, have a baby, buy a house, the whole suburban dream. We dated while separated and ended up getting pregnant, mostly on purpose. We bought the house, and have been living mostly happy for a few years.
I've always harbored some suspicions about what really went on with the 23-year-old assistant—knowing that if he did it WITH me, he would likely do it TO me, "once a cheater, always a cheater," etc. He confessed to having an affair with another woman before me while still married to his ex-wife, so I knew I wasn't the only one. A few months ago I found some text messages on his phone to the 23yo that were suspicious, but not damning. But I am a trusting person and chose to believe him. 
Before deciding whether to have a second child, I had to just know if I was really just being jealous and paranoid, or whether he was truthful, so I looked at his personal email. His email was littered with very explicit photos and emails to a handful of women throughout the past five years, including the six months where we were separated and he was actively trying to get back together with me. When confronted, he admitted to the four women in the emails, but didn't tell me about the other two, which I found out later. He had a chance to be honest and didn't take it. 
Turns out I was right about the 23yo—they had a 2.5 year affair that lasted through our engagement, wedding, pregnancy up until when our child was born. He also had an ongoing affair of multiple years with another colleague, and a number of one-/multiple-night stands with other women. The affair with the 23yo bothers me most of all because 1. he is twice her age, 2. she reports to him at work so it is MAJORLY illegal and put his professional career at risk, 3. she has been my "friend" and come to our house, held our baby, etc., 4. it started before we were married and continued through our wedding (WTF?), 5. he used all the same lines and moves on her that he used to seduce me, and 6. he lied to me when confronted and let me think I was jealous and paranoid. The rest bother me, but not as much as this. 
I don't care that much that he had sex with these women—in fact, I had brought up the possibility of having an open marriage, but he wasn't into it. I'm just really hurt that he lied to me, for so many years, to my face, over and over. I don't know if I can forgive that. 
He is in therapy now, and has been attending Love and Sex Addicts Anonymous meetings (not sure I believe in the "disease" of sex addiction). He desperately wants to make it work, but I am not so sure. For our child's sake, I would rather break up now than when she is older and can understand and be traumatized. I just can't believe that at 50, he is going to all of a sudden change patterns of cheating and lying that he has mastered over the last 25 years. He is a great husband otherwise, kind, caring, stable, smart, etc., he just has some hole in his life that he fills by seducing and sleeping with women so that he can feel attractive and wanted. 
Sorry for the long email. But my heart is broken and I need to know whether I should just do my best to move on and write this guy off (though I have to see him every day of my life due to our having a child together) or whether there is any chance it can work.
So my ex and I were in a relationship for four years beginning when she was 18 and I was 21. About 1.5 years in we became poly for another 1.5 years then we went back to being monogamous. Polyamory wasn't really an issue during that time. Last October we moved into a house together with two of our friends. It turned out to be an extremely stressful situation that did not go well. During the spring my ex became more and more distant and was spending more time away from home. I also knew there was a guy at work she was beginning to have feelings for and she began pressuring me to open up our relationship again. We never saw breaking up as an option. I never wanted to be poly again, but I reluctantly agreed. I should have already saw this as a sign.
For the following month what we had was not really a poly relationship. There was little communication. She was still staying out late most nights of the week and not saying where she was or communicating at all. When questioned about it she would get defensive and say something like "I'm a free woman, I can do what I feel like." My roommates were hurt by the situation because we grew really close early on and then she spent virtually no time with them anymore. We went on vacation for 10 days and upon returning she almost immediately left and disappeared until almost 1 am. I knew what she was doing and was not okay with it. After about a week more of this type of behavior I confronted her and she confessed to having slept with the new guy five times during the time we had returned from vacation. We decided this wasn't working and we needed a break.
For the first few weeks of the break we alternated between trying not to speak with each other and fighting aggressively. I wouldn't talk to her for three days and then I would get several texts of her declarations of love and spiritual connection to me. I'd go about my business and then a few days later she would text me saying "Just saw so-and-so's new apartment and they seemed so happy. I wish that could be us." Basically getting mixed signals. Every time i would speak to her again and try to continue some sort of casual friendship my trust for her would either get betrayed in some way or she would only seem to communicate if she needed something from me. For example, we technically still share the house. I moved back to my parents due to the emotional baggage there, but I'm still paying rent and have yet to move my things out. One day I went back to pick up some clothes and discovered she had essentially moved me out of the house, rearranging our entire bedroom and moving my personal belongings, in addition to taking some of my belongings from my office. I received a message the same day saying "hey I wanted to let you know I paid your part of the internet and electric bills since you no longer live here." It felt like a passive aggressive back stab to me, especially considering at that point we were still "on a break" and hadn't once discussed me moving out permanently. I didn't speak to her for several days after that, opting not to fight about it, but she quickly realized why I wasn't speaking with her and covered up moving everything out as "just trying to be comfortable" and taking my personal stuff (mostly decorative plants) as "wanting to be nice and take care of your plants" (though they're literally a room away). I have a very forgiving and understanding personality so naturally after expressing my views I forgave her and went back to trying to be friends, but in the back of my mind felt like she was still trying to have her cake and eat it too (ie. breaking up with me, getting her own place to live, and getting a brand new FWB, but still having my emotional support and friendship).
This type of pattern basically continued for a month and a half. Her doing something I felt was messed up, her justifying it, me forgiving her and thinking maybe I'm the one who is wrong, and then her doing something I find selfish and inconsiderate again. The nail in the coffin for me was when for about a week she was being extremely nice, almost absurdly. I thought it was odd and felt like she was sucking up to me for unknown reasons, but it seemed like her way of trying to make everything "easier" for me (and perhaps make herself feel more like she's doing the right thing). I found out from my roommate that she had been having the new guy come over in the middle of the night and sleeping in our room (which she previously said she would never do out of courtesy and because it's simply uncomfortable). He swore it to have happened at least three times he was aware of. Naturally, I thought this was not right at all, considering the fact that 1. I still pay for the place, and I'm not paying for someone else to live there and 2. Most of my stuff is still in there. The bed itself is hers, but the bedroom set we split half the price of. and 3. Just as a friend I find it immensely inconsiderate to share a place with your best friend of four years and then disregard that.
I confronted her about the situation and she blatantly lied to both my roommate's and my face. She confessed to it happening once and then later confessed to it happening multiple times. She said she felt awful about it the first time, but I find that hard to believe considering it happened again, and again. After this I decided I just couldn't have this person in my life and told her I was tired of my trust and forgiveness being taken advantage of I could no longer speak to her. I blocked her Facebook and her phone number and it's been about a week since we've spoken. Initially she left me nine voice mails (yes even with a blocked number my phone still gets the voice mails and texts) and was freaking out crying and saying she was going to crash her car. I naturally had to call her and then she basically justified her behavior and just tried to find out "what other people thought of her" the entire time I was on the phone. Later that night she left a letter in my mailbox apologizing for everything and saying "she would do anything if it made me happy, even if that means never talking to you again." A few days later she sent me several texts speaking of "spiritual connection" and how "we HAVE to be together" again. Then nothing since. I have responded to nothing in about a week now.
My questions are...
Am I doing the right thing by cutting contact? Am I right in being extremely angry with and not having any trust in her anymore? Am I right in feeling taken advantage of and used and like she was (unconsciously) doing nothing but attempting to keep me on a leash or am I being overly sensitive?
I feel as if she treated the whole thing like I was just another guy she dated for two months and it's perfectly acceptable to just break up and get on with your life doing whatever you feel like. However, it doesn't make sense to me how one would choose to go about things in that way when they definitely want to continue remaining good friends and they claim to care about and don't want to hurt the other person. Also, just from a moral standpoint I would never have gone about things this way if our roles were reversed.
So what do I do? Should I keep trying to see it from her perspective and forgive her? Or should I just accept that she's selfish and immature and is playing emotional games with me and just cut her out of my life?
This just came in to the group editors email...
Hello editors,
I have been reading Savage Love for over a decade in your publication and will no longer be purchasing it as you have fired Dan Savage. Let me know if you decide to reinstate the only advice column that deals with sex positivity, education and consent in a nation plagued with bullying, shaming and sexual assault.  
Thank you,
I'm a 26-year-old gay guy. I just moved to a new city and started making some friends. Through these friends, I recently met a 45-year-old guy. He's shown a lot of interest in me, and I find him very nice, smart, and funny, and I really enjoy his company. We went out a few times alone but not really on official dates. Now he's on vacation and he keeps texting and checking up on me every few days.
I really like the guy, but I'm struggling with the age difference between us. I've thought about it a lot, and the way I see it is that it might not be a big problem now but it will be in the future if things work out. By the time I'm ready to have kids, he's gonna be almost 60. And chances are he's gonna pass away before I do. I know you never know when these things happen, but the idea scares me. And if things don't work out, I'm worried it would be awkward to hang out together, and I would lose the few friends that I've made so far.
In general, my mind is saying "what's the point of it?" but my heart is saying "try it out, why not." It might be an old problem, but I'm really struggling with it, so I hope you give me your insight. What do you think?
I'm a divorced 45-year-old straight male living in the Bay Area of CA. I have joint custody of my daughter, and I get along well, for the most part, with my ex-wife. I met my GF, who I will call "J," 11 months ago. She lives in rural CA about 140 miles away. She is a 38-year-old single parent as well and she is a stay-at-home mom who lives in a posh house with her parents. She's been trying to create a start-up business from home with her art, but so far has made little progress since we've met. Her ex is a bit of a deadbeat, so I've been helping her finance her business and expenses like her car and clothes for J and her daughter.
From the get-go, things have always been hot for us. It was love at first sight! The sex is INTENSE. We even share the same kinks. We rarely argue, and when we do have differences, we always manage to talk them out without any hurt feelings. I also get along with her parents just fine. They're in their early 60s and healthy.
From the beginning J always told me she wanted to leave the town where she lives because it's very rural and there's nothing there for her in regards to a future. When I presented her the idea of moving into my house in the Bay Area, she was warm to it. She didn't like the house I lived in because my previous GF from two years prior lived with me, and J felt there were too many bad memories in the house. We talked about moving elsewhere. 
About two months ago, to expedite the search for a good house, we agreed that I would give up my current home and I'd airBnB it for a couple of months to save up cash so we could find a great place. Well, it's a couple of months later, and I'm sitting on a pile of cash, and suddenly I was hit with a brick this week. She was on vacation with her mom and daughter last week. On Tuesday she cashed $300 from a blank check I gave her—she says for expenses and back-to-school clothes for her daughter—which was fine. Normally, when I'm working, I'll text her in the morning say the standard "I love you" and count the days before I see her again. And normally I'd get a response. Last week, nothing. I figured bad reception. I received a cold message two days later saying hi and not much more. I can confirm that she did go with her mom and daughter, so I know there was no cheating going on.
When they got back to her parents' house on Saturday, she texted me she had a headache and she was going to bed. I asked if I could drive up Sunday, and she said she's busy and needs time to work on cleaning the house. I said I'd just stop by because I knew J and her mom were going to SoCal to see grandma for another two weeks. Sunday comes, I drive to the house, I get a text from J that says she can't see me at the house and that we should meet in town. In my head I was like OH SHIT. Then 10 minutes later she tells me to come to the house. I get to the house and I can see my belongings, just some extra clothes I leave there, in a garbage bag by the door. She comes to the front door and says it's over because she can't leave the town she grew up in! It's too stressful for her to leave! She says it's just too much for her to work and be a mom. But I've ALWAYS helped her physically, emotionally, and financially! I tell her I can't lose her and I'd agree to her staying where she lives while I lived in an apartment in SF and we can see each other every weekend. She says that's not fair to me (!) and that it's over and told me to leave.
I've tried to call and text, nothing. I get an e-mail saying the same thing she said to my face, that this is over and that she's sorry but that we've stopped connecting that that she was failing me. I'm destroyed. I haven't told my daughter yet, and I know that it's going to hurt her greatly. I'm at a loss. Do I just walk away from the most beautiful girl I've ever dated? Do I give her space? I gave up my house and now I'm left with a mess. Please HELP me!!!!!
Male from Canada writing, 36 years old, straight. Two years ago, I was in a common law relationship with a woman for a little over 4 years.  Several times during our relationship, I would notice her trying to shield her phone from me while she texted. Invariably, she would be talking to a guy she met somewhere, I’d discover that she planned to cheat on me, we’d fight, she’d forget about the other guy, things would go back to normal, then the whole process would start again.  In the last few months of that relationship, I found out (because I snooped through her email and phone… and snooping is bad… but I don’t regret it) she had a few more affairs than I’d originally known about—somewhere between four and seven—and this left me feeling betrayed and disposable.  Presently, I’m six months into a relationship with a woman I’m madly in love with. In fact, I fell in love with her the moment I set eyes on her. She has a backstory of her own, however: it seems that whenever she allows herself the vulnerability necessary to fall in love, the relationship fails, and she gets hurt. This has led to her trying to sabotage our relationship on a couple occasions in an attempt to make it less ideal, or to cause conflict, so that if we do break up, it doesn’t feel like she’s losing something worthwhile. Anytime things between us start getting really good, she gets afraid of getting hurt and pushes me away. Because of debt I’m carrying, I work two jobs and rarely get a day off. Lately when I’m at work she’s been spending her days off with her ex-boyfriend, which is reminiscent of everything I went through with the common law. Paraphrasing John Irving, "It’s not just a trigger. That’s all the bullets." I’ve told her why this behavior bothers me so much, that I feel it sends both me and her ex the same message. (He’s hard to let go of, I’m disposable.) But she still hangs out with him on a regular basis. I've told her she's causing me a lot of pain and worry, but she doesn't seem willing to let go of this relationship with her ex. Am I being a jerk and letting my past experience color this new relationship, and if so, any ideas on how to get past it? Or is she completely disregarding my feelings on the matter? Long long long time reader and listener. I need your advice today, right now, please.
I am distraught and don't know what to do. I've been dating a man for about eight months now. He's 30 I am 32. Everything was going well. You know this whole song and dance. Then out of the blue he says "I'm struggling with this." He says this is the best relationship he's ever been in. This is the first time he's ever been able to see himself with someone for the long term. "But I need space to think about it. Can we talk in three weeks?" I was shocked and in tears but said yes.
That was last Tuesday. I waited three days but felt panicky and insecure and awful. It seemed insane to wait three weeks to... see if he wants to dump me? Or not? I kept crying at work and didn't know what to do. So Saturday morning I emailed him to say that I needed to speak with him sooner. He called the following day, Sunday, yesterday. I said that I didn't understand. He seemed sort of short and frustrated with me over the phone. I asked him to explain and he said he had nothing to say but what he had already said. I asked him to meet me in person and he said he would. Tonight at 7 pm.
I can't even describe the amount of pain I'm in. I think I need to end it? I don't think I can wait around for two weeks just hoping he'll decide to be with me. When we talked on the phone last night he sounded so cold and distant. But I think I'm in love with him. I know it hasn't been that long. But I feel happy with him. We have a rapport that I've never had with anyone else. I feel like the best version of myself when I am with him. This never happens for me. I don't understand what's going on inside his head. Why do you need to think about a good relationship?
Do I:
1. Talk to him today, break down in tears and hope he changes his mind about this weeks and weeks of time? Decides that he actually wants me?  
2. Do I wait it out? I don't think this is actually a realistic option. I'll be too distracted and devastated every day. It'll ruin my work productivity and I think my affections for him will curdle. That, or I will be SO relieved if he decides he wants me, that I will put myself in an unhealthy relationship situation.
3. End it for now? Tell him I won't wait for him but that I love him, and if he wants to be in a real relationship with me, and we are both single, I would be open to that.
4. End it for good? This is cruel, this limbo. It demonstrates that he's emotionally immature and/or doesn't want me. Nothing else matters.
Thank you. I just need someone to tell me what to do here. you have the best advice. I've been reading you for... two decades? And I've been listening to you since the beginning of the Lovecast.
I am a longtime reader and I'm currently going through a divorce. My situation is complicated so bear with me.
I met my husband when I was 19. He told me he loved me at two weeks and proposed at three. I said yes and, yes, I realize my 19-year-old self was stupid. We got pregnant at four months when he was drunk and didn't put a condom on. I wanted an abortion, he said no. I love my twins dearly and don't regret them but this sets up a regular pattern of me putting him first.
Flash forward three years. We are married, we have two kids, and he drops the bomb that he wants me to have sex with my ex. I married a cuckold. I was horrified at the suggestion. My ex was my ex for a reason. My husband had never given a hint that he was into this. But my husband was obsessed with the idea that my ex took my virginity and, to be totally blunt, that my ex had a massive cock. My husband was small endowed and tended to come quickly. We fought over this for seven years. I did go out with the ex a few times and my husband would be excited but I could never go through with it. I loved my husband and the idea made me sick. I conveyed this to him repeatedly. But in order to indulge him I did agree to some role play.
Flash forward another four years. We were separated. He left with no warning and was giving me the silent treatment. After five months the very same ex, the first guy I ever had sex with, asked me to have a one-night stand. I figured why not. We had been apart long enough that I knew I could do it without getting attached. I also thought it might bring my husband back. It did. When I told him he came over and we had sex five times. He couldn't get enough. He was affectionate and kind and loving.
It didn't last. He wanted me to do it again. I wasn't prepared. I also couldn't just tell my ex that my husband wanted me to do this. I had to lie to my ex and I didn't like that. I ended up coming up with this elaborate scheme and hooked up with my ex a few months later. I said no more after that. It was a road I didn't want to go down.
That's when my husband started suggesting dating websites. I was mortified at the idea of being caught. He wouldn't drop it and finally I went for it. This started 2 years of hell. He liked the idea of anonymous hookups for me, little contact, meet up and have sex. I had never been that type. The first time it happened it was with a strange man in his bedroom, no talking just sex. I felt like a prostitute and cried all the way home. I then had to go and tell my husband how hot it was and how many times I came. (The honest answer was "not once.")
I told him if this was going to work I needed to get to know the guy a bit. He finally agreed. I met this guy "Mason." I liked him, I wasn't able to tell him I was married and I felt awful as I think he really liked me.We hooked up once and it was good. He texted me again to meet a week later and my husband said it was too late and he would prefer I stayed home. I said I wanted to go. He stated his preference for me to stay again but agreed I could go on one condition: I had to record the sex secretly so my husband could listen after. (I know I'm a disgusting human—believe me I felt awful.) Anyways. When I got home everything seemed fine, he was turned on listening to it, and we had sex three times.
The rest of the question... after the jump.
The next day things changed. He took my phone and texted "Mason" saying it was a mistake and to never contact me. He made me watch him listen to the recording and he cried. He accused me of cheating, he installed a phone tracker on my phone, he said I couldn't be trusted. Naturally I was confused—the rules always seemed to change. I told him he had nothing to be threatened by but he held on so tight. He yelled at me and gave me the cold shoulder. I wasn't allowed to go anywhere alone with my phone and I felt smothered.
A few weeks later I ran into Mason. He was hurt as to why I just went so cold. He offered me a ride home and we ended up going back to his place. One thing led to another and we had sex. I regretted it immediately but it also allowed me to feel like I wasn't my husband's property for once. I never told him. I just tried to put it behind me.
I continued meeting men in an effort to make my husband happy. I was almost killed once by a guy who was driving drunk. Partners came and went and I felt like a dirty whore most days. I also started getting more and more depressed. I started getting obsessed with my weight as sometimes men would comment as I'm not super skinny. My self esteem would go in the garbage and I cried often to my husband that being married meant not having to feel rejected by strangers. He told me to deal with it.
A pattern was starting to emerge. During the initial chase my husband would be so excited, the sex would be great, it would be mind blowing after I did it, he would be loving and kind and affectionate. I would be incredibly happy for that was something I didn't always get. Then it would slow down. He would stop the affection and pretty much starve me of it. He would start asking me to find another man again and I would be reluctant. After months of being in a marriage with no affection or non sexual contact I would cave. Every. Single. Time.
He never got that it wasn't amazing for me. I was putting on a show for him. I learned pretty quickly how to detach while some random man was pumping away above me. I felt empty and dirty and the best part was always going home to my husband. I was racking up a lot of partners and wanted to stop. I was slowly dying inside for less reward as the good part of the cycle was getting shorter and shorter. 
The last straw was this guy "Aaron." Aaron was perfectly nice, but I remember walking to his house in an area getting more and more deserted and thinking, " I could get raped and killed right now." I cried the way home.I demanded a six month break. I was tired and emotionally raw. He was not happy. We fought about it constantly. I feel as though I tried so hard and he deceived me by not telling me about this from the beginning. We did a year of therapy but he refused to let me bring up the kink. I told him he needed to so we could lay some ground rules down to make us both happy. He started pressuring me again after a few months and I said no. I was in and out of hospitals with a serious gynecological issue and sex with anonymous men was the last thing on my mind. He left again. We had sex one night, he told me he loved me, and he never came home. I found out later he was making out with some coke fiend at a bar that night.
Eventually I told him about Mason. He called me a whore and a cheater. I don't feel as though I was. He told everyone about our life and painted me as a cheater. I was shamed publicly by friends and family, I took the brunt of it as no "good woman who loved her man would do that."
The thing I learned was that it was never about me like he claimed. It was about him. And his desires and I was just a prop, he changed the rules often and totally disregarded my feelings. I'm not going to lie, Dan. I'm pretty fucked up over this. I'm unable to have a relationship and casual sex is like a handshake now. I'm also still pretty hung up on my ex for some reason. It's been eight months since he left and I'm still in denial. My husband met a new woman. At three weeks he told me he loved her. At five weeks she met my kids. And at two months he is living there and the kids are moving in too. I can't wrap my head around this.
Anyways I don't know if you will respond. I am in therapy and trying to get over this. I guess I want your advice about whether I'm a cheater. I've been thinking about starting a blog or writing about this. I think my story could help some people. I look back and try and figure out why I ever agreed to do this. The damage is pretty bad.
Thanks for reading this mini novel. Trust me—I cut out lots and lots of other stuff.
I am a woman who finds the occasional woman sexually attractive. It is a physical desire, not an emotional one, and sex for me has always been more of an emotional experience (I get clingy after sex and have no desire for an emotional relationship with a woman), so I've never really acted on it and have rounded myself up to straightish and moved on. My fantasies don't always revolve around women, and are highly varied in the gender of the participants and the activities involved.
I've met and fallen in love with a great, smart, strong, and sex-positive man. We are getting married in a few months, and couldn't be happier. He knows about my straightish orientation. I'm having the best sex of my life, and it keeps getting better. But my straightish orientation coupled with my rather androgynous clothing style—I work in IT, and am taken more seriously when I don't dress too girly, besides, it is comfortable—have him worried that I am some deeply closeted lesbian. I can tell that he is genuinely concerned, and only wants me to be happy. But this is coming up often enough (a few times a week) to the point where I am starting to question myself. I've never "come out" about this to anyone else, and frankly wish that he would just get over it already. I know that he is the person for me, but I'm trying to figure out how to get him to move on.  Reassurances aren't cutting it. I'm 40, not 20, so this isn't my first rodeo.
I'm 
I'm a bisexual female in need of your advice. A while ago I hooked up with Colleague A: it was a casual thing, and we both agreed we would never tell anyone about it, and we both stuck to that. We hooked up a few times but went back to being just friends. Not long after that, I hooked up with Colleague B. We dated for about a year and ended up falling in love. Colleague A was supportive and probably relieved because he's not into commitment.
I ended things with Colleague B about a year ago and she took it really badly. We all still worked together but she avoided me a lot and I barely saw her. At some point after our breakup I ended up hooking up with Colleague A again—same rules, casual, tell no-one, except at one point it looked like we might be headed towards something more real, but then we both backed away from it, partly because of guilt over how much it would hurt Colleague B, partly for fear of what others would think, and partly because of Colleague A's fear of commitment in general.
Now I am having feelings for Colleague B again. I really want to give it another try and I think I'm in love with her. But I feel stuck because I think if I try to get back together with her, I'll have to tell her about Colleague A, and she will be SO devastated. Not only will it ruin my chances of rebuilding the relationship, it will really damage her as a person.
So my question is, do I tell her anyway and still try to reconcile? Do I tell her enough so she knows there are feelings there but not tell her we hooked up? Do I go for it and keep this to myself or do I just forget the whole thing?
I saw you on CBS Sunday Morning and I was drawn in with your genuine and feeling words. My living room is usually silent with only my husband and myself, but yesterday morning our visiting adult kids were wondering why CBS was on—and why there was so much talk about sex. You followed a piece on Masters and Johnson.
All day after their departure I sat in uncomfortable silence with my husband—our usual routine—thinking about writing to you concerning my dilemma. I have often thought of starting my own blog concerning my situation: I'm in my fifties, I'm married, and I'm annoyed 98% of the time by my spouse. This must be a symptom of not having sex for 12 years. And I am wondering... how do I remedy this nightmare? Most of my days are adventures in trying to figure out how I can survive this for one more day..
We've been married 22 years. He's my third husband. We have five children together and eight grandchildren. We are very active in the lives of three of our grandchildren. The two of us are an institution. We are "home base" for so many lives and I feel I cannot leave my husband because of that. I had my share of divorce in my early years—a string of abusive relationships/marriages. 
Mostly I am hungry for touch. I want to be held, to be kissed, to be cuddled, and to have sex. No sex for 12 years is like a prison sentence. For the past eight years we have slept in separate bedrooms. When our youngest daughter moved out I took her room and turned it into my oasis. I put a lock on my door and won't let anyone in there. The rest of the house is all my husband. It's a big mess. He is a hoarder of junk, he puts nothing away, there's a corner in the living room where he plays video games on his phone and creeps on my Facebook all day and night. I love to have conversations. He only can only argue and he is incessantly negative and racist. When I am overwhelmed by his rantings I go to my room and lock the door.
I have survived so many difficulties in my life—domestic violence in prior relationships, a car accident that nearly killed me, a cancer diagnoses—but I possess an amazing will to survive and to overcome. But my marriage has me drowning in unhappiness. I struggle each moment I am awake with what I need to do. Do I hate him? No. I am not romantically in love with him. I have feelings for him of some kind. Maybe it is a love of some sort. But I don't like who he is though. 
We stopped having sex—my choice—after so many years of crying in the dark after sex because he was never making love to me. He had to fantasize aloud about other women each time. Then came porn on the internet there and "experiments" that often ended with him hurting me physically. I vowed to never have sex with him again one night and that was it: Absolutely no intimacy of any kind for twelve years.
So what to do? I do not want to hurt my kids and grandkids but how do I overcome this? Any thoughts or advice? I am desperately in need of someone else's input.
I loved your piece on the show. You do good work with your life.
My partner and I consider ourselves to be monogamish and/or open. We hadn't tested the idea of having sex with anyone else until recently—we had fooled around with others, but no sex—and it went very poorly. My partner thinks I'm the one who handled it poorly and cannot be monogamish due to jealously, and I think he handled it poorly and needs to communicate better and care about how I feel. 
We went to a fun camping event this past weekend and my partner met someone he liked a lot. He proceeded to ignore me for all of Saturday in favor of hanging with her and this led to an argument Sunday morning. I told him I felt like he was prioritizing her over me and that it did not make me feel happy and was hurting me. He seemed to get it and we spent time together on Sunday.
I had given him permission on Saturday—prior to feeling ignored, although to be fair, I never revoked that permission—to make out with the woman we had met. On Monday morning, I woke up alone and went looking for my partner. I walked up to find them beginning to engage in sex. My partner didn't seem to be worried about me walking in, but I felt horrified. We had not discussed sex at all, and when he gave me the "thumbs up, thumbs side, thumbs down signal," I thumbed down. He stopped the sex and I told him we needed to talk. He asked if he could meet me back at camp and I agreed, assuming he wanted to smooth things over with the woman. I was correct, but apparently to him that meant finishing fucking her. 
This feels like a 100% betrayal to me. Not only did he not discuss having sex with her ahead of time, he continued having sex with her after I had veto'd her very clearly. This felt like cheating. He seems to understand why he should have talked to me first and asked my permission to fuck, and he says he will do "better in the future," but he does not see anything wrong with finishing fucking her. He says he was trying to make her feel less awkward and empathized with her feelings of unhappiness. However, he seems to have no empathy for me sitting in camp upset for 45 minutes waiting for him to come back to talk about this, and instead he gets defensive with me.
He is a long-time reader of yours, Dan, and he respects your opinion. Am I wrong that this seems like cheating and betrayal? I feel like communication is so important to do this correctly, and I think he was the one who dropped the ball, not me. I'm worried we may not recover from this first foray in to being open. 
Can't I'm an eighth-grade teacher at a public school in the South and I will have a trans student in class next year. I know this because I purposely requested him, knowing that his school year would be much worse with some of my colleagues. Last year there was a big issue with the student about being called his preferred name—because his parents refuse to recognize his gender identity and make him go by his birth (female) name. The other students were told that they had to call him by his given name as well, but they pretty much refused and use his preferred name constantly. The school's policy is to only use nicknames that are approved or acceptable to parents, but that's exactly the problem in this case. It's not exactly feasible to avoid using a name or pronoun for a whole school year, but I don't want to be yet another adult making this young man feel less than or unwelcome in a classroom. So, uh, any help?
My last relationship was monogamish, at points. I always told my ex-boyfriend how far things would go with a third BEFORE I had a date. When I said "nothing will happen," nothing but flirting happened—no kissing, no groping, nada. I wanted my boyfriend to do the same when he went on a date with a third, i.e. just tell me how far things would go: kissing, making out, intercourse. They were his limits to set, and telling me ahead of time allowed me to prepare emotionally for what was coming.
Twice, with two different women, in a span of three weeks, he went beyond the limits he'd set. 
The first time, I was understanding. The second time, I was super pissed. Granted, these weren't huge transgressions—just smooching or making out when he'd said nothing would happen—but I nevertheless felt that if he couldn't set and adhere to limits in small ways, how could I trust him to honor a BIG promise, like to always use condoms? It felt like he was always renegotiating in the moment—and without me present. 
When I got pissed after the second incident, he responded by closing his end of the relationship because he just couldn't state limits ahead of time and adhere to them. All he would tell me is "you come first." In most respects, I was very GGG. All I wanted was for him to set some boundaries for himself and to honor them. Was it unreasonable to expect him to state his limits—whatever HE wanted them to be!—and then stick to those stated limits on a date with someone else, which ideally allowed him to do whatever he wanted AND me to be emotionally prepared for whatever happened?
This relationship imploded for other reasons, but should this issue ever come up again, I'd like your opinion. In a monogamish situation, is my wanting my partner to set ahead-of-date boundaries and stick with them unreasonable?
I am a 30-year-old straight man married to a wonderful 29-year-old bisexual woman. We have been married almost three years and together for five, and we have a beautiful two-year-old son. Our marriage is monogamish—occasional threesomes, leeway to make out with other people with prior consent—and despite the normal stressors of parenting and work life, our relationship is happy, stable, and fulfilling. I love my wife, and she is the best thing to ever happen to me. Even though I feel like I have hit the jackpot, today, I am very stressed.
This past weekend I attended an arts event in a large city two states over with my wife, our son, and several of our friends. At this festival, one of my best friends ran into a girl whose name he did not know. But despite not knowing her name, he knew her face—three years prior, in the same city, he hooked up with her at my bachelor party. She approached my friend and me at a bar, told us how hot we were, and asked if she could party with us that night. Being drunk and high out of our minds, having a hot girl hitting on us with absolutely no effort on our part? It felt like the best idea in the world.
After the bar closed, we went back and partied at another friend’s house with the rest of the bachelor party group. At some point, my best friend and I wound up in a room with this girl, and there was kissing between all three of us. I don’t remember all of the details concerning exactly how things progressed, but I do know that once it felt like sex was an inevitability, I managed to pull it together and leave the room. I did make out with this girl, but I kept all of my clothes on, and we did not fuck each other—orally, manually, or otherwise.  My friend stayed with her that night, presumably having the time of his life, and the next morning she was gone. No names exchanged, no friendship on social media, no photos, no nothing.
After this occurred, I struggled deeply over whether to tell my soon-to-be-wife. Before leaving for the bachelor trip, she requested that I not make out with any strippers, and I agreed. Given this entirely reasonable request, I felt like making out with someone from the real world was several orders of magnitude worse than making out with a stripper. I felt extremely guilty. I thought long and hard about what to do and decided that because I didn’t do anything sexually that could jeopardize my wife’s health or my own AND given that our wedding was just two months away at the time AND not wanting to add to my wife’s stress AND given that this occurred in a large city with over a million people AND my friends and I were never going to see this girl again... I concluded that the considerate thing to do was to shove the whole ordeal down the memory hole. I didn’t see any benefit to telling my wife beyond unburdening myself of my own guilt.
Fast-forward to the present, and my best friend and this girl have really hit it off. They spent all evening at the arts event together, and he slept at her house that night. I am thrilled that my friend has found someone he is enthusiastic about—a rarity for him—but the bottom line is I imagine that this girl will be around my friend group (and my wife) on a semi-regular basis from here on out. So now, despite astronomically improbable odds, it appears that fate has intervened and I have to once again decide whether to tell my wife what happened at the bachelor party. I am relatively certain that if I don’t  tell her—and tell her quickly—lies about the situation will compound and turn what was once a considerate omission into a betrayal. I love my wife more than anything and am devastated that this issue has come up again, let alone when our relationship and openness/communication seem to be at a high point. I don’t want to keep anything from her. Am I doing the right thing by telling her now? Set me straight, Dan.  
Originally posted on October 24. 2012.
A while ago, I broke up with my long-term boyfriend. A few months after the breakup, I met someone new and we started sleeping together. It was the best sex of my life. Wild, passionate, and unpredictable. New Guy wasn't looking for anything serious, and neither was I, so we kept things very casual. After a couple months of amazing sex with New Guy, my long-term boyfriend came back into the picture. I told him I'd been seeing other people, but that I missed him and wanted to make things work between us. All good, right? Wrong! I love him so much, and I think we could have a very happy life together, but when we have sex, it just seems so dull and average compared to the volcanic sex that I was having during our time apart. Do I sacrifice an amazing sex life for a happy life of decidedly average sex with the man I love? Help!
About a year and a half ago, I was surprise broken up with by my girlfriend of 2.5 years. I was very much in love with her. It was like all my dreams could come true because I had her. Then I found out that she had been cheating on me. I wanted to move past this, and she said she did too, but said we should stay in a “gray area” and not be official. We kept fucking, and I kept loving her. She would occasionally start crying and tell me how much she loved me. However, things seemed amiss. Still, she told me repeatedly that her 10-year plan was to marry me after she "deserved me again”. 
Then, a few days before I had to leave the place where we both had been living—I had to leave, she had to stay for the time being—she told me that the other girl was “magical" but she refused to admit to me that she was waiting for me to leave the country before getting with her again. Of course that’s what happened when I left. Perhaps it had been going on the whole time. 
Anyway, I am now in another relationship, and my current partner wants to get married. We’re not engaged or anything yet, but it seems to be headed that way. I want to marry my current partner but not if my ex meant what she said about marrying me at some point. Do you think I should wait 10 years just in case she meant it?
Let's say two people entered a marriage under the agreement there would be no children resulting from this union. A few years into the marriage, one person decides he/she wants children. The other has not changed his/her mind, and wants to remain child-free. What advice would you give to each of these people?

I'm a gay man who's about to turn 49, but I look 5-10 years older. On dating and hook-up sites, when I listed my actual age, I was often accused of lying. I would reply by asking, "Why would I tell a lie that would make people think I look like shit for my age; wouldn't it make sense to say I was 70 and looked great?" So, I finally acted on this: I started listing my age as early 50s. I figured that, not only would I stop getting accused of lying, but my profile would show up in the search results of guys looking for people who look like me. Since I have done this, I have been approached by (and hooked up and had relationships with) a lot of guys in their 20s. While I am embarrassed by my Trumpian superficiality, I am attracted to younger guys. I'm not exclusively attracted to younger guys, but that's who's responding to my profiles. This is a bit of a problem because I am looking for a serious boyfriend with whom I'm intellectually compatible.
Three of these guys have just disappeared after a while (one stood me up, wrote me a nasty email, and then started begging me to get back together sending me repeated emails through Manhunt). One extremely young (22) guy who flaked on me initially seemed promising. He's Brazilian, teaches Portuguese, and we've had pretty good conversations about language and Brazilian politics. There are some sexual problems (he's obsessed with being rimmed and fisted, and I don't find his ass that attractive, and I have lost my erection with him). He started flaking on me. One time I found out he couldn't meet because he was sick only because I contacted him; another time he didn't show because he lost his cell phone and wallet, and, another time, he canceled at the last minute because he was sick. I spoke to him about this and he said he would stop canceling and not showing without notice. He asked me if we could date exclusively, and I agreed. The last time I saw him, I lost my erection but he came, and then he did nothing to make me come. Later, I felt he left abruptly. The next morning, I told him I didn't have a good time and gave him the reasons. He was hurt and said that he was feeling bad because I lost my erection, which implied I wasn't attracted to him, and that he didn't think he left abruptly. I proposed that we go on a real date—a movie and dinner. He loved the idea. On the day we were supposed to go to the movies, we exchanged text messages about what movie to go to, where, and when. After I proposed a specific time and theater, I never heard back from him. At that point, I decided I was done with him.
Last week (about a month after the the movie mishigas), he started contacting me. (He communicates almost exclusively by text message—kids today!) He told me he had been disappearing because of panic attacks and that he was now seeing a therapist. He begged me to give him a second chance. I refused in no uncertain terms. Last night, he texted me a "Hi, how are you?" (though he didn't spell out "are" or "you"). Emotionally, I'm starting to soften (especially since a couple of recent dating prospects have not panned out), but, rationally, I know there is a very good chance that he is trouble, and I should stay away. Any thoughts?
Conflicted Over Frickin' 
My girlfriend of nearly six years just gave me chlamydia, which she contracted while on vacation without me. I would never have suspected that she had cheated on me were it not for the oozing, itchy penis I developed after having sex with her. I've never cheated on her but we've talked (mostly in the beginning of the relationship) about what to do if either one of us ever did slip up. She was always adamant that the unfaithful partner had a responsibility to tell the other because of the risk posed by VD. 
Now that she's the one having unprotected sex behind my back and failing to come clean, I'm having a hard time. Based on the gulf between her words and actions, she's a monumental hypocrite. In fact, after she returned from vacation, she wanted to talk about the possibility of being less exclusive with one another. I was very supportive of the idea because I've never truly believed that monogamy was right, good, or natural. But I've always been a faithful man since meeting her, having been gradually convinced that the benefits conferred by our commitment to one another outweighed the fleeting pleasures (and risks) of random hookups. Now I understand that these conversations were just a way for her to ease her guilty conscience.
So Dan, should I give in to my wounded male ego and chuck away the main interpersonal project of the past six years of my life because I was cucked and burned OR do I take advantage of the considerable relational capital I have accrued as a result of my victimization (boo hoo!) and push hard for a threesome, multi-use cheat pass, or full-blown polyamorous relationship?
Despicable? You bet! 
I am a straight 20-something female actress in Northern California. I started a very passionate romance with a fellow actor about a month ago. We've known each other for years, but only recently admitted our feelings to one another. I feel so comfortable around him and the sex is AMAZING. Unfortunately, he's moving to LA in a month to finish school and pursue acting full time. I am tied down in Northern California by my job, family, and future performances I've agreed to do. We've talked about me visiting him and vice versa, and he's mentioned long distance a few times. My last long-distance relationship was disastrous. I know he cares about me and I can tell our being together now is making this move even more difficult for him. We feel we've fallen for each other, but is it just because we're youngsters in a new, exciting love affair? Is this meant to be a fling? Or should I try long-distance despite my past failures? 
I had a brief fling some time back; it ended amicably when we discovered some major personality incompatibilities. Six months later, we rekindled a physical relationship—I was his first partner who indulged/enjoyed his fetishes, and he wanted to explore them. We had a few hot months of rope (he's a natural!), whips, and toys. Then at New Years he told me he was an alcoholic. I had only ever seen him drunk once, while on vacation. Of course I supported his efforts to get sober, get therapy, and get on antidepressants. Six months later he's undeniably happier. My trouble, though, is threefold: 
1. His interest in kink has disappeared along with his melancholy. He still has a libido, but I haven't seen a rope or a toy since before Christmas. 
2. Even the vanilla sex is crappy. His equipment doesn't rise to the occasion all that often anymore, and when it does it's a minute or two tops before he's done. He's willing to do other stuff with his mouth/hands, which is great, except what gets me off is a good hard pounding, whether dick or dildo or flogger—but none of those have been on the table. Frankly, the tender soft touches he uses now give me the willies most of the time. 
3. He's suddenly decided he is totally in love with me. He doesn't seem to see that our personalities remain incompatible—instead he seems to be in love with some fantasy of me that's only tangentially related to the real deal. I do not return these feelings aside from a friendly affection, and I've been clear about that since we started fucking again. 
So is it a "thing" for interest in kink to only be present if the person is depressed? And how do you go about telling someone that their happiness is killing your sex life in a nice way? He's really kind to me and the last thing I want is to be the total asshole that stomps all over his hard-won joy, but so far everything I can think of does exactly that.
I'm a straight guy with some gay friends. I had this debate with them about the rainbow being chosen to represent the LGBT community. I proudly support gay marriage and gay rights I just disagree about your use of the rainbow. With all the brilliant and creative minds in LGBT community you could not come up with better than the rainbow? When I was a child I would chase rainbows without any labels in mind. My dad used to have a "gay" rainbow flag on his front porch before the LGBT community started using the rainbow as its symbol. I am now told that the gay rainbow represents diversity. I beg to differ. I am part of the culture that is so much more diverse than the LGBT community. Heck, the LGBT community is part of my culture! So are racists, extreme (and usually anti-gay) religious groups, Americans, and foreigners alike. It is known as Deaf Culture (with capital D) and it crosses over every culture in the world. Biased people and gay/minorities are brought together by the experience of being Deaf in a larger hearing world. So I cant accept "diversity" as a reason to use the rainbow when it should belong to everyone. I wish I could display rainbows without experiencing two extremities. First, having hateful people make my life difficult. Second, having gay men checking me out and following me into bathrooms. I support the LGBT community but I have my own battles being a Deaf person in this oppressive world.
Portland lesbian here. A few months ago, I started hooking up with a friend of mine (she initiated). She had a long-distance boyfriend and I knew that, but after the first time she told me that the two of them were taking a break. I took this to mean that she was free to see other people and kept hooking up with her. A month later, she clarified that wasn't the case, but I still kept hooking up with her. Since then she ended it with me to make it work with the boyfriend and then subsequently ended it with the boyfriend. Now she and I are back in old habits, and I'm trying to decide where I want to go from here.
The sex is amazing, but not only that, we have had some really good times together. Good talks, lots of texting, an actual long walk on the beach. I'd like to keep dating her and see where this goes, but I'm worried that her cheating on her boyfriend means she'll ultimately cheat on me, too. And our communication could obviously be improved. She says she's never cheated before. Is once a cheater, always a cheater really a thing? Or is there some kind of one-time exception for cheating at the end of a relationship that really wasn't working anyway?
I have a conundrum: my boyfriend constantly texts this girl. Not normally an issue, but he fucked her pretty regularly right before he and I got together. He says it was never more than a sexual attraction, but this girl—who has a boyfriend, mind you—is in love with him. I know this because my boyfriend has told me so. They don't hang out and they don't have phone calls, but the texting is bothering me because she's clearly not speaking to him as "just a friend." He's informed me that, yes, she does flirt with him but he insists he never responds in kind. I've tried to talk to him about it but he doesn't think he's doing anything wrong because he is respectful of our relationship when he responds to her.
He describes her as a damsel in distress with a shitty boyfriend and says he's just trying to be nice. He wouldn't cheat on me, especially not with her, but I cannot get past the fact that he humors her. You're going to tell me to trust him, so fine, I trust him, but shouldn't he care about how this makes me feel? It's not like this girl is a long-time friend of his, but when it comes up (which it does because I bring it up, oops) we end up in huge fights. I go back and forth on whether I'm justified or just crazy. What is it? And what can I do to get over this? 
I am getting married to my partner next month. I'm super pumped. Her family is awesome and supportive. I've had a long back-and-forth with my family about the wedding. I'm trying to do the "right" thing/be the bigger person even though they have never been supportive of me as a queer person. This including inviting them and trying to be positive about the wedding and writing about how much it would mean to me if they would be a part of this important day/chapter of my life. I suspect some of them are not coming, as I got a pretty intense email from my sister-in-law about how my family can't support my engagement blah blah blah Catholic blah blah holier-than-thou bullshit bullshit. But that was over a year ago and most of my family has just been avoiding the topic of the wedding when I try to talk on the phone with them about it. But no one has told me outright that they won't be attending. Yesterday was the RSVP due date for our wedding and none of them have responded. So it now to the point where I'm going to have to call and outright ask if they're coming and potentially absorb all their rejection personally.
Now here's the kicker: I found out through Facebook ten minutes ago that my brother, who i used to think was my ally (he said in December that he and his GF were going to try and make it to my wedding), is getting married SEVEN DAYS after we are in a different state! IN A MONTH! And he... forgot to tell me??? Forgot to invite me??? Everyone in my entire extended family knew about his wedding, including second cousins and stuff, but I did not.
So with this knowledge what am I supposed to say when I call asking for RSVPs? I have no idea.
My partner of 25 years passed away last week, and today I received a sympathy card from his sister. She included many paragraphs about how I need to seek salvation in Jesus Christ, etc., and hardly a kind word spoken but at one point she did thank me for "being his friend." (We were a gay couple—much more than friends.) She enclosed a brochure with Bible verses printed on it, the kind that evangelizers give out on street corners. On the envelope of this card she wrote only my first name, because she apparently never bothered finding out my last name.
This lady never once asked about me in any of the many letters she wrote to my partner when he was alive. She is nice and sweet in person but she always manages to slip in something thoroughly nasty during every conversation. She did this to my partner too. I assume she is this way to everyone. During our one and only lengthy conversation, one day after my partner's death, she asked me to give her all of the family photo albums in our house because "you are not family."
As soon as I read her letter I was inspired to write a reply:
Dear So-And-So:
Thank you for the card. Proselytizing someone in a sympathy card must rank as one of the rudest acts imaginable.  If I didn't want to convert to Christianity before, your card would certainly guarantee I never want to in the future.
P.S. You are concerned about my personal salvation but you couldn't bother to find out my last name?
I thought about sending this note to her in a thank you card, then I thought about slipping this as a note in the bottom of the box of family photos I plan to ship to her (I am going to give her back the photo albums because my partner asked me to before he died), then I thought about emailing this note to her daughter instead of sending it to her and asking her to pass it along to her mother. This woman's daughter seems to be a truly nice person, unlike her mother, and we have been corresponding since my partner's death.
But I have qualms about sending something like my reply for several reasons. First, I do not want to jeopardize the budding relationship between me and my partner's niece. Second, I do not want to dishonor my partner's memory with anger.
If you've made it this far, THANK YOU SO MUCH for listening to me. Now tell me what you think I should do.
Straight-out-of-college female here. I've begun my foray into the real world with my first job at a large firm and, as an added bonus, a hunky, kind man. My relationship is new—we got together in January of this year. I have some work to do on myself: post-abusive relationship and recently uncovered mommy issues have landed me in therapy. I am a work in progress, and he is both aware and supportive. Really feels like this is a potential LTR.
The one thing (I call it a thing and not an issue or a problem) is that he is "hung up" on his ex. They dated for two years and had a hard time distancing themselves from each other. From my understanding, he really only cut off communication with her after he met me. They met up recently as she is moving out of state and she contacted him in an attempt to gain closure. He says that their relationship is done but that he has unresolved feelings. When I asked him to explain, he said that he was still attempting to dissect their breakup and that their meeting was supposed to provide clarity. The only thing that is clear is that he didn't get what he needed.
The thing is that I know I'm being insane. He repeatedly tells me he loves me. He is kind, affectionate, always engaging, the sex is great—hell, he cooked me a 10 lb pork butt that was divine. These are not the actions of a man who is in love with someone else. Despite all these things, I feel like the lackluster movie sequel that producers confidently made but received, at best, a lukewarm response from the public. Entertaining, I guess, but not nearly as good as the first one. What do you do when your great love has already had his great love?
Can you sense how dramatic I'm being? I don't know how to turn my brain off to my insecurities. My friends feed my sentiments: They tell me I shouldn't be with someone who isn't over his ex. Can you help me better articulate what the hell he's going through? And then could you tell me to leave him alone so that he can work through it since since it clearly has nothing to do with me? I'm about to run my relationship into the ground and I don't know how to stop.
I’m a straight-identifying Aussie guy in my mid-20s, and I have recently started living with my girlfriend of just under two years. Let's call her "Mathilda."
I need your help.
I feel I need to start by mentioning that most of my prior "serious relationships" have been marred and ultimately ended from full-on cheating or some degree of infidelity, by either myself or the other person. I discovered you at the Festival of Dangerous Ideas in Sydney a few years ago at what would be the week prior to the conclusion of my previous relationship. 
With your help via the introduction to the ways of the "monogamish," and taking some time as a single bloke to work out who I really am and what I need from relationships, I was able to accept within myself and "come clea"’ when I put myself back out there and eventually met Mathilda. Successful monogamy in a LTR isn’t possible for me.
Before Mathilda and I started dating seriously, we discussed at length monogamishamy, "what happens when we fuck up" rather than "if we fuck up," and our shared desire to have sex with other couples. I introduced her to your podcast, and we watched the recording of your presentation at the Opera House on YouTube together. Mathilda had told me she always wanted to explore sex with girls, and banging other couples seemed like a safe and exciting environment for her to explore. It also had the bonus of being a great opportunity for me to occasionally fuck other women, and try my mouth on a cock or two eventually, which is something I recently felt has been calling out to me. 
I hated the jealous piece of shit I could become in monogamous relationships, as I always found myself trying to catch out my partner with what I knew to be true: They wanted to fuck other people. Obviously they did—because so did I. 
I told Mathilda what I wanted, needed, and could offer in a relationship; that I couldn’t stand how jealous I always ended up becoming in my past relationships; that I believed a degree of mutual openness could prevent that arising in me; and that I wasn’t prepared to make (another) commitment that I couldn’t keep. And to top it off, the thought of her occasionally "getting some strange" and sharing details or photos was pretty damn hot.
Even though Mathilda vowed to never sleep around without me, we shared the same views on the matter of monogamy and swinging, and formed what appeared to be a highly successful, trusting monogamish relationship, one that I thought could go the distance. Mathilda didn’t need sex as often or the same way as I enjoyed, but I’ve always considered myself someone with a high sex drive, and now I had an approved outlet to satisfy those needs elsewhere if the need should arise, so I didn’t mind.
After about 10 months of being "slightly open," Mathilda asked to close our relationship, stating that she could no longer stand the thought of me fucking someone else. Truth be told, sparing a single kiss with a stranger on a dance floor, I had no other explorations of openness to report. We talked about it for weeks, before landing on the “we can still fuck other girls or couples together” compromise. 
We eventually found one couple online that we clicked with, and really enjoyed fucking, and we tried to see them semiregularly for dinner, drinks, and sex. It was fantastic. We all got what we needed, and it worked particularly well for me, as I got to explore some light BDSM and other kinks with the girl of the other couple, which wasn’t an opportunity that I got to explore within my relationship. I really loved how close and intimate things with Mathilda and I would be in the moments and days after allowing each other to sleep with the other couple.
The couple moved at the start of this year and naturally my interest in reactivating our online profile and searching for new local replacements sparked a couple of months later. After putting off talking about finding another couple, Mathilda tells me that she does not want to sleep with other people "for a while." After talking about it in depth, she confesses that although she is glad we fucked the other couple, she doesn’t want to do it again any time soon, and only said she wanted to do it the subsequent times in order to please me. She didn’t like the idea of the occasional outsourcing of a pro to fuck me either, but told me I could explore with as many men on my own as I wanted, as that “wasn't something you could get from me.”
I did the right thing by telling her what I want, need, and could offer before our relationship started, right? I feel like she told me what I wanted to hear and bit her tongue until we were in too deep. Now I’m sharing a house with her and supporting her through law school, and she’s changing the rules of the relationship and pleading mercy. I’m going out of my fucking mind. 
We have average, vanilla, weekly-ish sex, but I no longer get the opportunity for hot, sweaty, athletic and subby/dommy sex that I crave on those rare occasions. And this all ended before we took the opportunity to find a couple with a bi-curious/bisexual guy with whom I could explore. Also, she’s put on about a fifth of her body weight since we met, and I’m finding myself less attracted to her as the months go on—which is somewhat of a blessing in disguise considering our mismatched sex drives, because I am now less likely to ask her for sex when she’s not feeling it. She’s unhappy with her weight but not unhappy enough to make any changes. I’m a personal trainer, I work with dozens of driven, sexy, and flirty female (and male!) clients and colleagues every week. But I'm spending all my free time masturbating furiously to thoughts of other people and resenting my partner.
It seems like the obvious thing to do is to leave her. I know we’re both young, and there is probably a better match for me out there, but the non-sex part of our life together is brilliant. She is my best friend and an extremely loving and caring person. We make a wonderful home together. She has supported me and helped contribute to the success of my career. She is the woman with whom I want to start a family. And the thought of fucking up her pathway to becoming a lawyer, throwing all the wonderful companionship away, dividing our assets, sharing our rescue dog, and the rest, all because she doesn’t want to share me with others—it's just unconscionable to me. 
Summing up: I can’t accept full monogamy as the price I have to pay for this relationship, but leaving her is not something I can do.
We have talked and fought endlessly about this over the last couple of months and I have no idea where to go from here. I think it is shitty of her to change the rules and not want to compromise. But I can’t help the way I feel about her.
Please tell me there’s another way we can both win.

So I am dealing with some issues right now that I don't know how to handle. I'll start with the basics. I'm a 34-year-old single-ish straight male and I have been in a very close intimate friends with benefits relationship with a 28-year-old polyamorous bisexual girl. We have definitely had our ups and downs, the main ones being that I want to formalize the relationship whereas she wants it to remain exactly the same. We also have some sexual problems that come up from time to time where she loses her libido for sometimes months at a time. During those times our relationship remain very sexual without any sex acts occurring which leaves me sexually frustrated because it feels like I'm constantly being teased. But, those issues aren't what I'm currently writing about. 
So a couple of weeks ago, after almost three months of constant teasing with no sex I got fed up and ended the relationship. I stayed away for a week until my frustrations calmed down and went back to her and she welcomed me with open arms and lo and behold her libido is back and things seem a bit more normal.
When I returned however I noticed all of her sex toys out and she told me that while I was away she decided to explore her dominant side by using her toys on a guy. We've never been exclusive So that by itself didn't bother me. But, while telling me about it she was rather vague about who it was but said it was someone she knew. She is normally more open about her exploits So I thought it was strange that she would hide that info from me. She is also a homebody and doesn't hangout with anyone besides me and her male cousin who is close to her age. That got me really suspicious that she might have hooked up with her cousin. 
Well, last night I asked her directly if it was and she admitted to it. She said there were no other acts performed and that she just used toys on him, not sure if I completely believe that though. She said that was the only time but that they had discussed going further. Now I am completely grossed out by it and it's really bothering me to the point that I might end things if she does continue that type of relationship with her cousin. We didn't talk long about it before she fell asleep So I'm going over tonight to talk more. 
I love her dearly and don't want to give up what we have but I also can't help but being completely creeped out by the fact that on any given night she could have her cousin's dick in her mouth. This is her first cousin, as in her mom's sister's son and they grew up together rather closely. Is this a situation where I could give her an ultimatum of if she continues to hook up with him then I will walk out the door or is it something that is really none of my business and I should just somehow get over it? I feel super judgmental right now and I also worry that it might just kill all my attraction to her.. 
What are your thoughts? I know know it's legal in some states and she did tell me that it would most certainly be a temporary thing given how close their entire family is. I personally feel like it's something that she needs to talk to a mental health professional about. I also worry if I give her the ultimatum that she might choose cousin sex over our long term relationship. Please help. 
You've written about "gold star pedophiles," people who are attracted to children but have not and would not touch a child, and the trap they're in when seek treatment. Which really gave me unexpected empathy for them. 
As a parent myself, I struggle to know what would be the appropriate steps to take if we were ever faced with a Josh Duggar situation. I think a lot of people, while condemning the Duggars (for so very very many things) also wonder what the hell they would do if it was their 14-year-old son, wanting to get the kid and the victims treatment without ruining his or their lives.
Any guidance?
I'm bi but there are many words that could describe my sexual/identity fluidity. I like romance with guys (though I have had romances with women too), I like sex with women and men, I like porn of all types—and I generally think sex is personal and that folks should do whatever they like while being respectful. I am female but I get turned on by many types of porn. Why is it that men love F2F porn but only gay/bi guys are supposed to be turned on by M2M porn? M2M porn turns me on even though I know I will never be in a M2M situation. (But I have pegged some dudes, if it matters.) Whats with the stereotypes? Wouldn't we all be better off if we could forsake what is MALE and what is FEMALE and enjoy EVERYTHING?
Thoughts?
I'm a 22-year-old bisexual female. I have had a flirty relationship with a close family friend for awhile now. He is 24. The closest we have ever come to fucking was on a family vacation a few years back, but I didn't go through with it because of the guilt of my conservative Christian upbringing. I'm no longer a Christian and have gotten past all the bullshit I was taught. Now I really want to fuck this guy but he is in a relationship—an on-again, off-again monogamous one. I realize there are many guys to choose from and that I should probably move on, but this is one of the few guys that really does it for me. (I probably lean more towards the homoflexible side of things and don't find many men attractive.)
I'm not looking to get him to cheat (assuming he is still interested, which he may not be), so my question is this: Would it be inappropriate to mention to him, while he is still in a relationship, that I would enjoy an FWB relationship with him if he found himself single? I would usually wait until he actually was "off-again" but by the time I hear that he's broken up with his girlfriend he could be back together with her again or with someone new. I think he would be up for it and I don't think the offer would make things weird between us even if he passed on it. Should I treat it like your advice in asking for threesomes where you go in open for rejection or should I just not do make the offer?
A big congrats to Caitlyn Jenner on her big reveal and lovely Vanity Fair cover!
Now to the reason I'm writing: I am having a crisis of conscience. On one hand, I absolutely support a person's right to be whoever the heck they want to be. If you feel like you want to wear "women's" clothing and makeup and hair? You look fabulous! You want to carry a pillow person around and be "married" to said pillow? Congrats on your nuptials! You want to buy dolls that look creepily real and walk them around in $300 strollers? GREAT! 
But I'm confused where we draw the line. When a thin person believes themselves to be "fat" and then dangerously restricts their food intake, we can have that person committed. Most reputable doctors won't amputate your arm simply because you feel you were meant to be an amputee. Making the decision to end your own life in the absence of unbearable suffering is illegal. But when a man decides that he should be a woman (or vice versa), we will surgically remove healthy body parts to suit that particular desire.
Of course we modify/enhance/surgically alter other body parts all the time. I don't know, I guess I'm confused. Could you shine some light on this for me? I want to be less conflicted about sex-reassignment surgery.
I have dilemma. I'm a married man, my wife and I have been together 20 years total, and our sex life is beginning to get kind of dull. Recently she told me she would like to have a FFM threesome. Our problem is finding another F. She said she would never do it with a friend—we don't think any of her friends would do it anyway—so I suggested dating sites since neither of us knows any bisexual women. My question to you is this: Would it be better if she made the profile on some dating sites or should I do it? She told me to do it because she's too shy to do it herself. I just think it would look better if she did it. What is your opinion on finding a third? 
Originally posted on February 6, 2013. 
I'm a 27-year-old man in a two-year relationship with a 26-year-old woman. My last partner cheated and lied and did some unforgivable things. I wasn't blameless-I stayed with her long after I realized it wasn't working-but our relationship did unearth a kink. After I found out about her cheating, I got extremely turned on thinking about it. I never told her.
Enter my next girlfriend. We were together a few months before I brought up my kink. She was very accommodating (dirty talk about her cheating, making up stories about cheating) and then, after some months, she admitted that it was something she wanted to try in real life. I said I was okay with it as long as I had the option to pursue other partners as well. We agreed on some rules and gave it a shot. She set up a date through OKCupid and had sex with someone; I hooked up with an ex. Everything seemed to be turning out great. Then two weeks later, she got drunk and told me she had seen the OKCupid guy again without asking. I was so upset, I nearly broke up with her. Having the guidelines ignored felt like a betrayal. She later admitted to seeing him one other time without talking to me first.
Are we going through the normal trip-ups of a newly open relationship? Or are these lies an indication that she can't be trusted? I feel like it might be hard to find someone else who is into my kink and maybe we're just having a hard time navigating polyamory. I love my partner, and I want to make this cuckolding thing work if we can. Suck it up or break it off?
Originally posted on September 14, 2011.
I am a 16-year-old female. I have been in a monogamous relationship with a boy for seven months. My first, his too. A couple of months in, we began to explore masturbating each other and oral sex. He has gone down on me three times, but I have never given him a blowjob. I'm scared to because I'm scared he will be disappointed. We fight sometimes because he feels it's unfair that he goes down on me and I don't go down on him.
On top of this, he started doing something when we are in the midst of being sexual that I don't understand. He will stick the tip of his hard penis just inside the opening to my vagina, again and again. I guess you could call it "probing." I know enough to know that there's a slight risk of pregnancy, as pre-come can get a woman pregnant and he doesn't wear a condom when he does this. We are planning on having complete vaginal intercourse in the next few months, with condoms and birth control, but this is happening now and it worries me.
This is what I need advice about: I know that there is a very small risk of pregnancy even if we use condoms and birth control. I couldn't handle a child at my age or the humiliation of being pregnant at 16 and having to walk around town with the evidence out for all to see. I would have an abortion. He disagrees strongly with abortion, but he's not the one who would have to go through it all! So I would probably end up having an abortion without telling him, which seems completely unfair.
Originally posted on October 16, 2013.
I'm a gay man in a happy and open marriage. I routinely seek the services of an erotic masseur, a man with whom I have a great client/service-provider relationship. I found out when booking my next massage with him that he was recently in a car accident with his long-term partner, who died in the hospital. Normally, I'd send flowers and a card. However, due to the nature of our working relationship, I don't want to extend myself in ways that could be uncomfortable for him. I wouldn't want to put him in the position of having to explain who I am if the card I sent was read by someone else. Any advice would be appreciated.
Originally posted on February 27, 2013.
I am writing about a friend. By all appearances, he is straight. However, on more than one occasion, he has gotten drunk and tried to hook up with a transvestite or a person who could have been one. In one instance, he went to a club and was approached by a really masculine-seeming girl who proceeded to give him head. My friend, in his drunken state, reached into her pants and felt for a pussy only after she started giving him head. On a trip to Las Vegas, he drunkenly picked up someone who I was told looked like "Kevin Garnett in a wig" and was very obviously a man. He tried to take this person back to his hotel, but friends put a stop to it. I just received a message from a friend who is with him on a trip to Europe, who said that he just tried the same thing again with yet another manly looking transvestite type. Again, my friend was stopped before he did anything he might regret. I can understand if these cases happened with transvestites who looked like real women. It's easy to fool someone when he's drunk. However, the situations I have seen personally and have heard about all seem to indicate he is seeking out transvestites. Could he be harboring some gay or bisexual tendencies? I've never seen him act this way when sober. Or could he just have the world's thickest pair of beer goggles?

 My husband and I are newlyweds who have been together for almost five years. Over the course of our relationship, we have discussed the potential of bringing other partners into the bedroom with us. Recently, we decided to go to an event for couples and single women. As this would be our first foray into this type of experience, we set up some ground rules prior to the event—primarily, no penetration or oral sex.
The event ended up being smaller (and decidedly more intimate) than we had anticipated and we ended up relying a little too heavily on our drinks to quell our nerves. We met a great couple and chatted with them for a while before deciding to make our way into the playroom. Amidst the initial kissing and light touching, those nervous cocktails suddenly rushed to my head. Apparently, my husband and I had a conversation in which we decided to forego our previously established ground rule of no penetration. Though he went forward with this and had sex with a new partner (both vaginal and oral), I ended up in the bathroom unable to keep the liquor down before any sex occurred with the man I was with.
In the morning, I was upset. He informed me that I had agreed to forego our ground rules in my drunken state. Now, I feel incredibly confused. I’m hurt—but I can’t tell if I’m hurt because I feel left out (after all, I was going to engage in sexual intercourse as well before the alcohol decided to intervene) or if I’m upset because I was too drunk to be making the decision to abandon the rules (he claims he was pretty drunk as well during this conversation). Either way, I know I don’t have any justification for feeling hurt—but I can’t seem to shake it.
I’ve been the proponent for bringing other people into our sexual experiences, but he’s the one who ended up acting on it. Did I bring this on myself? We clearly went about our first swinging experience all wrong—the alcohol being our biggest mistake. We’ve talked about the incident and he feels badly—but ultimately doesn’t feel to blame because I gave the go-ahead. I want to resolve this, but I’m having a difficult time not feeling resentful of him. Please help.
Was Hazily Objecting Oral / Originally posted on July 20, 2011.
I'm a 24-year-old female living in London, where I have just finished a degree in circus arts. I'm in a relationship with a great guy. The problem is that while I have had long- and short-term relationships before, he hasn't, and he can be very emotionally needy. For example, he can't/won't sleep without me in the bed. We've been together for 10 months, and he often tells me that I'm everything in his life. I've told him that under no circumstances is this normal, and I've confirmed my right to have a life outside of him. The real crux of the situation is this: I worked on and off as a stripper in a high-end club for two years. I haven't done it while with him because of the physical demands of my degree. Now I'm done and broke and want to return to this work. This is an issue for him, as you can imagine. I won't compromise: The job was great for me and allowed me such sexual (and financial!) liberation. I didn't orgasm for the first time until after I took control of my own sexuality via stripping.
I don't know how to handle this issue: He knew this about me when we met and says he hoped it wouldn't carry on. I feel upset that he hasn't accepted the whole of me and I guess part of me wonders if I'm in the wrong relationship. I love this man, but I feel trapped.
Originally posted on July 20, 2011.
You probably get this question every day. I'm a man who loves it when my girlfriend fucks me with a strap-on. Another great thing: My girlfriend ejaculates frequently and plentifully when we have sex, and she has done so when she's pegging me. Which leads to my question: What are the possible issues from getting female ejaculate in your ass? I am thinking about modifying a toy in a way that might enable her to squirt up my ass. It probably won't work, but I am going to try. Because if it does work...
Originally posted on May 18, 2011.
Kinky female here, age 26. For as long as I've been sexually active, I've been ridiculously turned on by guys with huge cocks. I love the way they look and feel in my hands and when they're inside me. This isn't to say that I'd date a guy purely on cock enormity alone; I wouldn't. But I'm not sure what to do about my current situation: I'm dating someone now who shares my same values—he's flamingly liberal and actually enjoys RuPaul's Drag Race—but we don't have the greatest sexual chemistry. Some of it's because he's pretty vanilla, although he's GGG, but a lot of it is that his dick is average. Sadly. Am I wrong to want a guy with the lower half of a horse? If so, can I retrain myself to accept, and even want, an average or below-average penis?
Originally posted on May 18, 2011.
I suppose you are going to call me an asshole once you have finished reading my letter, but I hope you have some advice for me regardless.
I am a 45-year-old heterosexual male. My last relationship lasted nearly seven years. I am currently single. I am discouraged. One of the reasons for my discouragement: I have to get too far into a relationship before I can determine if it will work out with any particular woman. An awful lot of emotion, time, and effort are required to get that first look into a woman's panties. And this is where my problem lies. A woman can have the sweetest personality, she can be pretty and hardworking, but if her pussy isn't bald and her "little man in the boat" doesn't fit comfortably in my mouth, I am NOT turned on. I require a shaved pussy and a big clit.
I have asked women with whom I've become close to go bald. If the answer is no, there is no need to return. I respect a woman's control over her own body, of course, but I like a big clit. She may or may not be bald, but if the clit isn't big enough, there's no sense in returning. I have heard women say that they were disappointed to find that a man's dick was too small or too large, or they didn't like that it curved to the left or right. Do I have a right to a similar preference? What do I do? Is there a way to ask about these issues before emotion, time, and effort are invested?
I am on vacation. Please enjoy this golden oldie from November 7, 2012. 
I'm a man who just got out of a two-year relationship with a great girl. She was always a little controlling, and I felt like I had to tiptoe around her all the time, so I'm glad to be out of the relationship. But I was still providing her with a lot of emotional support. This was fine until she started bothering me for advice on what to do about her rebound relationship. This seemed beyond the call of duty, and I suggested to her that we needed to reevaluate our boundaries. She flipped out and has threatened to force all our mutual friends to pick her over me. I'm also worried that she will tell everyone we know about my pegging kink. I'm comfortable with that aspect of myself, but other people don't need to know. Do I stick up for kinks or deny it and blame a vengeful ex?
Kink-outing Originally posted on December 21, 2011. 
I'm a submissive gay man. All anal sex guides stress that when done right, anal sex should cause no pain. But what if I want pain? Over three years, my boyfriend and I have proceeded from having lots of anal foreplay to lube-it-up-and-stick-it-in. I love it, and once it stops hurting, as it always does after a while, I have amazing orgasms. So does he. There's a definite line between the arousing kind of pain and too much pain. But that line has moved closer to more intense pain, and I'm worried about injury. Then again, we're not sticking progressively bigger objects up my ass, just the same object with less foreplay. Is this risky?
Originally Posted on December 26, 2012.
I just started an intense relationship with a guy who has a boyfriend. This guy and I love each other. However, he is uncomfortable with me meeting his boyfriend. I've asked if it's okay that we're fucking, and he said they're in an open relationship so it's okay. I asked if it's okay that we're in love, and he said yes. So why the secrecy? My lover's only explanation is that his boyfriend doesn't want to know about the guys he fucks around with. The whole situation is starting to make me uneasy. I can't figure out why I want to know more about his boyfriend. Is it so I can verify that he's not cheating, or that jealousy is an issue for them and that's why I can't meet him? I do know that I wish my lover would be more open with me. Should I just relax?
Originally posted on July 18, 2012.   
I am desperately in need of your help. After eight years of marriage, it turns out that the blowjobs I give are "good but not great" and are now getting "boring." My husband is unable to tell me anything specific that he wants me to do, just that I should "be creative." I've done everything I can think of over the years, so I have no idea where to go from here! My husband is my first partner, so I have no past experience to draw from, and porn hardly seems the proper inspiration: visually exciting (for a guy) but no visible technique other than some rather extreme deep-throating, which I am incapable of, as I have an annoyingly sensitive gag reflex. Is there anything nonstandard but fun that you could suggest? I'm not exactly vanilla, so I'm willing to try pretty much anything at this point.
I'm a 29-year-old straight-ish woman in Illinois married for just over five years to a wonderful man who is 28. About a year ago, we were watching RuPaul's Drag Race clips and, for fun, I asked my husband if I could dress him up in drag. It took some convincing but he agreed—so long as there were no photos. He looked fierce! He was surprised and we had a few good laughs. About a week later we were Ru and we were talking about their severity—those severe queens and their severe looks—and why they rarely wear "everyday" makeup. I explained that they're not trying to look like women. For comparison I convinced him to let me make him over as a regular woman, hair and all. I think this was where things changed. He looked really good. In fact, he kept his face on for nearly four hours, constantly going back to the mirror. Since then, he has started feminizing himself, little by little. He's learned to put on makeup by himself and do his hair. We've even been out together, as two girls, to dance. My problem is, sexually, he's become completely passive. When we do have intercourse, I have to be on top. But usually it's just him going down on me—very well, mind you—and we bypass his orgasm entirely. Have I created a trans girl? I know that isn't possible, but does it seem like I may have released something he didn't know was there?
I'm a 34-year-old mostly straight woman in the Southwest US. My amazing boyfriend is 30 and straight. We've been together about 2.5 years, and we love and respect each other dearly and deeply. Here's the issue:  while we both prefer monogamy, we both realize that we'll be sexually attracted to others throughout our lives, and I don't want either of us to get bored sexually. However, neither of us knows how to deal with the thought of our partner being sexually intimate with someone else. I'm afraid I would be emotionally damaged beyond repair. Every girlfriend he's had before me has cheated on him. How could we ever possibly learn to be monogamish and still maintain our healthy relationship?! We've discussed being together for the rest of our lives, but I honestly don't know if we can do that within the constraints of monogamy. But I don't know how to deal with anything else. Please help! This is the most open, loving, trusting relationship I've ever had, and I'd really like to learn to make it the best it can be for the long haul, for both of us. 

I had an embarrassing thing happen a few days ago and figured you'd be a good person to ask about it. I've been Google imaging porn for a while now—just when the mood strikes. (I have a couple of go-to porn sites, but looking through Google just gives me, I guess, a little more variety.) Anyway, the other day I was Google imaging what I've always been into, which is SSBBW and the like (facesitting/fat skinny comparisons, etc). One click led to another and suddenly I was on a page that appeared normal... but at the bottom it had a statement from Google saying "three images have been removed from this page that contained child abuse, report child abuse." 
AH!! 
I've never seen that EVER. It was terrifying, to say the least. I quickly erased my Google history and preceded to have a panic attack that's been going on for days now. I guess my question is: Am I implicated in something illegal now? I talked to my wife about it, she thinks I'm going a little overboard, but it's very upsetting to me! None of my fantasies involve anything like that and I just feel sick to my stomach that I even came close to seeing something that, from my admittedly Luddite perspective, was only on the "dark web," of which I know nothing about and prefer to keep it that way.
I guess I'm done Google imaging porn forever. But, as a person who suffers from depression/anxiety, I just can't shake the feeling that I'm in some sort of trouble (not to mention just seeing the word child abuse when I'm doing a routine porn search has got me freaked out). I mean, I didn't even SEE anything incriminating... but still, I'm just very upset. What do you think, Dan?
I'm a 34-year-old erotic massage therapist/hand job artist. It's interesting, gratifying, and I always have a good story to share with friends in the know. I love it.
About six months ago I met a 78-year-old man in need of my services after grieving the loss of his wife. Despite the obvious odds, we hit it off, and I soon found myself hanging out at his place long after our sessions had ended just because I liked his company. Aside from our more vanilla shared interests, we both enjoy weed, MDMA, and kink. (He used to be a leather daddy back in his prime.) What started off as "just another day at the office" has developed into an unlikely relationship where we get high, I give him a fantastic massage (I'm trained), and then he ties me up & paddles my pussy or whatever else we feel like doing that evening. Or sometime we just go out for sushi & enjoy scandalizing other diners. We're both experienced, safe, honest and respectful, especially when it comes to sex & drugs, and I still check in with a friend during our sessions. He is the only client I "party" with.
It's fun for me because I get to "out-perv" myself while exploring a new aspect of my sexuality with someone great. And since I'm not currently dating, Dan, this kindly old gentleman is like boyfriend-lite. It's fun for him because, duh.
My question is regarding his jizz. Or lack thereof. 
We've never fucked because he's never gotten hard enough to make it a physical possibility (and that might actually be where I'd draw the line), but I do love sucking his soft old dick. You can do things with a soft dick that you just can't do with a hard one and I'm totally sharpening my skills for when I start dating guys who can get hard. He says he has orgasms, and I have no reason not to believe him, but nothing ever comes out when he does. Which is not a problem. But even though he says he can't remember if he still has his prostate or not, sometimes after a particularly strong O, he'll ask, "Are you sure nothing came out? I swear I felt something that time!" Based on my experience both as a sex worker and as a woman who fucks dudes, I know sometimes a man's ejaculation is a source of pride, so sometimes I'll tell a little white lie. Which satisfies him and then we get to go back to my pussy. But one night, driving home, I started to wonder, "What if he actually jizzed in your mouth one of these days?"
I'm not a squeamish girl, but all the loads of jizz I've taken in my mouth have been from young, pipes-cleared-every-day guys. I've never had old, probably-been-in-there-a-while jizz. And now it's literally and figuratively messing with my head. Now, every time he gets close, I take it out and discretely point it the fuck away from my face, afraid that something looking like bad tapioca is gonna come out of there and that the consistency won't be the worst part. Taking into consideration our drug play and all the stimulation he's getting... is it possible for a man his age to suddenly ejaculate after years of shooting blanks? And if so, would that first one probably be super gross?
I've been reading your column for years, but this is my first time writing. (I hope you like the acronym!)
You wrote in one of your columns awhile back: "It's amazing how well some people get along with their exes after they break up or divorce. People really seem to relax and enjoy each other once they let go of their expectations, once they're no longer trying to control each other, and once both are free to sleep with whoever they want. I sometimes wonder why people don't give that stuff a try—shitcan the expectations, stop trying to control each other, fuck whoever you want—before they get divorced."
I just broke up with my boyfriend of a year because we could never get to the same place—or even a workable place—on the poly/mono spectrum. He wanted to screw around without limits or boundaries beyond safe sex practices and I wanted to be the primary, nesting partner, to build a life with him, which, to my mind, meant that he had to let go of some of the other women in order for us to spend the time together necessary to create a strong, trusting bond. In many other ways we were super compatible, but in this way we were not. So, eventually, after a lot of pain and angst, I ended it. 
I'm aware that my expectations were part of the problem. But I also believe that we get to want what we want. So my question to you is: how do you think we ("we" as in people, not "we" as in my ex and I) should go about "shitcanning our expectations," especially when they've been taught to us for maybe our whole lives? I tried for a year to let go of my expectations, trying to accept my ex's reassurances that all these other women didn't affect our relationship or his love for me, but I couldn't do it. It still hurt when I—supposedly his primary and his life partner—had to compete with other women for his time and attention, and when his dating didn't seem to give him the time to focus on building something special with me. Predictably, he called me insecure when I asked for more time and attention, which may have been true, but my requests were still legitimate, regardless of my insecurity.
In moving forward, I would like to be better about managing expectations in a relationship, even though I now know I'm more on the monogamous side of things. How does one let go of a lifetime of programming? Any advice?
Originally posted on August 28, 2013.
I'm a cute, mostly straight, twentysomething, single, and (safely) sexually active woman. This happens to me pretty often: I hook up with a guy, we start fooling around, and we're both really into it. I reach down, and he's full sail. Things progress-clothes come off, etc.-and, as is generally the polite order of things, the lady comes first. (This isn't the problem.) I'm not aggressive, but I'm not shy. I tell a partner what I like and how to do it. They are always happy to oblige. The thing is, after I get off, a lot of times, the guy is limp. (This is the problem.) They usually express frustration and indicate that they're very much turned on but it's just not working. Generally after a few times, they will stop having this problem, and we will end up having lots of fun. So I don't think I'm doing anything "wrong" to kill the boners. I think maybe I'm just intimidating. In fact, I've been told so. Why does this happen and how can I reduce the awkwardness? Should I talk about it or just ignore it? And should I keep trying to make him hard? Or will that just make his dick panic worse?
Originally posted on October 23, 2013.
My girlfriend snooped on my browser history the other day specifically to see what porn I had been looking at. I've told her I look at porn a few times a week, and she said she didn't mind. She asked me what type of stuff I usually look at, and I was mostly honest. My viewing habits are pretty vanilla except for BBW porn. It's not my go-to, but it was what she found in my browser history the day she snooped. She had some issues, and I don't know how to address them. I'm not more attracted to overweight women than other women, but sometimes that type just does it for me. Compounding this, my girlfriend is overweight—not on par with the women in the videos I watched—and now she's worried that her weight is the only reason I'm attracted to her. It's not! How can I explain this to her and put her mind at ease?
I've been reading your column for years (19 years?), and I love it. Savage Love has been a major part of my coming to terms with my sexuality after a very religious upbringing. And I hate to complain about something that probably seems pretty minor, but hopefully my reasons will be compelling.
You recently advised GTBHF about taking the virginity of her Middle Eastern boyfriend, and you referred to his very conservative upbringing and the "medieval version of his faith." I'm a medievalist, and this is one of the things about our current discourse on religion that drives me nuts. Contemporary radical Christianity, Judaism, and Islam are all terrible, but none of them are medieval, especially in terms of sexuality.
Today's history lesson—and it's a fascinating one—continues after the jump....
I'm not saying that the Middle Ages was a great period of freedom (sexual or otherwise), but the sexual culture of 12th-century France, Iraq, Jerusalem, or Minsk did not involve the degree of self-loathing brought about by modern approaches to sexuality. Modern sexual purity has become a marker of faith, which it wasn't in the Middle Ages. (For instance, the Bishop of Winchester ran the brothels in South London—for real, it was a primary and publicly acknowledged source of his revenue—and one particularly powerful Bishop of Winchester was both the product of adultery and the father of a bastard, which didn't stop him from being a cardinal and papal legate.) And faith, especially in modern radical religion, is a marker of social identity in a way it rarely was in the Middle Ages. 
The thing that really screwed up a lot of us religious kids was that engaging with our sexuality destroyed our religious identity: We stopped being Christians or Muslims when we started having sex, or sometimes, just started desiring to have sex. (Jewish identity is somewhat different, though my Haredi friends would perhaps find a similar situation.) 
The Middle Eastern boyfriend wasn't taught a medieval version of his faith, and radical religion in the West isn't a retreat into the past—it is a very modern way of conceiving identity. Even something like ISIS is really just interested in the medieval borders of their caliphate; their ideology developed out of 18th- and 19th-century anticolonial sentiment, and much ultra-Orthodox (Haredi) Judaism and evangelical Christianity developed at the same time. Even the radical Roman Catholicism of someone like Rick Santorum is surprisingly modern.
The reason why this matters (beyond medievalists just being like, OMG no one gets us) is that the common response in the West to religious radicalism is to urge enlightenment, and to believe that enlightenment is a progressive narrative that is ever more inclusive. But these religions are responses to enlightenment, in fact often to The Enlightenment. As such, they become more comprehensible. The Enlightenment narrative comes with a bunch of other stuff, including concepts of mass culture and population. (Michel Foucault does a great job of talking about these developments, and modern sexuality, including homosexual and heterosexual identity, as well—and I'm stealing and watering down his thoughts here.) Its narrative depends upon centralized control: It gave us the modern army, the modern prison, the mental asylum, genocide, and totalitarianism as well as modern science and democracy. Again, I'm not saying that I'd prefer to live in the 12th century (I wouldn't), but that's because I can imagine myself as part of that center. Educated, well-off Westerners generally assume that they are part of the center, that they can affect the government and contribute to the progress of enlightenment. This means that their identity is invested in the social form of modernity.
However, for those on the margins, for the excluded, the feeling is much different. Some governments have taken advantage of that: The Nazis made national identity part of a progress narrative in order to involve lots of struggling, middle-class Germans in their cause (despite Germany having become a nation only recently); the Soviet Union did a similar thing with the oppressed Russian peasants (despite Marx saying that a mostly agricultural society wasn't ready for Communism). Radical religion is doing something similar: It offers a social identity to those excluded (or who feel excluded) from the dominant system of Western enlightenment capitalism. It is a modern response to a modern problem, and by making it seem like some medieval holdover, we cover up the way in which our social power produces the conditions for this kind of identity, and make violence appear as the only response for these recalcitrant "holdouts."
I don't know how to solve this—I imagine I would have a cooler job than "medievalist" if I did—but telling people to get enlightened, or to leave behind the "medieval," is not it, and it reinforces the very kinds of identities that create radical religion. You're someone who thinks a lot about identities, and I hope that this can be part of your consideration when you think about the shitty kinds of religion that cause terrible pain (and death) among LGBTQ people. I've come to believe that real social change is going to come through sexual revolution, and maybe through getting rid of identity as we know it altogether. So for the goal of a sexy utopia in the future, don't call these shitty religions "medieval." And sorry for such a long letter, but it allowed me to put off my grading for a while. 
Best, 
Middle Eastern Dude Is Entirely Victorian, Alright? First, I must apologize. I ramble when I'm nervous and I'm quite nervous, as I'm a big fan of yours, and my girlfriend—the lady I'm writing about—is too, but maybe her seeing this will help.
So, I've had a pretty weird sex life. I'm a repeated male victim of rape, and as a fat guy who grew up very poor and surrounded by rich kids, I viewed pretty much every good, consenting sexual encounter as probably the last one I'd ever have unless I rocked at it. So I'd always been all about my partner's pleasure, no matter what it takes—if they like, it maybe they'll come back.
It worked for a long time. My late teens and early 20s were full of loving relationships and a great sex life. Then, when I turned 22, my longtime girlfriend sort of lost her mind. Not in the way guys talk about women being crazy, but actually beating me with objects and raping me when I couldn't resist anymore—that degree of crazy. When I managed to get free, I left, but my sex drive died. I didn't date. I didn't flirt (which is hard for me to not do, as to this day I'm still fat and poor, but I pride myself on being charming). I didn't even masturbate for a few years. When I decided to get back into dating, I was unemployed, living with my mother, in the worst shape of my life, and in therapy for trying to get used to being touched again.
I went the online route, through gaming and dating sites, and through three disastrous online relationships (including one where the 22-year-old girl ended up being a 34-year-old married man), I finally ended up with a woman I'd call the love of my life. I moved across the country for her and don't regret it—things are mostly pretty great!
But there's the bedroom.
She's a good lover. I love the intimacy and I love, well, being with someone I love. It's much better than being with a willing body. There are snafus and struggles here and there, but the issue comes down to the title of this e-mail: I will be 30 years old in eight months. Between serving my lovers and being raped, I have no idea what a blowjob feels like. I don't know if she finds them gross—I'm not circumcised and I figured that was the issue, but I'm very, very clean, and she says she doesn't care, but she just doesn't want to do them. She's cited a sensitive gag reflex as one of the main reasons, but, well, I'm not exactly John Holmes. Or even remotely close. Frankly, I've seen her eat corn dogs that put me to shame. We've spoken to a couple's therapist, who, on the side, encouraged me to stray to find out what it was like because "every man deserves good head at some point," despite us telling her that we are monogamous. Upon telling that to my girlfriend, well, let's just say we only talk to the therapist together now.
I basically am just trying to find someone's advice. The relationship is monogamous, and I love her to death, but she's said, flatly, no blowjobs ever, and I don't know if I'm putting an overemphasis on how good/important they are, but I'd also like to know for myself at least one time. What should I do?
I am a 32 year-old straight woman, in a new relationship with an amazing 32 year-old man.   
The (overly) detailed backstory: We met online one month ago. He travels for work, and when we began talking he was at a job two hours away from me. We texted (a lot) for a couple days, then talked on the phone for two hours, then texted more, and FaceTimed, and one week after first connecting, he spent a weekend with me in between jobs. The weekend was amazing. We connect intellectually, have similar senses of humor, have overlapping values and interests, are physically into each other, etc. One thing I love about him is that he is a good communicator. Another thing I love is that he is sensitive. Even before we met for the first time, we talked about the kind of relationship we would each want to be able to have, about being able to talk to each other rather than just shutting down or blowing up.
After that first weekend, he was away for a couple weeks, during which time we continued to talk every day.  He visited me again after that second job, and we had another magical weekend.  He is currently at a job that is two hours away from me again, and I just visited him this past weekend.  After this job he has five months off, and will return to his permanent residence, which is eight hours away from me.  I am in graduate school, so I am about to have the summer off, and we have been planning to spend a couple weeks together at his place during that time. Essentially, we are at the beginning of what is shaping up to be a serious, long-term, long-distance relationship.  In fact, I feel it may be the serious, long-term relationship, if you follow.  I will be finished with school in one year, and we are approaching the point of deciding whether this is a relationship worth putting through the trials and tribulations of long-distance for the next year.
During our more serious conversations, we have talked about past relationships and hurts, as people tend to do. He told me about a past girlfriend who had an abortion without telling him, then told him after the fact, and broke up with him, and then tried to get back together.
The rest of this epic letter—and my response—after the jump...
He told me this story because we had decided (during our second weekend together) that he would pull-out instead of using a condom. It was my idea. He asked what I would do if I got pregnant, and I said I would have the baby, which I would. The fucked up thing here, is that I had an accidental pregnancy with the only long-term boyfriend I ever had, which was seven years ago, and I had an abortion, but I didn’t even remember this until he told me about his own experience with his ex. I know it sounds ridiculous, but when I think back to the moment when he asked what I would do if I got pregnant, I don’t remember thinking about my past experience, I just remember thinking, “of course I would keep it, I think I am in love with this person.”   
Afterwards he explained that he had had what he described as "a traumatic experience," and proceeded to tell the ex-girlfriend abortion story. As soon as he said the word ‘abortion,’ I remembered my own, and I felt immediately guilty and awful. (It wasn’t until later that I realized how delayed I was in recalling this, but when I think back to how I had to deal with the whole thing on my own, and how matter-of-fact and robotic I was about it all, I guess I was partially in shock or denial, and that I had buried the experience.) Part of me wanted to blurt it out to him right then, but I didn’t want it to seem like I was one-upping his hurt or just turning the conversation to me or something like that, so I didn’t say anything. Perhaps more truthfully though, I didn’t say anything because I realized that I had just engaged in (and even instigated) the same kind of reckless behavior that led to my pregnancy and abortion seven years ago. 
This past weekend, he told me that he had been married when he was 23. There is a whole separate story there, but after telling it, I could tell he felt vulnerable, and that maybe he was worried about what my reaction might be. I thought again about telling him about my abortion, but again it felt weird to say it just as a response to him telling me something difficult and personal, so again, I kept it to myself.
Nobody except my ex-boyfriend (and the folks at Planned Parenthood) knows about my abortion, so I don’t really have anyone to talk to about this. I want to tell him (current man), because I feel like not telling him is dishonest, but that also seems selfish, and like I am just looking for absolution or forgiveness or something.  I want to tell him because I want him to know me the way he is letting me know him, but the things he has told me don’t reflect on him the way my story does on me. He has told me about failed relationships, and mistakes, and being hurt, but I feel like my story just shows me to be a reckless person who doesn’t learn from her mistakes. And the worst part of my mistake is that it doesn’t just affect me, so it’s like I am being careless with him, which is a million times worse. But, if I were to get pregnant now, I know that I would keep the baby, so does that make it different? 
If this relationship is what I think it is, I feel I should tell him. I am kind of a compulsive truth-teller, so the thought of keeping this from someone I want to be as close as I can with just seems wrong, but again, is that just a justification for my selfish need to have someone tell me I am not a horrible, stupid person?  Would it just hurt or confuse him if I told him? And the other part is, of course, what will he think of me?  It’s not the fact that I had an abortion that I am ashamed of, and it’s not what he might think of me for that that I am afraid to know.  It was a horrible position I put myself in, and a horrible experience that is punishment enough, so that I know I shouldn't be beating myself up about making the decision I made. It's the fact that I allowed this to happen once, and am still being irresponsible in the same way that I am ashamed and embarrassed about. Either way, though, I feel that now this has come back up, and I have this decision to make, and I just want to make sure I do the best thing for the right reason.  I want this person to be in my life, in a big way, but I also need to be able to live with myself.  If he's the person I think he is, I feel I should be able to tell him without fear of judgment, but is it right to put him in that position? Now this memory has come back to me, I feel like I need to resolve it, but maybe putting it on him isn't how I should do that?
Thanks to whoever reads this.
Originally posted on May 23, 2012. 
I'm a 17-year-old girl and, in most aspects, I'm confident with myself, my identity, and my body. Earlier this year, I met a girl. She had some serious drama at home and needed to get out of her house, so I let her stay at mine. Things went a LOT further than I was ready for. I had just had my first kiss the month before and I didn't feel like our relationship was ready for sex, but I went along with it because she never gave me a chance to slow things down or say no.
My feelings for her are gone; she is attractive, but we don't connect. But she has feelings for me. How can I get her to understand, or at least respect, how I feel if she doesn't understand why this was a big deal for me?

So let me start with saying I only started listening to your show in January of this year. Love the show and being on the road a lot for work, I have listened to about 75 of your podcasts. 
First is political, I had a rough time last year volunteering to get Clinton elected after changing my registration from Republican to Democrat. I just wished I would have listened to Episode 500 before today. Your explanation of Green/Libertarian/etc. only running for president would have been a huge help in conversations I had last year. And taking over the grassroots campaign in my area, I love hearing I'm not the only frustrated—albeit new—Democrat. Though I live in a county where 75% of the votes went to that pussy-grabbing, Putin-sucking orange shitbag.
Second is follow up from the election. My wife, the self-described flaming liberal, women's rights activist, and every other leftist label you can give, had and is understandably still having a very difficult time. The eletion—all of last year—was a highly emotional time for us. We got married, we hosted her brother's wedding (who in turn blamed us and my mother-in-law for ruining it), there was a legal problem with a family member, and then the election and inauguration. You can imagine. I pushed her and she finally agreed to see a psychologist. 
As newlyweds, our sex life diminished because her brother and his fiancé (at the time) were living with us for several months between our wedding and theirs. We both work full time and there's continuing emotional trauma due to election and family drama. I do as much as I can short of tying her up (which I would like to do) and fucking her until neither of us can walk. But when I raise the issue she turns me down, says we'll do it later, or has a meltdown which makes me feel awful for even wanting sex. I feel terrible pushing the issue but sex once a week (max) for over a year has me humping the couch. What do I do? Or am I being a dick?
Originally posted on May 23, 2012. 
I'm a 17-year-old girl and, in most aspects, I'm confident with myself, my identity, and my body. Earlier this year, I met a girl. She had some serious drama at home and needed to get out of her house, so I let her stay at mine. Things went a LOT further than I was ready for. I had just had my first kiss the month before and I didn't feel like our relationship was ready for sex, but I went along with it because she never gave me a chance to slow things down or say no.
My feelings for her are gone; she is attractive, but we don't connect. But she has feelings for me. How can I get her to understand, or at least respect, how I feel if she doesn't understand why this was a big deal for me?
Originally posted on December 19, 2012.
I am gay and I have a brother who's gay. The problem is, he is very much into humiliation. He exposes himself online and allows his online "masters" to have control over his pictures and videos. I found his pictures recently, and the embarrassment and humiliation were a huge turn-on for him. (In real life, we've never shown any interest sexually in each other whatsoever. But when he asked if I had any naked pictures, I told him I did and sent some to him, and somehow that was a bit of a turn-on, I must admit.) On to the real problem: Soon, my brother told me that he felt really guilty, cleaned up his hard drive, deleted all his pics and mine and asked me to do the same, and swore off playing online. But I found evidence that he's resumed this habit. This has been a pattern for him, he says, and he insists he was somehow damaged in childhood. I told him I see him as my kinky brother and that he might be happier if he could just accept himself. But I don't think he should quit his "addiction" cold turkey, as it hasn't worked in the past.
Originally posted on September 5, 2012.
I've been dating someone for a little more than two months. After the second week, he was saying things like "We need a word between 'like' and 'love' because 'I like you' doesn't seem sufficient." After weeks of telling him to slow his roll, I agreed to make it official and stop dating and sleeping with other guys because he wanted to "lock it down." It's been a week, and he's still on Scruff and Growlr. I'm a little put off because he was the one who pushed for exclusivity and the title of boyfriend. Should I be concerned? Can hookup apps be part of a healthy, monogamous relationship? Obviously a talk is needed.
I'm home and listening to opera. While listening I was contemplating some issues my wife and I discussed recently. We are both bi and have been together 11 years. What came up was penis size and essentially tight clothing. When I wear tight jeans my cock is obviously showing, even when completely soft. Imagine The Stones' "Sticky fingers" album cover, just bigger. We both know this and enjoy the attention I get. What this discussion brought up was my reluctance to go to strip clubs because when I get aroused my cock seems to grab everyone's attention. This seems great but I don't want to freak out the dancers or other customers. I know visible turgidity isn’t an issue legally, but honestly, I'm at the strip club to enjoy the dancers and I don’t want to distract attention away from them. That's really it.
I'm wondering if this is the right place to ask a question for the show or if I MUST call? Either way, I'm just wondering: I identify as a queer female, having dated men and women almost in equal measure. Lately I'm finding that my fantasies are changing gears: I'm fantasizing about gay men, watching gay porn, feeling particularly sexual toward my gay male friends. I want to have intercourse with gay men. Is this insane and impossible? Might it be offensive to gay men that I'm actively trying to figure out how to satisfy my needs in this way? Is it unlikely that any gay men would be willing to get naked with a girl (and like it?)? I suppose one solution is to seek out a bisexual man, but is there anything else you'd recommend? What is the most ethical way to operate here?
Girl's Originally posted on May 09, 2012.I am a 26-year-old straight guy. My straightness and guyness are recent revelations, and it feels amazing to be able to confidently state this. Here is my trouble: I've had gender issues for the past five years. My now ex-girlfriend of three years said she couldn't be with me anymore due to these issues. Our breakup was a result of my apathy in the bedroom, which was tied to my gender issues, and her fears of me transitioning into a woman. I can see now that my insecurities about myself caused me to be a selfish partner in many ways, but mainly in the bedroom. I now realize I was allowing my sexual kinks to get the best of me. I get very turned on by the idea of giving head to a guy, but in reality it is not something that I enjoy. I also find lingerie to be very arousing. I allowed myself to focus so heavily on those aspects of my sexuality that I became insecure in my masculinity inside and outside of the bedroom. I also ended up ignoring the majority of my sexual desires as a result of my insecurity in my gender identity. I have now stopped repressing my lust toward women in general, something I had been doing that negatively affected my ex.
I am asking you, I suppose, for some advice. I am still in love with my ex. I am prepared now to be the boyfriend that she wanted me to be. But how do I prove to her that I am no longer the apathetic, distant, and repressed lover that she was with for three years? I find myself overwhelmed with regret. She saw me as someone who couldn't do the things she needed, when in reality I was just paralyzed by my insecurities.
This is a bit of a long, fucked-up story.
I've been having an affair with a older married woman with three kids for the past 10+ years. She claims her husband doesn't know about us, that she doesn't have sex with him anymore, and that she sleeps in a separate room. She requires me to be monogamous to her and, hence, doesn't allow me to date anyone else. You might wonder why on earth I put up with this, but we get along amazingly well. She's witty, funny, clever, intelligent, and drop-dead sexy. She's the best friend I've ever had. Every time we're together—if I'm not depressed—the conversation just flows. Plus the sex is pretty great, although she's not as kinky as I am and is a bit reluctant to do stuff I would like to do. Finally, and maybe most importantly, we've both made sacrifices to be together: I've turned down jobs that would require me to move overseas, and she's completely changed her career to be with me. So, in many senses, it's much more like a real relationship rather than an affair. It's just we can't easily go on holidays together, we rarely spend the night together, and we don't often get to spend the evenings together.
Why am I writing? Because I feel like my life is slipping by, and I'm not entirely happy. I don't like being alone in the evenings. To cope with the situation, I drink too much in the evenings. It's hard for me to have friends, as by nature I like to be friends with women, but the woman I'm seeing gets insanely jealous and assumes I'm trying to fuck them. I'm 38 and would like to be married. I don't have any kids, and I'm not sure I actually want kids, but I would like the option of having kids. (I'm an only child, and it would make my parents so happy if I did have kids; they occasionally drop the passive-aggressive comment about me being the "end of the line.") The married woman I'm seeing did get pregnant by me, twice, and decided to have abortions both times, rather than actually open up a conversation with me about whether we should start a full and proper life together and raise a family. She's past childbearing age now so there's no chance any longer of us having kids together.
The rest of the letter... and my response... after the jump.
Setting aside the issue of kids, I would also just like to be able to go on a holiday with someone without having to engage in the cloak-and-dagger planning rituals. I would like to host dinner parties with friends—you know, all the stuff that normal couples do. Why don't I leave? See earlier remark about her being the best friend I've ever had. I can't imagine a life without her. Besides, I've tried to leave her several times in the past for other people, but have never been able to do it. No one compares to her.
This is where things get interesting. About a month ago, a 27-year-old woman made a pass at me. I was at a low point, and so I decided to follow it up and see where it went. We started emailing, texting, then sexting, then had sex. This new person is like a sexual godsend for me. She's willing to do absolutely anything (bondage, watersports, anal play, and she says she would happily have threesomes and group sex), and she calls herself my "sex slave." She has also said she wants to have kids at some point in the future and, since she's really into me, she said she would like to have kids with me. From the very beginning, I was honest and open with her about the married woman I was seeing—which was hard for her to take, but I told her that I couldn't walk away from a 10+ year relationship for a relatively unknown stranger. So she's reluctantly agreed to put up with the situation for a little while until we get to know each other better. She the first person I've met in 10 years that I can actually imagine leaving the married woman for.
But this is the problem: I can't really talk to the 27-year old. There's a small language barrier (English isn't her native language) but, really, it's that she's not talkative, she doesn't ask questions, and she doesn't seem to want to talk about the news, or books, or films. She says she's not this way with other people, but that, for some reason, it's hard for her to talk to me. I suspect she could be good to talk to, as she's funny and chatty over text, but in person it's just weird, awkward silences a lot of the time. Furthermore, the age gap, while great from a kink perspective, is just enough that it makes cultural references hard to share.  
So, that's the problem. On one hand, I've got the perfect intellectual match who—if I could marry—I would love to spend the rest of my life with. But she won't leave her husband to be with me. (Trust me, I've asked her many times. She's made and broken so many promises to leave I can't count them anymore.) On the other hand, I've got the perfect sexual match who I probably could marry and have kids with and a normal life with, but whom I can't really talk to, and whom being with requires giving up my best friend.
Not sure what advice you might have (see a shrink?), but I'd love to hear it.  
A bit of back story: I'm in my 20s, a female lesbian, who recently was asked by a stranger I met on a dating site to use his consenting slave financially—and he invited me to use his slave's apartment as part of their slavery agreement. I've never done anything like this before, but I am planning on using him/his space for organizing a small non-profit that I run because it's awesome when kinks can help end social inequality, right? But how much investigation should I do into the nature of their relationship and whether the slave thing is fully consensual? Are there certain questions I should ask? It's a no-sex agreement also! Hope you reply, really wondering about this!
My fiancé claims that after almost six years of being together, he still does not know what he is doing in bed. Our sex life is super vanilla, but the quality of the orgasm is stellar. He knows to get me off he needs to finger my clit while tonguing my nipples. And he is great at it! Great to the point I am sure the neighbors know his name. And he just loves it when I am on top, where he can see my boobs bounce around. 
One problem with our sex life is that I have a high sex drive, as in I could go three times a day every day, while my fiancé could go weeks without sex—with me. He would be fine as long as he could masturbate. I sometimes masturbate, but I do not prefer to do so because the orgasms are better with my fiancé. Plus it takes a lot more to get me there when I am alone with myself, my toys, and my porn. My fiancé, on the other hand, will happily masturbate in front of his computer in the next room while I am in our bed waiting for him. 
I know he is partially being selfish about this because he's squeamish and likes the easier "clean up." (Masturbating into an old pair of boxers isn't as messy as actual sex.) But I also feel the real reason he prefers masturbation over sex with me is because he can engage in his breast enlargement fetish. He likes to see videos of women with their breasts expanding to the point where the woman is basically immobilized. I cannot fake that to fix our sex life, Dan, and he is not interested in watching his porn with me.
So what can I do to engage his fetish more in bed? Isn't there something?
So I'm just gonna get straight to the point: My boyfriend told me that he would like to be pegged. We talked about it a lot, and it's both something we have never done before. We haven't been together too long, so firstly, should we be experimenting with other stuff first? We have both never really had any play in the anal area, which scares me. I have no idea how to initiate this kind of play. Like obviously we have to go buy a strap-on and stuff, but how do we transition from pretty normalish sex to me ramming something into his butthole? (What size or type of strap-on?! Where do you even go and buy stuff like that?!) Like what's the middle ground here?! Is there even middle ground? Would that make it easier if we were both experimenting with each other's butts? Also. How does one get ready to have something in their butt? I just keep picturing being behind him, with him bent over and me freezing because I have no idea what to do!

Okay, it has been literally years since I first wrote to you.
I'm now 24, no longer a virgin, and I'm living in London. I've slept with long-term boyfriends and had my share of DFMOs. Fairly sure I'm not a lesbian, but am somewhere along the spectrum of being interested in women. I know you call people like me unicorns, but I'm not quite that. I've always wondered what being with a woman is like, and I think I'd like to explore that. I'm looking for a woman or a couple to help me explore these w4w tendencies. I've never seen advice that quite applies to my situation (particularly the first question):
1. How do I find people looking for the above outside the US? Ideally anonymity at first is important, as I'm very nervous and would need some contact before meeting them.
2. What are the precautions I should take? I've contacted a couple of people on Craigslist, but don't want to end up in a ditch somewhere. At the same time, I'd rather not tell real life people.
My letter appeared in your column last week. I was the guy wondering what was up with the "straight" guy whose online personal ad said he had "an addiction to massive cocks in my ass." You said that the guy was most likely bi (and rounding down to straight), might be gay (and flying a false flag), but there was a very, very small chance he was actually straight (and turned on by the violation or doing "forced bi" for a dominant girlfriend).
I took your advice and sent the guy a message and he replied. I thought your readers would like to hear it directly from him: "Sorry for the delay. Dan was actually correct when he suggested that I was rounding down. At the core of it, I am bi. I am lucky to have a girlfriend that accepts and embraces me for me. I guess it could be considered a marketing ploy to brand myself as 'straight,' though I do identify as a straight male for the majority of my day."
So good call, Dan!
And guess what? The guy is a "Savage Love" reader! Before I messaged him his profile had been updated with this: "Straight with an addiction to massive cocks in my ass. Just read someone asked Dan Savage about the legitimacy of my ad, and yes, I'm real and serious." His ad is here.
I am 28, a woman, in law school, and have a history of PTSD which makes me wonder if I am inventing reasons to be upset...
I also have an incredibly high sex drive. I mean like it's ridiculous I have never met my match. I'm a two, three times a day kind of gal. Vanilla, kinky, whatever, I just love to fuck. I also try to be realistic about the odds of finding a partner who wants to fuck as much as I do. I have a set of vibrators and lots of batteries and have no problem taking care of my own needs, but I greatly prefer partnered sex. It's just so much more satisfying. 
I am dating a 38-year-old man who is kind, supportive, loving, and hilarious. He is also very distant emotionally and physically sometimes. It's weird, it's like a switch that turns on and off. He is fully present and loving and amazing most of the time and then for days or weeks he will tap out and just be gone, hard to reach out to, impossible to engage with.
We started dating in October, and very quickly started having issues with him being unable to maintain an erection during penetrative sex. I brought it up (gently, I hope) three (!!!) times, and he was somewhat responsive but not really willing to discuss the issue. By January I was feeling extremely alienated and rejected, and I broke up with him without specifically saying it was about the sex. I thought that would have been cruel.
On Valentines Day he texted me.
The rest of the letter—and my response—after the jump.
He asked me out for a drink and we ended up having incredible marathon sex that blew my mind and was everything I had been looking for while we had been dating. I'm talking like six hours of mutual oral, vaginal penetration (yes, please!), orgasms galore (both of us!), eye contact, dirty talk—the full nine. It was the best sex of my life, not only physically but also because it was with someone I care about so deeply.  We got back together after about a month of dating and awesome sex. Two, maybe three weeks back in, the impotence issues are recurring. He just doesn't seem to be able to hold on to his erection for long enough for either of us to come. 
I am starting to take it pretty personally (again) and am wondering what the fuck is going on. Am I a jerk? (I'm not a jerk.) Am I ugly? (I'm not ugly at all.) Am I doing something horrible that totally turns him off? (I'm doing all the same things he loves when he is able to be responsive.) I hesitate to bring it up with him yet again. I don't want to destroy his confidence or imply that there is something wrong with him. I don't want to medicalize his sexuality. But this is killing me. I fucking love this man he is incredible and such an impressive person. I want to be with him. Fuck I want to marry him. 
So my question is: What the fuck do I do? Tell him to see a shrink? Tell him I'm worried I will cheat on him? Break up with him? He is not a motherfucker so DTMFA is not applicable. Is it just that he's in his 40's and this kind of thing is to be expected? My #1 goal is to not hurt him with any kind of accusatory language. But Dan I need to fuck. And I'm worried that I will eventually take care of that need with an outside party. 
The only reason I am asking you what to do is that from my research on the subject it seems like we are a textbook case. But there is no textbook answer. Impotence and performance anxiety seem to be huge issues for a lot of men. I want to be supportive and I also want to fuck my boyfriend. Do you have any idea what might be going on?  Am I being an asshole? Am I overreacting? Am I taking it too personally? Am I being too demanding? We have sex about once a week currently. Maybe half of those (if lucky) we are successful. 
Should I just suck his dick more? Is this a lost cause? Is he being an asshole?
I'm a 53-year-old straight male in a long term "exclusive-ish" committed relationship. I say "exclusive-ish" because a few times a year we'll have a third join us for a 3way. So far, the third has always been male, but my better half is open to the idea of that third being female so long as she isn't the one doing the asking. As you can imagine, the possibilities of a willing woman falling into our lap is about as likely as winning the lottery. Consequently, the idea is just an unrealized fantasy of mine. However, this weekend I got a strong vibe that this younger woman was flirting with us. She was probably at the youngest 25 and at the oldest 32.
This isn't a fantasy I'm obsessed with, so I don't think I'm projecting or imagining things through a distorted lens, but I also don't want to make an ass out of myself and come off as the old creepy guy either. So I'll lay out what happened as briefly as possible and maybe you can tell me if I need to forget about it all or risk looking like a fool and try making some inroads should I encounter her again?
The rest of DADDY's long, long letter—and my short, short response—after the jump...
We were at the local casino we frequent a few times a month and this woman sits next to me at a slot machine and starts chatting me up like were old friends. My wife is to my left, she is to my right and standing behind her is her boyfriend or husband, I don't know which. I know I've never seen this woman before in my life and she is saying things like, "Oh, we see you guys here all the time," and "You guys are so nice", blah, blah, blah, just general conversation, but she's leaning in to me and making long eye contact.
She seems perfectly sober by the way.
She sat there next to me for about an hour or so, and I really didn't think anything about her as being anything other than just a really friendly person, until later. Her husband or boyfriend seemed like the shy, quiet type and he didn't say anything at all, nor did he seem to be bothered by her overt friendliness to me either. He just stood behind her the whole time.
She got up and they left and after another hour or so we decided to head home. Had I not seen her again I probably would have forgotten her altogether. We were standing in line to cash in our ticket and she comes up and grabs my arm or taps my shoulder, and is standing close asking if we won and telling me about her bad luck, but she's smiling and making serious eye contact. The boyfriend or husband was standing several feet away and again with no input. Then, as she was walking away she stops and turns around and waves again.
I don't know, as I type this all sounds completely innocent, but I don't usually mess up signals from people either. Just to add a few more details: We are a fairly attractive couple for 53 and 48 years old, both in good shape, fit and all. The younger woman had a very pretty face, but she was not in shape and her boyfriend or husband was average looking. I'd guess they were both 28ish.
So Dan, am I seeing this event through the rose colored glasses of a 53-year-old man who is thinking with his cock and not his brain? Do I need to just forget the whole thing, or should I take a chance and try to inject the fact that we might be game for some fun with her, or them for that matter, if we run into them again?  She did say, "We see you guys all the time," so I guess we'll see them again at our casino.
My boyfriend of almost three years broke up with me before Thanksgiving. But now we are trying to work things out. He is my first and only, I love him dearly, and I want to spend the rest of my life with him. He is a Gemini, he has been with countless women before me, and he recently opened up to me about his need for two women. He says that he loves me and wants to be with me, but he gets bored easily and needs the extra excitement of a third joining us in the bedroom if he is to be monogamous. He also had younger twin sisters which he says explains the reason he needs to women at once. We're looking at spending the rest of our lives together, but its extremely important for him that I be OK with occasionally bringing another woman into the bedroom.
Before I met him, I was planning to wait until marriage and had extreme anxiety around sex. He has slowly pulled me out of my shell in the bedroom and now I have a sex drive almost as great as his and enjoy experimenting and variety just as much as he does. However, I am a Leo and get extremely jealous. I'm even jealous when it comes to his friends who are girls. The thought of him looking at another woman, much less the idea of watching him screw one in front of me, makes me physically sick. I'm not sure if I can go through with it and I can't predict I'll be able to handle what would happen if we did go through with it. I want to cater to his desires and make him the happiest man in the world, but I have no idea where to even begin getting over my fears. It's also really hard to talk to anyone even my closest friends about because they all just tell me to leave him and that I deserve better. He doesn't judge me for my kinks and I don't want to judge him for his. I just want to be able to please him without hurting myself. HELP.
I hope I can get your opinion on my current situation.
I'll try to be as concise as possible. I'm a 26-year-old woman. Three years ago, I had a three-way with my 35-year-old fiancé and this nice girl he knew from high school. Let's call him "Bob" and her "Sally." The condom broke and Sally wound up pregnant despite using Plan B. Sally gave birth to a girl. For the first two years of the baby's life, Sally would NOT allow Bob to see the baby or be involved in any way. (She's Christian and she was embarrassed about conceiving during a three-way.)
Lately, Sally and Bob have been talking and now Sally is allowing Bob to see his daughter. I know there's no one to blame for this—the condom was used correctly but failed—but I'm still having kind of a hard time with it. Bob and I were planning on doing this (having a baby) for the first time with each other one day. Now i'm suddenly a stepmom. Bob has been seeing his daughter pretty frequently since Sally has been in contact with us. He's always so excited, so I feel I can't say anything about how bummed it makes me.
Any advice or thoughts you may have would be great. Is it wrong that my heart is breaking? I feel so selfish that I'm still somewhat skeptical of Sally's motives. I'm open to being disproven, but this is still pretty out of the blue.
Can you PLEASE describe life with Terry? Because I want to hear from the gay horse's mouth directly that ingesting your "husband's" feces on a regular "monogamish" basis is really what you meant by "it gets better."
The good news is that your pretend gay "marriage" has no legitimate legacy. Once you and Terry are gone who is going to care about remembering that two very damaged men played pretend house for a few decades and brought a child into the mix to make the adults feel more secure about their pretend family unit? Not the kid Terry raised who will one day be so busy in his own pretend gay "marriage" that he couldn't possibly be bothered to show up and throw dirt on a box in a hole. That might interrupt his Margaret Cho-inspired fisting class. The day after one of you dies the other will be in the arms of another man and will seek to play pretend house again until they pass. It's sad you actually think that what you turned your life into is anything other than a pathetic and sad mess. You couldn't be happy with just destroying your life and that of your so-called wi-band/hus-fe. You had to being a child into the mix in order to convince yourself that your made-up family is some how not a made up group of sad men playing pretend.
It gets better when you don't believe the lie that being gay is some how important in any meaningful way!
So my hubby and I have been together 20 years. The messages have been mixed. He's attracted to women much older than myself and much closer in age to him—we have a 20 year age difference—and he's also attracted to men. He had a terrible time trying to come to grips with his own sexuality and his inability to reconcile who he was with who he "was supposed to be" got mixed up into shame, guilt, infidelity, and addiction. Fine. Wherever. His sexuality did nothing but turn me on and help me overcome some of my own hangups. I have been through my own ringer. I cheated on him. I lied about the fact that he was my first. After my own affair I became a prostitute—with his befuddled blessing—but all of that is over. Now he wants me to be a hotwife. I want to be his sub. He has issues with being a Dom and I have issues fucking strangers. Can you refer us in a direction we can start from? I am excited for us to move on without hangups and shame and he can't get past the negative.
Bored, Dull, Sad, Originally posted on November 20, 2013. 
Last month at a house party, my boyfriend accidentally burned my chin, neck, and cleavage during a clumsily executed volcano shot. I was literally on fire for a few seconds. Some doctor appointments, burn creams, bandages, and awkward scabbing later, I'm healing nicely. My problem is, our sex life has become much more complicated. Before the accident, we were having sex only every week or so. But now he stares sadly at my neck wound (which still has a red line going down it) every time he looks at me. It's very hard to feel sexy when you're constantly looked at with pity, regret, and concern, and the stress of being sexually frustrated is fueling other stresses. I just want a way out of this sad circle we've found ourselves in.
Originally posted on November 27, 2013.
How stupid would it be to sleep with my boss's gorgeous 18-year-old son? My boss has become a mentor to me. He and his wife have welcomed me into their home, which includes their aforementioned son, a high-school senior. I am a 23-year-old woman. Normally, I wouldn't sleep with anyone younger than 20. But besides being very attractive, my boss's son is funny, kind, and sweet. He's also incredibly horny and has some serious unexplored kinks that most girls his age have no interest in. I want to spend the next few months fucking my boss's son—bearing in mind and honoring, of course, your campsite rule. Here are the two problems as I see them: (1) Fucking around with your boss's kid seems like a surefire way to seriously wreck your relationship with your boss. (2) He is still in high school.
Originally posted on December 11, 2013. 
I'm a straight woman who loves my boyfriend, but sex isn't a priority for me. His sex drive, on the other hand, is ridiculous. He gets very upset when I don't have sex with him and accuses me of not being interested in him anymore, which isn't the case. I just can't fuck on demand! Most people would probably say that my boyfriend is an insensitive asshole for pressuring me for sex. Except this was a switcheroo exercise: I, the girlfriend, want more sex. He, my boyfriend, doesn't see sex as a priority. When we first started dating, we had sex every day—it was incredible—but around the four-month mark, something changed. I've had to beg for it ever since—and I mean beg. I give him space, I take care of things on my own for as long as I can, and right around the time when I feel myself start to get really anxious, I ask for sex. And I am rejected. Only when I'm so hurt that I'm literally sobbing on the floor is he suddenly interested in having sex with me. Right then, right there. It happens about twice a month. I don't know what to do. I love him so much and would be a fool to leave him. Other than the sex, everything is wonderful. He is the best and most thoughtful boyfriend ever, but he says he likes being the one who's controlling the sex. Maybe I am just being a colossal asshole? My problem sounds mundane, I know, but it's killing me.
Originally posted on June 6, 2012.
Could you tell my boy to calm the heck down? Can't seem to get him to get the difference between bestiality, necrophilia, and screwin' a bearskin rug. Emphasizing my usual sexual interests—which involve rope bondage, floggin', and an e-stim unit—hasn't worked.
I'm a gay man and a hunter; he's a gay boy and a vegan. But he likes how I look in my camo, holding a rifle, so it works. Last fall, I went to Idaho and shot a bear. A taxidermist made the bear into a rug. Most people don't know this, but the head on a bearskin rug is entirely fake except for the fur. The skull, teeth, and tongue are plastic, and the eyes are glass. Bear's hardly a bear.
So he liked the rug. Even wanted me to screw him on it—until he walked in while I was doing it with the bear. I rigged up the mouth with one of those Fleshlight things, pretty much as a joke, but my boy freaked when he saw the bear giving me a blowjob. Called me sick and disgusting, and now he won't let me tie him up or anything. He says he's afraid I will kill him and screw him. What can I do?
Originally posted on July 25, 2012.
I am a 25-year-old straight woman. I recently started seeing a man. The first time I slept with him, he told me that he was interested in a relationship, and I told him that I wanted to keep things purely casual. Over the next month and a half of talking to him, hanging out, and having sex, I started to really like him. I was thinking about changing my mind and taking the relationship to the next level.
The last time I saw him was a week ago. He came over, we had sex, and then he mentioned he had met someone else. As he was beginning to elaborate, I told him to leave.
My anger comes from his timing. If he had told me this before we had sex, Dan, I would have been able to have a constructive conversation about this. The problem now, if I'm being completely honest with myself, is that I really like him and I don't want to stop seeing him.
A couple of questions: Do I reach out to him again? Did I overreact?
Originally posted on January 30, 2013.
I recently caught my boyfriend watching porn. We have talked about it before, and he said he didn't watch it while he was in a relationship. But when I caught him there with his dick in his hand, I lost it. I have never felt so hurt or betrayed. This is my first serious relationship. I can't get over how sick and sad I feel. It feels like he was cheating on me. Should I be as upset as I am? It was interactive porn—it was like he was cybersexing with one of his ex-girlfriends. What should I do?
Originally posted on February 1, 2012.
My husband is a very kinky submissive man. When we were dating, I found out that he had been talking to multiple people online and that he had met up with a professional dom a couple of times. I felt betrayed that he had done this all behind my back, even though I had told him that I would be down with him seeing a dom. (I even offered to buy him a session for his birthday!)
We got through it, and now our sex life is amazing. I tie him up, I lock his dick up, I dress him up. All I ask in return is that he be honest with me about who he's talking with online. Is that unreasonable? I know he chats with "women" online as a "woman," and I'm okay with that so long as I'm made aware of it. But today I found pictures on his phone of his cock in the chastity device I keep him in. He tried to lie but he came clean: He was chatting with a woman, it came out that he was a man, and she wanted to see pictures of his cock in his chastity belt.
Why lie? Honest to God, if he would have just told me the day he sent the pictures that he sent someone pictures of his cock, I would be okay with it! I also found another e-mail account he never told me about that he's using when he chats online as a woman. Again, no big deal! But I was under the impression that he used just this one chat program for chatting! Why hide it? My vanilla friends will be no help in this matter, and I feel pretty heartbroken. So I'm asking you.
He Isn't Originally posted on July 11, 2012. 
I'm a straight 32-year-old woman who has been in a monogamous relationship with a guy for two years. Recently, we took the plunge and moved in. Before moving in, we had experimented with some kinky stuff. (I have never come so hard or fast as the first time I fucked him in the ass with a strap-on.) Then he told me, after moving in, that he had given some thought to poly relationships before committing to me. Now I am feeling insecure about the viability of this relationship. Although he claims no desire to be in a poly situation now, I can't help but feel that I alone will ultimately not be able to fulfill him entirely. He is a soul mate who I can see growing with over time. But I worry this relationship is doomed.
I'm 40, happily married for 10 years, with the wife for 20 years. We have a good marriage, we're great friends, we have two kids, a good life. But my wife refuses to give me head. Flat-out says no. Won't do it. We have talked about it, and she says she doesn't want to and nothing I can say will ever convince her. I have tried denying her oral sex, I have tried not asking, I have tried begging. Nothing works.
I don't know what to do. Everything else is fine. I don't want an affair. It scares the hell out of me. I worry about sexual infections and I'm not sure I can just go see a sex worker. I need it to be done by a person I can get to know. But who would want to blow me regularly with no attachments or commitments?
Do you think my wife has given up the right to be mad at me for even considering this? By denying me oral, is she forcing my hand, or am I being selfish? Should I just suck it up? For lack of a better term?
I'm a gay male who's been partnered for four years, and for the last four nights my S.O. and I have been sleeping in separate beds. Money's been tight, there have been fights over that, including one last night, and our sex life has been practically nonexistent for a few months.
A couple mornings ago, as I went into the spare bedroom before leaving for work, I noticed a small bottle of poppers on the nightstand's lower shelf. Before I said good-bye to the S.O., I asked why he'd slept in there, to which he replied, "Because I felt like it." All I could think to say was, "Um... okay," and left.
Well, I had today off because of snow, and after last night's fight, I was curious. I didn't see the poppers on the nightstand, but I saw a bulky gym bag near the edge of the bed frame near the nightstand. It was filled with rather large and thick dildos, including one fisting dildo. Part of me wished Helena Bonham Carter's Marla Singer would have appeared and rolled her eyes, "Oh, don't worry. [They're] not a threat to you." But I can't use any of these myself. (I'm not much of a bottom, and the few dildos I've tried are "starters.") The ones I saw are pro-league, and I'm surprised the S.O. can enjoy them. Also: I've long known the S.O. likes nipple clamps, and I'd known about a thin sounding rod, but in my snooping I also found an extensive sounding kit. 
Again, we've been together for four years, living together for almost half of that. We've never incorporated toys into our sex besides the few times I've tried getting over my issues with bottoming. Suffice it to say, since Marla isn't sitting on my shoulder to reassure me, I am feeling threatened. Given the recent blowups, the mistrust over money, and the lack of intimacy, I'm not sure how to broach the subject. If he bought these, it's a sizable investment. If he was given them... I can't get past the shudder and even begin thinking about who might've given them to him.
He's about to go on a weekend trip tomorrow morning, and I don't know if I should say anything tonight, or wait until he returns. 
If Ben Carson thinks being gay is a choice, he should prove it by choosing to be gay himself. Christopher Halloran/I love and adore my wife, and would never stray, but I am going out of my friggin' mind because I am a kinkster (of the consensual-nonconsent and rape-play vintage with a side of ball-gag drool), yet have a very vanilla sex life. My wife knows all about my sexual predilections, does not judge them, and has tried to satisfy them, but her heart is not in it, and as a result, such attempts are epic in their non-sexiness. It's not that I don't find my wife hot. Quite the contrary, being naked with her is an instant megaboner, and I have little trouble climaxing during intercourse. But I have buttons that need to be pushed for my sex life to be truly fulfilling and satisfying in a physical and emotional sense, and that is not happening. I have resorted to masturbating with Tumblr porn on the side, which fills a physical need fleetingly, but not the emotional one, and ultimately solves nothing and is therefore depressing. In other words: If fapping fixed my problem, Dan, I would not be writing you. Now I am hitting my mid-50s without ever having fucked the way I really want (my wife is my first and last sex partner), and I'm panicking. Again, looking for the answer outside of my marriage is not an option, and I know my wife wouldn't be up for bring anyone else into our bed. Any advice?
Originally posted on December 28, 2011.
I'm a straight male in a committed live-in relationship. My girlfriend and I have sex once a week, usually on Saturday mornings. During the week, she is either too tired or too full after dinner. She often says she wants to have sex, but come 9:30 p.m., she's ready to get in bed and watch TV until she falls asleep. She asks me on a daily basis if I've masturbated in her absence. If I say no, she accuses me of lying. She has demanded to smell my hands to see if she can smell lube on them. I resent feeling interrogated and guilt-tripped over this. When I do masturbate, I always clean up after myself and I'm doing it before she gets home or after she's gone to bed. So, again, why the guilt?
Browbeating Okay, 
I've recently discovered I'm a giant gaymo through a fortunate series of events. My problem is: I don't know how to come out, I don't even want to. I don't feel queer, I just feel like myself. I've never kissed a girl, but I just KNOW I am gay and that might not be enough for some people. I know my mother will most likely accept me, but say some ignorant crap in the beginning. I have a headache thinking about explaining my gayness to my mother. I don't feel like dealing with her state of grief over her dead straight daughter. Also I'm angry that it might not be safe being open at my university. Some of the men I know might not respond well and when men don't respond well women don't always have a happy ending. I've been yelled at because I've said no to sex with male classmates (he wanted a reason for rejecting him), what happens if they find out about my sexuality? I've dated a guy for FOUR extra months because I didn't have a good enough reason saying I didn't want to go on a fourth date. The reason was I was questioning my sexuality and needed some time alone, but that was none of his fucking business. He wanted a reason and cause I didn't have one I kept on dating him until I found another. I'm not even sure if I'm lesbian or bi. I just know I 100% want to date some women.
In the end, I know I should come out, but I don't know how. Do I give my Mom a letter? Do I make a cake? Should I start living in the closet until she asks why I'm there? Am I open at home and closeted at school?
An important note: I live with my Mom and have one more year until I can move out. So I will have to deal with the effects of coming out immediately.
Open & From listening to your podcast, I know you appreciate feedback from the people you have given advice to, so here you have an update from the poor guy who (according to many comments to my letter) was being fooled by a pimp and a prostitute.
To recap: I met an escort, we experienced what seemed to be a mutual attraction on the first fuck, and she then invited me to go see Fifty Shades of Grey with her. A date. I took your advice and took her to the movie... after spending the night before at her place. I wound up spending the night with her again. We got irritated looks from some of the old women at the screening—they did not approve of her acting submissive toward me (just some hair pulling and making out)—but, hey, the reason she asked me to go see the movie at all was because during our first encounter I told her I was a dominant sadist. And after the movie, she was in the mood for trying out BDSM for herself—and now I've been introduced to her sister and her friends as the man she is dating, and as her "Mr. Grey" to some of her closer friends. And we've been seeing a lot more of each other since that movie date. I have no idea where the relationship between us is going, but we enjoy each other. We are two fucked-up people finding pleasure and company together—we just happened to meet in an unusual way. Thanks for advising me to go on the date, Dan.
And in response to some of the comments: No, she didn't want me to smuggle drugs up my ass. No, she didn't have a pimp who wanted to blackmail me. No, my letter was not viral marketing for the movie. Yes, I know it sounds like something made up—but sometimes reality surprises you. The moral of my story: Found someone you like and that person likes you back? Don't fucking worry about how you met and just see where it leads.
Gay male, Magnum listener, 36-years-old, and from Slovenia here. My boyfriend and I are 17 years in a relationship. How do you make sucking same cock for 17 years interesting again? Bye!
I am a pansexual female in my early 20s, and I have been an emetophile since maybe when I was six. I remember seeing pregnant women on TV dramas throwing up and feeling a weird warm sensation in my crotch area, like I want to pee, but I don't need to pee. In my teenage years I started associating that with sex, and realized this is a fetish. Nowadays, when I want to watch porn, 95% of the time just look at videos of people, mostly girls, vomiting. Things like "the milk challenge" and "bulimia aversion videos" are pretty useful to getting me off. I don't like vomit porn that include scat play or deepthroating very much. It's pretty hard to find new porn for my kink. I've probably seen all the people-vomiting-on-each-other-and-rubbing-vomit-all-over porn searchable by Bing.
My boyfriend and I have been dating for a year, and he's great. I introduced him to Savage Love. He knew about pegging and fantasized about being pegged before he knew about you. I told him about my fetish, and he luckily isn't grossed out by vomit and is capable of pushing stomach contents up just by controlling his muscles when he's fairly full. There has been a few times where he's had a big meal before sex, and he vomited for me to watch. He gets turned on by how turned on I am. I usually get extremely wet and so turned on that I can't think about anything else, so I'm super happy I have such a GGG partner.
The rest of the letter—and it's not for the squeamish—plus responses from two guest experts... after the jump.
Before dating him, I've told people about my fetish and I'm comfortable about it, but no-one has done it for my pleasure. I've made myself throw-up too and it's exciting to an extent, but I didn't want to make it a habit, and I mostly like watching other people vomit. 
This Valentine's day, we went to a Chinese all-you-can-eat buffet with the intention of him overeating. It's spring-break here so his housemates are all gone, so we can have fun without worry. I made him drink luke-warm half-OJ-half-water which is pretty gross, until he's bloated enough to easily vomit into a large glass pan. I touched his cock and let him touch my cunt, and we fucked too. Anyway, after he's done vomiting, we fucked for good. When he was cleaning up, I was looking at the glass pan of slime, and I thought about the porn that I watch where people rub vomit all over their bodies. I also remembered a reddit comment where a girl masturbated with her boyfriend's vomit as lube, and I was intrigued. 
I didn't know how I felt about the idea of actually touching the vomit. My boyfriend was very encouraging, and I thought I should satisfy my curiosity with this rare opportunity. I hesitantly put my hand in the vomit, and immediately I was intrigued by the slimy texture, even though it was already kind of cold then. I felt my clit get engorged again, but I was still having mixed feelings about putting it near my vulva. What if I get an infection or something? 
My boyfriend encouraged me to do it. I finally moved my slimy hand to my clit. Pretty much as soon as I touched my clit, I was squirting like crazy. We moved into the bath tub and I fucked myself with a dildo while I let him put a little bit of the slime on my pubic area. I came so much! It's amazing how as soon as I indulged myself in my fetish I just lost all the inhibition and grossness. I almost couldn't tell if I was mentally turned on or not; I was too busy squirting. 
Questions:
1. Are there health risks to vomiting once in a while?
2. Are there health risks to smearing vomit on my body, including near/in my vagina? I'm not worried about  UTI's because I squirt so much.
3. Why are fetishes this powerful?
I am an older straight woman married to a man is younger than me, by about 12 years. We've been together eight years, married for one. He is handsome, friendly and charming. He tells me over and over that he loves me, I'm the only one for him, he thinks I'm sexy—all the things I do love to hear. He is good to me and because of his good job I don't have to work full time.
My problem has to do with trust. We agreed our relationship is monogamous and what that means is no interaction of a sexual nature with anyone else—including cams, or chats, or texting. Look at photos on Cragislist all you want, and indulge that porn addiction you acquired as a lonely single guy—I don't care, but keep it out of the real world. As a lover, he knows I am GGG and we have a lot of fun with sex, just the two of us. My husband expresses a very bad opinion of anyone who cheats, swears he never would and has told me one of the problems in his former marriage was that the ex accused him of cheating often and he insists was not doing that.
On my side of things is something I am ashamed to admit: I snoop. In fact I can get so anxious I am almost obsessed. I pay our phone bill so I can see all the numbers called or texted, and I know the passwords to all the e mail accounts he has I know about. I look at his cell when I can. Just typing this out reminds me how crazy I am being. 
The rest of the letter—and my response—after the jump...
I know it is wrong. But isn't it just as wrong to send a long text full of descriptions of desired sexual activities to another woman, one he has always said was nothing more than a friend? When I found that text I couldn't believe it, I wanted to throw up. So I confronted him and naturally the issue became my snooping. We resolved it—he would not contact her again, and I would not snoop anymore. That was a year and half ago. Since then I have asked a few times about whether he was in contact with her, or saw her when he is in her part of town. He always says no, and in fact has gotten mad because I haven't dropped it after so long.
I, asshole that I am, continued to snoop.
The other day I looked at what windows he had open on his phone and one was the contacts list, open to the page this woman's number is on. It dawned on me that he must have called her from work, where I wouldn't see the number on the bill. Yesterday, there was a long-distance call on our bill, a longer one to a number I didn't recognize, and when I looked it up, it is this woman's mother, who was friendly with my husband as well. I looked at his phone again this afternoon and the contacts page was open to her page again. He was at the place he can make phone calls from so I assume it was another day for him to have a nice chat with her.
Dan, I think this is cheating. But aren't I doing the same thing in a way? I feel so crazy about this, I know if I ask him about this he will be very angry. It might well be the deal breaker, which I am sure neither of us wants. I wish I could just let go of this and let him have his secret phone convos but I am afraid that they will lead to something more. And it creates resentment in my head, which is the enemy of intimacy.
So do you have some advice for me, beyond just "don't snoop"?. I already know that, I'm just having a hard time implementing that plan. Is he being a dick or should I just let him have his secret? And if he's a dick, then what?
Originally posted on November 7, 2012. 
This probably falls into the category of a so-what's-the-problem problem: I'm a bearish 44-year-old who can't get a hot Latin 18-year-old guy to stop sucking my dick. Craigslist was involved initially. But now he comes by for weekly sessions of mutual head and leaves immediately afterward. His round trip on the subway lasts longer than his stays at my place. He's a sweet kid but deeply closeted; given what little I know of his Dominican family and group of friends, he's years away from coming out. I'm under no illusion that I'm what he's looking for, but I am an available sexual outlet. The trouble for me is he won't kiss and won't do anything social with me, and the novelty of getting naked with an 18-year-old has worn off. I could stop seeing him, I guess, but saying, "You give great head, but you bore me" is rude. I'm mindful of your rule about treating younger partners like campsites: Leave them in better shape than you found them. I'm doing that, by treating him respectfully and showing him that it's possible to be openly gay and have support from family and friends, but I don't know where to go next.
My best friend and I (straightish/not giving a fuck-ish female and asexual/gay agender) are in a rather codependent relationship. We are roughly equivalent from a psychological perspective, which is a rare find for such fucked up people. The differences that we do have tend to complete each other so that in many situations it is easier to function as a unit. One might think such codependency is unhealthy, but having a constant friend security blanket has made us both happier and calmer. I wake them up in the morning and help them with their makeup, they calm me down when I have panic attacks, and we hang out in the evenings. On weekends we are even more inseparable because we don't have school and can enhance our friendship with substance use. Essentially we function as a hive mind.
As one might imagine, such a clingy relationship is not conducive to dating. Given that my hive mind companion is asexual and I am terrible at selecting mates, neither of us are keen on spending less time together to pursue romantic interests. What our otherwise perfect ecosystem does seem to be missing a source of oxytocin, e.g. a boy to fuck/kiss and hold hands with, respectively. Naturally, it would be convenient for us to share the same boy.
It seems unrealistic to hope we will find a theoretical boy who is both kissable and who happens to be attracted to two people of significantly different aesthetic/gender and who is down for a particularly weird variation of polyamory. But we are hopeful. In fact, we may have located a potential candidate, though we don't know him especially well.
We have discussed the possibility enough that I think our friendship would survive any outcome of the situation. However, it is extremely difficult to ask someone, "Hey, we want to date you, but only as a unit, how do you feel about that?" Such a proposition can't really be executed in a typical dating format as it requires such explicit exposition. Then if the idea appeals to him we will need to provide further exposition about the exact sexual or emotional relationship between each party. (Essentially my friend probably won't be down for sex, I will be, threeways are unacceptable but we may want to make out with him concurrently, and we will always be closer to each other than to him.)
Do you have any advice on how to execute such a conversation?
My husband is attracted to non-op trans-women. He's a big Bailey Jay fan, and we've bought and used pegging toys that allow him to (at least partially) experience his fantasy. It's a part of his sexuality that I've always known about and never questioned, until we recently considered opening up our relationship to meet needs that the other person can't. (I'm bisexual, he likes women who have dicks.) We thought about creating OKC profiles but I wondered, would it be wrong for him to include his interest in his profile? Would stating, "I'm married to a cis-woman but interested in meeting and fucking trans-women" be awful? He wants to let (non-op) trans-women know that he's open and interested, while also letting cis-women know that he's not looking for that right now.
Is this type of specific searching a way of fetishizing trans-women? Is there something wrong with the desire to meet and sleep with a penis-having woman? I know you've condemned discriminatory language in online dating profiles before, but this is different in that it is explicitly inclusive.
Prioritizing Essential Need Intelligently, Gay male in my late twenties here. I recently ended things with a guy I had been dating for about two months. Our relationship started as a strictly sexual one. We're both involved in the kink scene in our city and have interests that align in a particularly great way. Very quickly it became clear that there was more of a connection than just a sexual one. The next two months were pretty great! We spent several nights a week together, me often spending the night at his place, I even had a toothbrush at his place within three weeks. Everything was poised to make this into a great relationship.
Early on I noticed that he was a much more extroverted person than I was. He would laugh loudly at movies, works the room at parties, says wild things about kink in the middle of crowded restaurants. I, on the other hand, prefer to blend in with the scenery, and tend to get uncomfortable when people call more attention to me than I'd like.
Initially I thought of this as a price of admission I was willing to pay, but it soon became really tiresome to hang out with him. Add into that a tendency to behave like an excited five year old, and it was just too much. I ended things telling him that there were just conflicts with our personalities that made a relationship difficult, not specifying what. He has definitely fallen for me—he's stated it over and over again—but I don't want him to think that he has to change who he is to be with me. 
I'm confused, Dan. I loved the feeling of being in a relationship again (I've been single for a VERY long time). When he's being down to earth and just talking to me like an adult we have a ton in common. The sex is great, and finding someone who shares your kinks and you're attracted to emotionally is rare. He's asking me to reconsider. I've told him I need some time. What do I do? Should I find a way to not only tolerate, but love his loud personality? Or should I accept that I was right to end this?
I could benefit from your sage wisdom regarding the unique situation I find myself in.
Wife and I got married super young, very religious families, yada yada. We’ve had a great marriage, but the last couple years she has struggled with depression and has acted out by being unfaithful, first via text and then physically with a couple of people. This was more of an escape from life thing, as she has never been a particularly sexual person. I understand her struggles and we’ve come to a place where I don’t expect her to be someone she is not. However, I’m still an affectionate, passionate person and at this point we’re having vanilla sex like twice a month. To complicate matters, our gay (or so I thought) best friend and her have basically fallen in love. He is living with us in a poly-ish set up. I love him, though it’s not a situation I would have chosen. I don’t necessarily identify as fully straight, and am open to exploring the three of us, but she is too sexually hung up and won’t go there.
So, I find myself with half my wife’s attention, even less sex than the less-than-satisfactory amount I was having before, and I’m just not sure what to do. I consider myself poly, but I’m almost certain that if I hooked up with someone else it would end my marriage. Wife is deeply insecure and has a jealous streak, despite me being pretty goddam motherfucking understanding and supportive about her stuff. My options as I see them: Have a discreet affair with someone I can trust, so my sexual and affection needs are met without blowing up my life; status quo and keep asking for more from her, which I may or may not get; ask her to allow me to be poly and look for another partner to connect with who can fill in the gaps in my life and hopefully add more happiness for us all, which risks her flipping out and god knows what else.
Oh yeah, did I mention we have a 15-year-old kid? Yeah, I’ve really jumped head first into shit’s creek in an attempt to save my marriage. Any advice you can offer is greatly appreciated. I've been with my husband for about fifteen years, married for seven years. He recently announced that he wants to separate so he can think about whether he's able to stay in our marriage or if he needs to explore his fetishes without being tied down to me.
I have known about his fetishes since early in our relationship. The bone of contention is that I would only do it sometimes but I would not indulge his many sexual fantasies all of the time, as I'm not really into them, and this caused him to suppress his desires. Since the birth of our third child he hasn't been happy and we sought counseling with a counsellor who specializes in fetishes. We did this because my husband got depressed and wanted to end his life and—yes—that got my attention. Now I want to fulfill his fantasies and fetishes. I would be his "mommy," as he has a diaper fetish, and I would follow the long list of role-play activities he likes (all communicated in an email), which include changing his diaper, humiliating him, spanking him with different instruments, feeding him, etc.
He also wanted us to go to munches and to fetish parties so he could meet other people into his fetishes. I was okay with munches. I didn't want him to see a dominatrix or have his own play partner so I agreed for him to go to fetish parties. We have gone to five in two months; at these parties he has been spanked by different woman who he meets there. He is now conversing with a Dominant woman via email who he had been spanked by at one of the parties. They now have an email relationship, which I'm not entirely comfortable with, as he is doing this in secret through an email account I don't have access to. He says he wants a "mommy" and doesn't want me to do it anymore. At first he wanted to pay this woman and do it at her home (she has a nursery), but now he's met a couple of different women who enjoy being mommies and he wants to explore his baby fetish with these women
His fetishes are very sensual, intimate, and sexual. When I do it with him it involves a lot of sexual acts and he is very submissive. He wants to be diapered and babied and fed and humiliated and breastfed. He wants to do all these things with these other women—including being breastfed. Also, he wants to give oral sex to them as well. I am not okay with this and this is where we are at odds. He now says he will divorce me if I don't agree to this.
I love him and I admit I wasn't supportive of his fetish needs for a long time. He is very angry about this and feels because I forced him to suppress his needs for so long that I should let him do this with other women. But this is against everything I want. It feels like he would be having an affair if he went to some other woman's house and role-played his fantasies, which include oral sex, but he's saying it should be fine as he's not having "actual sex," i.e. like penetration, and because he doesn't love these women. I keep saying that I will meet baby fetish needs but he says I'm only doing it because I love him and that I don't really want to do it. He also says he doesn't want to do it with me because there's a nine-month-old baby in the house and he doesn't want to do it with me until our new baby is out of diapers.
I am stuck and don't know what to do. I love him and don't want a divorce but he wants me to be okay with him doing his baby fetish with other women and this this behavior does not belong in a monogamous marriage. Help!
Mulling Over My Mate's 
My mom is a 70+ yo lesbian who recently moved to my town to retire. Mom's financially comfortable, and she enjoys traveling, and lives close by. She also enjoys moving from one hot-and-heavy relationship to the next suddenly and regularly. I'd say her median relationship time is under a year, and she's been known to use the phrase "soul mate" within the first week of dating.
She's been dating someone here since she arrived about six months ago. Mom's currently pressuring her new girlfriend to sell her house, which the GF bought a long time ago, and which is now worth a lot of money. It's also full of renters that are friends of the GF, and includes the GF's adult son. I think the GF really likes her house. If she sells it, however, she could buy a house near my mom and then use the extra money for travel with my mom.
Normally I try to stay the hell out of mom's relationships, but this is a classic mom pattern—create as much drama as possible once the initial gooey period in a relationship has passed, and then abruptly end the relationship once the drama well has been tapped out. I'm afraid that this time that process is going to leave her with an ex-GF who might be righteously rather pissed at her, and who is living one or two doors down from us. 
The GF is an adult and adults get to make their own decisions. I'm not sure, however, that she is aware of how quickly my mom cycles through relationships, so her decisions may be in this case based on misleading implications about how long mom intends this relationship to last. (The aforementioned "soul mate" lasted less than a year.) Is the information about how quickly my mom moves through relationships something that I should provide her GF with, before the GF makes a huge decision that she may rapidly regret? Or should I continue to stay the fuck out of it?
I have an idea for those in sexless marriages! I know, I know! This topic is overworked! But I haven't seen mention of something that has been a wonderful discovery for us: WEED!
My husband and I are a pair of cis-gender, hetero, white, middle-class, middle-aged, unexceptional folks. My libido dwindled (as they evidently often do), from about age 45 to 55 or so, until it was nearly gone. He's ten years older, and his fell off almost as much over that same period. This bothered him a great deal more than it did me, and he did some fruitless exploring and experimenting in efforts to find ways to keep his interest up.
Then about three years ago, he revealed to me that he's always (since age 12 or so) been into cross dressing. This shocked me, but I knew right away that while shocking, it really shouldn't be a big deal to our relationship. Binge-reading your archived Savage Love columns online confirmed my initial take on things, and also re-kindled my own libido—I think because I thought more about sex over those few days than I had in the previous ten or so years. THANKS, Dan!
We got mighty frisky for a time, but his libido tapered back off pretty quickly. Leaving me pretty frustrated, since mine didn't as much. For a year or so, I was trying sooo hard NOT to be harsh, whiny, angry, or anything but supportive and patient. But I've been confused and hurt, and told him as much. He and his Drs (GP and urologist) couldn't find any physical reason for his lack of interest. Viagra and Cialis aren't the answer when there's no desire to begin with.
Then an old friend, in for a long weekend, pulled out some weed as we sat around visiting. Husband and I hadn't toked for years. It just hadn't been something we ever thought about. It's still illegal where we live—no medical MJ allowed or anything—so not easily, readily, or openly available. But WHOA! Our friend left us with a small supply, and after a couple of evenings of red-eyed snacking, we discovered that my husband's desire and capacity for sex was back! That was late in the summer, we've since found a local supply, and we've been happily toking every couple of weekends since then, and fucking about one out of every two of those nights. 
Can I get a great hallelujah?!?
So there's something that other loving couples struggling with this issue might try. Weed doesn't do anything for me in that department—when I smoke, I just want to drift and giggle, not focus on the kind of effort needed to achieve or give sexual release—but it might affect some women in the way it does my man. Worth a try, huh?
I'm a 27-year-old male engaged to a 26-year-old female. We have been together 6 years. We met at college. We've lived together for almost three years. We have been saving to buy a house together. Well, I have been. She makes less than me and has a lot more debt than me. We got pre approved.  We found a house, loved it, got the offer in. Offer accepted. Home inspection went well. Now we are at the stage where the bank needs us to sign 60 documents in order to actually get the house.
Last night I found out that she has $90k more debt than I thought—$170k total. I found out this information from the bank's loan application, not from her. I asked her countless times to sort out all of her debt and to figure out who she owes and how much so we can make a plan for a future. Wedding, children, schools, house, etc.. So, I developed a ten year plan to pay off our loans, buy a house, save for children's future. Now with this new debt, we can't pay her stuff off for twenty years.
Her lack of knowledge about her finances comes from laziness and apathy, not malice. She didn't lie on purpose. She simply never bothered to do what she needed to do to make a plan. I'm pissed. I don't know if I want to commit another ten years of my life to paying off her education, especially when now we can't afford a house. I want vacations. I want a car. I want furniture. I want to go out to dinner sometimes. I want a wedding. I want college funds for my children. I don't see any of this happening now. What should I do?
Longtime reader, Dan. Just wanted to ask why you never publish questions or comments from happily married hetero folks? Too boring? None ever come in? I love to read your advice and think what you've done in your career and for the advancement of gay rights is incredible—but I'd love to see some diversity in the Q&A; department!
So! My husband and I have been together for 24 years—I'll be 42 in July—and despite normal ups and downs, we're happy together. We have great sex on a regular basis (at least twice a week) and both enjoy trying different things with each other (inside and outside the bedroom). We've talked about swinging, opening our relationship, etc., and neither of us is into it. Are we freaks? Two normal, nice happily married middle age folks content to fuck each other and no one else? Just curious!
I feel like I should add something shocking but really don't have any ideas, Dan. Our biggest problem is we're binge eaters and often find ourselves demolishing pound bags of peanut M&Ms; in our bedroom late at night after smoking bowls. So even our shocking details are pretty lame. But as a regular reader and a longtime monogamous couple, Dan, I'd love to see some letters about how it CAN work—not about how it's destined to fall the fuck apart. Might give some hope to the other saps out there wondering wtf they are doing wrong cause they aren't planning a wild threesome or fantasizing about fucking the neighbor!
Happily Married, Happily Fucking, Please don't roll your eyes and forward this to your not-again folder. I really want to get your advice.
Married over fifteen years, professional businessman in forties, very healthy, still fancy my wife. But it's always been a relationship where I had to initiate any intimacy. But here's the challenge: her health has deteriorated somewhat over the last five years and sex is off the menu. She won't discuss sex and I'm made to sound like some sex-crazed person, so it's become a tricky subject to bring up. Leaving her is not a favored scenario—we have children and she is dependent on me.
A female friend recently confided in me that she is a "fuck buddy" for a guy who, like me, has a sick wife. This man, however, has his wife's consent—or claims to have her consent. I could not get that consent. Going astray would be extremely hurtful to my wife. Can you see any reasonable compromise or way out of this?
I have a friend who's 30 and only just coming out of the closet. I'm eighteen and I've been openly gay for a few years now, so I've been helping him along the way. There's one thing I can't help him with: he reckons he's a top and wants to try fucking me. I'm more than happy to let him try, and indeed we have tried, but as soon as he gets close to penetration he goes soft. He's very insecure in his identity as a gay man, and I'm almost certain this is an anxiety-induced performance issue. But what can we do? I've never topped so I can't help him. You have argued that society's position on cheating is logically incoherent. Society says, on the one hand, sex is not that important, so living in a sexless marriage is not a big deal. On the other hand, society says cheating can never justified because sex is that important, so important you shouldn't do it with anyone else, not even if your spouse won't do it with you.
I think you're being unfair to society, Dan. There is no inconsistency in saying the pain caused by infidelity outweighs the pain/frustration caused by forced celibacy. The problem for the prospective cheater—or the current/former cheater trying to ease his/her conscience—is that you're weighing your own, known pain against the unknown pain your spouse might potentially have to endure. So society really needs to know: Would the average person rather be cheated on or trapped in a sexless marriage?
This is where you might actually provide a real service. We need a survey! So what do your readers say? Which is worse? Let's settle this question once and for all, so you can get back to answering questions about parrot masturbation!
I read your response to the person hoping to recycle their used toys in new column. A few years ago, I donated the sex toys and other items I no longer wanted to the Aliveness Project for their annual fundraiser. Before donating the sex toys, I ran them all through the dishwasher so they'd be clean, and the Project was grateful to get them. I have no idea what sold and what didn't, but felt good about the contribution. Perhaps the person who wrote that letter could donate them to a business like the Aliveness Project to auction off at a fundraiser as well.
Don't Long time reader, first time writer. And I should probably begin by saying I'm pretty fucked—in the sense that everything has kinda blown up in my face. I should start at the beginning.
I was in a very vanilla relationship with a woman for nine years. A woman who I loved and who really loved me. The problem was that we were more of less friends who fucked sometimes, and there was never a real passion or urgency. We literally went the last year we had together without sex. I didn't know how to turn her on at all. And I greatly felt I was not her type. There was no spark. I found a spark with a girl met and really fell in love with. The catch is that I remained with my girlfriend-in-name. I tried to be a supportive father figure, I guess, to my girlfriend-in-name while also trying not to be a distant, fly-by-night asshole to my girlfriend-in-my-heart.
Then my girlfriend-in-name discovered a package from my girlfriend-in-my-heart. She exploded and cut bait, moving across the country within three days, returning to her family. I see now that I was a chickenshit coward and I tried to tell her I still loved her. And I did. I do. But I couldn't find a way to tell her I loved someone else too. She's gone now.
While I was focused on my girlfriend-in-name—while we were talking whether or not we should breakup—my girlfriend-in-my-heart became increasingly impatient. I'm sure she was waiting for me to make my choice. Then the choice was made for me and my girlfriend-in-my-heart took it personally. I was in a bad place, mentally and emotionally, and I sometimes iced her out and I didn't feel sexual or in a place where I could be a boyfriend to anyone. So I sent the girlfriend-in-my-heart a letter explaining I needed to break up with her because it was all driving me crazy. She took it badly and showed the letter to her therapist. Her therapist confirmed that, yeah, I was probably right and that I wasn't good boyfriend material at the moment.
Time passed and I got my wits back. But my girlfriend-in-my-heart grew colder and more distant. Unbeknownst to me she was dating guys on the side. And on her birthday she told me she was making it official with one. I know I was the one who broke up with her but it hit me like a sledgehammer. I feel terrible now because she really was somebody I truly loved and I didn't realize it until she was was gone. She says she's happy with the guy she's with now but I feel like a pathetic lost puppy. I'm still talking to her, now more than ever, desperate to prove to her that the slap-in-the-face wakeup call was all I needed to realize I should have put her first all along. 
My question is: Should I cling to the sad, small morsel of hope I'm still holding on to? The hope that I can stay with her again? Or should I give up and try my luck with someone else? 
I'm a 40-year-old hetero woman. (I may possibly be bi—but that's not relevant here.) I've had surprisingly good luck on Craigslist finding good FWBs. I have two partners that I met through Craigslist that I've been seeing for ten months. We have so much fun! But they're irregular, so I thought I'd search out an additional, more regular partner. I met someone who seems very nice. (We met online only so far.)  He's busy like me and he doesn't want any kind of romantic relationship, purely NSA. Great! But early on in our emailing he wanted to know what I would like for my time. I explained that I'm not a sex worker but if paying me for sex is something that gets him off, then I would consider it. He said he knows others who have such an arrangement and that it just makes things simpler and more straightforward, but it's not obligatory. I guess he means it will make me more committed to our set one-hour date each week. I am a student and single mom, so it would actually be really helpful to get a "gift" for having fun each week. He wants to know how much and I'm clueless. I'm also a little uneasy about the whole thing. Would this make me a sex worker? Should I avoid it simply because I have a custody agreement with a vindictive ex-husband?
Luckily (or unluckily) for me, Dan, your pledge to "swear off answering letters from people trapped in sexless relationships/marriages" doesn't apply, because that's not the case. In fact, quite the opposite. 
I'm a straight female in my mid-twenties and I've been in a happy, longterm relationship for ten years. In my teens I found a guy I loved, and we've been together ever since. We have a great life together. Although I'm in the "monogamish campm" (and altogether more liberal than my boyfriend in other ways), he's firmly monogamy camp. Still, we have a happy, suitably sex-filled relationship that works. I find other men attractive but I haven't felt the need or desire to have sex with anyone else because I've always been happy and content with what I have in our relationship. And although I’ve always been prepared to deal with the natural sexual attraction I will feel towards other men—and how I must remain monogamous for my partner—I recently found I'm not prepared for dealing with feelings beyond sexual attraction.  
Maybe you can see where this is going ...
Through work I met a guy. An amazing man in his early thirties who is long-term happily married. Instantly we clicked (for lack of a better description) and became fast friends. We have the same life views, same interests, similar life dreams, etc. We are both pretty blown away by the connection we felt almost immediately; it felt different to other relationships we have experienced with other people, friends or otherwise. Stupidly or perhaps inevitably, we wound up admitting we had developed feelings for each other beyond that went beyond friendship. We are both "soft" people: we care a lot about other people and the world in general, about the sense of right and wrong, and about the people we love. So after admitting to each other how we felt, we also discussed how heartbroken we were. Heartbroken because to avoid hurting the people we love we would have to hurt each other—we would have to ignore our feelings and never explore a relationship that could be great.
Then the inevitable happened: we were sat chatting at work and then we were kissing. The sexual tension between us had been building for a long time. We've kissed a couple of times since, always feeling terribly guilty between these make-out sessions, and trying to return to being the "good" friends we know we should be, rather than the cheating, deceptive, hurtful people we have become—and hate. We've never had sex. But we are both cheats. We do not have permission to do what we've done and we both agree that it is very wrong.
Do you have any advice for us? We both knew that as soon as we admitted our feelings to one another there would be no 'good, happy endings' or solutions, but do you have any advice to make it less excruciating? If polyamory was an option in our relationships we might be able to make that work. But not even monogamishness is an option for either of our partners. 
Do you have any tips on how to be better "good friends" rather than "bad" cheaters? Or tips on how to deal with feeling sexually frustrated because we just want to jump on each other so badly? Should we not even attempt to be friends? Are we just tempting fate when we already have good, happy lives and good, loving partners? I know I'm young, and have only been in one serious relationship, but I like to think I'm pretty mature and generally make good life decisions, but could this mean part of me growing up and realizing things about myself?
Do we chalk this up to life experience? Do we try and find different jobs far away and cut each other out and try and forget? (Heartbreaking but probably the safest option.)  Or do we try and continue to be "good" friends and stick to our new rules? Or would we just kidding ourselves? Or do we have crazy hot amazing (or not, who knows) sex and then deal with the terrifying consequences? Or is this just something we are going to have to struggle through individually and become stronger people because of it? 
I wish this hadn’t happened. I wish we could've met and just been friends, without thinking about each other constantly in "other ways" and without wanting to fuck each other's brains out all the time. Neither of us were seeking this, neither of us wanted this, neither of us ever expected anything like this to happen. But now it has happened and we don't know how to deal with it. 
Sorry for the novel. It was therapeutic to "spill."

I am a 24 year old lesbian living in the southeast who has had limited experience with dating. I recently met this girl on Tinder. We messaged for a few days and then met for a quick cup of coffee. (Thank you for the "meet sooner rather than later" advice because it gave me the courage to ask her out pretty quickly!) It went really well and I find her personality and looks very attractive. It's been about 2 weeks and we just had our fourth date. I really like her. The only issue is that I think that she is someone who wants to wait awhile before having sex. I understand this; however, she identifies as bi but has never been in a relationship or had sex with a woman. I'm worried about waiting too long to have sex and then she realizes that perhaps she isn't into women as much as she thought she was and might be more heteroflexible than bi. As time passes I'm finding myself more and more emotionally invested in her.  So, how long do you think I should be willing to wait before trying to talk about having sex or steering the relationship more towards that direction? Really, this situation would apply even if I was dating another lesbian, because you just can't know if you are sexually compatible with someone until you have sex, or at least fool around some. So far we have just hugged and had a quick kiss. I feel like I have been dropping subtle hints that I am open for more, but since she is the one with less experience, I am letting her kind of direct how much contact she wants. 
Dan, I really want to at least make out with this girl! But she seems to want to move SO SLOW. I have anxiety issues so I may be overthinking this whole thing, and I know I probably need to just loosen up and "enjoy the ride" but I have a hard time enjoying spending time together when I'm worried the other shoe is going to drop any second. Or that I don't know where I stand. I'm someone who generally likes to just talk about these things in the open because I prefer honest conversations to uncertainty, but I also do not want to scare her off by moving too fast or being too open and honest. Geez, I'm all a mess. Please give this wound up ball of nerves some advice. I'd really appreciate it!
I'm a straight 30-year-old man, and I've been living with my girlfriend for 10 years. Yes, 10 years! We've been having this long, mostly monogamous and fairly vanilla relationship, only interrupted for half a year or so, years ago (we studied abroad for a while, met people, then got back together). Our life right now is fantastic on many dimensions but our sex life is kind of dead. Strangely though (or not), we've never been so comfortable together. So we talk about it quite openly: she recently told me she didn't feel any desire to have sex with me. This will sound terribly delusional, but I'm still really into her so I'm trying to rationalize. 
My understanding of the situation is, first, she's not so much into sex. She's into being seductive and attractive, and sex is for her a way to get self-confidence from the fact she's hot (she is), but in fact I don't think—and in fact she tells me—that she's ever really enjoyed herself having sex for its/her own sake. Second, I'm not giving her really good sex. It's this kind of a circular situation. 
I'm contemplating different solutions to these two problems. We could switch to a completely open relationship, in the hopes of us getting horny again together (although I suspect it would in the same time completely modify the rest of our life and eventually have it explode it into a thousand pieces). Or we could just renounce sex—with each other, with anyone else—and find solace in pure sublimation of sex into studies and work. This has proven an intellectually enriching (although not entirely satisfying) way of managing things to this day.
Maybe I'm just too much into living with someone, and too attached to our cozy life, and in fact it's all hopeless and we should break up? Or maybe we should try and become a polymorphous, fluid and sexy entity, living for and by pleasure into a dazzling web of multiple happy relationships? But how is such a thing done? 
I recently found a new LMP that I really liked, but I had a questionable experience with him this week.
I had seen him once before, last December, and went in for my second appointment on Monday. Near the end of the massage, he was working on my neck and asked me if it would be ok if he worked on my chest. I said yes, because in general I think bodies are bodies, so not every form of touch has to be sexual, and my pecs were sore, so yeah—help a sister out. I really do think touch, even in areas deemed "intimate areas" by American society (aka breasts), is not necessarily inherently sexual, and I was willing to forget the social norms in favor of what I hoped was a more clinical approach to actual anatomy (plus we cis-lady folk tend to get ignored in that area precisely because I think so many LMP's are afraid of stepping over the line, which is totally understandable, but no one had ever offered to work on my pecs before and I was eager to give it a go).
He kind of dug in a little bit, and then as he got more and more invasive, asked me two more times, "Is this ok?" I responded with verbal consent both times. However, shortly after that last time I said yes, I sensed a change. It was becoming less of a pectoral muscle massage and more of just... a breast massage. I started to feel pretty turned on by his touch, which in the moment I regarded as a positive side-effect of a good massage. However, it kept going long enough for me to get the sense that he was also really turned on and the touch changed in ways that made me like he was actively trying to turn me on. (Less muscle massage, more light stroking and squeezing—he even tapped my nipples at one point.) This change happened so quickly I didn't really have time to react and tell him to stop, and I think the fact that I was so relaxed made it hard for me to realize what was happening until after I felt like a line was crossed.
I finally got kind of nervous and just pulled up the sheet, and shortly thereafter the massage ended. He made some sort of comment at the end about how we did good work and how those "hormones released are good for relaxation." I kind of think that is bullshit, because I definitely do not feel more relaxed when someone is turning me on—those feelings of relaxation come later, after the "happy ending." I was kind of wigged out I beat it out of there pretty quickly.
A few things struck me as odd.
1. I felt uncomfortable, which sucks, especially because I have been sexually assaulted in the past and it brought up some pretty nasty memories.
2. I looked at the clock as I was leaving and we were 20 minutes over time—meaning that most of that part of the massage happened "after hours." So we were alone in the office.
3. This was only my second appointment with the guy, which, even though I'm pretty open and accepting to touch, it seems odd to go that close to the line when you don't have an established trust with your patient (like, it may have been different if this was someone I had been seeing regularly for 8 months and we worked up to that level of intimacy so I didn't have to question whether he had ulterior motives).
Now that you know the whole situation in detail, Dan, my question is this: Even if I offered verbal consent, did something shady take place? My eyes were closed and I have no way of proving that he was being voyeuristic or inappropriate in any way, but I also feel gross and dirty about the whole thing. If you think there was foul play, should I do anything? I recognize that me saying anything to either him or the clinic he works at could have disastrous effects for this guy's livelihood, but I also know there is a risk that this has happened to other women. Then again, maybe this was a one-time thing, and he got carried away and didn't realize what was happening either until he was over the line? I don't know what to do, but I'm not sleeping very well since then and I can't stop questioning my sanity about what really happened. 
I would greatly appreciate your advice. Thanks for everything you do for everyone everywhere.
I am a 21-year-old lesbian. I have a question about a friend of mine. I have this guy friend. We were very close in high school. He was my best friend for a long time and played a big part in me being comfortable coming out to other friends and family. When we were 17 we were at a party, everyone was very very drunk. It was a party celebrating my very, very recent ex-girlfriend's birthday. I shouldn't have gone to the party in retrospect but I wanted to be supportive of her. So everyone was very drunk—except me, as I had decided to not drink at all. I was sad because of the break up and I was also going through  serious depressive episode. This good male friend came and found me and gave me these very long hugs all night and had been very touchy-feely with me.
Later that night all of us friends were sleeping in a tent together, and this friend and I ended up being put next to each other on the very edge of the tent. During the night we got very physically close, as it was a cold night. I didn't mind putting our two sleeping bags together to be warmer. Sometime during the night my friend, being very, very drunk, tried to shove his hand down my pants. He was making sleepy drunk slurred comments about how I was so sad and how he wanted to make me feel better and so on. I told him to stop and he continued to attempt to finger me there in the tent with all of our friends passed out around us. He never did anything to me but I had to nearly break a few of his fingers to stop him. He never remembered doing this after the fact, I assume, because he never brought up the subject.
We were close throughout the rest of high school but I never really felt safe around him after that.
He recently asked if we could get a drink together because we went to separate colleges but I am feeling uncomfortable with this. I am not sure if I feel safe or comfortable or if I have even forgiven him for attempting to do that to me all of those years ago. I am not sure what to do. I may be overreacting and sometimes I think I should just forgive him. He was drunk and I don't think he wanted to hurt me. But I just want some advice on what to do. Should I forgive him? Should I forget it? Should I ignore him?
Thanks for reading this!
I hope this finds you better than I'm doing. I feel awful for doing what I did, but I can't take it back. My boyfriend's phone was blinking and I looked. He was responding to a m4m Craigslist ad. The ad was looking for a JO partner, STD- and HIV-free, to watch porn with. I don't know what to do with this info. We haven't slept together for a while. I thought it was just because I'm pregnant. Now I have so many thoughts filling my head. To make matters worse: There is something wrong with the baby and I have to terminate the pregnancy. I haven't felt it in a day and I think it's already gone. So here I am with his dead baby inside of me and he is looking for a hook up. I was hoping for us to sort it all out and try to have another baby, but with this new turn of events, I just don't know. Should I bring it up or just try to forget about it? I was snooping and am in the wrong. I hate this.
I met Long Distance Girlfriend two summers ago; she was 31, I was 25. Moved to a big city in her state after six months. Saw each other every other weekend. Met friends, parents, etc. We'd likely cancel out each other's presidential votes in most normal years, though even she wouldn't vote for Trump. Talked about marriage, some lifestyle compromises (eg: urban vs rural), etc., though not as fully as we probably should have. Big roadtrip over the summer, I asked her to marry me, she said yes. We didn't tell anyone. I came back, met Someone Else. I told LDG about feelings for SE and we came back to this as a frequent topic of conversation. A month or so later I had a conversation with SE on the matter, broke up with LDG, and started seeing SE. FWIW, I see SE as more intellectually compatible, bolder, brasher, less empathetic, and better in bed. 
Question: How big an asshole am I?
We are all in our thirties: my wife, her younger sister, and myself. My wife and I have been together for almost ten years. I deeply love my wife, the sex is great and we've never lost our connection. The thing is: I have the same feelings for her sister.
These two sisters are best friends to each other. The three of us are very close: over time we've developed a unique and intimate connection, even though we've lived far away. My wife nurtures that intimacy, she loves to see how much close her sister and I have become over the years. A couple of months ago her sister moved to town. It is like a dream. We now spend most of our time together, the three of us.
One evening my wife's sister and I went out together. We got drunk and kissed. It was not an ordinary kiss. It had all the passion and frustration of years of emotional but not physical reach. It was in that very moment that I realized she is as much in love with me as I am with her.
Now things became quite tricky.
My wife's sister got scared. Obviously she doesn't want to harm her sister. Her solution was to cut back on communication with me. She is now very distant. Everything seems normal on the outside but there is no emotional closeness anymore. Even those this is damn painful, I understand her choice and I respect her choice. But the demon torments me. It seems to me that this distance is not the only option. As absurd as it may sound to outsiders, I believe we could have an open threeway relationship. I can say with certainty about myself that my love for my wife has not been affected by my feelings for her sister. Not in the least.
If I was 100% sure that this arrangement would be a no-go for my wife, distancing myself from her sister would be a tough but straightforward solution. But I don't think this is what my wife or her sister would really want.
Questions for you: Should I just give up and live a half-fake life next to the two persons that are dearest to me until the end of my days, repressing what I feel and work on "un-loving" my wife's sister, even if I see her everyday? If not, how could I try to find out what my wife could think about all this without running the risk to hurt her or sister?
A Originally posted on January 22, 2014.I'm 45, female, and married to a smart, funny, intelligent 50-year-old man. We've been together nine years, married seven. The sex was good for the first year and then dropped off to nothing. He says, "I've had plenty of sex in my life. I'm just not interested anymore." During my first marriage, the sex was so bad that I thought, "If I could find a man who loved to cuddle, I could go the rest of my life without sex." Perfectly describes husband number two! Except now I feel more sexual than I ever have! I've discussed this with my husband endlessly and have mentioned open marriage, but nothing ever comes of it. I'm not an instigator, although I have tried a few times and have been rejected. Yes, he has had his testosterone checked. It's normal. Not even going to a therapist helped. What do I do? He's a great guy, he loves me and my grown kids unconditionally, but we are more friends/roommates than husband and wife. We have a safe, comfortable life, but I'm too young to go without that for the rest of my life!
Originally posted on January 22, 2014.Five years ago, my wife and I decided to pursue her MFM threesome fantasy. Part of her fantasy was that the other chap have a BBC (big black cock), so we advertised and met this great guy who we've seen three times a year ever since. He is nice and open-minded, and we've become so comfortable with our BBC that we meet at our home now instead of a hotel. So there are respectful and safe people out there to be found! The issue I'm writing about is a problem with me. After our BBC ejaculates in my wife—everyone is tested and free of STIs—I enjoy going down on her, he enjoys watching me go down on her, and she enjoys having me lick the interloper's come from her pussy. That isn't the problem. The problem arises when our BBC isn't in the picture. We enjoy talking about our dirty threesomes, and we both talk about how hot it will be when I go down on her after I've unloaded in her myself. Unfortunately, once I've made my deposit, I have zero desire to go down on her. It's like someone flips a switch in my brain and something I couldn't wait to do is suddenly repulsive to me. This problem doesn't arise in our threesomes because our BBC always comes before I do. What is my issue? Is there a fix?
Can't Really Eat All My Pecker's It's been a long week, with some long, crazy questions and some long, helpful answers (from me and the commenters), so I'm going to take it easy today and keep this one short.
I'm a bi woman in my early 20s. My partner lives about an hour away from me. We see each other about three times a week, and every time we meet up, we have sex 3-4 times. On the days when I don't see him, I masturbate pretty much at least once a day. I've tried to stop masturbating but I can't seem to. Should I be concerned about my really high sex drive? My lust are...

I'm a 23-year-old male, and I identify as gray asexual. I'm sure you're familiar with it, but for those who aren't; I have feelings of attraction towards a small amount of people, but I have absolutely no interest in any form of sex, and the idea actually makes me very uncomfortable. On to the question. There is this girl who I have gone on a couple dates with, her idea. Things have gone really well, and we have a strong mental and emotional connection. On the first date, I told her the basics of identity, but I left out the sex part. I felt it was too awkward to bring up so soon, but I don't want to wait too long and hurt her. So that's my question, when would be a good point to bring it up?
Originally posted on December 24, 2014.I am a college student just trying to get through my senior year with some halfway decent grades and a smidge of sanity. As such, I have basically given up the social scene. I avoid sexual or romantic interactions. The problem is, while I recognize that I will have plenty of time for social stuff once I graduate (and some far better prospects available with a degree to my name), the rest of me is having trouble getting with the program. My weekends are a lot quieter and my wallet is more comfortable, but sometimes I can't help feeling lonely. Is there anything in your bag of tricks for this self-imposed hermit?
Originally posted on December 24, 2014.
My last relationship—abusive—ended 13 years ago. I've been single for the last 10. I enjoy my life! And I get to wake up in the morning happy, not afraid! However, I would like to share my life with someone. I have not been asked on a date in years—sad—but I go out to movies, dinner, etc., on my own. Do I have a list? Yes! My love should be happy, be self-actualized, be capable of communicating without violence, and have a sense of humor. I am physically fit, and although I'm not a beauty, I'm pretty enough! I snowboard and ride horses—I have lots of energy for 52.5! But is this it? Am I to be alone now?
Originally posted on December 24, 2014.I'm a short guy and I need advice. I don't want a small paragraph's worth of advice, like you gave "Below Their League" a few years ago. I need advice beyond "Women like men taller than them, get over it!" I get it. I'm short (five foot two), and most women are taller than me. And women like tall dudes just like I like slender women. Fat women may have it hard, but at least they have their fans and their own sex-object abbreviation: BBW. But where can a short guy go to feel appreciated? Is there an abbreviation or a dating website for us?
Jesus Christ, I'm My husband is bisexual.
When we first began our relationship he told me he hadn't expected to fall for a woman because sexually he preferred men. He broached the subject of having an open relationship but I wasn't cool with it so he dropped it. Fifteen monogamous years later we're married with two kids, three dogs, and a mortgage. I thought we were happy but something seems to have snapped in him this summer. In just the last few months he has cheated on me three separate times with three different men. Then, he gave me your speech. You know, the one where you advise people who are trying to stay in relationship that's missing something in the bedroom. He said he wants to stay with me, but he feels like he's denying a part of himself and he's afraid he'll end up resenting me. I can understand that. I'm even willing to give it a try—theoretically. But putting that idea into action broke my heart, and it was I who began to resent him. I want to keep our marriage, but I also want monogamy. Is there any way I can learn to accept this as our new normal?
I've been in a heterosexual relationship with boyfriend for almost a year. In conversation, he has told me that he has conditioned himself to not feel sexual attraction for women as he feels that it is degrading to them. While I appreciate that he doesn't ogle other women, sometimes I want to feel that he is sexually attracted to me. I think attraction is important in relationships; is it enough that it's not sexual? We do have a healthy sex life, but this has made me considerably less confident in myself. 
I had sex with a second cousin—our mothers are first cousins—a few years ago. We were not raised together. We had only ever met twice. Then we wound up "hanging out" for a week or so. Had sex several times. We swore it was a one-time deal and that we would never to tell anyone. A couple months later I moved across the country and married someone else.
Well, a couple years have passed, I'm getting divorced, and I've moved back to the area. Now we are talking a lot and both want to meet back up and fuck a lot more. Problem is... he cares more than I do if family finds out. Or at least he says he does. I adore him. He's an asshole but at least he's honest about it. Also there are a bunch of other problems with the relationship. But... on a physical level, he has everything I've ever wanted and never had in a partner. 
TBH I never stopped thinking about him even while I was married. (Nothing to do with the divorce, I swear.) I don't know where this is going but I do know that we are family and will always be in each other's lives. I know it may make problems for us in future relationships. Or maybe we will just keep doing this. I don't know. I feel drawn to him in a way that i can't explain. I am very conflicted. Should I be doing this? Not just because the cousin thing... but all the other complications? A semi-large age difference. I'm mid divorce and probably need to just, I don't know, be alone and learn to be ok with being alone.
Before you answer I think you should know a couple other details. I always wanted to be with someone way bigger than me. My exes have all been little guys. Either short or really skinny. And never much taller than me. And I've accepted them because "love." My cousin is like 6'6" and 275 pounds. He is really big. In a super delicious way. And honestly I could list about half a dozen reasons why we definitely should not be in a relationship which I have not mentioned. Can you help me out here? I need clarity, what I have is fog.
Can't Since Mr. Savage had the ability to make Santorum who he is today, would he promote the new meme that Trump = dump? As in, "I have to take a trump," or, "I just took a major trump—like a transatlantic-cable trump."
Just asking.
You've help put a lot of things into perspective. I wanted to discuss with you my current and convoluted situation to see if you have any sage wisdom to impart to me.
I helped open a business with my brother some eight odd years ago. Though we've always been relatively close despite our five year age difference (him older), our sibling dynamic inevitably came to a head by working so closely with one another and so I left three or so years ago. I left for several reasons, one which was the fact that I felt our working together changed our relationship into something unhealthy (it's not easy working with family at all!) but also because I had learned about his multiple infidelities with women he worked with and with women outside of work. Fast forward three years: I was coaxed to come back and work for him under the condition that I would no longer be asked to cover his tracks, etc. This was fine for awhile until it started happening again and again and again. I tried to speak with him logically, and he's even since started seeing a therapist, but nothing has changed. And I would even say it's gotten worse.
Not only do I have a brother who is foolishly cheating on his wife (and they have kids), he's doing so without care or fear of repercussion, which in turn has affected how my respect for him not only as a boss and a brother, but as a man. This is not only juvenile behavior, it's legally foolish. It has also begun to affect the way I look at men. I've developed a lack of trust in those closest to me, seeing how easily a man can lie and expect others to lie and cover for him. (I'm currently in a relationship and pretty happy. I don't have trust issues with this person but this whole ordeal has left a bad taste in my mouth with regards to long term commitments, etc.)
I know when it comes to cheating you've said that it's no one's business but the persons involved and I agree. But his cheating is not only affecting my personal relationships, it's affecting my livelihood. I've decided to leave my comfortable position here because again I don't want any part in this. I don't know how to help my brother and I'm tired of lying to cover for him. His wife is constantly texting me and cornering me and I don't know what to do or say anymore. My parents are also at their wits end. Do I just let him crash and burn?
He's Originally posted on December 31, 2014. 
Vanilla straight guy here. As a fellow Washingtonian, I feel proud to live in a state that was among the first to legalize marriage equality by a popular majority vote of the people. I avidly follow the NFL and eat fried bologna sandwiches and do lots of other manly things. However, I have always loved musical theater. Whenever I go to New York, I have to see at least two or three big shows. My question: Is it socially acceptable for me to good-naturedly say, "I'm totally gay for musical theater"? Or is it a slur that I shouldn't say, no matter how playful or well-intended?
Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
I've recently discovered that I am a panty sniffer. Though since I'm a gay man, maybe I'm a briefs breather? The smell gets me hard and gets me off. I discovered this when a fuck buddy left his shorts behind, and for the next few days I jerked off sniffing his shorts. That brings me to the young millennial techie guys at my work. They are fucking slobs, and they're always leaving their underwear and socks on the floor of the company's gym in our office. The janitor picks them up and puts them in a lost-and-found bin. I started checking the bin, and nothing was being removed. No one ever claimed their shorts. So I started taking a pair every now and then. At home, I fantasize about who they belong to, and when I'm done with them, I just toss them. First question: Am I stealing? I assume the guys aren't missing them, since they've been in the bin for a week or more. Second question: Have I become one of those perverted panty sniffers from those old Chester the Molester comics?

A woman recently wrote in about her friend who went on an OKCupid date and the date went through her underwear drawer overnight without her permission. I said the friend probably got pervy with this guy, wanted to tell her friend about this guy's kink, but was too embarrassed to admit that she played along and possibly got into it. And—whoa, this doesn't happen every day—her friend wrote me to clear up said panty raid:
Hello Mr. Savage,
As the lady in question for MIA's story, I must say Perv Hooves did indeed work on his own. Her rendition of my story was slightly off. My entire panty drawer had been gutted and my panties were just "causally" covering his feet. When I woke up at 6 AM, randomly, sleep still in my eyes, to my emptied panty drawer in the middle of my floor and my lovely lacies piled on his feet, my first thought was, "How/why how did my puppy manage that?" I put everything away, let my dog outside and fell back asleep. I didn't even remember it had happened till later that night while I was lounging on the couch. I am not ashamed or quiet about my freaky preferences and have no issue about other people's kinks. However, going through my panty drawer without my consent was... invasive.
Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
What is your stance on maintenance sex? I'd never thought about the issue until reading Amy Poehler's new memoir. I didn't find anything she said controversial, and was surprised when this quote blew up in the feminist blogosphere: "You have to have sex with your husband occasionally, even though you're exhausted. Sorry." I'd never realized many people firmly believe one should have sex with their partner only when they are in the mood! Some articles even made it sound like maintenance sex is a form of nonconsensual sex. I have sex with my husband pretty often when I'm not in the mood. He would prefer sex every day, and I'm more of an every-other-day or twice-a-week girl. I'd say about 25 percent of the time we are having sex, I am doing it for maintenance purposes. I always enjoy it and I get off the majority of the time, but I don't always go in wanting it or needing it. Is this wrong? Am I not the feminist I thought I was?
I, and my husband, have followed you for over a decade. I think we grew to become very open minded, subconsciously, because of it. We never planned to open up our relationship, I had sworn off my attraction to women, but after kids and life, we didn't really have sex for several years. It has been quite unfulfilling when we did. We get along quite well in every other department, but his low libido and my raging one was bound to end badly if something didn't change. So, because of all of your advice, swirling around the back of my head, I just recently asked, "Can I please meet my needs elsewhere?" and you know what, it's fine that we both do, if we choose, and we've had a lot of amazing sex this week because it's brought us closer than ever. Thankful for my open-minded guy who isn't threatened by my raging bisexuality and need for variety. Thankful for all of the future amazing sex on my horizon. Damn, Dan, thankful for you this Thanksgiving. 
I'm a 27-year-old male who has been recently submerging myself in the poly lifestyle. I've been maintaining multiple relationships with various degrees of seriousness. Some of my partners are people in the local kink scene that I play with at parties. One of them is a recurring playmate I have over to my house to tie up and consensually torture. I was even seriously dating a married poly person who was a lifestyle slave to her husband, but wanted to explore topping.
Recently though, I've started chatting with a person I met at one of the kink parties. We've been calling each other for hours at night, exchanging messages all the time, etc. However, despite the fact that we both enjoy roughly the same things, she claims to not be poly, where I do. We've discussed this, and it seems we practice roughly the same thing.
I consider being tied up and beaten a form of sex, because mentally it's every bit as stimulating and that's what matters to me. She does not. So while I maintain only one fluid-bonded partner at a time for STI-risk-management purposes, I don't really consider this practice monogamy. She, however, only considers penetrative sex to be sex, and thinks that play parties at the local dungeon don't count against monogamy.
Should I be worried about the semantics here? I'm not sure which counts more for compatibility: our practices or our beliefs. Is this fundamental disagreement something that should preclude us pursuing a relationship?
I've been dating my boyfriend for almost a year. He's 25, I'm 27. I asked him to have Thanksgiving dinner with me and my mother at my house. He said no. I also invited him to have dinner with my father, my brother, my stepmom and me the day after Thanksgiving. He said no again. His reasoning: "It would be too awkward." He has met both sides of my family before, and I have met his parents as well. His parents are having Thanksgiving dinner with family friends and he doesn't have other Thanksgiving plans. This is not the first time he has turned down invitations to spend time with my family. I've told him the only way for us to feel less awkward with each other's families is to spend more time with them. He just said "I know" via text.
I believe he loves me, he is a wonderful partner in many areas of my life, but this is bothering me. What should I do, Dan? At this point I am fighting the urge to tell him that maybe our relationship is "too awkward" and we should part ways before Christmas rolls around. What do you think?
I'm a straight female in my mid twenties. I've been dating a wonderful guy for two years—but I recently found something that has put me on edge.
Before we met, he was in a relationship with a terrible, alcoholic, and mentally-unstable woman. They got pregnant early in the relationship and stayed together for about five years. We met a year after they broke up. I feel like I'd come to terms with the ugliness of his past, with his trying to stay in a bad relationship for the sake of his child, and the rest of it. But recently, thanks to the vastness of the Internet, I came across a suggestive photo of my boyfriend with his ex's sister. I asked him about it and he admitted to sleeping with her while he was with his ex. He says it was during a particularly bad period, he was very drunk, she made the first move, etc., but I'm just so grossed out. Cheating is one thing but fucking your girlfriend's sister? And it's not like this was a 19-year-old's mistake. He was near thirty and the father of a child. He also fudged a little about whether it was just one time or a few times. They were a pretty tight family, he spent a lot of birthdays and holidays with them before and after, and he stayed with his ex for another two years after sleeping with her sister. And he never told her about it!
I feel like now I'm questioning his integrity. This is something that I just wouldn't have thought him capable of doing, regardless of how fucked up his relationship was. What do I do?
I’m a married woman and reading your column with my husband helped us create a healthy sex life together. Thank you for that. Now I have a question.
My kink is having my husband come in my mouth. It’s not a wild kink and it's not one many women share. But I have the best orgasms as my husband is coming in my mouth. My biggest fantasy is to have his come in my mouth while he is fucking me—or, more accurately, having him come in my mouth as he fucks me. I've used a dildo while he comes in my mouth, and that's pretty good, but I want the real thing. And we're not willing to invite others into our play at this point.
Putting his come in a jar and drinking it while we're getting it on seems so sterile. I think it might ruin the mood. Plus, I would want it warm, so what do you do? Freeze it and microwave right before we start? Any advice for someone who wants her husband to be in two places at once?
For a total of nine months, in my 40’s, I made my living as a "high-class call girl" or prostitute or sex worker—whatever one likes to call it. I chose to when getting out of a consuming and abusive relationship. At the time I did not want to be truly close to anyone yet desired a lot of sex. It led me to a whole new world that I was very happy with. I felt I had mutually respectful interactions and the clearly defined boundaries and my new financial and creative independence helped me feel strong and gave me a new confidence.
Eight months ago I met a beautiful man, by chance, when I was in a pub despite the fact that I don’t drink. We have a strong love for each other and moved in together.
After two months I told him that I had been a high-class call girl. He says he's haunted by it, disgusted by it, and almost every single day since I told him—months now—he says something insulting to be about it. He says this will never change and he cant stand that I won't say how wrong it was or is. He says I sold my soul and the least I can do is express regret for it. I had not felt dirty about this until this happened. I cannot say I feel that way—like I sold my soul—but maybe there were certain deceptions that took place during this time that I was a party to (men cheating on their spouses). I never asked about the men I was with about their private lives.
I would like to know your feeling about this subject and just how much is true love worth sacrificing for or going through some temporary by flagellation for?
I wanted to pass along a thought in response to your remarks to NGAA in your most recent column.
In your reply, you wrote, "You're going to need a gay dude to act on the advice I'm about to give you... the kind of gay dude who obsesses about Broadway musicals." I was surprised to see you endorsing a stereotype about both the LGBTQ community and those who obsess over musicals. I myself am a heterosexual man who has been obsessed with musicals my whole life (You'll be happy to know Mame is in my collection—on vinyl—and I too find the OBC of Joseph to be a special kind of torture.) I pass this along because I am part of a statistical minority and have often had assumptions made about my sexuality based on my music preferences. I'm almost forty now and in recent years I've stopped caring about such things but in my twenties I kept my showtunes away from my paramours and when they did find out, I would play down my obsession.
I'm sure my various girlfriends have loved me in spite of musicals, though I am happy to report that my current girlfriend is different—when my friends asked her how she felt about the whole "musical thing," she told them she loved it. And she does; her iPod is stuffed full of Broadway playlists I've made for her. 
It strikes me that as we fight for equality for the LGBTQ community, we should work towards eliminating all stereotypes, no matter how minor they may seem.
As one of the rare straight dudes into theater (particularly Shakespeare [PBUH], though I have dabbled in musicals), there was something I wanted to mention about the advice you wrote this week for No Good At Acronyms.
So much of our culture (particularly Hollywood, though Broadway isn't always much better) tells us hetero guys can't have any emotions other than (1) rage, (2) mad passionate love for a woman, which is really not enough to express the range of human experience. Broadening what we allow ourselves to feel can be difficult, but it's so worth it! In particular, I know my life got better when I learned to accept that I can love my friends (even the female ones!) as friends in a truly meaningful way without it having to be about sex and romance. Sometimes the logistics of people's lives just work out so that's the kind of love that fits, and thinking of might-have-beens doesn't really help anybody. However, expressing how you feel to a friend can be a good idea, as long as it's an in control kind of love, not a painfully-exploding-really-all-about-gratifying-your-desires kind of love.
As much as I love show tunes, Dan, that's what I think most straight dudes actually need to hear.
Can't I'm 32 y/o and I've been with my fiancée for 3 years along with her 5 y/o son (with us half the time). Our love is strong most of the time and we have common interests, we laugh, have very good sex, and she's devoted to me, and her son and I get along great, but she (fiancée) struggles with extreme jealousy. Most notably about my ex-girlfriend who I was with for nearly four years. I have not talked to my ex in two years and she has since married and clearly moved on with her life (in a far away state no less). When I broke up with her we exchanged some emails that were positive and supportive of each other moving on and my now-fiancée read them (without permission) and often cites them in her belief that I still love and want to be with my ex. While I do care for my ex on a respectful level, I have moved on as well, but my fiancée clings to this, and I'm just not sure why, at least on a practical level she must know that it's hurting our relationship. 
Furthermore, she had made scenes around other women she perceives as threatening, or at minimum is snarky and unkind to woman (particularly white woman who vaguely resemble my ex). Her "feelings" about things tend to determine everything we do, and at times I'm almost constantly reassuring her that I love her in order to get through any kind of social event or being out in public in general. She is taking some anti-anxiety meds, and she's seen a therapist a few times, but these issues continue to arise. My hunch is that you'll tell me to walk away, but I'm afraid to leave and of the drama that will unfold with her and her son with whom I've grown close, and I also do love her and feel that this is the biggest thing standing in our way of being happy and having a solid relationship. How can we get past her jealously before I officially commit to spend the rest of my life with her?

I'm writing from Italy. I'm 19, and my girlfriend is 20. I live in Italy, she lives in Sweden. I like girls, she likes girls too. 
We've been together for two years in a distance relationship that was awesome. We never had trust issues and we loved each other really much. We were thinking about a poly relationship also. After a while she tells me that she's attracted to girls, so we both search for someone interested in having sex with her. She finds a girl on a dating app, they meet, and she felt in love with her. Now she's sure she's lesbian and being with me seems wrong to her. She has panic attacks, deep sadness, identity crisis. So she broke up even if she still feels something for me and now I want to take her back. I don't care if she's also in a relationship with this girl, as I said we were open to poly love. How can I do?
This Relationship Isn't Something That's Originally posted on October 23, 2013.
My girlfriend always responds positively when I initiate sex with her, but she hardly ever initiates sex with me. I'm a no-beat-around-the-bush kind of guy, but I realize that this can be a sensitive topic, and I don't want to scare her by saying, "Please initiate sex more often!" So I do small things to coax her and let her know that I want her to initiate. I will lotion up in front of her after we shower. Or I'll say something like "I wanted to fuck last night-maybe you can wear one of your sexy bras and thongs one day soon?" But it hasn't worked. The only time she'll initiate is if I haven't initiated for a while and she's sexually frustrated. But that can take days!
I bet you get a lot of emails like this one but I would love to hear your thoughts.
I am a 23-year-old man I met a girl at school in January of 2014 and we went out a couple times never did anything and I left out of state. She was single at the time. When I came back we reconnected randomly and instantly fucked. While I was gone I looked her up on Instagram and saw pictures of her with a man. After we had sex she confessed that she was in a relationship and also said that her boyfriend is 35. She is 18. We continued casually having sex on and off until June this year. I took her out to a show and we ran into her boyfriend's friend. She stayed over that night and her boyfriend called my phone number about twenty times. Apparently he already knew about me. I let her stay another two nights cause she was not prepared to go deal with reality. He continued calling. I did not answer. When she went home he got slightly physical with her. I had already left for the summer to work and they stayed together. I see this as an abusive relationship. She doesn't have much experience dating, she was abused before, they have bills and shit together and she told me she feels trapped. I actually like this girl despite her behavior. As far as I know me and her BF are the only people she's had sex with besides a relative who raped her. I don't know whether I should drop this like a hot potato or go ahead and be a home wrecker. Since I got back a month ago we have been talking over email. Her boyfriend snoops thru her phone and blocked my number. Any advice?
I'm in an awkward situation and need advice ASAP. I'm a grad student in my mid-20's, and this summer while studying in another country I met and thought I had fallen in love with a British guy. When I returned to the US after spending 2.5 months together, he ended up following me home, which I was excited about at the time. He planned a stay of 90 days, the length of his tourist visa, and he's relying on me for accommodations though supplying his own food/drinking money through minimal online work and borrowing from his parents. Within the first weeks that he was here, I already started to realize that I didn't like him as much as I'd thought. Since then, I've become increasingly annoyed by him and stressed by his financial issues and constant presence. We haven't had sex in weeks and I no longer want to. The next month is very work-heavy and I don't know that I can handle having him here anymore, but even cheap options like couchsurfing would likely force him to borrow even more from his parents, something I know he would hate to do. Can I uninvite someone who I encouraged to visit me? Or should I suck it up and let him stay for the last month?
I'm a 49-year-old gay professional. I'm a PhD and a college professor. But I can't seem to find anyone who will take a second look at me, much less go on a date. The last two guys I asked out both cancelled at the last minute with bullshit excuses. I think I have a lot of personality and I'm really funny and obviously smart but I'm not handsome in the way that one needs to be at this age to get dates. It's as though a 49-year-old gay man is invisible. It doesn't help that I live in a city where one either needs to be beautiful or rich to catch a dick. I'm neither and I've just about given up on ever finding anyone who will look past superficial things and see the real me. (Unfortunately, I also do the same thing—which makes me a hypocrite, I know.) The dating apps don't help. I'm too ugly for Grindr, not buff enough for Jack'd, too preppy for Scruff. It would be awesome if they had a dating app for academics with acerbic senses of humor.
What the fuck should I do, dude?
I'm a 23 year old female from central Florida (believe me, I don't like it either), and I've been happily married for almost six months now to a man I've been with for about three-and-a-half years. I've only recently started listening to the micro version of your podcast and absolutely love it, and each time I listen I come up with all these questions that I simply never had anyone to ask. Thankfully, this won't be about the relationship with my husband, but mostly stuff I'm not comfortable with asking anyone because almost the entire spectrum of sex, the reproductive part of the body, relationships and such was not (were not?) openly spoken about when I was growing up. I never really thought of myself as a sheltered child and the more time I spend with my husband, the more I learn I actually was. I apologise in advance for how long this will be (I tend to babble and rant), but I will do my best to make it as short as possible.
1. I work in retail...
...and I have a co-worker that for some unknown reason loves to give me her opinion on my life choices. It mostly started with me adamantly telling her I don't want kids now or ever and that my husband is in the same boat. "What if he changes his mind? What if you change your mind? You're just saying that because you're young. You'll change your mind some day" yadda yadda yadda, I get it all the fucking time with this girl. And I do mean girl—she's maybe a year older than me. I used to work with her once a week and she'd ask me every fucking week about whether or not I wanted kids, even though I'd given the same answer every time. Part of me feels she would do it to push my buttons and I still try hard not to give in to that and simply ignore her every criticism, until early spring this year when she told me I was doing my wedding wrong. I had planned (and had) a small, intimate wedding at a county park this past May and it was wonderful, but she felt that since I didn't want a big wedding and make a big fucking deal about it, that I was doing my first wedding (as if there'd be another!) "wrong". Fast forward to a month or so ago and she has since stopped asking me about kids, but she still freaks the fuck out about my decisions. I recently got promoted (which she got "offended" that I didn't tell her right away) and now I have no idea how to handle it should she basically start harassing me about this again. I am terrible at confronting people, I don't like it, and if I don't say something in the moment (the rare times I have said something in the moment, it was not nice), I tend to not say anything at all. This whole thing gets me fired up whether she says anything or not, to the point where I hate working with her (there are other work related reasons for that, too, but this is long enough already). Any advice you have or a direction you can point me in for this situation would be wonderful because I'm at my wits end with this girl.
2. The most recent podcasts I have listened to include you talking about men hitting their sexual peak in their teens and women in their late twenties or early thirties, this being related to men "discovering" themselves at an earlier age than women. I can't personally speak for other women, but I know I started some mild form of masturbation at about fourteen, moving on to fingering at about fifteen or sixteen. With that said, I am no expert on the female body despite being the owner of one. I have some abstract/loose ideas of what pleasures me (which I make sure to articulate as best as possible to my husband), but I don't know my turn ons/offs as well as my husband knows his. I know you are a man who thinks the female body is icky, but I was wondering if you had tips for a sheltered girl who would like to get to know her own body better. I have a vibrator that I have used and I love that, but I personally don't like using my fingers on myself. My husband likes using his own fingers and the vibrator on occasion and since he actually gets a chance to look at my lady parts, I mostly want to know my body better to help him get me off because he legitimately like to.
3. I'm not sure how to phrase this, but I am only good at one relationship at a time. I graduated high school pretty much hating everyone and everything and was diagnosed with depression in 2011. I've been in treatment ever since and though I don't think the two are linked (shit relationships and depression), I do think not knowing I had depression was the reason I didn't have too many friends growing up. I've gotten past all that and have a great relationship with my husband, as I've said before. I honestly couldn't care less about having friends of my own, though I do encourage him to hang out with his friends whenever he can. My only problem with this is that it is also affects the relationships I have with my family. Before meeting my husband, my one good relationship was with my mom. Granted, we didn't have big discussions on anything and if she ever brought up "life", I'd shut down, but we hung out all the time and it was nice. I think at first she was really hurt that I kind of stopped hanging out with her when I met my husband, but maybe let that go once she saw how happy I was. The other problem I have with this is that I couldn't care less about being close with my siblings (two sisters, one brother) or my dad (which wasn't a great relationship to begin with). I think that more than anything hurts my mom, and I know it hurts my brother that I don't exactly get along with my dad. My question is this: since I currently believe that my "one good relationship" thing isn't going to go away, how to do I get my family to understand this about me without hurting anyone?
I'm sure I could have sent you three separate emails about this, and I truly apologise for how long-winded it is. I guess I should add I'm incapable of concisely expressing my thoughts/feelings. Anyway, if you can only answer one of those questions, or even if you tell me to fuck off for taking up too much of your time, any response would be great.
Originally posted on November 13, 2013. 
I'm a heterosexual guy in my early 20s. I've been dating my girlfriend for about six months, and we've been having some fights recently. The problem: I have a high sex drive in comparison to hers. I want to be intimate on a weekly basis (at least!), and she's told me that she's more of a once-every-three-weeks-or-so person. I'm trying not to put pressure on her. I don't want her to feel uncomfortable—she's a virgin (no penetration), and the thought of the pain of that first time scares her a bit. That said, physical intimacy with her—developing that bond, even without intercourse—is important to me and a key part of what I believe is a healthy relationship. I do my best to be understanding, but I'm not sure how to bridge this gap.
Originally posted on November 27, 2013.
I'm a bi woman in my mid-20s in a great monogamish relationship with my straight boyfriend. We occasionally invite other women into our sex life, which is really enjoyable for both of us. He isn't threatened by other women, only by other men, which isn't an issue since I'm not interested in any other men. So on the occasions when we find a lady we're both into who's also into us, anything goes, and it's awesome. We've hooked up with both friends and strangers, but always as a couple because it makes us both feel safe. That's all lovely. Enter the problem: I was visiting some friends of ours I used to live with before my boyfriend and I moved in together. After going out for drinks, we were playing an alcohol-fueled card game that turned into an alcohol-fueled strip card game. This is in my former home where I am very comfortable, feel safe, and was frequently in various states of undress while I was a housemate. One friend soon had her lovely breasts out, and she made a few comments that were direct and inviting and turned me on a little. I touched her boobs and sucked on her nipples, but that's as far as things went. Her boyfriend witnessed this but wasn't involved. It was a fun, playful moment, and soon after, I went to bed—alone. It wasn't anything my boyfriend would've objected to had he been there, but he wasn't there. Should I tell him about it, or is this a case where he has the right not to know? I'm not interested in pursuing anything further with this friend, and I'm not sure what talking about it would accomplish, other than being honest at the expense of my boyfriend's feelings, and probably making me feel bad for something that, although it seemed innocent and harmless in the moment, I shouldn't have done.
Non-Originally posted on September 18, 2013. 
Straight male here. I took a writing course, and some of us students created a writing group. We meet and workshop the things we've been working on. One of the guys in the group is gay, and a while ago, he confessed that he had very strong feelings for me. I didn't have a problem with this, but I told him that I wasn't into guys. The other day, he sent me an e-mail telling me there was something he wanted to discuss. We met for dinner, and he told me that despite the fact that I claimed to be straight, he felt like I had been sending him messages to indicate my interest in him. He said that this was cruel and that he felt like I was teasing him. When I asked him for examples, he told me that when we had originally been in class together, he noticed that I had started to dress like him, and that this was sometimes a way closeted men showed interest in other men. He mentioned that one week he had worn a red sweater, and the following week I had worn a red T-shirt. He also said that he felt like the stories I had been workshopping in our group were secretly about him. I admit I'm not the stereotypical straight guy—I have good taste in shoes and I like art—but I know what I'm into and who I want to get naked with. I never showed any interest in this guy, I never led him on, this entire thing has taken place purely in his head. I told him all this, and now he says he is hurt and doesn't want to see me at the group. He suggested that we share the group, alternating meetings, but I refused. We're both adults who should have the emotional maturity to handle this. Am I being too harsh?
Originally posted on December 12, 2012. 
I had a conversation with a friend who is an emergency-room physician. He told me about removing something—I can't remember what—from a gentleman's ass. My immediate response was to ask whether he had the flared-base talk with the gentleman after the fact. His response? "What are you talking about?" I explained that if the gentleman had used a butt toy with a flared base, he wouldn't have been in the circumstances that brought him to the hospital. He had never thought of that and thanked me for the advice. My partner is a physician and has treated patients with anal "encumbrances." He gives the flared-base advice to anyone who seems like they might benefit from it—but he tells me this isn't something they go over in med school. This shocks me because it seems like a topic where a little education could do a lot of good. You should use your column to bring this to the attention of medical school administrators.

My wife and I live in a big city. We have two very small kids. We have lots of friends in the LGBTQ community. My sister (and her ex-husband) live in a small town. Their biological daughter—at age 16—has just come out as trans. He has done some amazing things, like get his high school to install at least some gender-neutral bathrooms and consider changing overall bathroom regulations. But I don’t think he has a lot of exposure to other folks in the community. We were thinking of inviting him to come and stay with us this summer; we’d pay all the expenses, give him his own room, help him find a job or internship (one of our LGBTQ friends has already agreed, if he’s willing, to give him part-time work at a local activism organization.) The problem is that my nephew’s parents don’t want us to do any of this, and say that we’re interfering. They say that their child may still be just “in a phase.” I don’t know whether that’s true or not, but my argument is that we have to support the person my nephew IS right now, not the person he may or may not become (or have been). Obviously, we can’t make the summer plan happen without parental approval since my nephew remains a minor, but my sister has asked me not to even mention the offer or any of the surrounding issues to my nephew. I feel like he may need the support and I want him to know that whatever he’s going through, he has a loving family here in the big city to depend on and that accepts him.
Don’t know what to do, ethically/morally/logistically.
I’m so fucking fucked. I really hope you can help me. I just don’t know what to do. I’m in a fifteen-year relationship with my (now) wife. We met when I was very young and unsure of myself. Despite a large age difference (I’m younger), I convinced her to take a chance on me, and together we have built a life, a successful company, and she has stood by my side and supported my own career, which is now flourishing. I have also blossomed personally, only in recent yeas. I’m nearing 40 now, and I find it hard to even believe I’m the same girl my wife met so many years ago—though she herself is pretty much the same, solid and unwavering. Our sex life has always been terrible. It’s inconsistent and unfulfilling and there’s not really any attraction…but she doesn’t really have attraction for anyone, and this has always been an issue for her. I, however, am very attracted to attraction. For the sake of making a long story short, I had a pretty significant (though short) affair a couple years ago with someone who pursued me and then promptly fell in love with me. It was exhilarating, and I loved her too, but I hated myself throughout the process. I hated that I had become a cheater, but I didn’t know how to end it, and I don’t think I wanted to. My marriage nearly ended, but I pleaded and begged for a second chance, unable to live with the pain I had caused my wife. I temporarily entered therapy, and we also were in couple’s therapy. I thought we had become stronger, that I had become more self-reliant, and that our fundamental needs were being addressed. I love my wife so much. I love the life we have.
And now, here I am again. I met a woman at a conference, and we hit it off. But there was an intensity there, and that intensity has taken over our “friendship.” I live on one coast and she’s on the other—and she’s also in an unfulfilling relationship. We have plans to see each other again. For the first time in my life, it all feels so RIGHT with this person. We communicate constantly, and have had every kind of sex that we can have from afar. We have told each other we love each other, and we do. Despite how this sounds, it doesn’t feel obsessive. It feels real and sweet. And scary. I don’t want to betray my marriage, nor do I want to lose it. In addition to a lot of logistic circumstances that I won’t get into here (though there are no kids involved, thankfully), I am financially tied to my wife, and would be broke, and lose my business, without her. All things considered, that is minor though, and that is not my driving force. The thing is, I really, really love my wife. I love our sweetness and our shared hobbies and our connection. I’m just not in love with her, there is no vavavoom, and she’s not in love with me… or at least, not in the way I need. The “other person” is applying no pressure. She knows that we have to each be in our respective marriages and situations for the time being for a variety of reasons, and so we have adopted a sort of “see you down the road” attitude, though we hope for moments of lovemaking and connection along the way. My wife is older. Can I just let time play out or am I being a horrible partner and betraying the person who believed in me when no one else did? Do I need to end all contact with this new person who fills me up in ways I didn’t know were possible? I just don’t think I can do that. I feel like this is all unmanageable. Many people who contact you with similar stories are in unhappy marriages. Mine is not unhappy. I honestly don’t see a way forward. Help? I met this hot couple recently with a sex swing in their house, and they have some kind of game they play with it, and it sounded fun so I made some plans to meet up with them. The day of, we were discussing logistics and one of them mentioned a coconut oil lube he had from Hawaii. This sent up a red flag (oil based lube + latex condom = trouble) so I asked what types of condoms they had. His response of "the ones you get for free from the bar" (so, obviously latex) turned me off, and I canceled. 
From my standpoint, not knowing that oil based lube and latex condoms don't mix is an indicator. Either, it's an indicator that they aren't safe sex experts, or that they're trying to dissuade condom use all together. If I pick up at any point that someone may have a pattern of unsafe sex decisions, I exit the situation because it seems likely to me that one bad decision comes after a series of other bad decisions.
Any deficiency in understanding of safe sex puts me at risk. Sex is always a risk and I understand that, but I like to take risks that are as well informed as they can be. I have a lot of sex, but always with partners I've interrogated to my liking without revealing any red flags.
I was discussing this with a friend who said I was overthinking it. What do you think? Am I being to harsh by extrapolating things and making broad assumptions? Am I being to harsh? I really did want to try that swing!
I know that family issues aren't exactly your specialty but I am a huge fan of your column and would love to hear your advice. I am an almost 30 straight-ish woman.  I have a brother "Ed" in his early 20s who is gay. I knew when he was about 12 because he frequently used my laptop to look for porn. He came out to me when he was around 16. I told him I supported him and that when/if he wanted to come out to our parents I would be there. 
He officially came out a few years ago. I'm happy that he is able to live openly. But since coming out he has turned into a major asshole. We were close prior to him coming out. Now he is rude, manipulative, passive aggressive, and lies constantly. Worse, if anyone calls him out on his rudeness he immediately plays the victim/gay card. Example: He showed up at my kid's birthday party high on speed, talked graphically about hooking up with strangers, and then cussed me out when I asked him to keep it rated G. 
He lives in a different city than me, so we do not see each other often. In the last year, I have noticed several relatives who live close to Ed distancing themselves from me. Last week, my other sibling told me that Ed has been telling people that we are estranged because I'm homophobic. Dan, this couldn't be farther from the truth. I was in a relationship with a woman when I was his age and consider myself to be an ally. Although I disapprove of MANY of his recent actions, I could care less about his sexual orientation. He is very charming when he wants to be and I suspect that several relatives believe that I mistreated Ed in some way. How can I set the record straight? I can't just say, "By the way I'm not a homophobe, Ed's a liar" in the middle of Thanksgiving dinner. Even if I could, I still have hopes that Ed will grow out of this (being an asshole, not being gay) and I don't want to speak badly about him. I also don't want anyone to think I'm the type of person who would disown my brother for being gay. 
I'm Sure You'll Originally posted on September 25, 2013.
My girlfriend and I have a vibrant relationship. Sex is great and adventurous when we have it, but I have one small issue that clouds up the sexual chemistry and turns me into a somber theologian: Since the earliest days of my childhood, I was told by my family that abortion was a horrible, horrible thing. And that thought has complicated my relationships. I simply don't know how to get past this thought and indulge my partner and myself sexually without feeling uncertain about the possible outcome of our getting funky. I feel awful that my girlfriend has to deal with this moral panic of mine, and I'm sick of putting her through it. Help!
I am a straight woman in my mid-forties. I have been seeing the same man for six years, he is a similar age to me. About a year ago we officially moved in together. There are several problems. 
I like to socialize and go out to see movies and bands, eat dinner with friends and family, and take trips away for leisure. He is usually reluctant to do any of these types of activities with me and seems content to spend most of his time in the house aside from work and essentials e.g. going to the grocery store. He almost always refuses to accompany me out socially. He did take me to dinner on my birthday and very occasionally will come to a movie. If we do go out he usually feels stressed and wants to go home early so it isn't really fun anyway.
He will not sleep the night with me in the same bed—we have our own separate bedrooms. He has sleeping problems and is a light sleeper. I do snore, not all the time, but he never sleeps with me. We have not spent one night in the same bed since he moved in. I feel lonely in my bed by myself each night, especially if we have had sex and then he is quick to leave back to his room.
The sex can be really great but is sporadic—could be anywhere from twice per month to 2-3 times per week. This depends on energy levels and how well the relationship is going. We both work long and demanding hours and can be tired at times. He can only orgasm from penetrative sex which is somewhat limiting but I have accepted it. I have not had a problem bringing other partners to orgasm by hand or blowjobs and enjoyed these activities a lot but it doesn't work with him. I do miss being able to do this. He puts in the effort to give me a good time sexually however and is generally GGG.
He gave up smoking which is awesome, but after a few months of being quit took up a nicotine vapouriser instead. I asked him not to use it inside my apartment when he moved in, and he often steps outside, but he does still use it inside when I am not home despite my repeated requests not to. It leaves an odour and affects my breathing as I suffer from asthma. I need to use my inhaler more frequently due to this. I have asked him to consider giving up the vapouriser but he doesn't want to do that.
The final and most significant issue is that he has poor dental health and hygiene, causing at times severe bad breath. He has spent a lot of time at the dentist getting repairs which has made intermittent improvements. He recently got some work done, but more is needed. He leaves long gaps before going to the dentist even when he knows work is due, and waits until the breath is really gross again and I ask him to go which causes a huge upset. He does not seem to get that he needs to brush and floss before sex or kissing. I have asked him nicely to do this but he usually forgets. He drinks several alcoholic beverages every night and this along with the vapouriser is not helping the breath problem. He does not brush before bed and not even every morning. 
When we are having sex I have developed ways to avoid smelling his breath (never doing it face to face, keeping my face down when giving oral etc) which detracts from a relaxed and natural experience. I feel so frustrated and ashamed. I have been as kind and tactful as possible around this issue but I have begun to think it will not change. I seem to have developed an aversion to kissing him now; last week he had actually brushed his teeth before he got in bed with me but when we kissed it made my stomach turn. This has not happened before, I think I must have reached a point where I have lost attraction for him. 
I have been contemplating moving out into a new place as I do not feel happy. I am not afraid of being alone really, but I feel sad at the thought of our relationship failing after having dedicated so much time and energy to it. Despite the problems I feel love for my partner and I know breaking up will hurt us both. I know my description of our problems make him sound unappealing but he is a kind, loving and thoughtful man who is a dear friend to me as well.
I know the answer seems obvious but I am struggling act decisively. I would appreciate your assessment and advice, Dan. Give it to me straight.
Originally posted on November 13, 2013. 
Why am I such a slut?
Girl, A friend of mine stumbled across this Tumblr that I thought would be right up your alley: thingsmydickdoes.tumblr.com. It's the secret life of what a guy's dick does while he's asleep and it's very funny indeed. If you post it on Slog could you leave me, the tipper, anonymous? 
My Friend's I'm in a bit of a pickle. I am a 33-year-old hetero female in a monogamous relationship with a 30-year-old hetero male for about a year and a half. He is a wonderful person—kind, gentle, funny, intelligent, and, more importantly, thinks the same of me. We get along swimmingly except when it comes to sex. He has had issues with sex since his first time when he was 19. He can get it up, but has trouble maintaining an erection, and can only come very occasionally and only by his hand. This apparently has always been the case. I could probably deal with that, but my real problem is that in his haste to get to the performance, he bypasses foreplay and pays little attention to whether or not I'm getting turned on. Yes, I have brought this up and we have talked about. We both see a therapist regularly and so pay pretty close attention to our communication. We even did Sensate Focus for a few months. It helped a little bit at the time, but once we started having intercourse again, he slipped back in to his old ways. I have been very verbal with him about what I like and what turns me on, but it's like his anxiety and insecurities around sex trump everything else. He is good at oral sex and can make me come almost every time, but if I'm giving him oral, or if I want to be on top for a while, he quickly goes soft. I have had quite a bit of sex in my life and I feel like I want to be with someone that I can explore further with, not someone I have to school. On the other hand, I feel like a fool to give up such a great guy because of physical desire. And to further complicate matters, most everyone I talk to about this is downplaying the issue, so I don't know if I think it would be foolish because it would be foolish or if I'm being influenced by a social construct. Dan, please help!!
A 
I'm sometimes sent long letters that read more like drafts of forthcoming and often ill-advised/conceived memoirs. I usually pass on these letters because, you know, the print column has a word count and looooooooooong letters are tedious and boring and, good God, get the point, people, and I don't want to risk using up the Internet on a single question. But I'm making an exception for today's "exceptional" question.
To help you (and myself) get through this NeverEnding Story, I'm going to respond to the letter writer as we go along, as opposed to waiting until the end.
I have a problem and I'm hoping for your advice/input. The problem is MINE, meaning I'm the one who needs to chill and/or move on, but I'm having a hard time doing that. Maybe you can shed some light on why I can't let this go.
I was married for over ten years to a pretty good guy. I didn't get married until I was 37, and honestly never really thought I would get married. I met him at my job and we dated for about 2 years before getting married. It was his second marriage and he had two children from his first marriage who were 16 and 19 when we married. 
He accused me of cheating on him the entire time we were married. I wasn't cheating. That is, until the very end of our marriage. My cheating on him didn't make it the end, it was just the end of our marriage for no reason other than we weren't happy together anymore. We both contributed to the demise of our marriage (although like most men, he doesn't admit to his contribution). I moved out and we were separated for about three years. Things seemed to get better between us after we were no longer living together and we formed a very strong friendship that probably wouldn't have happened had we not split up. He was there for me when both my parents passed away and I was there for him when his mom died. We spent holidays together and hung out together regularly. We had fun together. We laughed a lot and I could be myself around him and say whatever sick but funny thing popped into my head. I value his friendship so much now. 
It's been about seven years since we officially divorced. We didn't hire lawyers because we had already split up the marital assets and we had no children together. I didn't go after his pension even though I was legally entitled to half for the ten years we were married. I just couldn't take the pension he worked so hard for. I don't regret this decision.
Before getting in any deeper—and we're about to get colonoscope deep—let's just mark where we're at: You're around 54 (depending on how you included those three years of separation), and you've been divorced from your ex-husband for about seven years. You don't have children with him, although you became a step-mother to his older teenagers. And the most important piece of information you've relayed—the crucial tidbit that's going to inevitably come up again—is that your ex-husband thought you were cheating on him the entire decade you were married. You weren't cheating on him, but he continued being suspicious and shitty about it for ten long years. And then, when the wheels were coming off, you cheated on him. On your way out the door. When you were done—with him, with the marriage. The cheating didn't end things, things had ended. So you felt free to fuck someone else.
Noted.
Some might say that his paranoia and jealousy were self-fulfilling prophecies—he was paranoid and jealous and you got fed up and decided to go ahead and commit the crime you'd stood accused of for ten long years. But considering how common cheating is—and considering how often people who aren't paranoid or jealous get cheated on—pinning cheating on those flaws is equal parts selection bias, magical thinking, and victim-blaming. (Bearing in mind, of course, that the victim of the affair is not always the victim of the marriage.)
Anyhoo, ex-husband's behavior aside, you believe that your problem—which you haven't explained yet—is YOUR problem, and your's alone. Moving on....
I dated often after we split up, met a man I ended up seeing for about a year and a half, (that's a whole other column) and always stayed close to my ex. I never badmouthed him to any of my dates/boyfriends and still saw him often. We had sex now and then when we were both lonely and horny but not too often. I always felt like having sex with your ex-spouse is usually not a great idea. You are either together or you aren't. By continuing to sleep with your ex-husband/wife the lines get blurred and it's difficult to make it final. But we did it anyway once in a while over the years.
Fucking your ex? probably not a great idea, I agree. But some ex-couples make post-relationship sex work. As with anything and everything: individual results may vary. 
He hadn't dated anyone since we split. It's been about seven years! This is a long time to be lonely. I get that. Recently, he made sure that I was aware of the fact that he met someone and is now getting laid regularly. He told me she's married which really bothered me! This bothers me because he has never ever let me forget that I cheated on him during our marriage and how horrible I was to do this to him. Still, to this day, when we would argue, he'd throw it in my face that I cheated on him. I realize that I hurt him deeply by cheating on him and I regret it. I have apologized for it and we moved past it. The fact that he is dating a married woman and it's okay (now that he's not the one being cheated on) baffles me. He's a hypocrite and I can't believe he'd be dating a married woman! 
Apparently, the woman's marriage is at its end and her soon-to-be-ex is thrilled she found someone who will get her our of his hair. My ex told me that her husband is glad she's seeing someone, but that doesn't make it right in my opinion. The way I see it: if you're unhappy in your marriage, you should get out of the marriage instead of cheating and throwing it in your spouses face to hurt him. That's what my ex's GF is doing. She even put my ex up to knocking on their door when he went to pick her up at the house she still shares with her husband! My ex actually walked up to the front door and rang the doorbell so she knew he was there. The wife wanted to rub her husband's face in the fact that she has another boyfriend now. I was shocked that my ex would disrespect another man in his own home! I couldn't believe the level in which he was stooping to! I also learned that he had badmouthed me to this woman and I was very hurt and angry. I would never do that to him.
We've arrived at the nut. You believe you've been exemplary as a partner and an ex-partner—you cheated but you didn't throw your cheating in your ex's face (you got caught, like a good person); you've been kind and supportive and there for him since your divorce. Your husband, however—oh, wait, sorry. Your ex-husband, however, has been less considerate. Yes, your ex-husband is a hypocritical shit. He spent ten years accusing you of cheating, and the next seven harping on the one time you did cheat—but your affair that was the final nail in the coffin of your already deceased relationship, so it's okay, while the cheating he's a party to now is, um, the final nail in the coffin of an already deceased relationship but with door knocking and nose rubbing, so it's not okay.
Right up here at the top, letter writer, I'm going to say that your ex-husband's choices don't have anything to do with you. It doesn't fucking matter—it shouldn't matter to you—if he's knocking on some woman's door and she's married and her partner is in the kitchen and he's blah blah fuckin' blah what does this have to do with you again anyway? Why are you in the middle of this? Why is he telling you about his new GF, her husband, their front door, etc.?
This is your ex and you two are exes for reasons. Now it's time to get some boundaries for reasons—reasons like your sanity. And mine. And my readers'.
Anyway, my problem is that I'm having trouble letting go of my ex.
Ya think?
I want to stay friends with him forever, and I believe he wants the same but this woman is driving a wedge between our special friendship. He is ignoring my texts and calls, and then badmouthed me to this bimbo he's known less than two months. After he made sure I was aware that he was seeing someone I found out who she was and I sent her husband a friend request on FB, thinking he would just accept the request (like many people do) and that maybe I could get more info about this woman my ex is seeing. Instead her soon-to-be-ex-husband messaged me asking if we know each other and I told him who I was. We chatted and he told me that she repeated stuff that my ex had told her about me. This angered the hell out of me and made me lash out at my ex for betraying my privacy and I let him know that she repeated everything to her ex who told me. When he asked her about it she lied to him and said she never repeated anything. She's lying because the stuff her husband told me is stuff he'd have no way of knowing unless my ex had told her and she told her ex. 
You are acting like a crazy person.
I am having trouble accepting the fact that my ex is seeing someone else.
So your ex is an asshole—he's betrayed your privacy, he's a hypocrite, he badmouths you to people he barely knows—and yet you're angry he isn't making more time for you. Can you see how crazy that sounds? Especially when you aren't showing much respect for the privacy of others? What right did you have to contact and invade the privacy of the current/soon-to-be-ex husband of your ex-husband's girlfriend?
Okay, I need a break. Gotta take a piss, get something to drink, throw myself off the roof.

We're back!
I am baffled by this because I don't want him back. I don't want to live with him again, I don't even want to have sex with him again. I guess I just liked knowing that he would always be there for me and vice versa.
You didn't want to fuck him anymore but you didn't want him fucking anyone else. Got it.
Now he's acting like some cocky stud who has to prove to me that he can still get laid. She has him doing things for her that make him look like a whipped pussy and that's not him at all! He's always been a strong, honest, loyal man who possessed more integrity than most men I've known. Now she puts him up to disrespecting her husband in his own house and I know for a fact that she sees him as her meal ticket out of her horrible marriage. I don't want him to get hurt, and I realize he's a big boy and can handle his business himself, but I hate to see him being made to look like some pussy whipped little slave boy. (No, it's not a role play scenario they are playing on purpose!) He is just so happy to have found someone to fuck him regularly I think he's willing to stoop to her less than noble level and let her walk all over him. It hurts me to see him like this. Not to mention the fact that she's married and before he met her he thought so little of cheaters. Now he is doing that himself.
Three quick things...
1. If it hurts you to see him like this, STOP LOOKING.
2. You know how a "straight" guy who won't shut up about the perverted homos is likely to be a homo? Well, a guy who won't shut up about the awful cheaters is likely to be a cheater himself. Both guys are externalizing an internal conflict, both are boring as hell, and both make lousy husbands.
3. Even if it's all going down exactly as you've described, letter writer, how is it any of your business? If someone you're no longer in a relationship with wants to be the whipped pussy* of someone you've never met and together they want to treat someone you don't know from Adam—but can quickly locate on Facebook—with disrespect, that's not any of your business.
I know that as long as this idiot woman is in his life he will see me less, spend less time with me, etc., because he's got someone else to spend time with and she fucks him! No matter who I dated after my marriage ended I never ignored my ex. I never talked poorly about him. I never betrayed him in any way. I still found time to hang out with him and we spent holidays together since I have no other family here. Now I'm scared I'll be pushed aside by my ex and have no one to spend the holidays with (which are not for another year or so). I know this woman he's seeing has told her soon to be ex everything that my ex has told her, she's shared info with her ex that my ex has shared with her in confidence. This woman isn't a good person and I know she is hoping he helps her financially to get out of her marriage. He has grand kids he could better spend that money on! I have no idea if he would help her financially or not and I know it's none of my business anyway. I just would hate for him to be taken advantage of by some married bimbo he's fucking. I'm sure she likes him as he's a great guy. I know he likes her because she's fucking him. I have no idea if he loves her or vice versa. They've only been dating for 2 months, so it's probably lust if anything.
Remember how I said this isn't your problem? Remember how you said that at the start of your letter? ("The problem is MINE...") Let's pause to reemphasize that point again. Your ex-husband and this "bimbo he's known less than two months" are adult humans making their own adult human choices and adult human mistakes. If you would've disengaged when you should've—which, really, was seven years ago—you might've avoided making the mistake of sending the soon-to-be-ex-husband of your ex-husband's girlfriend a friend request on Facebook to get more information about her. This stalkerish move was a major invasion of your ex's privacy, his girlfriend's privacy, and his girlfriend's husband's privacy. And yet you lashed out at your ex for invading... your privacy?
And your ex-husband's girlfriend may not even be cheating on her husband. You seem to know a lot about their relationship, but you're also overlooking the fact that all of this is happening right out in the open. Their divorce papers may not be finalized, but your ex-husband's girlfriend's soon-to-be-ex-husband doesn't seem too upset about this "cheating." But again, what your ex-husband does with his dick isn't any of your business. You are not involved. Mind your own business. Back off. Block their numbers, unfollow them on social media, go find someone to fuck yourself or buy a vibrator get a lap dance or some boundaries or a hobby or something.
Dan, I'm hurt and very angry at the horrible way my ex has been treating me since he met this married woman. I am having trouble with the fact that I don't get to see him as often and it's driving me nuts.
"My ex is horrible—and I hardly get to see him anymore!" is the relationship equivalent of "The food here is terrible—and the portions are so small!"
I am dating someone but it's not serious and I don't even know if it will last much longer. I would never alienate my ex over some guy I just met two months ago like he is doing to me. I am sad, angry and hurt and there's nothing I can do about it!
You're a better person than your ex. Not much better—I mean, he's being an asshole, but you're the one doing stalkerish shit. But if it makes you feel better, and if it'll get you to stop, I'll come down on your side and rule that you're less awful than he is. Now cut him out of your life.
I realize now how deeply I hurt him during and even after our marriage, although he never was able to express his true feelings to me while we were married. When I announced that I was moving out, his response was, "Fine, get the fuck out." He wasn't emotionally open enough to say, "Hey, don't leave me, I love you, let's work this out." Had he done that, I seriously may have worked harder on my marriage.
So... your marriage wasn't dead when you cheated on him? The cheating was a cry for attention? Hm. That backfired, didn't it?
He was never open with his feelings and when I hurt him he would withdraw inside himself even more. I know now that he was hurting but refused to show it or express it. I wish he had. It's too late for that now though. I can't help but wonder if he's getting back at me and purposely trying to hurt me like I hurt him? I wouldn't really put it past him. He's feeling all cocky and sure of himself now that he's seeing someone and this would be the perfect opportunity for him to get back at me for the hurt I caused him. Do you think that's what he's doing? He has plenty of free time to include me in his life when he's not with his married GF, so that's the only reason I can think of as to why he's been treating me so poorly by ignoring me, talking about me behind my back, and not spending any time with me. I'm very sad and very hurt.
"My ex is horrible—and I hardly get to see him anymore!"
I have to admit that I liked the fact that he wasn't seeing anyone regularly and that we spent time together (maybe 1 or 2 nights a week we'd go out). I used to have no doubt that he still loves me like family but you don't treat someone you love so poorly, so now I'm beginning to doubt he still loves me. 
How can I get over the fact that he's seeing someone who is threatening our friendship and he's allowing it to happen? He's my only family here and I love him like family. I always will love him (not in a romantic way) and I can't stand the thought of losing him, especially to a low rent bimbo who has brought him down to her level? I hate feeling this way and although I know I'll get over it eventually I want to get over it NOW. Any advice or input? 
Dear Readers: It’s Sherman Alexie's birthday—happy birthday, Sherman!—and by some strange coincidence... it's my birthday too. And while I’m taking it easy today (just three flights), I don't want to deprive you of your daily dose of Savage Love. So here are two not-very-complicated questions pulled out of today's emailbag—queries I could answer quickly—and one listener response I wanted to share.—I'm a 34-year-old male and I've been dating a woman on and off for the past eight months (she's 27, though I'm not sure that matters much to the story). I really care about this person, and she opened up a serious can of worms recently when she opened up my sketchbook/journal one morning when I went to work. I completely believe her when she says it was an accident. It was right on top of my desk and she says she was looking for paper to write me a note. That said, she read through it, and she did not like what she read. 
What she read specifically was from the first time we broke up was back in April. I was upset and I gave a pretty harsh commentary on her. I think I was trying to convince myself that I didn't feel as strongly about her as I did. A lot of the things were fair, but some were less so. She has some pretty heavy body image issues due to a significant weight loss that left her with excess skin and I talked about how it bothered me. I got over it, because I really value this person as a whole, but my own prejudice was a hurdle for me to get over. I never let it affect my ability to be intimate with her.
I think any trust we could have had is lost and I don't think she'll ever feel comfortable around me again. She's understandably upset, but do I have a right to be mad how deep she went into my private thoughts? And is she right to frame those thoughts as a inexcusable slight to her? Is there any way to salvage this relationship?
Betrayer/I have listened to your show and read your column for many years. I like that you cut to the chase. My husband and I have been married for fifteen years and have three children. Our twelve year old suffers form a chronic medical condition which requires me to be a full time caregiver and homeschooler.
I will do my best to sum up how I became a CPS and how I have attempted to move on with our lives. My husband and I had an amazing sex life—up and until our wedding night. Afterwards, he was unable to perform sexually. I begged and pleaded for him to get some help either with an MD or a shrink or both. He refused. Seven years into a totally sexless marriage, I became close friends with a college buddy of his. Lots of common interests. We also shared a common wound: we were both in sexless marriages. I tried, cried, and begged my husband to get some help because I could not stay in a marriage with no sex. Long story short, his friend and I started out with casual outings to book stores. (We're both big readers.) We soon had our inside jokes. I tried to warn my husband at one point about how this relationship was spiraling out of control. Husband shook it off assuring me that his friend would never do anything improper. 
His friend became physically affectionate and I found myself falling head over heels for the guy. The attraction was dynamite.
One weekend, we spent the night at the guy's house with his wife. She had to be up at 5 a.m. and left us to a night of heavy drinking. My husband passed out in the guest room and the friend and I started groping. The next thing I knew my husband was pulling me off of his friend. He asked what the hell we were doing and I was so drunk I told him I wasn't really sure. The next day we had to travel to for his sister's wedding. A tense situation to say the least. He ranted and railed at me for the entire twelve-hour drive. He threatened to kill himself, to kill his friend, to destroy both of us in the community. I took the blame and promised to end it. Which I did. I had developed emotional feelings as well as sexual feelings for the friend. I never told him that. My husband wanted to sweep it under the rug and move on. There were signs he was handling it poorly. He became an alcoholic. He would become angry and verbally abusive. I felt like I deserved it. He would continue to ask me for nitty gritty details and I began to evade his questions because the more I told him, the more enraged he became.
We had been trying to have children for many, many years and had been unsuccessful. As soon as I became pregnant, this barely consummated affair seemed to be water under the bridge. That is, until the guy's wife found out we were having a baby and mailed us a gift. My husband was enraged again and decided to call her and tell her the truth about her husband. I begged him not to do it. He told me that I wanted him to suffer in silence. I became pregnant with our twins five months later. We now had three babies who required everything we had.
My husband I attempted to go to counseling and it basically came down to this: either my husband has to accept his part in this tragedy or we had to divorce and move on. Due to ages of our children, we decided to sweep it under the rug and move onwards. At this point I was gravely inured in an accident and needed 24/7 nursing care for months. During my convalescense, my husband refused to engage in sexual contact with me. I met a man online through a porno site and we had cybersex. It was a great release for me. When the guy expressed romantic feelings, I ended it. It turned out my husband had placed tracking software on my computer and saw our messages. More rage.
Jump ahead several years. My husband and I went though extensive counseling and I thought things were ok. Now, seven years later, he has started having flashbacks and nightmares. He is inconsolable. He was so sure that I was lying to him that he contacted our former friend for all the details. My former friend made it sound like it was all my fault. He said I was the sexual aggressor. Now my husband says the scab has been ripped off, that he always knew I was a liar, and that he doesn't know what to do now.
Having a special needs child with critical health problems means all hands on deck. I have tried everything I can to get my husband to understand that I have been faithful to him through this time and WHY I was unfaithful to him. He wants to go back to couples counseling. I am fine with it as long as he understands the circumstances that led me to stray in the first place.
Dan, I am really lost. I will stay for the kids. I am bound and determined to care for them. My question is: can he get past this?
I am married and have a simple question: Is phone sex and webcam sex considered cheating on my spouse or is it not because the other person is not actually physically present? 
I’m a straight woman in my late 20s and I have a problem and it’s your fault.
Let me back up. I feel great about sex—conceptually, personally, interpersonally, in practice, all of it. This is largely your doing, as I’ve been reading your column for almost 15 years and your perspective was integral in helping me avoid the hang-up landmines that littered my religious upbringing. In fact, the only residue of religious judginess that stuck around as an adult was a sense of getting away with something illicit... which I like!
Here’s the issue: I am so well-adjusted that it’s hurting my otherwise fantastic sex life. I just don’t feel like there’s anything naughty about having sex anymore; sans the cultural baggage, anything one does in the bedroom is just consenting adults making each other feel great. Which is wonderful, but what’s dirty (in the good way) about that? Even the sense of “getting away with it” is gone since the boyfriend and I live in our own place and no longer have to fuck on the sly to avoid scandalizing our respective roommates.
How do I get that feeling back? Please don’t tell me we should bang in public, we already do that sometimes and it’s great fun but hasn’t done the trick.
Remember this guy from earlier this morning?

I wrote him back. Our long email exchange... after the jump.
You are a disgusting piece of shit! I am and forever conservative who believes in GOD! I am against all you fucking faggots and I will continue to destroy everything you try to create. I will fight you and your fag agenda forever! Come down my street you fudge packing coward. You won't because you are scared, you are a spineless, sick, repugnant and disgusting piece of shit. You will NOT win, you and all the other fags & dikes will lose and you will lose in a huge way. Eternity in hell will be a wonderful place for you!—Originally posted on November 11, 2012. 
I am a 22-year-old straight female. I used to babysit for a wealthy family, but their children have outgrown babysitters. The dad of this family is very into martial arts/fighting and has invited me over several times for "self-defense training." I have accepted his invitations a few times, and it has always started off as a normal workout in their home gym-treadmill, weights, swimming laps-but he is always pretty anxious to get to the self-defense part. Often he will blindfold me and then come at me, and I must then wrestle my way out of the situation using the moves I've learned.
I did this a few times, Dan, but I found it a bit unsettling. However, he never touched me inappropriately. Last time we did this, he told me he wanted to see how much pain he could take. He asked me to kick him in the groin with no protection until he couldn't take it anymore. I thought, "This is strange," but I was curious, so I did it. He was able to take it for a surprisingly long time. I haven't been back since, but for the last six months, he has been pestering me to come back. Recently, he suggested that we have what he calls a "competition." He will stand there, and I will kick him in the balls-or anywhere else I want-and if he gives up, I get $150. If I give up, by getting too tired, I give him $20. His wife knows about the workouts, but he said he doesn't want me to tell her about the fighting.
My question is this: Is there a sexual component to this? I have never heard of anything like this before, and I find it odd. But I am a poor college student, and for $150, I'll stand there fully clothed and kick this guy in the balls! Please let me know your thoughts.
Originally posted on December 19, 2012.
This is a touchy and gross subject. I am a 17-year-old girl growing up in an adoptive family in Australia. I was sexually abused by my birth family, and I think it really fucked up my sexuality. The only thing that gets me off is the idea of people absolutely destroying their lives for an orgasm. I started with mild S&M; stories and then moved on to grosser stuff like murder (stories and online images), pedo (stories only), and lately I've been thinking about my (adoptive) parents. The thing is, it doesn't have to be a particular category. As long as it's the most vile thing I can think of, it will get me off. There isn't a pattern as far as gender, age, or relationship to the people I am fantasizing about; it just has to be horrible, the kind of thing that would destroy you in real life. These fantasies alone are scary enough, but because they are literally the only things that get me off, I can't even really tell if I'm attracted to boys or girls or none of the above. I'm scared to talk to a counselor about this because I don't want to freak my parents out. I mean, I've got my quirks, but overall I seem like a pretty healthy kid, and I try not to worry them. I don't expect you to solve this problem via your column, but do you have any ideas for how I could get help with this without messing up my family?

My girlfriend and I have been together almost three years and we've always had trouble sleeping together. Not intercourse, but restful sleep. We share a queen size bed on nights we spend together and neither one of us is blameless. We're both sleep talkers. She has occasional night terrors. Despite sleeping naked with only one blanket, I wake up drenched in my own sweat 50% of the time when I'm alone and 99% of the time we sleep together. We don't live together now but we're at the point in our relationship and our lives that we're ready to move in together.
We openly acknowledge this challenge and we've discussed our future cohabitation and sleeping arrangements. We both like the benefits of separate beds (more restful, uninterrupted sleep) but we both enjoy the intimacy of sleeping together. Our sex life is great and sex before and/or after sleep is something that is important to both of us.
Is there any way we can train our bodies to be happy sharing a bed or should we get used to spending our nights like a couple in a 1950's sitcom?
Originally posted on January 22, 2014.
I'm 45, female, and married to a smart, funny, intelligent 50-year-old man. We've been together nine years, married seven. The sex was good for the first year and then dropped off to nothing. He says, "I've had plenty of sex in my life. I'm just not interested anymore." During my first marriage, the sex was so bad that I thought, "If I could find a man who loved to cuddle, I could go the rest of my life without sex." Perfectly describes husband number two! Except now I feel more sexual than I ever have! I've discussed this with my husband endlessly and have mentioned open marriage, but nothing ever comes of it. I'm not an instigator, although I have tried a few times and have been rejected. Yes, he has had his testosterone checked. It's normal. Not even going to a therapist helped. What do I do? He's a great guy, he loves me and my grown kids unconditionally, but we are more friends/roommates than husband and wife. We have a safe, comfortable life, but I'm too young to go without that for the rest of my life!
Originally posted on February 19, 2014.
I am a straight 19-year-old girl in college. I broke up with my boyfriend of several months a week before Valentine's Day (a WHOLE nother situation), and during that relationship, I met this other guy, one of his friends. This friend has been in a relationship for 2.5 years. But his girlfriend cheated on him, and now he has a free card to go fuck someone else. He wants that person to be me! We have fooled around some, but even though I am not looking for a relationship right now, I have reservations about fucking someone who is in a relationship, even if it's on a Go Fuck Someone Else card. Advice?
Originally posted on October 30, 2013.
I'm a youth who identifies as asexual. That isn't my question. I was born female, and I've been binding for a while and identify as gender-neutral. But I'm afraid to tell others that I'm gender-neutral for fear of being told I'm wrong because I wear dresses. Does wearing skirts and dresses mean I'm not gender-neutral? I just think I look better in dresses than flannel.
Gender-Originally posted on February 12, 2014.
I am an 18-year-old pansexual girl. I'm currently in a relationship with a guy. He is a bit younger, though mature for his age. We get along great, our friends like us together, yada yada. He wants to do the waiting until marriage thing for religious reasons, which I mostly agree with. We met in youth group, after all. Here is the kink. I lost the big V a year ago. He knows, isn't happy about it, but is willing to date me anyway.
What hasn't come up is the subject of porn and masturbation. He doesn't do either (or won't fess up to them) and doesn't approve. I, however, do both. Especially since my breakup (and thus no more sex) last year, I've come to rely on masturbating to take care of my sexual needs. The porn I am willing to forgo, but I don't want to give up pleasuring myself. This guy knows nothing. He has talked about how we ought to "keep ourselves pure." (My thoughts on purity: I've already screwed that up!) Is there any good way to communicate to him that I'm not going to give up masturbating without him going crazy? It took long enough just to show him I wasn't the spawn of Satan because I like girls as much as I like guys. Should I go along with his standards and try giving up masturbation? Or should I not tell him anything about what I do in the privacy of my own bedroom?
Originally posted on February 5, 2014
I'm a 30-year-old straight guy 18 months into a relationship with a 30-year-old bi woman. We get along wonderfully and fuck wonderfully. Have you ever tried to see who can out-rim whom? Fun stuff. We want a life together. The snag is that she has a certain dedication to Catholicism and wants us to marry. I'm agnostic on God, but I don't care at all for his earthly representatives; the idea of a priest giving me permission to kiss her is repellent. A secular courthouse wedding isn't much more appealing. I know that a marriage license doesn't automatically come with a dead bedroom, but it seems utterly unnecessary. It's also a binary sort of thing, and thus our go-to solution when we have a conflict—compromise—doesn't work here. I suggested flipping a coin as a sort of probabilistic compromise. She wasn't interested. Breaking up over the details of your future life together seems like a dumb thing for two smart people in love to do, but that's the outcome we're inexorably moving toward.
Originally posted on January 22, 2014. 
Five years ago, my wife and I decided to pursue her MFM threesome fantasy. Part of her fantasy was that the other chap have a BBC (big black cock), so we advertised and met this great guy who we've seen three times a year ever since. He is nice and open-minded, and we've become so comfortable with our BBC that we meet at our home now instead of a hotel. So there are respectful and safe people out there to be found! The issue I'm writing about is a problem with me. After our BBC ejaculates in my wife—everyone is tested and free of STIs—I enjoy going down on her, he enjoys watching me go down on her, and she enjoys having me lick the interloper's come from her pussy. That isn't the problem. The problem arises when our BBC isn't in the picture. We enjoy talking about our dirty threesomes, and we both talk about how hot it will be when I go down on her after I've unloaded in her myself. Unfortunately, once I've made my deposit, I have zero desire to go down on her. It's like someone flips a switch in my brain and something I couldn't wait to do is suddenly repulsive to me. This problem doesn't arise in our threesomes because our BBC always comes before I do. What is my issue? Is there a fix?
Can't Really Eat All My Pecker's Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
Vanilla straight guy here. As a fellow Washingtonian, I feel proud to live in a state that was among the first to legalize marriage equality by a popular majority vote of the people. I avidly follow the NFL and eat fried bologna sandwiches and do lots of other manly things. However, I have always loved musical theater. Whenever I go to New York, I have to see at least two or three big shows. My question: Is it socially acceptable for me to good-naturedly say, "I'm totally gay for musical theater"? Or is it a slur that I shouldn't say, no matter how playful or well-intended?
Originally posted on December 31, 2014.
I've recently discovered that I am a panty sniffer. Though since I'm a gay man, maybe I'm a briefs breather? The smell gets me hard and gets me off. I discovered this when a fuck buddy left his shorts behind, and for the next few days I jerked off sniffing his shorts. That brings me to the young millennial techie guys at my work. They are fucking slobs, and they're always leaving their underwear and socks on the floor of the company's gym in our office. The janitor picks them up and puts them in a lost-and-found bin. I started checking the bin, and nothing was being removed. No one ever claimed their shorts. So I started taking a pair every now and then. At home, I fantasize about who they belong to, and when I'm done with them, I just toss them. First question: Am I stealing? I assume the guys aren't missing them, since they've been in the bin for a week or more. Second question: Have I become one of those perverted panty sniffers from those old Chester the Molester comics?
I'm a man and I just slept with Marco Rubio. Marco didn't say a word the whole time and he hardly looked at me—and he was all thumbs.
Want the details?
I was flying Miami-LAX, and I noticed my generic-looking businessman seat-mate was busy on his phone, so I didn't pay much attention, and didn't do my usual introduction saying it was ok to tap me awake or jump over whenever he wanted to get out. Then the wheels started clicking and I realized is was Marco Rubio, one of the seventeen republican candidates for president! The guy being touted as a top tier candidate/potential nominee if/when the GOP get tired of being Trump'd.
He didn't say a word the whole flight. Initially taking a nap (me too), then not eating his breakfast or having anything to drink (is that why he's so famously parched?), until he asked for coffee when he woke up. Then he got out his iPad and started working it rapidly with his thumbs, going thru what appeared to be sports & political sites, including Drudge Report.
My question: Should I have engaged him? And, if so, what should I have said? My impression is that he's a Knows Better/Doesn't Do Better type (he must know that climate change is for real, that we needed to end the ridiculous embargo of Cuba, that same-sex marriage isn't a threat), so "educating" him is of little value. So should I have said something? Engaged or not?
Our son, who is almost 30 years old, was married four years ago. He just shared with us that for the last three years he and his wife have been practicing polyamory. They are committed to their relationship, but have each had relationships with both men and women over the last three years. We are trying to get our heads around this, as we come from a more traditional background (we've been married 40 years in a loving and respectful relationship), and we find ourselves feeling very sad. We are accepting and non-judgmental, just trying to understand how he came to this decision. He feels that to make love "finite," to love only one person, is "not being true" and that this kind of relationship prevents dishonesty and is based on truth. He also shared that his wife was the first one to broach this idea three years ago and after many long and deep conversations he eventually overcame his jealousy and now is embracing this practice. They do not have children and do not plan to ever have children.  Any guidance you can provide to us would be greatly appreciated.  
I greatly admire you and your work, and thank you for all of the caring guidance you have provided over the years.

I'm often give some other rightwing fuckwad the Santorum treatment—redefine their last name—but I demure because the santorum campaign was something special and it would be hard to replicate. (I dedicate a chapter in my last book to how it came together and why it worked.) Somehow, though, I wavered that conviction last week on Blabbermouth and got kindasortamaybe got behind the idea of redefining Rep. Jason Chaffetz's last name. Chaffetz is a Republican from Utah, the chairman of the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, the dude who launched an investigation every time Hillary Clinton farted, but he's downplaying Flynngate, refusing to investigate financial conflicts of interest relating to Trump, couldn't care less about Russia, and is pushing the lie that the people showing up at town hall meetings are paid protesters. Chaffetz is ripe for Santorum-izing—he's disgusting and, like Rick, his last name sounds like something disgusting—and now I'm tempted. And so are all of you:
Chaffetz: menstrual blood that dries and forms clots in one's pubic hair, making walking and other forms of movement painful. Much Love from a teacher who has been a loyal magnum subscriber ever since you created the magnum subscription, and who suffers from chaffetz now and then!
I feel like two things that don't have names that might fit this name are:
1. When, on a hot day or after working hard, one gets the sensation that their ass needs wiping (what is this from anyway, sweat?). The sensation or the wiping action could be "to chaffetz."
2. The other is when a sweaty taint is chaffing in a painful way or forms a rash due to sweat—that could be known as "chaffetzing."
I wanted to throw out this idea for a new definition for "chaffetz": the tingling and/or burning discomfort that often precedes a herpetic outbreak, be it oral or genital.
Moving on from chaffetz... a reader/listener wrote in to the trans caller whose college choir sang at Orange Julius Caesar's inauguration:
Hey Girl,
I am a bleeding liberal from Connecticut, but I went to college in Oklahoma. You are needed on campus in Missouri and your presence will probably save a life of someone whose struggle is profound and almost too painful to bear. I once read an article that said that poverty can be solved in four words: know a poor person. Not through work, but have a friend who is poor. I think that applies to the trans community. How do you solve Transphobia? Know a trans person. Not on TV (which helps), but personally. Your presence in this conservative wasteland is so necessary and makes you an activist!
So go get 'em. Kick ass and be obnoxiously proud and successful.  Find your place to be loved and to share love. You've got this.  And if you need to go home to Chicago when your time at school is over, don't regret that. Because I got the fuck out of Oklahoma the minute I was done.
Regarding my comments on Kristen Stewart on the Savage Lovecast:
Dan, Noah Michelson's article on Kristen Stewart was dripping in lesbian erasure. I was surprised that you quoted him on your podcast. Kristen said she is gay, and you and Noah treat her like she is not because she dated men before coming out. You dated women before stating that you are gay. Elton John married a woman before he came out as gay. Why the double standard? Has your definition of gay changed? Are you stating that you are fluid? It seemed that way to me. Sounds like Kristen knows she is gay but you don't seem to think that gay means gay anymore, so I guess you are bisexual or fluid? Not that there is anything wrong with that, I would still listen to your podcast if you were bi or fluid. But lesbian erasure sucks, just as much as gay male erasure would suck, wouldn't it?
You know what also sucks? Bi erasure. From my perspective, it seemed Stewart was pretty much coming out as "so gay," but I included Michelson's article because it made a solid point:
It should also be noted that Stewart’s “so gay” comment doesn’t necessarily mean that she literally identifies as gay. She did date Pattinson, someone who, as far as we know, identifies as male, which may mean she identifies as bisexual or pansexual or sexually fluid or in some other way than “gay,” which is traditionally thought of as being sexually attracted to someone of the same gender. Perhaps she chose that phrase because it packed the most punch and would be the most instantly recognizable to those watching the show―and because it’s probably the term most people have used behind her back ever since she started dating women. But she also may have decided at this point in her life that it’s the term that feels the most appropriate. We just don’t know.
That said, Stewart was definitely setting off my lezdar.
And a follow-up to a Savage Love Letter of the Day from last year: 
Some time ago I wrote to you about my affair, The Affairs We Don't Hear About. A successful affair that I was having. Your readers slammed me for many things; a poorly written letter, how could I have found someone at Ashley Madison, and there was no way things were as good as I said they were.  Well, here I am to say yes my affair is that good. It's been a year and we're still together. We have turned our sex-only affair into a love affair. I'm not sure that either one of us had anticipated that. But it happened. Feelings developed, the relationship became intense sexually, emotionally, and intellectually. We have made time for one another. We go for dinner, enjoy weekends away, and just spending the day together doing the things we like. For me, this affair has been a life saver. This man came into my life for a purpose. That purpose was to show me what true intimacy is like with someone that loves you. He does love me and I do love him. I am having incredible sex and try many new things. Things I was never allowed to discuss or try in my own marriage because it was considered taboo.
I sought advice from a lawyer. I did tell my husband I was not interested in being married and any longer, it was only fair to him. But the affair is my way of coping with an emotionally abusive marriage. We have children and right now he won't let me leave. So I stay and continue on with what makes me happy. I know that my lover will never leave his wife. He's 20 years older than me and has been married for 40 years. I have the luxury of being younger and able to move on. I don't have the same life he has. I have sought out counseling which has helped me become more self-aware and confident. I also started a blog sharing my real life affair. Hopefully to help others involved in a situation similar to mine.
Yes, I followed your advice and I am truly happy that you wrote many articles encouraging people to have an affair to meet their needs. I got my needs met and learned more about myself and my marriage in the last year that I would have never known. I am truly grateful for frank advice. It was just what the doctor ordered.
A So here's a relationshipish question about remaining friends with your ex following a break up.
My ex dumped me about six months ago. We ended in a long distance scenario and remain that way now, and will remain that way for the foreseeable future. We don't really have any mutual friends. Due to the distance, there isn't a chance that we'll really run into each other again unless something is otherwise planned. Essentially, us seeing each other in social situations or something is not likely.
I've reached out to friends about this, and other more experienced people with mixed results. Some say it's time to move on. Others say that just because you don't love each other romantically anymore, it would be unforunate to throw away somebody you cared about and loved a lot. Importantly, our relationship did not end well. It ended horribly actually. And it was horrible for the last nine months of it. The longer we dated the more we grew apart and the less I liked her as a person. I was forcing myself to be somebody who I wasn't so that I could cater to her needs while neglecting my own. I was an absolute prick to her and treated her like shit as a consequence. And all this was happening simultaneously with my job in the Army crumbling in front of me. Needless to say it was a dark time that I did not enjoy.
However! I get out of the Army in three months, I will be moving to Oregon from the shithole of Tennessee, and I will be spending my time traveling and fucking around. All the things I missed out on doing in my twenties. I am very happy with where my life is at right now. But is it worth trying to salvage a friendship? I am trying to move on from that chapter in my life and take with me all the lessons learned, but at the same time I do have a lot of very fond memories of my ex and I don't want to throw them away.
A Relationship's Background: an early-twenty-something cousin of mine came out to me over a meal a few months ago. The discomfort around the uncharted territory of coming out was apparent in both our behaviours. I think his exact words were, “Oh, so… I’m very gay.” It was all sort of nonchalant and in the same tone as, “Oh, so… I’m switching majors.” He gave me no time to sense what he might be about to share with me, Dan, so it completely blindsided me. So the first thing I said was, “I know!”, which was stupid! (But I also did know, and had suspected for many years.) I went on to express what I hope was genuine happiness to hear the news. I think I did all the right things through the rest of our meal including listening a lot.
Thinking back on the moment over the last few months though, I felt strongly that I’d said the wrong thing at first and wished that it had turned out better. He was away all summer on vacation, and we just got together the other night. He told me that he felt I’d said the wrong thing, too. I apologised and said that it was great news and I was happy he told me. But I was definitely sad that he felt I’d said the wrong thing, because it’s an incredibly vulnerable moment and you should be able to expect graceful support from your family.
I’m wondering what your take on it is. If you could come out all over again, what would you want to hear from the people you came out to?
I'm home for the summer from college and will go back in a few weeks. I have two little sisters and an older brother who lives across the country. I've always thought my parents had a great marriage, but last week I came home to find my dad tossing my mom around the living room. He found her email address on Ashley Madison, confronted her, learned about affairs, and went berserk. My dad has never been a violent man and has always been in control of his temper. But what I saw last week terrified me. I found a hole in the wall at about the height of my mom's head and the shattered remains of a heavy glass ornament, too, and think he threw something at her before I returned. My parents have both apologized to me for what I saw, and my dad has sworn he will never lose his temper like that again. By some miracle, my mom doesn't have any injuries, and I guess they want me to be okay with what happened because of that.
But I don't think I will ever look at my dad the same again. I don't care what my mom did—and he's definitely blaming his rage fest on her infidelity—because what my dad did was, to me, unforgivable. I'm the only kid who was home at the time, and I have been sworn to secrecy. It's eating me up inside, and I'm scared to go back to college because of what might happen when I'm gone. My parents don't want to talk to me about it, and I'm at a loss as to what to do. 
I have a question. I'm half-Mexican, 40's, gay, and male. In my youth I was a weak nerd who was made fun of by jocks—and now I am very attracted to young white straightish jocks. So much so that they're all I go for. And when I find one that lets me have sex with them? It feels amazing, like incredibly fulfilling, I feel so special that he's letting me into his bodies and his realm. I'm only in for the short term, obviously, and so this is only briefly fulfilling. My adult sex life has been a cycle of finding these guys and I'm really only turned on by this one type. Do you think this cycle can be broken? If I maybe learned to "love myself" and no longer needed the attention of these guys to feel good—maybe I could broaden my spectrum of attraction? Or is it pretty hard "coded" at this point? Obviously this is going nowhere.
I've been married to my husband for one month now, though we've been a couple almost six years. We are in the process of moving and I've stayed behind to pack up, while he's looking for apartments in our new city. We agreed that I should go through our old iPhones and get any pics off of them and just toss them, or try to sell them. Well I found no pics on his, but I did snoop on his email to find out if he had pay stubs in there and saw a folder called "work." I opened it and found on four separate emails to himself of four different pics of his old co-worker, and she's posing naked in all of them. They were dated two years ago—about 4 months before he proposed to me! Needless to say it felt like a punch in the gut. 
I immediately confronted him. At first he couldn't be honest with me. He admitted that he had the pictures, but thought he deleted them a long time ago. He played the blame game a bit, saying we were in a rough spot in our relationship and we weren't having much sex and that he wasn't sure where we were going at the time. I believe that he did delete them from his new phone, but the old phone still has that folder.
Long story short, after a few days of crying and many interrogations, he came clean about the whole thing. It only lasted a couple of weeks. It started out as innocent flirting and it escalated to sexting. In the heat of the moment he emailed her pics to himself and deleted them from his phone. He said he thought he got them out of his email box. He never made it clear to this girl that he made a mistake and he has continued to be friendly with her since. He said the mistake made him realize that he really needed to decide if I was what he really wanted in life, and he obviously felt I was because he proposed to me a few months later.
We have always been very open with each other and try to stay creative and spice things up. We regularly listen to sex podcasts and read books, articles and talk about what we learned from them.  Ultimately I feel that he cheated on me and completely disrespected me by lying about it. But I also knew that I had to find out why he did this—what did he get from her that he couldn't have gotten from me? And why did he choose not to tell me? And moreover, why didn't he cut ties with her?
I have decided to try to work this out with him. He has admitted to having a lot of issues. He said he didn't cut ties with her because he has huge insecurities about what other people think about him and he didn't want her to "not like him." He said he felt he could sext with her, and be open with her, at the time, because he didn't care what she thought because he didn't really know her and felt safe doing that with her. And when it was all said and done he felt so much shame that he buried it, and basically pretended it never happened. Finally, he insists that there were no physical acts between them. I believe he is remorseful. He cries every time we talk—and I have only seen this man cry once in six years. But I'm worried that I won't be able to get over this. That it will eat me up inside.
I just want to know what your thoughts are on our situation. 1. Do you think he should be forgiven? 2. How can we recover from this if he is? 3. What are your thoughts about his sexting relationship? 4. Do you think this was cheating? 
We have been together a long time now, but our marriage is still young, and I'd hate to see the last six years go down the drain. Help!
I'm coming to you because your sage advice makes me trust that you can help me out.
I'm a straightish, pregnant 33-year-old in Colorado. I've been married for two years and with my husband for six. Here's my dilemma/issue: my husband and I seem to have very different ideas about male/female friendship boundaries. I will be the first to admit that one of my prices of admission is my jealousy. My husband has used this as justification for lying about female friendships he's had in the past, which, as I'm sure you can imagine, did nothing to help my jealousy. He now has a new 22-year-old friend—a girl from work—and I'm struggling. After the previous incidents I alluded to before, one of the things I'm allowed to do is check his text messages if I feel so inclined. (I know you're rolling your eyes, Dan, but please stay with me.) This 22-year-old has made me inclined.
Nothing they have talked about is so extreme that it has me confronting him immediately, Dan, but I am still VERY uncomfortable with the subject matter. For example, her talking about doing homework naked and him asking "for his friend Jordan" if she likes guys who wear women's underwear, which is actually something we enjoy together. (And when she said she thought it was gross he agreed—what a turd!) Now that I am pregnant, I am feeling like the stakes are even higher and finding these messages has me questioning if I can accept this blurring of boundaries as my husband's price of admission. Should I just write this off as my husband being pathetic or should I confront him? This seems like a very slippery slope to me but my husband probably won't see it that way. I could wrap my head around forgiveness for cheating if we had been together for over a decade, but if it were to happen only two years in, we would be done.
I'm trying really hard not to be crazy pregnant lady, but please feel free to set me straight if I am. 
I'm sure you get a lot of these messages, but I just have to thank you for the work that you do. When my husband and I got married five years ago, we had already discussed things like "What happens if one of us cheats?" which we knew to talk about thanks to reading your column regularly. We frequently revisit the idea of opening up our marriage, though we haven't done it yet. And you know what? We might never do it. But being able to talk about it and be honest about meeting each other's needs (or not) has been a lifesaver to our marriage.
This week my husband approached me to let me know that he had a free profile on Ashley Madison. I would have never searched for his information, but he wanted me to know just in case. He said it fell under our "don't ask, don't tell" rules regarding flirting with other people and porn use. And even though I was initially kind of hurt, I agree with him. I can't overstate how thankful I am to have this kind of open communication with my husband about our sex life.
Oh, and we were both raised in super conservative households and consider ourselves Christians. I have a better sex life than any of my friends, too. THANK YOU!
Originally posted on January 30, 2013.
I recently caught my boyfriend watching porn. We have talked about it before, and he said he didn't watch it while he was in a relationship. But when I caught him there with his dick in his hand, I lost it. I have never felt so hurt or betrayed. This is my first serious relationship. I can't get over how sick and sad I feel. It feels like he was cheating on me. Should I be as upset as I am? It was interactive porn—it was like he was cybersexing with one of his ex-girlfriends. What should I do?
Here’s my situation: I’m 27, straight, and female (and GGG, or trying to be anyway), and I’ve been with my partner, male, for six years. A little over a year ago he came out to me as bisexual. To keep a long story as short as possible: We got through it (part of getting through it meant that I went to counseling, and it was one of the best things I ever did), we have had a few threesomes (with other men), and after the first one—at least—when everything was fresh and new and reinvigorated we both felt that it had brought us closer together as a couple, and as people who love each other, and who are committed (but monogamish!).
In addition to navigating all that, we have been living long distance for about a year and a half now. We manage to visit each other every 3-5 weeks. I cope with this pretty well (I’m completing a PhD, and I like my space) but he hasn’t coped quite so well. In recent months, his tendency to guilt trip me about being where I am, and having made the choices I have, has really had an impact on my happiness. Things got really bad, to the point where I almost ended it. We managed to pull up our bootstraps though, and so far things seem to have improved.  
My main issue is this: Where I once was more or less 100% sure he was "the one," over the last year and a half, after rebuilding the level of trust several times (threesomes can be tricky), and having some disagreements about the future (I’m not so keen on marriage, and am pretty ambiguous about kids—he wants both), I am, shall we say, less than 100% sure he is the one I want to build my future with. That’s hard for me to say, because I love him dearly and passionately. But, among other things, I don’t think threesomes are in my future long-term. I’ve read all the books and still can’t shake the feeling of being less-than or not-enough completely. (I don’t think I want to feel this way, even off and on, forever, you know?) I sometimes feel like I’m just not cut out to deal with THIS particular set of problems. I hope that doesn’t make me sound shallow—I have exhausted myself over this for over a year (working at it, communicating, reflecting, going for it, etc)
So, do I tell him this? Do I disrupt the harmony, shake the boat, and let him know that I’m just not sure anymore? That week-to-week is pretty much as far ahead as I can look? Or, do I just go with it, (potentially wasting more time in this relationship) and wait until I know for sure that I want out? Or that I don’t? 

I've been single now for a little over a year and a half, after getting out of a ten-year marriage.  For most of this time I've been low-key FWB with a super hot and reasonably kind and communicative guy friend of mine. Now I've moved to the West Coast and I'm beginning to really date for the first time since I was a teenager. I've slept with a couple of men since I've moved, and both have made me feel weird about what I want in bed. Is a little dirty talk, spanking and mutual masturbation not vanilla? Is it wrong for me to ask for what I want within the first couple of times having sex with a new partner? Are straight men delicate sex flowers? What is vanilla? I'm new to dating and need some guidance. Help me, Guru Dan!
Here's A I’m a gay woman in my mid-forties and I would like to know your thoughts on a man in his 50s blurting out to his teenage daughter that the reason he sees and now pays for the boyfriend services of a male escort is because his wife, the young woman's mother, wouldn’t have sex with him.
This heretofore straight married man is my best friend's husband. He and my friend had an arrangement—he was free to look elsewhere. They are now finally in the process of divorcing. I’ve always known the man to be quite cold, but he is now totally infatuated with this 30-year-old guy who walks all over him. The whole situation is quite sad and very complicated but I’d really like to arm my friend with some sort of answer for him when this is undoubtedly throws in her face again—that her withholding sex is to blame. The truth is it was a marriage of convenience but that is a whole other story, though his lack of drive when they first got together now makes perfect sense—he is gay! I doubt he will ever say it in front of their daughter again though I’m still sickened by his callousness.
Without going into too much detail... they had separated and moved back in (a misguided decision in my mind) for their daughter's sake. Before the split there was no sex because he didn’t want it and when they moved back in together he all of a sudden said “let’s have sex” and my friend said no. They agreed that he should be able to go outside of the marriage for sex but he took it a step further and introduced this young man as his mentee with the intention of having him welcomed into the family. The rest of the story is so outrageous I’d need hours to do the situation justice.
I’d like to know how you might explain someone who justifies things in such a way. He is very good with his words, thanks to his profession, and my friend not so much. What worries me the most is their daughter but thankfully my friend has taken her to a good therapist.
A This went up really late yesterday—I screwed up the scheduling—so I'm reposting it this morning for those who missed it and because I'm kinda proud of the headline.
This was scheduled to go up at 5:30. Don't know why it didn't—but better late...
I'm a bedwetter and am super embarrassed about it.  My boyfriend knows and I know he doesn't mean to hurt me but he makes jokes about it. He even once saw me wet myself and made a joke. I know I should say something but I'm afraid too.
I'm a 35-year-old woman married to a 50-year-old man. We have been married for three years, together for seven, and have a 18-month-old child. I recently discovered that my husband has slept with at least six other women in the last five years. He seems to be a compulsive liar and serial cheater, and my question to you is whether he can ever really change. 
The backstory is that we met when he was still married to his now-ex wife (they have two older children together). He told me they were essentially separated (living in different bedrooms) though I no longer know if I believe this. We had a fun whirlwind sexcapade affair in hotels around the country. We both traveled a lot for work, and attended a lot of the same conferences and work events. After he got divorced, we moved in together, and had a good relationship for a number of years. We got engaged, got married, etc. Shortly after our wedding, he started acting weird, staying out late with his 23-year-old assistant, etc. I confronted him and asked if he was sleeping with her, and he looked me in the eye and told me No. I chose to believe him, but we ended up separating for six months to see if being together was what we wanted. I wanted to be married, have a baby, buy a house, the whole suburban dream. We dated while separated and ended up getting pregnant, mostly on purpose. We bought the house, and have been living mostly happy for a few years.
I've always harbored some suspicions about what really went on with the 23-year-old assistant—knowing that if he did it WITH me, he would likely do it TO me, "once a cheater, always a cheater," etc. He confessed to having an affair with another woman before me while still married to his ex-wife, so I knew I wasn't the only one. A few months ago I found some text messages on his phone to the 23yo that were suspicious, but not damning. But I am a trusting person and chose to believe him. 
Before deciding whether to have a second child, I had to just know if I was really just being jealous and paranoid, or whether he was truthful, so I looked at his personal email. His email was littered with very explicit photos and emails to a handful of women throughout the past five years, including the six months where we were separated and he was actively trying to get back together with me. When confronted, he admitted to the four women in the emails, but didn't tell me about the other two, which I found out later. He had a chance to be honest and didn't take it. 
Turns out I was right about the 23yo—they had a 2.5 year affair that lasted through our engagement, wedding, pregnancy up until when our child was born. He also had an ongoing affair of multiple years with another colleague, and a number of one-/multiple-night stands with other women. The affair with the 23yo bothers me most of all because 1. he is twice her age, 2. she reports to him at work so it is MAJORLY illegal and put his professional career at risk, 3. she has been my "friend" and come to our house, held our baby, etc., 4. it started before we were married and continued through our wedding (WTF?), 5. he used all the same lines and moves on her that he used to seduce me, and 6. he lied to me when confronted and let me think I was jealous and paranoid. The rest bother me, but not as much as this. 
I don't care that much that he had sex with these women—in fact, I had brought up the possibility of having an open marriage, but he wasn't into it. I'm just really hurt that he lied to me, for so many years, to my face, over and over. I don't know if I can forgive that. 
He is in therapy now, and has been attending Love and Sex Addicts Anonymous meetings (not sure I believe in the "disease" of sex addiction). He desperately wants to make it work, but I am not so sure. For our child's sake, I would rather break up now than when she is older and can understand and be traumatized. I just can't believe that at 50, he is going to all of a sudden change patterns of cheating and lying that he has mastered over the last 25 years. He is a great husband otherwise, kind, caring, stable, smart, etc., he just has some hole in his life that he fills by seducing and sleeping with women so that he can feel attractive and wanted. 
Sorry for the long email. But my heart is broken and I need to know whether I should just do my best to move on and write this guy off (though I have to see him every day of my life due to our having a child together) or whether there is any chance it can work.
So my ex and I were in a relationship for four years beginning when she was 18 and I was 21. About 1.5 years in we became poly for another 1.5 years then we went back to being monogamous. Polyamory wasn't really an issue during that time. Last October we moved into a house together with two of our friends. It turned out to be an extremely stressful situation that did not go well. During the spring my ex became more and more distant and was spending more time away from home. I also knew there was a guy at work she was beginning to have feelings for and she began pressuring me to open up our relationship again. We never saw breaking up as an option. I never wanted to be poly again, but I reluctantly agreed. I should have already saw this as a sign.
For the following month what we had was not really a poly relationship. There was little communication. She was still staying out late most nights of the week and not saying where she was or communicating at all. When questioned about it she would get defensive and say something like "I'm a free woman, I can do what I feel like." My roommates were hurt by the situation because we grew really close early on and then she spent virtually no time with them anymore. We went on vacation for 10 days and upon returning she almost immediately left and disappeared until almost 1 am. I knew what she was doing and was not okay with it. After about a week more of this type of behavior I confronted her and she confessed to having slept with the new guy five times during the time we had returned from vacation. We decided this wasn't working and we needed a break.
For the first few weeks of the break we alternated between trying not to speak with each other and fighting aggressively. I wouldn't talk to her for three days and then I would get several texts of her declarations of love and spiritual connection to me. I'd go about my business and then a few days later she would text me saying "Just saw so-and-so's new apartment and they seemed so happy. I wish that could be us." Basically getting mixed signals. Every time i would speak to her again and try to continue some sort of casual friendship my trust for her would either get betrayed in some way or she would only seem to communicate if she needed something from me. For example, we technically still share the house. I moved back to my parents due to the emotional baggage there, but I'm still paying rent and have yet to move my things out. One day I went back to pick up some clothes and discovered she had essentially moved me out of the house, rearranging our entire bedroom and moving my personal belongings, in addition to taking some of my belongings from my office. I received a message the same day saying "hey I wanted to let you know I paid your part of the internet and electric bills since you no longer live here." It felt like a passive aggressive back stab to me, especially considering at that point we were still "on a break" and hadn't once discussed me moving out permanently. I didn't speak to her for several days after that, opting not to fight about it, but she quickly realized why I wasn't speaking with her and covered up moving everything out as "just trying to be comfortable" and taking my personal stuff (mostly decorative plants) as "wanting to be nice and take care of your plants" (though they're literally a room away). I have a very forgiving and understanding personality so naturally after expressing my views I forgave her and went back to trying to be friends, but in the back of my mind felt like she was still trying to have her cake and eat it too (ie. breaking up with me, getting her own place to live, and getting a brand new FWB, but still having my emotional support and friendship).
This type of pattern basically continued for a month and a half. Her doing something I felt was messed up, her justifying it, me forgiving her and thinking maybe I'm the one who is wrong, and then her doing something I find selfish and inconsiderate again. The nail in the coffin for me was when for about a week she was being extremely nice, almost absurdly. I thought it was odd and felt like she was sucking up to me for unknown reasons, but it seemed like her way of trying to make everything "easier" for me (and perhaps make herself feel more like she's doing the right thing). I found out from my roommate that she had been having the new guy come over in the middle of the night and sleeping in our room (which she previously said she would never do out of courtesy and because it's simply uncomfortable). He swore it to have happened at least three times he was aware of. Naturally, I thought this was not right at all, considering the fact that 1. I still pay for the place, and I'm not paying for someone else to live there and 2. Most of my stuff is still in there. The bed itself is hers, but the bedroom set we split half the price of. and 3. Just as a friend I find it immensely inconsiderate to share a place with your best friend of four years and then disregard that.
I confronted her about the situation and she blatantly lied to both my roommate's and my face. She confessed to it happening once and then later confessed to it happening multiple times. She said she felt awful about it the first time, but I find that hard to believe considering it happened again, and again. After this I decided I just couldn't have this person in my life and told her I was tired of my trust and forgiveness being taken advantage of I could no longer speak to her. I blocked her Facebook and her phone number and it's been about a week since we've spoken. Initially she left me nine voice mails (yes even with a blocked number my phone still gets the voice mails and texts) and was freaking out crying and saying she was going to crash her car. I naturally had to call her and then she basically justified her behavior and just tried to find out "what other people thought of her" the entire time I was on the phone. Later that night she left a letter in my mailbox apologizing for everything and saying "she would do anything if it made me happy, even if that means never talking to you again." A few days later she sent me several texts speaking of "spiritual connection" and how "we HAVE to be together" again. Then nothing since. I have responded to nothing in about a week now.
My questions are...
Am I doing the right thing by cutting contact? Am I right in being extremely angry with and not having any trust in her anymore? Am I right in feeling taken advantage of and used and like she was (unconsciously) doing nothing but attempting to keep me on a leash or am I being overly sensitive?
I feel as if she treated the whole thing like I was just another guy she dated for two months and it's perfectly acceptable to just break up and get on with your life doing whatever you feel like. However, it doesn't make sense to me how one would choose to go about things in that way when they definitely want to continue remaining good friends and they claim to care about and don't want to hurt the other person. Also, just from a moral standpoint I would never have gone about things this way if our roles were reversed.
So what do I do? Should I keep trying to see it from her perspective and forgive her? Or should I just accept that she's selfish and immature and is playing emotional games with me and just cut her out of my life?
This just came in to the group editors email...
Hello editors,
I have been reading Savage Love for over a decade in your publication and will no longer be purchasing it as you have fired Dan Savage. Let me know if you decide to reinstate the only advice column that deals with sex positivity, education and consent in a nation plagued with bullying, shaming and sexual assault.  
Thank you,
I'm a 26-year-old gay guy. I just moved to a new city and started making some friends. Through these friends, I recently met a 45-year-old guy. He's shown a lot of interest in me, and I find him very nice, smart, and funny, and I really enjoy his company. We went out a few times alone but not really on official dates. Now he's on vacation and he keeps texting and checking up on me every few days.
I really like the guy, but I'm struggling with the age difference between us. I've thought about it a lot, and the way I see it is that it might not be a big problem now but it will be in the future if things work out. By the time I'm ready to have kids, he's gonna be almost 60. And chances are he's gonna pass away before I do. I know you never know when these things happen, but the idea scares me. And if things don't work out, I'm worried it would be awkward to hang out together, and I would lose the few friends that I've made so far.
In general, my mind is saying "what's the point of it?" but my heart is saying "try it out, why not." It might be an old problem, but I'm really struggling with it, so I hope you give me your insight. What do you think?
I'm a divorced 45-year-old straight male living in the Bay Area of CA. I have joint custody of my daughter, and I get along well, for the most part, with my ex-wife. I met my GF, who I will call "J," 11 months ago. She lives in rural CA about 140 miles away. She is a 38-year-old single parent as well and she is a stay-at-home mom who lives in a posh house with her parents. She's been trying to create a start-up business from home with her art, but so far has made little progress since we've met. Her ex is a bit of a deadbeat, so I've been helping her finance her business and expenses like her car and clothes for J and her daughter.
From the get-go, things have always been hot for us. It was love at first sight! The sex is INTENSE. We even share the same kinks. We rarely argue, and when we do have differences, we always manage to talk them out without any hurt feelings. I also get along with her parents just fine. They're in their early 60s and healthy.
From the beginning J always told me she wanted to leave the town where she lives because it's very rural and there's nothing there for her in regards to a future. When I presented her the idea of moving into my house in the Bay Area, she was warm to it. She didn't like the house I lived in because my previous GF from two years prior lived with me, and J felt there were too many bad memories in the house. We talked about moving elsewhere. 
About two months ago, to expedite the search for a good house, we agreed that I would give up my current home and I'd airBnB it for a couple of months to save up cash so we could find a great place. Well, it's a couple of months later, and I'm sitting on a pile of cash, and suddenly I was hit with a brick this week. She was on vacation with her mom and daughter last week. On Tuesday she cashed $300 from a blank check I gave her—she says for expenses and back-to-school clothes for her daughter—which was fine. Normally, when I'm working, I'll text her in the morning say the standard "I love you" and count the days before I see her again. And normally I'd get a response. Last week, nothing. I figured bad reception. I received a cold message two days later saying hi and not much more. I can confirm that she did go with her mom and daughter, so I know there was no cheating going on.
When they got back to her parents' house on Saturday, she texted me she had a headache and she was going to bed. I asked if I could drive up Sunday, and she said she's busy and needs time to work on cleaning the house. I said I'd just stop by because I knew J and her mom were going to SoCal to see grandma for another two weeks. Sunday comes, I drive to the house, I get a text from J that says she can't see me at the house and that we should meet in town. In my head I was like OH SHIT. Then 10 minutes later she tells me to come to the house. I get to the house and I can see my belongings, just some extra clothes I leave there, in a garbage bag by the door. She comes to the front door and says it's over because she can't leave the town she grew up in! It's too stressful for her to leave! She says it's just too much for her to work and be a mom. But I've ALWAYS helped her physically, emotionally, and financially! I tell her I can't lose her and I'd agree to her staying where she lives while I lived in an apartment in SF and we can see each other every weekend. She says that's not fair to me (!) and that it's over and told me to leave.
I've tried to call and text, nothing. I get an e-mail saying the same thing she said to my face, that this is over and that she's sorry but that we've stopped connecting that that she was failing me. I'm destroyed. I haven't told my daughter yet, and I know that it's going to hurt her greatly. I'm at a loss. Do I just walk away from the most beautiful girl I've ever dated? Do I give her space? I gave up my house and now I'm left with a mess. Please HELP me!!!!!
Male from Canada writing, 36 years old, straight. Two years ago, I was in a common law relationship with a woman for a little over 4 years.  Several times during our relationship, I would notice her trying to shield her phone from me while she texted. Invariably, she would be talking to a guy she met somewhere, I’d discover that she planned to cheat on me, we’d fight, she’d forget about the other guy, things would go back to normal, then the whole process would start again.  In the last few months of that relationship, I found out (because I snooped through her email and phone… and snooping is bad… but I don’t regret it) she had a few more affairs than I’d originally known about—somewhere between four and seven—and this left me feeling betrayed and disposable.  Presently, I’m six months into a relationship with a woman I’m madly in love with. In fact, I fell in love with her the moment I set eyes on her. She has a backstory of her own, however: it seems that whenever she allows herself the vulnerability necessary to fall in love, the relationship fails, and she gets hurt. This has led to her trying to sabotage our relationship on a couple occasions in an attempt to make it less ideal, or to cause conflict, so that if we do break up, it doesn’t feel like she’s losing something worthwhile. Anytime things between us start getting really good, she gets afraid of getting hurt and pushes me away. Because of debt I’m carrying, I work two jobs and rarely get a day off. Lately when I’m at work she’s been spending her days off with her ex-boyfriend, which is reminiscent of everything I went through with the common law. Paraphrasing John Irving, "It’s not just a trigger. That’s all the bullets." I’ve told her why this behavior bothers me so much, that I feel it sends both me and her ex the same message. (He’s hard to let go of, I’m disposable.) But she still hangs out with him on a regular basis. I've told her she's causing me a lot of pain and worry, but she doesn't seem willing to let go of this relationship with her ex. Am I being a jerk and letting my past experience color this new relationship, and if so, any ideas on how to get past it? Or is she completely disregarding my feelings on the matter? 
Do you have any advice on how to develop healthy sexual boundaries when you have a long history of people not letting you?
I was sexually abused by a relative starting when I was a child and continuing until I was fourteen. My first relationship wasn't until after I finished college, and it wasn't a healthy one. I've dated a little since then, but not much, mostly because: (1) pretty much no one is interested in me and (2) frankly, I'm not sure I'm healthy enough to be dating these days.
As a fat, disabled, gay trans guy, I pretty much feel like my options are to either not have sex at all or to have casual sex with guys who it often turns out don't treat me well. I don't think there's anything wrong with having casual sex, and it has sometimes been a positive experience for me. Far too often, though, I've met up with guys with whom I've agreed to have one kind of sex only to have it turn into something violent or very different from what I consented to. Yes, rape would accurately describe several of these experiences. Help?
Haunted, Unlucky, Long long long time reader and listener. I need your advice today, right now, please.
I am distraught and don't know what to do. I've been dating a man for about eight months now. He's 30 I am 32. Everything was going well. You know this whole song and dance. Then out of the blue he says "I'm struggling with this." He says this is the best relationship he's ever been in. This is the first time he's ever been able to see himself with someone for the long term. "But I need space to think about it. Can we talk in three weeks?" I was shocked and in tears but said yes.
That was last Tuesday. I waited three days but felt panicky and insecure and awful. It seemed insane to wait three weeks to... see if he wants to dump me? Or not? I kept crying at work and didn't know what to do. So Saturday morning I emailed him to say that I needed to speak with him sooner. He called the following day, Sunday, yesterday. I said that I didn't understand. He seemed sort of short and frustrated with me over the phone. I asked him to explain and he said he had nothing to say but what he had already said. I asked him to meet me in person and he said he would. Tonight at 7 pm.
I can't even describe the amount of pain I'm in. I think I need to end it? I don't think I can wait around for two weeks just hoping he'll decide to be with me. When we talked on the phone last night he sounded so cold and distant. But I think I'm in love with him. I know it hasn't been that long. But I feel happy with him. We have a rapport that I've never had with anyone else. I feel like the best version of myself when I am with him. This never happens for me. I don't understand what's going on inside his head. Why do you need to think about a good relationship?
Do I:
1. Talk to him today, break down in tears and hope he changes his mind about this weeks and weeks of time? Decides that he actually wants me?  
2. Do I wait it out? I don't think this is actually a realistic option. I'll be too distracted and devastated every day. It'll ruin my work productivity and I think my affections for him will curdle. That, or I will be SO relieved if he decides he wants me, that I will put myself in an unhealthy relationship situation.
3. End it for now? Tell him I won't wait for him but that I love him, and if he wants to be in a real relationship with me, and we are both single, I would be open to that.
4. End it for good? This is cruel, this limbo. It demonstrates that he's emotionally immature and/or doesn't want me. Nothing else matters.
Thank you. I just need someone to tell me what to do here. you have the best advice. I've been reading you for... two decades? And I've been listening to you since the beginning of the Lovecast.
I am a longtime reader and I'm currently going through a divorce. My situation is complicated so bear with me.
I met my husband when I was 19. He told me he loved me at two weeks and proposed at three. I said yes and, yes, I realize my 19-year-old self was stupid. We got pregnant at four months when he was drunk and didn't put a condom on. I wanted an abortion, he said no. I love my twins dearly and don't regret them but this sets up a regular pattern of me putting him first.
Flash forward three years. We are married, we have two kids, and he drops the bomb that he wants me to have sex with my ex. I married a cuckold. I was horrified at the suggestion. My ex was my ex for a reason. My husband had never given a hint that he was into this. But my husband was obsessed with the idea that my ex took my virginity and, to be totally blunt, that my ex had a massive cock. My husband was small endowed and tended to come quickly. We fought over this for seven years. I did go out with the ex a few times and my husband would be excited but I could never go through with it. I loved my husband and the idea made me sick. I conveyed this to him repeatedly. But in order to indulge him I did agree to some role play.
Flash forward another four years. We were separated. He left with no warning and was giving me the silent treatment. After five months the very same ex, the first guy I ever had sex with, asked me to have a one-night stand. I figured why not. We had been apart long enough that I knew I could do it without getting attached. I also thought it might bring my husband back. It did. When I told him he came over and we had sex five times. He couldn't get enough. He was affectionate and kind and loving.
It didn't last. He wanted me to do it again. I wasn't prepared. I also couldn't just tell my ex that my husband wanted me to do this. I had to lie to my ex and I didn't like that. I ended up coming up with this elaborate scheme and hooked up with my ex a few months later. I said no more after that. It was a road I didn't want to go down.
That's when my husband started suggesting dating websites. I was mortified at the idea of being caught. He wouldn't drop it and finally I went for it. This started 2 years of hell. He liked the idea of anonymous hookups for me, little contact, meet up and have sex. I had never been that type. The first time it happened it was with a strange man in his bedroom, no talking just sex. I felt like a prostitute and cried all the way home. I then had to go and tell my husband how hot it was and how many times I came. (The honest answer was "not once.")
I told him if this was going to work I needed to get to know the guy a bit. He finally agreed. I met this guy "Mason." I liked him, I wasn't able to tell him I was married and I felt awful as I think he really liked me.We hooked up once and it was good. He texted me again to meet a week later and my husband said it was too late and he would prefer I stayed home. I said I wanted to go. He stated his preference for me to stay again but agreed I could go on one condition: I had to record the sex secretly so my husband could listen after. (I know I'm a disgusting human—believe me I felt awful.) Anyways. When I got home everything seemed fine, he was turned on listening to it, and we had sex three times.
The rest of the question... after the jump.
The next day things changed. He took my phone and texted "Mason" saying it was a mistake and to never contact me. He made me watch him listen to the recording and he cried. He accused me of cheating, he installed a phone tracker on my phone, he said I couldn't be trusted. Naturally I was confused—the rules always seemed to change. I told him he had nothing to be threatened by but he held on so tight. He yelled at me and gave me the cold shoulder. I wasn't allowed to go anywhere alone with my phone and I felt smothered.
A few weeks later I ran into Mason. He was hurt as to why I just went so cold. He offered me a ride home and we ended up going back to his place. One thing led to another and we had sex. I regretted it immediately but it also allowed me to feel like I wasn't my husband's property for once. I never told him. I just tried to put it behind me.
I continued meeting men in an effort to make my husband happy. I was almost killed once by a guy who was driving drunk. Partners came and went and I felt like a dirty whore most days. I also started getting more and more depressed. I started getting obsessed with my weight as sometimes men would comment as I'm not super skinny. My self esteem would go in the garbage and I cried often to my husband that being married meant not having to feel rejected by strangers. He told me to deal with it.
A pattern was starting to emerge. During the initial chase my husband would be so excited, the sex would be great, it would be mind blowing after I did it, he would be loving and kind and affectionate. I would be incredibly happy for that was something I didn't always get. Then it would slow down. He would stop the affection and pretty much starve me of it. He would start asking me to find another man again and I would be reluctant. After months of being in a marriage with no affection or non sexual contact I would cave. Every. Single. Time.
He never got that it wasn't amazing for me. I was putting on a show for him. I learned pretty quickly how to detach while some random man was pumping away above me. I felt empty and dirty and the best part was always going home to my husband. I was racking up a lot of partners and wanted to stop. I was slowly dying inside for less reward as the good part of the cycle was getting shorter and shorter. 
The last straw was this guy "Aaron." Aaron was perfectly nice, but I remember walking to his house in an area getting more and more deserted and thinking, " I could get raped and killed right now." I cried the way home.I demanded a six month break. I was tired and emotionally raw. He was not happy. We fought about it constantly. I feel as though I tried so hard and he deceived me by not telling me about this from the beginning. We did a year of therapy but he refused to let me bring up the kink. I told him he needed to so we could lay some ground rules down to make us both happy. He started pressuring me again after a few months and I said no. I was in and out of hospitals with a serious gynecological issue and sex with anonymous men was the last thing on my mind. He left again. We had sex one night, he told me he loved me, and he never came home. I found out later he was making out with some coke fiend at a bar that night.
Eventually I told him about Mason. He called me a whore and a cheater. I don't feel as though I was. He told everyone about our life and painted me as a cheater. I was shamed publicly by friends and family, I took the brunt of it as no "good woman who loved her man would do that."
The thing I learned was that it was never about me like he claimed. It was about him. And his desires and I was just a prop, he changed the rules often and totally disregarded my feelings. I'm not going to lie, Dan. I'm pretty fucked up over this. I'm unable to have a relationship and casual sex is like a handshake now. I'm also still pretty hung up on my ex for some reason. It's been eight months since he left and I'm still in denial. My husband met a new woman. At three weeks he told me he loved her. At five weeks she met my kids. And at two months he is living there and the kids are moving in too. I can't wrap my head around this.
Anyways I don't know if you will respond. I am in therapy and trying to get over this. I guess I want your advice about whether I'm a cheater. I've been thinking about starting a blog or writing about this. I think my story could help some people. I look back and try and figure out why I ever agreed to do this. The damage is pretty bad.
Thanks for reading this mini novel. Trust me—I cut out lots and lots of other stuff.
I am a woman who finds the occasional woman sexually attractive. It is a physical desire, not an emotional one, and sex for me has always been more of an emotional experience (I get clingy after sex and have no desire for an emotional relationship with a woman), so I've never really acted on it and have rounded myself up to straightish and moved on. My fantasies don't always revolve around women, and are highly varied in the gender of the participants and the activities involved.
I've met and fallen in love with a great, smart, strong, and sex-positive man. We are getting married in a few months, and couldn't be happier. He knows about my straightish orientation. I'm having the best sex of my life, and it keeps getting better. But my straightish orientation coupled with my rather androgynous clothing style—I work in IT, and am taken more seriously when I don't dress too girly, besides, it is comfortable—have him worried that I am some deeply closeted lesbian. I can tell that he is genuinely concerned, and only wants me to be happy. But this is coming up often enough (a few times a week) to the point where I am starting to question myself. I've never "come out" about this to anyone else, and frankly wish that he would just get over it already. I know that he is the person for me, but I'm trying to figure out how to get him to move on.  Reassurances aren't cutting it. I'm 40, not 20, so this isn't my first rodeo.
I'm I saw you on CBS Sunday Morning and I was drawn in with your genuine and feeling words. My living room is usually silent with only my husband and myself, but yesterday morning our visiting adult kids were wondering why CBS was on—and why there was so much talk about sex. You followed a piece on Masters and Johnson.
All day after their departure I sat in uncomfortable silence with my husband—our usual routine—thinking about writing to you concerning my dilemma. I have often thought of starting my own blog concerning my situation: I'm in my fifties, I'm married, and I'm annoyed 98% of the time by my spouse. This must be a symptom of not having sex for 12 years. And I am wondering... how do I remedy this nightmare? Most of my days are adventures in trying to figure out how I can survive this for one more day..
We've been married 22 years. He's my third husband. We have five children together and eight grandchildren. We are very active in the lives of three of our grandchildren. The two of us are an institution. We are "home base" for so many lives and I feel I cannot leave my husband because of that. I had my share of divorce in my early years—a string of abusive relationships/marriages. 
Mostly I am hungry for touch. I want to be held, to be kissed, to be cuddled, and to have sex. No sex for 12 years is like a prison sentence. For the past eight years we have slept in separate bedrooms. When our youngest daughter moved out I took her room and turned it into my oasis. I put a lock on my door and won't let anyone in there. The rest of the house is all my husband. It's a big mess. He is a hoarder of junk, he puts nothing away, there's a corner in the living room where he plays video games on his phone and creeps on my Facebook all day and night. I love to have conversations. He only can only argue and he is incessantly negative and racist. When I am overwhelmed by his rantings I go to my room and lock the door.
I have survived so many difficulties in my life—domestic violence in prior relationships, a car accident that nearly killed me, a cancer diagnoses—but I possess an amazing will to survive and to overcome. But my marriage has me drowning in unhappiness. I struggle each moment I am awake with what I need to do. Do I hate him? No. I am not romantically in love with him. I have feelings for him of some kind. Maybe it is a love of some sort. But I don't like who he is though. 
We stopped having sex—my choice—after so many years of crying in the dark after sex because he was never making love to me. He had to fantasize aloud about other women each time. Then came porn on the internet there and "experiments" that often ended with him hurting me physically. I vowed to never have sex with him again one night and that was it: Absolutely no intimacy of any kind for twelve years.
So what to do? I do not want to hurt my kids and grandkids but how do I overcome this? Any thoughts or advice? I am desperately in need of someone else's input.
I loved your piece on the show. You do good work with your life.
My partner and I consider ourselves to be monogamish and/or open. We hadn't tested the idea of having sex with anyone else until recently—we had fooled around with others, but no sex—and it went very poorly. My partner thinks I'm the one who handled it poorly and cannot be monogamish due to jealously, and I think he handled it poorly and needs to communicate better and care about how I feel. 
We went to a fun camping event this past weekend and my partner met someone he liked a lot. He proceeded to ignore me for all of Saturday in favor of hanging with her and this led to an argument Sunday morning. I told him I felt like he was prioritizing her over me and that it did not make me feel happy and was hurting me. He seemed to get it and we spent time together on Sunday.
I had given him permission on Saturday—prior to feeling ignored, although to be fair, I never revoked that permission—to make out with the woman we had met. On Monday morning, I woke up alone and went looking for my partner. I walked up to find them beginning to engage in sex. My partner didn't seem to be worried about me walking in, but I felt horrified. We had not discussed sex at all, and when he gave me the "thumbs up, thumbs side, thumbs down signal," I thumbed down. He stopped the sex and I told him we needed to talk. He asked if he could meet me back at camp and I agreed, assuming he wanted to smooth things over with the woman. I was correct, but apparently to him that meant finishing fucking her. 
This feels like a 100% betrayal to me. Not only did he not discuss having sex with her ahead of time, he continued having sex with her after I had veto'd her very clearly. This felt like cheating. He seems to understand why he should have talked to me first and asked my permission to fuck, and he says he will do "better in the future," but he does not see anything wrong with finishing fucking her. He says he was trying to make her feel less awkward and empathized with her feelings of unhappiness. However, he seems to have no empathy for me sitting in camp upset for 45 minutes waiting for him to come back to talk about this, and instead he gets defensive with me.
He is a long-time reader of yours, Dan, and he respects your opinion. Am I wrong that this seems like cheating and betrayal? I feel like communication is so important to do this correctly, and I think he was the one who dropped the ball, not me. I'm worried we may not recover from this first foray in to being open. 
Can't I'm an eighth-grade teacher at a public school in the South and I will have a trans student in class next year. I know this because I purposely requested him, knowing that his school year would be much worse with some of my colleagues. Last year there was a big issue with the student about being called his preferred name—because his parents refuse to recognize his gender identity and make him go by his birth (female) name. The other students were told that they had to call him by his given name as well, but they pretty much refused and use his preferred name constantly. The school's policy is to only use nicknames that are approved or acceptable to parents, but that's exactly the problem in this case. It's not exactly feasible to avoid using a name or pronoun for a whole school year, but I don't want to be yet another adult making this young man feel less than or unwelcome in a classroom. So, uh, any help?
My last relationship was monogamish, at points. I always told my ex-boyfriend how far things would go with a third BEFORE I had a date. When I said "nothing will happen," nothing but flirting happened—no kissing, no groping, nada. I wanted my boyfriend to do the same when he went on a date with a third, i.e. just tell me how far things would go: kissing, making out, intercourse. They were his limits to set, and telling me ahead of time allowed me to prepare emotionally for what was coming.
Twice, with two different women, in a span of three weeks, he went beyond the limits he'd set. 
The first time, I was understanding. The second time, I was super pissed. Granted, these weren't huge transgressions—just smooching or making out when he'd said nothing would happen—but I nevertheless felt that if he couldn't set and adhere to limits in small ways, how could I trust him to honor a BIG promise, like to always use condoms? It felt like he was always renegotiating in the moment—and without me present. 
When I got pissed after the second incident, he responded by closing his end of the relationship because he just couldn't state limits ahead of time and adhere to them. All he would tell me is "you come first." In most respects, I was very GGG. All I wanted was for him to set some boundaries for himself and to honor them. Was it unreasonable to expect him to state his limits—whatever HE wanted them to be!—and then stick to those stated limits on a date with someone else, which ideally allowed him to do whatever he wanted AND me to be emotionally prepared for whatever happened?
This relationship imploded for other reasons, but should this issue ever come up again, I'd like your opinion. In a monogamish situation, is my wanting my partner to set ahead-of-date boundaries and stick with them unreasonable?
I am a 30-year-old straight man married to a wonderful 29-year-old bisexual woman. We have been married almost three years and together for five, and we have a beautiful two-year-old son. Our marriage is monogamish—occasional threesomes, leeway to make out with other people with prior consent—and despite the normal stressors of parenting and work life, our relationship is happy, stable, and fulfilling. I love my wife, and she is the best thing to ever happen to me. Even though I feel like I have hit the jackpot, today, I am very stressed.
This past weekend I attended an arts event in a large city two states over with my wife, our son, and several of our friends. At this festival, one of my best friends ran into a girl whose name he did not know. But despite not knowing her name, he knew her face—three years prior, in the same city, he hooked up with her at my bachelor party. She approached my friend and me at a bar, told us how hot we were, and asked if she could party with us that night. Being drunk and high out of our minds, having a hot girl hitting on us with absolutely no effort on our part? It felt like the best idea in the world.
After the bar closed, we went back and partied at another friend’s house with the rest of the bachelor party group. At some point, my best friend and I wound up in a room with this girl, and there was kissing between all three of us. I don’t remember all of the details concerning exactly how things progressed, but I do know that once it felt like sex was an inevitability, I managed to pull it together and leave the room. I did make out with this girl, but I kept all of my clothes on, and we did not fuck each other—orally, manually, or otherwise.  My friend stayed with her that night, presumably having the time of his life, and the next morning she was gone. No names exchanged, no friendship on social media, no photos, no nothing.
After this occurred, I struggled deeply over whether to tell my soon-to-be-wife. Before leaving for the bachelor trip, she requested that I not make out with any strippers, and I agreed. Given this entirely reasonable request, I felt like making out with someone from the real world was several orders of magnitude worse than making out with a stripper. I felt extremely guilty. I thought long and hard about what to do and decided that because I didn’t do anything sexually that could jeopardize my wife’s health or my own AND given that our wedding was just two months away at the time AND not wanting to add to my wife’s stress AND given that this occurred in a large city with over a million people AND my friends and I were never going to see this girl again... I concluded that the considerate thing to do was to shove the whole ordeal down the memory hole. I didn’t see any benefit to telling my wife beyond unburdening myself of my own guilt.
Fast-forward to the present, and my best friend and this girl have really hit it off. They spent all evening at the arts event together, and he slept at her house that night. I am thrilled that my friend has found someone he is enthusiastic about—a rarity for him—but the bottom line is I imagine that this girl will be around my friend group (and my wife) on a semi-regular basis from here on out. So now, despite astronomically improbable odds, it appears that fate has intervened and I have to once again decide whether to tell my wife what happened at the bachelor party. I am relatively certain that if I don’t  tell her—and tell her quickly—lies about the situation will compound and turn what was once a considerate omission into a betrayal. I love my wife more than anything and am devastated that this issue has come up again, let alone when our relationship and openness/communication seem to be at a high point. I don’t want to keep anything from her. Am I doing the right thing by telling her now? Set me straight, Dan.  

I was Mormon my entire life, Mormon missionary, married a Mormon girl, both families intensely Mormon. For multiple reasons, I left Mormonism about a year ago. One of the more weighty reasons was because of their stance and views regarding homosexuality and how they treat LGBT people.
My wife and I started exploring polyamory 3-4 years ago. The first year was mostly mental exploration. For us, it came from a place of feeling really confident in our relationship, and our ability that love was not a limited resource, even if time was. Then we felt comfortable enough to explore intimate and sexual relationships with others. Polyamory including multiple romantic relationships (not just sex) really seems to resonate with our emotional make-up and has so far been a great enriching aspect to our marriage. To the point, it’s becoming somewhat painful for us to not share that aspect of our life with our very Mormon families. Our closest friends know. My current girlfriend is very polyamorous as well. And came out to her family. That was a mixed bag of awesome, and bad. Her family is significantly more liberally minded for the most part.
It was really amazing to be able to live out loud, meet her sister, and her mother, and to be openly polyamorous. It’s something I crave, and from what I can tell, my wife craves to be able to be openly polyamorous. Yet all three of us are pretty terrified about how our very Mormon families will react. And we’ve currently decided to wait to come out until more time has passed between my leaving Mormonism. Also, my wife is currently employed by her non-Mormon conservative step-brother. And we’re concerned about possible financial fallout because of his conservative demeanor and his close proximity to his very Mormon mother. I realize we could be trumping up these fears. But again they could be very real.
I go to see a therapist on a weekly basis and have been discussing these issues with her. She seems just supportive of me self-determining. And from the videos and articles I've read from you, it seems that you have a nuanced feeling about when the appropriate time is to come out. And I apologize for any offensive language I've used in describing these things. I feel like I am waking up from a lot of years of being asleep as a practicing Mormon. And there are a lot of mind fucks I'm experiencing. Hence the struggle with when is the right time to make our families aware of how ok we are with polyamory. We want to be genuinely poly, not just using it as an excuse to explore our sexuality. Because multiple committed loving relationships really seems to work for us.
I suppose in some ways it’s very ironic that a former Mormon is fretting about when and how to tell his Mormon family, given their strong past with polygamy. But of course, polyamory and Mormon polygamy are two completely different beasts. One was patriarchal, and domineering, while the other is about honesty, facing fears, and sharing love. And of course, Mormons from my experience have no problem with huge amounts of cognitive dissonance, and hypocrisy.
Thanks for being a loud advocate and setting a good example for those of us still trying to figure out how to share our voice.
Ex-Originally posted on October 24. 2012.
A while ago, I broke up with my long-term boyfriend. A few months after the breakup, I met someone new and we started sleeping together. It was the best sex of my life. Wild, passionate, and unpredictable. New Guy wasn't looking for anything serious, and neither was I, so we kept things very casual. After a couple months of amazing sex with New Guy, my long-term boyfriend came back into the picture. I told him I'd been seeing other people, but that I missed him and wanted to make things work between us. All good, right? Wrong! I love him so much, and I think we could have a very happy life together, but when we have sex, it just seems so dull and average compared to the volcanic sex that I was having during our time apart. Do I sacrifice an amazing sex life for a happy life of decidedly average sex with the man I love? Help!
About a year and a half ago, I was surprise broken up with by my girlfriend of 2.5 years. I was very much in love with her. It was like all my dreams could come true because I had her. Then I found out that she had been cheating on me. I wanted to move past this, and she said she did too, but said we should stay in a “gray area” and not be official. We kept fucking, and I kept loving her. She would occasionally start crying and tell me how much she loved me. However, things seemed amiss. Still, she told me repeatedly that her 10-year plan was to marry me after she "deserved me again”. 
Then, a few days before I had to leave the place where we both had been living—I had to leave, she had to stay for the time being—she told me that the other girl was “magical" but she refused to admit to me that she was waiting for me to leave the country before getting with her again. Of course that’s what happened when I left. Perhaps it had been going on the whole time. 
Anyway, I am now in another relationship, and my current partner wants to get married. We’re not engaged or anything yet, but it seems to be headed that way. I want to marry my current partner but not if my ex meant what she said about marrying me at some point. Do you think I should wait 10 years just in case she meant it?
Let's say two people entered a marriage under the agreement there would be no children resulting from this union. A few years into the marriage, one person decides he/she wants children. The other has not changed his/her mind, and wants to remain child-free. What advice would you give to each of these people?
I am a straight 20-something female actress in Northern California. I started a very passionate romance with a fellow actor about a month ago. We've known each other for years, but only recently admitted our feelings to one another. I feel so comfortable around him and the sex is AMAZING. Unfortunately, he's moving to LA in a month to finish school and pursue acting full time. I am tied down in Northern California by my job, family, and future performances I've agreed to do. We've talked about me visiting him and vice versa, and he's mentioned long distance a few times. My last long-distance relationship was disastrous. I know he cares about me and I can tell our being together now is making this move even more difficult for him. We feel we've fallen for each other, but is it just because we're youngsters in a new, exciting love affair? Is this meant to be a fling? Or should I try long-distance despite my past failures? 
I had a brief fling some time back; it ended amicably when we discovered some major personality incompatibilities. Six months later, we rekindled a physical relationship—I was his first partner who indulged/enjoyed his fetishes, and he wanted to explore them. We had a few hot months of rope (he's a natural!), whips, and toys. Then at New Years he told me he was an alcoholic. I had only ever seen him drunk once, while on vacation. Of course I supported his efforts to get sober, get therapy, and get on antidepressants. Six months later he's undeniably happier. My trouble, though, is threefold: 
1. His interest in kink has disappeared along with his melancholy. He still has a libido, but I haven't seen a rope or a toy since before Christmas. 
2. Even the vanilla sex is crappy. His equipment doesn't rise to the occasion all that often anymore, and when it does it's a minute or two tops before he's done. He's willing to do other stuff with his mouth/hands, which is great, except what gets me off is a good hard pounding, whether dick or dildo or flogger—but none of those have been on the table. Frankly, the tender soft touches he uses now give me the willies most of the time. 
3. He's suddenly decided he is totally in love with me. He doesn't seem to see that our personalities remain incompatible—instead he seems to be in love with some fantasy of me that's only tangentially related to the real deal. I do not return these feelings aside from a friendly affection, and I've been clear about that since we started fucking again. 
So is it a "thing" for interest in kink to only be present if the person is depressed? And how do you go about telling someone that their happiness is killing your sex life in a nice way? He's really kind to me and the last thing I want is to be the total asshole that stomps all over his hard-won joy, but so far everything I can think of does exactly that.
I'm a straight guy with some gay friends. I had this debate with them about the rainbow being chosen to represent the LGBT community. I proudly support gay marriage and gay rights I just disagree about your use of the rainbow. With all the brilliant and creative minds in LGBT community you could not come up with better than the rainbow? When I was a child I would chase rainbows without any labels in mind. My dad used to have a "gay" rainbow flag on his front porch before the LGBT community started using the rainbow as its symbol. I am now told that the gay rainbow represents diversity. I beg to differ. I am part of the culture that is so much more diverse than the LGBT community. Heck, the LGBT community is part of my culture! So are racists, extreme (and usually anti-gay) religious groups, Americans, and foreigners alike. It is known as Deaf Culture (with capital D) and it crosses over every culture in the world. Biased people and gay/minorities are brought together by the experience of being Deaf in a larger hearing world. So I cant accept "diversity" as a reason to use the rainbow when it should belong to everyone. I wish I could display rainbows without experiencing two extremities. First, having hateful people make my life difficult. Second, having gay men checking me out and following me into bathrooms. I support the LGBT community but I have my own battles being a Deaf person in this oppressive world.
Portland lesbian here. A few months ago, I started hooking up with a friend of mine (she initiated). She had a long-distance boyfriend and I knew that, but after the first time she told me that the two of them were taking a break. I took this to mean that she was free to see other people and kept hooking up with her. A month later, she clarified that wasn't the case, but I still kept hooking up with her. Since then she ended it with me to make it work with the boyfriend and then subsequently ended it with the boyfriend. Now she and I are back in old habits, and I'm trying to decide where I want to go from here.
The sex is amazing, but not only that, we have had some really good times together. Good talks, lots of texting, an actual long walk on the beach. I'd like to keep dating her and see where this goes, but I'm worried that her cheating on her boyfriend means she'll ultimately cheat on me, too. And our communication could obviously be improved. She says she's never cheated before. Is once a cheater, always a cheater really a thing? Or is there some kind of one-time exception for cheating at the end of a relationship that really wasn't working anyway?
I have a conundrum: my boyfriend constantly texts this girl. Not normally an issue, but he fucked her pretty regularly right before he and I got together. He says it was never more than a sexual attraction, but this girl—who has a boyfriend, mind you—is in love with him. I know this because my boyfriend has told me so. They don't hang out and they don't have phone calls, but the texting is bothering me because she's clearly not speaking to him as "just a friend." He's informed me that, yes, she does flirt with him but he insists he never responds in kind. I've tried to talk to him about it but he doesn't think he's doing anything wrong because he is respectful of our relationship when he responds to her.
He describes her as a damsel in distress with a shitty boyfriend and says he's just trying to be nice. He wouldn't cheat on me, especially not with her, but I cannot get past the fact that he humors her. You're going to tell me to trust him, so fine, I trust him, but shouldn't he care about how this makes me feel? It's not like this girl is a long-time friend of his, but when it comes up (which it does because I bring it up, oops) we end up in huge fights. I go back and forth on whether I'm justified or just crazy. What is it? And what can I do to get over this? 
I am getting married to my partner next month. I'm super pumped. Her family is awesome and supportive. I've had a long back-and-forth with my family about the wedding. I'm trying to do the "right" thing/be the bigger person even though they have never been supportive of me as a queer person. This including inviting them and trying to be positive about the wedding and writing about how much it would mean to me if they would be a part of this important day/chapter of my life. I suspect some of them are not coming, as I got a pretty intense email from my sister-in-law about how my family can't support my engagement blah blah blah Catholic blah blah holier-than-thou bullshit bullshit. But that was over a year ago and most of my family has just been avoiding the topic of the wedding when I try to talk on the phone with them about it. But no one has told me outright that they won't be attending. Yesterday was the RSVP due date for our wedding and none of them have responded. So it now to the point where I'm going to have to call and outright ask if they're coming and potentially absorb all their rejection personally.
Now here's the kicker: I found out through Facebook ten minutes ago that my brother, who i used to think was my ally (he said in December that he and his GF were going to try and make it to my wedding), is getting married SEVEN DAYS after we are in a different state! IN A MONTH! And he... forgot to tell me??? Forgot to invite me??? Everyone in my entire extended family knew about his wedding, including second cousins and stuff, but I did not.
So with this knowledge what am I supposed to say when I call asking for RSVPs? I have no idea.
My partner of 25 years passed away last week, and today I received a sympathy card from his sister. She included many paragraphs about how I need to seek salvation in Jesus Christ, etc., and hardly a kind word spoken but at one point she did thank me for "being his friend." (We were a gay couple—much more than friends.) She enclosed a brochure with Bible verses printed on it, the kind that evangelizers give out on street corners. On the envelope of this card she wrote only my first name, because she apparently never bothered finding out my last name.
This lady never once asked about me in any of the many letters she wrote to my partner when he was alive. She is nice and sweet in person but she always manages to slip in something thoroughly nasty during every conversation. She did this to my partner too. I assume she is this way to everyone. During our one and only lengthy conversation, one day after my partner's death, she asked me to give her all of the family photo albums in our house because "you are not family."
As soon as I read her letter I was inspired to write a reply:
Dear So-And-So:
Thank you for the card. Proselytizing someone in a sympathy card must rank as one of the rudest acts imaginable.  If I didn't want to convert to Christianity before, your card would certainly guarantee I never want to in the future.
P.S. You are concerned about my personal salvation but you couldn't bother to find out my last name?
I thought about sending this note to her in a thank you card, then I thought about slipping this as a note in the bottom of the box of family photos I plan to ship to her (I am going to give her back the photo albums because my partner asked me to before he died), then I thought about emailing this note to her daughter instead of sending it to her and asking her to pass it along to her mother. This woman's daughter seems to be a truly nice person, unlike her mother, and we have been corresponding since my partner's death.
But I have qualms about sending something like my reply for several reasons. First, I do not want to jeopardize the budding relationship between me and my partner's niece. Second, I do not want to dishonor my partner's memory with anger.
If you've made it this far, THANK YOU SO MUCH for listening to me. Now tell me what you think I should do.
Straight-out-of-college female here. I've begun my foray into the real world with my first job at a large firm and, as an added bonus, a hunky, kind man. My relationship is new—we got together in January of this year. I have some work to do on myself: post-abusive relationship and recently uncovered mommy issues have landed me in therapy. I am a work in progress, and he is both aware and supportive. Really feels like this is a potential LTR.
The one thing (I call it a thing and not an issue or a problem) is that he is "hung up" on his ex. They dated for two years and had a hard time distancing themselves from each other. From my understanding, he really only cut off communication with her after he met me. They met up recently as she is moving out of state and she contacted him in an attempt to gain closure. He says that their relationship is done but that he has unresolved feelings. When I asked him to explain, he said that he was still attempting to dissect their breakup and that their meeting was supposed to provide clarity. The only thing that is clear is that he didn't get what he needed.
The thing is that I know I'm being insane. He repeatedly tells me he loves me. He is kind, affectionate, always engaging, the sex is great—hell, he cooked me a 10 lb pork butt that was divine. These are not the actions of a man who is in love with someone else. Despite all these things, I feel like the lackluster movie sequel that producers confidently made but received, at best, a lukewarm response from the public. Entertaining, I guess, but not nearly as good as the first one. What do you do when your great love has already had his great love?
Can you sense how dramatic I'm being? I don't know how to turn my brain off to my insecurities. My friends feed my sentiments: They tell me I shouldn't be with someone who isn't over his ex. Can you help me better articulate what the hell he's going through? And then could you tell me to leave him alone so that he can work through it since since it clearly has nothing to do with me? I'm about to run my relationship into the ground and I don't know how to stop.
I’m a straight-identifying Aussie guy in my mid-20s, and I have recently started living with my girlfriend of just under two years. Let's call her "Mathilda."
I need your help.
I feel I need to start by mentioning that most of my prior "serious relationships" have been marred and ultimately ended from full-on cheating or some degree of infidelity, by either myself or the other person. I discovered you at the Festival of Dangerous Ideas in Sydney a few years ago at what would be the week prior to the conclusion of my previous relationship. 
With your help via the introduction to the ways of the "monogamish," and taking some time as a single bloke to work out who I really am and what I need from relationships, I was able to accept within myself and "come clea"’ when I put myself back out there and eventually met Mathilda. Successful monogamy in a LTR isn’t possible for me.
Before Mathilda and I started dating seriously, we discussed at length monogamishamy, "what happens when we fuck up" rather than "if we fuck up," and our shared desire to have sex with other couples. I introduced her to your podcast, and we watched the recording of your presentation at the Opera House on YouTube together. Mathilda had told me she always wanted to explore sex with girls, and banging other couples seemed like a safe and exciting environment for her to explore. It also had the bonus of being a great opportunity for me to occasionally fuck other women, and try my mouth on a cock or two eventually, which is something I recently felt has been calling out to me. 
I hated the jealous piece of shit I could become in monogamous relationships, as I always found myself trying to catch out my partner with what I knew to be true: They wanted to fuck other people. Obviously they did—because so did I. 
I told Mathilda what I wanted, needed, and could offer in a relationship; that I couldn’t stand how jealous I always ended up becoming in my past relationships; that I believed a degree of mutual openness could prevent that arising in me; and that I wasn’t prepared to make (another) commitment that I couldn’t keep. And to top it off, the thought of her occasionally "getting some strange" and sharing details or photos was pretty damn hot.
Even though Mathilda vowed to never sleep around without me, we shared the same views on the matter of monogamy and swinging, and formed what appeared to be a highly successful, trusting monogamish relationship, one that I thought could go the distance. Mathilda didn’t need sex as often or the same way as I enjoyed, but I’ve always considered myself someone with a high sex drive, and now I had an approved outlet to satisfy those needs elsewhere if the need should arise, so I didn’t mind.
After about 10 months of being "slightly open," Mathilda asked to close our relationship, stating that she could no longer stand the thought of me fucking someone else. Truth be told, sparing a single kiss with a stranger on a dance floor, I had no other explorations of openness to report. We talked about it for weeks, before landing on the “we can still fuck other girls or couples together” compromise. 
We eventually found one couple online that we clicked with, and really enjoyed fucking, and we tried to see them semiregularly for dinner, drinks, and sex. It was fantastic. We all got what we needed, and it worked particularly well for me, as I got to explore some light BDSM and other kinks with the girl of the other couple, which wasn’t an opportunity that I got to explore within my relationship. I really loved how close and intimate things with Mathilda and I would be in the moments and days after allowing each other to sleep with the other couple.
The couple moved at the start of this year and naturally my interest in reactivating our online profile and searching for new local replacements sparked a couple of months later. After putting off talking about finding another couple, Mathilda tells me that she does not want to sleep with other people "for a while." After talking about it in depth, she confesses that although she is glad we fucked the other couple, she doesn’t want to do it again any time soon, and only said she wanted to do it the subsequent times in order to please me. She didn’t like the idea of the occasional outsourcing of a pro to fuck me either, but told me I could explore with as many men on my own as I wanted, as that “wasn't something you could get from me.”
I did the right thing by telling her what I want, need, and could offer before our relationship started, right? I feel like she told me what I wanted to hear and bit her tongue until we were in too deep. Now I’m sharing a house with her and supporting her through law school, and she’s changing the rules of the relationship and pleading mercy. I’m going out of my fucking mind. 
We have average, vanilla, weekly-ish sex, but I no longer get the opportunity for hot, sweaty, athletic and subby/dommy sex that I crave on those rare occasions. And this all ended before we took the opportunity to find a couple with a bi-curious/bisexual guy with whom I could explore. Also, she’s put on about a fifth of her body weight since we met, and I’m finding myself less attracted to her as the months go on—which is somewhat of a blessing in disguise considering our mismatched sex drives, because I am now less likely to ask her for sex when she’s not feeling it. She’s unhappy with her weight but not unhappy enough to make any changes. I’m a personal trainer, I work with dozens of driven, sexy, and flirty female (and male!) clients and colleagues every week. But I'm spending all my free time masturbating furiously to thoughts of other people and resenting my partner.
It seems like the obvious thing to do is to leave her. I know we’re both young, and there is probably a better match for me out there, but the non-sex part of our life together is brilliant. She is my best friend and an extremely loving and caring person. We make a wonderful home together. She has supported me and helped contribute to the success of my career. She is the woman with whom I want to start a family. And the thought of fucking up her pathway to becoming a lawyer, throwing all the wonderful companionship away, dividing our assets, sharing our rescue dog, and the rest, all because she doesn’t want to share me with others—it's just unconscionable to me. 
Summing up: I can’t accept full monogamy as the price I have to pay for this relationship, but leaving her is not something I can do.
We have talked and fought endlessly about this over the last couple of months and I have no idea where to go from here. I think it is shitty of her to change the rules and not want to compromise. But I can’t help the way I feel about her.
Please tell me there’s another way we can both win.
You've written about "gold star pedophiles," people who are attracted to children but have not and would not touch a child, and the trap they're in when seek treatment. Which really gave me unexpected empathy for them. 
As a parent myself, I struggle to know what would be the appropriate steps to take if we were ever faced with a Josh Duggar situation. I think a lot of people, while condemning the Duggars (for so very very many things) also wonder what the hell they would do if it was their 14-year-old son, wanting to get the kid and the victims treatment without ruining his or their lives.
Any guidance?
I'm bi but there are many words that could describe my sexual/identity fluidity. I like romance with guys (though I have had romances with women too), I like sex with women and men, I like porn of all types—and I generally think sex is personal and that folks should do whatever they like while being respectful. I am female but I get turned on by many types of porn. Why is it that men love F2F porn but only gay/bi guys are supposed to be turned on by M2M porn? M2M porn turns me on even though I know I will never be in a M2M situation. (But I have pegged some dudes, if it matters.) Whats with the stereotypes? Wouldn't we all be better off if we could forsake what is MALE and what is FEMALE and enjoy EVERYTHING?
Thoughts?
I'm a 22-year-old bisexual female. I have had a flirty relationship with a close family friend for awhile now. He is 24. The closest we have ever come to fucking was on a family vacation a few years back, but I didn't go through with it because of the guilt of my conservative Christian upbringing. I'm no longer a Christian and have gotten past all the bullshit I was taught. Now I really want to fuck this guy but he is in a relationship—an on-again, off-again monogamous one. I realize there are many guys to choose from and that I should probably move on, but this is one of the few guys that really does it for me. (I probably lean more towards the homoflexible side of things and don't find many men attractive.)
I'm not looking to get him to cheat (assuming he is still interested, which he may not be), so my question is this: Would it be inappropriate to mention to him, while he is still in a relationship, that I would enjoy an FWB relationship with him if he found himself single? I would usually wait until he actually was "off-again" but by the time I hear that he's broken up with his girlfriend he could be back together with her again or with someone new. I think he would be up for it and I don't think the offer would make things weird between us even if he passed on it. Should I treat it like your advice in asking for threesomes where you go in open for rejection or should I just not do make the offer?
A big congrats to Caitlyn Jenner on her big reveal and lovely Vanity Fair cover!
Now to the reason I'm writing: I am having a crisis of conscience. On one hand, I absolutely support a person's right to be whoever the heck they want to be. If you feel like you want to wear "women's" clothing and makeup and hair? You look fabulous! You want to carry a pillow person around and be "married" to said pillow? Congrats on your nuptials! You want to buy dolls that look creepily real and walk them around in $300 strollers? GREAT! 
But I'm confused where we draw the line. When a thin person believes themselves to be "fat" and then dangerously restricts their food intake, we can have that person committed. Most reputable doctors won't amputate your arm simply because you feel you were meant to be an amputee. Making the decision to end your own life in the absence of unbearable suffering is illegal. But when a man decides that he should be a woman (or vice versa), we will surgically remove healthy body parts to suit that particular desire.
Of course we modify/enhance/surgically alter other body parts all the time. I don't know, I guess I'm confused. Could you shine some light on this for me? I want to be less conflicted about sex-reassignment surgery.
I have dilemma. I'm a married man, my wife and I have been together 20 years total, and our sex life is beginning to get kind of dull. Recently she told me she would like to have a FFM threesome. Our problem is finding another F. She said she would never do it with a friend—we don't think any of her friends would do it anyway—so I suggested dating sites since neither of us knows any bisexual women. My question to you is this: Would it be better if she made the profile on some dating sites or should I do it? She told me to do it because she's too shy to do it herself. I just think it would look better if she did it. What is your opinion on finding a third? 
Originally posted on February 6, 2013. 
I'm a 27-year-old man in a two-year relationship with a 26-year-old woman. My last partner cheated and lied and did some unforgivable things. I wasn't blameless-I stayed with her long after I realized it wasn't working-but our relationship did unearth a kink. After I found out about her cheating, I got extremely turned on thinking about it. I never told her.
Enter my next girlfriend. We were together a few months before I brought up my kink. She was very accommodating (dirty talk about her cheating, making up stories about cheating) and then, after some months, she admitted that it was something she wanted to try in real life. I said I was okay with it as long as I had the option to pursue other partners as well. We agreed on some rules and gave it a shot. She set up a date through OKCupid and had sex with someone; I hooked up with an ex. Everything seemed to be turning out great. Then two weeks later, she got drunk and told me she had seen the OKCupid guy again without asking. I was so upset, I nearly broke up with her. Having the guidelines ignored felt like a betrayal. She later admitted to seeing him one other time without talking to me first.
Are we going through the normal trip-ups of a newly open relationship? Or are these lies an indication that she can't be trusted? I feel like it might be hard to find someone else who is into my kink and maybe we're just having a hard time navigating polyamory. I love my partner, and I want to make this cuckolding thing work if we can. Suck it up or break it off?
Originally posted on September 14, 2011.
I am a 16-year-old female. I have been in a monogamous relationship with a boy for seven months. My first, his too. A couple of months in, we began to explore masturbating each other and oral sex. He has gone down on me three times, but I have never given him a blowjob. I'm scared to because I'm scared he will be disappointed. We fight sometimes because he feels it's unfair that he goes down on me and I don't go down on him.
On top of this, he started doing something when we are in the midst of being sexual that I don't understand. He will stick the tip of his hard penis just inside the opening to my vagina, again and again. I guess you could call it "probing." I know enough to know that there's a slight risk of pregnancy, as pre-come can get a woman pregnant and he doesn't wear a condom when he does this. We are planning on having complete vaginal intercourse in the next few months, with condoms and birth control, but this is happening now and it worries me.
This is what I need advice about: I know that there is a very small risk of pregnancy even if we use condoms and birth control. I couldn't handle a child at my age or the humiliation of being pregnant at 16 and having to walk around town with the evidence out for all to see. I would have an abortion. He disagrees strongly with abortion, but he's not the one who would have to go through it all! So I would probably end up having an abortion without telling him, which seems completely unfair.

I just found out that my 16-year-old son, who's been out since age 11, was making out with a longtime female friend over the weekend and is now confused about it. As am I. I know he's been frustrated that he's never dated, and all his (straight) friends seem to be coupled up right now. He's a tall handsome kid and this girl was always attracted to him though she knew he was gay. I know that hormones run high in adolescence, but in your experience is it common for gay teens to experiment with the opposite sex? He doesn't know that I know, and I'm flummoxed over how/whether to bring this up. I'd really appreciate any light you can shed. 
Originally posted on October 16, 2013.
I'm a gay man in a happy and open marriage. I routinely seek the services of an erotic masseur, a man with whom I have a great client/service-provider relationship. I found out when booking my next massage with him that he was recently in a car accident with his long-term partner, who died in the hospital. Normally, I'd send flowers and a card. However, due to the nature of our working relationship, I don't want to extend myself in ways that could be uncomfortable for him. I wouldn't want to put him in the position of having to explain who I am if the card I sent was read by someone else. Any advice would be appreciated.
Originally posted on February 27, 2013.
I am writing about a friend. By all appearances, he is straight. However, on more than one occasion, he has gotten drunk and tried to hook up with a transvestite or a person who could have been one. In one instance, he went to a club and was approached by a really masculine-seeming girl who proceeded to give him head. My friend, in his drunken state, reached into her pants and felt for a pussy only after she started giving him head. On a trip to Las Vegas, he drunkenly picked up someone who I was told looked like "Kevin Garnett in a wig" and was very obviously a man. He tried to take this person back to his hotel, but friends put a stop to it. I just received a message from a friend who is with him on a trip to Europe, who said that he just tried the same thing again with yet another manly looking transvestite type. Again, my friend was stopped before he did anything he might regret. I can understand if these cases happened with transvestites who looked like real women. It's easy to fool someone when he's drunk. However, the situations I have seen personally and have heard about all seem to indicate he is seeking out transvestites. Could he be harboring some gay or bisexual tendencies? I've never seen him act this way when sober. Or could he just have the world's thickest pair of beer goggles?
Originally posted on July 20, 2011.
I'm a 24-year-old female living in London, where I have just finished a degree in circus arts. I'm in a relationship with a great guy. The problem is that while I have had long- and short-term relationships before, he hasn't, and he can be very emotionally needy. For example, he can't/won't sleep without me in the bed. We've been together for 10 months, and he often tells me that I'm everything in his life. I've told him that under no circumstances is this normal, and I've confirmed my right to have a life outside of him. The real crux of the situation is this: I worked on and off as a stripper in a high-end club for two years. I haven't done it while with him because of the physical demands of my degree. Now I'm done and broke and want to return to this work. This is an issue for him, as you can imagine. I won't compromise: The job was great for me and allowed me such sexual (and financial!) liberation. I didn't orgasm for the first time until after I took control of my own sexuality via stripping.
I don't know how to handle this issue: He knew this about me when we met and says he hoped it wouldn't carry on. I feel upset that he hasn't accepted the whole of me and I guess part of me wonders if I'm in the wrong relationship. I love this man, but I feel trapped.
Originally posted on July 20, 2011.
You probably get this question every day. I'm a man who loves it when my girlfriend fucks me with a strap-on. Another great thing: My girlfriend ejaculates frequently and plentifully when we have sex, and she has done so when she's pegging me. Which leads to my question: What are the possible issues from getting female ejaculate in your ass? I am thinking about modifying a toy in a way that might enable her to squirt up my ass. It probably won't work, but I am going to try. Because if it does work...
Originally posted on May 18, 2011.
Kinky female here, age 26. For as long as I've been sexually active, I've been ridiculously turned on by guys with huge cocks. I love the way they look and feel in my hands and when they're inside me. This isn't to say that I'd date a guy purely on cock enormity alone; I wouldn't. But I'm not sure what to do about my current situation: I'm dating someone now who shares my same values—he's flamingly liberal and actually enjoys RuPaul's Drag Race—but we don't have the greatest sexual chemistry. Some of it's because he's pretty vanilla, although he's GGG, but a lot of it is that his dick is average. Sadly. Am I wrong to want a guy with the lower half of a horse? If so, can I retrain myself to accept, and even want, an average or below-average penis?
Originally posted on May 18, 2011.
I suppose you are going to call me an asshole once you have finished reading my letter, but I hope you have some advice for me regardless.
I am a 45-year-old heterosexual male. My last relationship lasted nearly seven years. I am currently single. I am discouraged. One of the reasons for my discouragement: I have to get too far into a relationship before I can determine if it will work out with any particular woman. An awful lot of emotion, time, and effort are required to get that first look into a woman's panties. And this is where my problem lies. A woman can have the sweetest personality, she can be pretty and hardworking, but if her pussy isn't bald and her "little man in the boat" doesn't fit comfortably in my mouth, I am NOT turned on. I require a shaved pussy and a big clit.
I have asked women with whom I've become close to go bald. If the answer is no, there is no need to return. I respect a woman's control over her own body, of course, but I like a big clit. She may or may not be bald, but if the clit isn't big enough, there's no sense in returning. I have heard women say that they were disappointed to find that a man's dick was too small or too large, or they didn't like that it curved to the left or right. Do I have a right to a similar preference? What do I do? Is there a way to ask about these issues before emotion, time, and effort are invested?
I am on vacation. Please enjoy this golden oldie from November 7, 2012. 
I'm a man who just got out of a two-year relationship with a great girl. She was always a little controlling, and I felt like I had to tiptoe around her all the time, so I'm glad to be out of the relationship. But I was still providing her with a lot of emotional support. This was fine until she started bothering me for advice on what to do about her rebound relationship. This seemed beyond the call of duty, and I suggested to her that we needed to reevaluate our boundaries. She flipped out and has threatened to force all our mutual friends to pick her over me. I'm also worried that she will tell everyone we know about my pegging kink. I'm comfortable with that aspect of myself, but other people don't need to know. Do I stick up for kinks or deny it and blame a vengeful ex?
Kink-outing Originally posted on December 21, 2011. 
I'm a submissive gay man. All anal sex guides stress that when done right, anal sex should cause no pain. But what if I want pain? Over three years, my boyfriend and I have proceeded from having lots of anal foreplay to lube-it-up-and-stick-it-in. I love it, and once it stops hurting, as it always does after a while, I have amazing orgasms. So does he. There's a definite line between the arousing kind of pain and too much pain. But that line has moved closer to more intense pain, and I'm worried about injury. Then again, we're not sticking progressively bigger objects up my ass, just the same object with less foreplay. Is this risky?
Originally Posted on December 26, 2012.
I just started an intense relationship with a guy who has a boyfriend. This guy and I love each other. However, he is uncomfortable with me meeting his boyfriend. I've asked if it's okay that we're fucking, and he said they're in an open relationship so it's okay. I asked if it's okay that we're in love, and he said yes. So why the secrecy? My lover's only explanation is that his boyfriend doesn't want to know about the guys he fucks around with. The whole situation is starting to make me uneasy. I can't figure out why I want to know more about his boyfriend. Is it so I can verify that he's not cheating, or that jealousy is an issue for them and that's why I can't meet him? I do know that I wish my lover would be more open with me. Should I just relax?

I'm a gay man in my late 20's who works for a national pharmacy chain. At my old store, there were three cute guys who were semi-regular patients; they don't know each other, and I knew each one by name. I was transferred to another location, and yet, even now, I find myself occasionally "Facebook-stalking" them. I have never sent any of them a message; I just admire from afar, so to say. I think they're all adorable, but I would only bet that one of them is actually gay (I saw him go into a bar just after I got out of that same bar). What is protocol here? Do I wait until I quit the company altogether to send a friend request? Could I get in trouble for HIPAA violations? What should I do?
Prowling Internet, Originally posted on July 18, 2012.   
I am desperately in need of your help. After eight years of marriage, it turns out that the blowjobs I give are "good but not great" and are now getting "boring." My husband is unable to tell me anything specific that he wants me to do, just that I should "be creative." I've done everything I can think of over the years, so I have no idea where to go from here! My husband is my first partner, so I have no past experience to draw from, and porn hardly seems the proper inspiration: visually exciting (for a guy) but no visible technique other than some rather extreme deep-throating, which I am incapable of, as I have an annoyingly sensitive gag reflex. Is there anything nonstandard but fun that you could suggest? I'm not exactly vanilla, so I'm willing to try pretty much anything at this point.
I'm a 29-year-old straight-ish woman in Illinois married for just over five years to a wonderful man who is 28. About a year ago, we were watching RuPaul's Drag Race clips and, for fun, I asked my husband if I could dress him up in drag. It took some convincing but he agreed—so long as there were no photos. He looked fierce! He was surprised and we had a few good laughs. About a week later we were Ru and we were talking about their severity—those severe queens and their severe looks—and why they rarely wear "everyday" makeup. I explained that they're not trying to look like women. For comparison I convinced him to let me make him over as a regular woman, hair and all. I think this was where things changed. He looked really good. In fact, he kept his face on for nearly four hours, constantly going back to the mirror. Since then, he has started feminizing himself, little by little. He's learned to put on makeup by himself and do his hair. We've even been out together, as two girls, to dance. My problem is, sexually, he's become completely passive. When we do have intercourse, I have to be on top. But usually it's just him going down on me—very well, mind you—and we bypass his orgasm entirely. Have I created a trans girl? I know that isn't possible, but does it seem like I may have released something he didn't know was there?
I'm a 34-year-old mostly straight woman in the Southwest US. My amazing boyfriend is 30 and straight. We've been together about 2.5 years, and we love and respect each other dearly and deeply. Here's the issue:  while we both prefer monogamy, we both realize that we'll be sexually attracted to others throughout our lives, and I don't want either of us to get bored sexually. However, neither of us knows how to deal with the thought of our partner being sexually intimate with someone else. I'm afraid I would be emotionally damaged beyond repair. Every girlfriend he's had before me has cheated on him. How could we ever possibly learn to be monogamish and still maintain our healthy relationship?! We've discussed being together for the rest of our lives, but I honestly don't know if we can do that within the constraints of monogamy. But I don't know how to deal with anything else. Please help! This is the most open, loving, trusting relationship I've ever had, and I'd really like to learn to make it the best it can be for the long haul, for both of us. 
I'm a 34-year-old erotic massage therapist/hand job artist. It's interesting, gratifying, and I always have a good story to share with friends in the know. I love it.
About six months ago I met a 78-year-old man in need of my services after grieving the loss of his wife. Despite the obvious odds, we hit it off, and I soon found myself hanging out at his place long after our sessions had ended just because I liked his company. Aside from our more vanilla shared interests, we both enjoy weed, MDMA, and kink. (He used to be a leather daddy back in his prime.) What started off as "just another day at the office" has developed into an unlikely relationship where we get high, I give him a fantastic massage (I'm trained), and then he ties me up & paddles my pussy or whatever else we feel like doing that evening. Or sometime we just go out for sushi & enjoy scandalizing other diners. We're both experienced, safe, honest and respectful, especially when it comes to sex & drugs, and I still check in with a friend during our sessions. He is the only client I "party" with.
It's fun for me because I get to "out-perv" myself while exploring a new aspect of my sexuality with someone great. And since I'm not currently dating, Dan, this kindly old gentleman is like boyfriend-lite. It's fun for him because, duh.
My question is regarding his jizz. Or lack thereof. 
We've never fucked because he's never gotten hard enough to make it a physical possibility (and that might actually be where I'd draw the line), but I do love sucking his soft old dick. You can do things with a soft dick that you just can't do with a hard one and I'm totally sharpening my skills for when I start dating guys who can get hard. He says he has orgasms, and I have no reason not to believe him, but nothing ever comes out when he does. Which is not a problem. But even though he says he can't remember if he still has his prostate or not, sometimes after a particularly strong O, he'll ask, "Are you sure nothing came out? I swear I felt something that time!" Based on my experience both as a sex worker and as a woman who fucks dudes, I know sometimes a man's ejaculation is a source of pride, so sometimes I'll tell a little white lie. Which satisfies him and then we get to go back to my pussy. But one night, driving home, I started to wonder, "What if he actually jizzed in your mouth one of these days?"
I'm not a squeamish girl, but all the loads of jizz I've taken in my mouth have been from young, pipes-cleared-every-day guys. I've never had old, probably-been-in-there-a-while jizz. And now it's literally and figuratively messing with my head. Now, every time he gets close, I take it out and discretely point it the fuck away from my face, afraid that something looking like bad tapioca is gonna come out of there and that the consistency won't be the worst part. Taking into consideration our drug play and all the stimulation he's getting... is it possible for a man his age to suddenly ejaculate after years of shooting blanks? And if so, would that first one probably be super gross?
I've been reading your column for years, but this is my first time writing. (I hope you like the acronym!)
You wrote in one of your columns awhile back: "It's amazing how well some people get along with their exes after they break up or divorce. People really seem to relax and enjoy each other once they let go of their expectations, once they're no longer trying to control each other, and once both are free to sleep with whoever they want. I sometimes wonder why people don't give that stuff a try—shitcan the expectations, stop trying to control each other, fuck whoever you want—before they get divorced."
I just broke up with my boyfriend of a year because we could never get to the same place—or even a workable place—on the poly/mono spectrum. He wanted to screw around without limits or boundaries beyond safe sex practices and I wanted to be the primary, nesting partner, to build a life with him, which, to my mind, meant that he had to let go of some of the other women in order for us to spend the time together necessary to create a strong, trusting bond. In many other ways we were super compatible, but in this way we were not. So, eventually, after a lot of pain and angst, I ended it. 
I'm aware that my expectations were part of the problem. But I also believe that we get to want what we want. So my question to you is: how do you think we ("we" as in people, not "we" as in my ex and I) should go about "shitcanning our expectations," especially when they've been taught to us for maybe our whole lives? I tried for a year to let go of my expectations, trying to accept my ex's reassurances that all these other women didn't affect our relationship or his love for me, but I couldn't do it. It still hurt when I—supposedly his primary and his life partner—had to compete with other women for his time and attention, and when his dating didn't seem to give him the time to focus on building something special with me. Predictably, he called me insecure when I asked for more time and attention, which may have been true, but my requests were still legitimate, regardless of my insecurity.
In moving forward, I would like to be better about managing expectations in a relationship, even though I now know I'm more on the monogamous side of things. How does one let go of a lifetime of programming? Any advice?
Originally posted on August 28, 2013.
I'm a cute, mostly straight, twentysomething, single, and (safely) sexually active woman. This happens to me pretty often: I hook up with a guy, we start fooling around, and we're both really into it. I reach down, and he's full sail. Things progress-clothes come off, etc.-and, as is generally the polite order of things, the lady comes first. (This isn't the problem.) I'm not aggressive, but I'm not shy. I tell a partner what I like and how to do it. They are always happy to oblige. The thing is, after I get off, a lot of times, the guy is limp. (This is the problem.) They usually express frustration and indicate that they're very much turned on but it's just not working. Generally after a few times, they will stop having this problem, and we will end up having lots of fun. So I don't think I'm doing anything "wrong" to kill the boners. I think maybe I'm just intimidating. In fact, I've been told so. Why does this happen and how can I reduce the awkwardness? Should I talk about it or just ignore it? And should I keep trying to make him hard? Or will that just make his dick panic worse?
Originally posted on October 23, 2013.
My girlfriend snooped on my browser history the other day specifically to see what porn I had been looking at. I've told her I look at porn a few times a week, and she said she didn't mind. She asked me what type of stuff I usually look at, and I was mostly honest. My viewing habits are pretty vanilla except for BBW porn. It's not my go-to, but it was what she found in my browser history the day she snooped. She had some issues, and I don't know how to address them. I'm not more attracted to overweight women than other women, but sometimes that type just does it for me. Compounding this, my girlfriend is overweight—not on par with the women in the videos I watched—and now she's worried that her weight is the only reason I'm attracted to her. It's not! How can I explain this to her and put her mind at ease?
I've been reading your column for years (19 years?), and I love it. Savage Love has been a major part of my coming to terms with my sexuality after a very religious upbringing. And I hate to complain about something that probably seems pretty minor, but hopefully my reasons will be compelling.
You recently advised GTBHF about taking the virginity of her Middle Eastern boyfriend, and you referred to his very conservative upbringing and the "medieval version of his faith." I'm a medievalist, and this is one of the things about our current discourse on religion that drives me nuts. Contemporary radical Christianity, Judaism, and Islam are all terrible, but none of them are medieval, especially in terms of sexuality.
Today's history lesson—and it's a fascinating one—continues after the jump....
I'm not saying that the Middle Ages was a great period of freedom (sexual or otherwise), but the sexual culture of 12th-century France, Iraq, Jerusalem, or Minsk did not involve the degree of self-loathing brought about by modern approaches to sexuality. Modern sexual purity has become a marker of faith, which it wasn't in the Middle Ages. (For instance, the Bishop of Winchester ran the brothels in South London—for real, it was a primary and publicly acknowledged source of his revenue—and one particularly powerful Bishop of Winchester was both the product of adultery and the father of a bastard, which didn't stop him from being a cardinal and papal legate.) And faith, especially in modern radical religion, is a marker of social identity in a way it rarely was in the Middle Ages. 
The thing that really screwed up a lot of us religious kids was that engaging with our sexuality destroyed our religious identity: We stopped being Christians or Muslims when we started having sex, or sometimes, just started desiring to have sex. (Jewish identity is somewhat different, though my Haredi friends would perhaps find a similar situation.) 
The Middle Eastern boyfriend wasn't taught a medieval version of his faith, and radical religion in the West isn't a retreat into the past—it is a very modern way of conceiving identity. Even something like ISIS is really just interested in the medieval borders of their caliphate; their ideology developed out of 18th- and 19th-century anticolonial sentiment, and much ultra-Orthodox (Haredi) Judaism and evangelical Christianity developed at the same time. Even the radical Roman Catholicism of someone like Rick Santorum is surprisingly modern.
The reason why this matters (beyond medievalists just being like, OMG no one gets us) is that the common response in the West to religious radicalism is to urge enlightenment, and to believe that enlightenment is a progressive narrative that is ever more inclusive. But these religions are responses to enlightenment, in fact often to The Enlightenment. As such, they become more comprehensible. The Enlightenment narrative comes with a bunch of other stuff, including concepts of mass culture and population. (Michel Foucault does a great job of talking about these developments, and modern sexuality, including homosexual and heterosexual identity, as well—and I'm stealing and watering down his thoughts here.) Its narrative depends upon centralized control: It gave us the modern army, the modern prison, the mental asylum, genocide, and totalitarianism as well as modern science and democracy. Again, I'm not saying that I'd prefer to live in the 12th century (I wouldn't), but that's because I can imagine myself as part of that center. Educated, well-off Westerners generally assume that they are part of the center, that they can affect the government and contribute to the progress of enlightenment. This means that their identity is invested in the social form of modernity.
However, for those on the margins, for the excluded, the feeling is much different. Some governments have taken advantage of that: The Nazis made national identity part of a progress narrative in order to involve lots of struggling, middle-class Germans in their cause (despite Germany having become a nation only recently); the Soviet Union did a similar thing with the oppressed Russian peasants (despite Marx saying that a mostly agricultural society wasn't ready for Communism). Radical religion is doing something similar: It offers a social identity to those excluded (or who feel excluded) from the dominant system of Western enlightenment capitalism. It is a modern response to a modern problem, and by making it seem like some medieval holdover, we cover up the way in which our social power produces the conditions for this kind of identity, and make violence appear as the only response for these recalcitrant "holdouts."
I don't know how to solve this—I imagine I would have a cooler job than "medievalist" if I did—but telling people to get enlightened, or to leave behind the "medieval," is not it, and it reinforces the very kinds of identities that create radical religion. You're someone who thinks a lot about identities, and I hope that this can be part of your consideration when you think about the shitty kinds of religion that cause terrible pain (and death) among LGBTQ people. I've come to believe that real social change is going to come through sexual revolution, and maybe through getting rid of identity as we know it altogether. So for the goal of a sexy utopia in the future, don't call these shitty religions "medieval." And sorry for such a long letter, but it allowed me to put off my grading for a while. 
Best, 
Middle Eastern Dude Is Entirely Victorian, Alright? 
Forty-ish straight white dude here, Dan. I have this weird (possibly misogynistic) belief that, when it comes to sex, I can't win. Actually, I think men in general can't win. Thoughtful, well-meaning men, at least. It comes down to this: During sex, if the man doesn't come, it's the man's fault, because he clearly has problems with his dick and is barely even a man and should be ashamed of himself. If the woman doesn't come, it's also the man's fault, because he's clearly bad at sex and doesn't even care and is barely even a man and should be ashamed of himself.
So, am I a misogynist or just a guy with issues? Any advice for me moving forward?
Yeah, I First, I must apologize. I ramble when I'm nervous and I'm quite nervous, as I'm a big fan of yours, and my girlfriend—the lady I'm writing about—is too, but maybe her seeing this will help.
So, I've had a pretty weird sex life. I'm a repeated male victim of rape, and as a fat guy who grew up very poor and surrounded by rich kids, I viewed pretty much every good, consenting sexual encounter as probably the last one I'd ever have unless I rocked at it. So I'd always been all about my partner's pleasure, no matter what it takes—if they like, it maybe they'll come back.
It worked for a long time. My late teens and early 20s were full of loving relationships and a great sex life. Then, when I turned 22, my longtime girlfriend sort of lost her mind. Not in the way guys talk about women being crazy, but actually beating me with objects and raping me when I couldn't resist anymore—that degree of crazy. When I managed to get free, I left, but my sex drive died. I didn't date. I didn't flirt (which is hard for me to not do, as to this day I'm still fat and poor, but I pride myself on being charming). I didn't even masturbate for a few years. When I decided to get back into dating, I was unemployed, living with my mother, in the worst shape of my life, and in therapy for trying to get used to being touched again.
I went the online route, through gaming and dating sites, and through three disastrous online relationships (including one where the 22-year-old girl ended up being a 34-year-old married man), I finally ended up with a woman I'd call the love of my life. I moved across the country for her and don't regret it—things are mostly pretty great!
But there's the bedroom.
She's a good lover. I love the intimacy and I love, well, being with someone I love. It's much better than being with a willing body. There are snafus and struggles here and there, but the issue comes down to the title of this e-mail: I will be 30 years old in eight months. Between serving my lovers and being raped, I have no idea what a blowjob feels like. I don't know if she finds them gross—I'm not circumcised and I figured that was the issue, but I'm very, very clean, and she says she doesn't care, but she just doesn't want to do them. She's cited a sensitive gag reflex as one of the main reasons, but, well, I'm not exactly John Holmes. Or even remotely close. Frankly, I've seen her eat corn dogs that put me to shame. We've spoken to a couple's therapist, who, on the side, encouraged me to stray to find out what it was like because "every man deserves good head at some point," despite us telling her that we are monogamous. Upon telling that to my girlfriend, well, let's just say we only talk to the therapist together now.
I basically am just trying to find someone's advice. The relationship is monogamous, and I love her to death, but she's said, flatly, no blowjobs ever, and I don't know if I'm putting an overemphasis on how good/important they are, but I'd also like to know for myself at least one time. What should I do?
I am a 32 year-old straight woman, in a new relationship with an amazing 32 year-old man.   
The (overly) detailed backstory: We met online one month ago. He travels for work, and when we began talking he was at a job two hours away from me. We texted (a lot) for a couple days, then talked on the phone for two hours, then texted more, and FaceTimed, and one week after first connecting, he spent a weekend with me in between jobs. The weekend was amazing. We connect intellectually, have similar senses of humor, have overlapping values and interests, are physically into each other, etc. One thing I love about him is that he is a good communicator. Another thing I love is that he is sensitive. Even before we met for the first time, we talked about the kind of relationship we would each want to be able to have, about being able to talk to each other rather than just shutting down or blowing up.
After that first weekend, he was away for a couple weeks, during which time we continued to talk every day.  He visited me again after that second job, and we had another magical weekend.  He is currently at a job that is two hours away from me again, and I just visited him this past weekend.  After this job he has five months off, and will return to his permanent residence, which is eight hours away from me.  I am in graduate school, so I am about to have the summer off, and we have been planning to spend a couple weeks together at his place during that time. Essentially, we are at the beginning of what is shaping up to be a serious, long-term, long-distance relationship.  In fact, I feel it may be the serious, long-term relationship, if you follow.  I will be finished with school in one year, and we are approaching the point of deciding whether this is a relationship worth putting through the trials and tribulations of long-distance for the next year.
During our more serious conversations, we have talked about past relationships and hurts, as people tend to do. He told me about a past girlfriend who had an abortion without telling him, then told him after the fact, and broke up with him, and then tried to get back together.
The rest of this epic letter—and my response—after the jump...
He told me this story because we had decided (during our second weekend together) that he would pull-out instead of using a condom. It was my idea. He asked what I would do if I got pregnant, and I said I would have the baby, which I would. The fucked up thing here, is that I had an accidental pregnancy with the only long-term boyfriend I ever had, which was seven years ago, and I had an abortion, but I didn’t even remember this until he told me about his own experience with his ex. I know it sounds ridiculous, but when I think back to the moment when he asked what I would do if I got pregnant, I don’t remember thinking about my past experience, I just remember thinking, “of course I would keep it, I think I am in love with this person.”   
Afterwards he explained that he had had what he described as "a traumatic experience," and proceeded to tell the ex-girlfriend abortion story. As soon as he said the word ‘abortion,’ I remembered my own, and I felt immediately guilty and awful. (It wasn’t until later that I realized how delayed I was in recalling this, but when I think back to how I had to deal with the whole thing on my own, and how matter-of-fact and robotic I was about it all, I guess I was partially in shock or denial, and that I had buried the experience.) Part of me wanted to blurt it out to him right then, but I didn’t want it to seem like I was one-upping his hurt or just turning the conversation to me or something like that, so I didn’t say anything. Perhaps more truthfully though, I didn’t say anything because I realized that I had just engaged in (and even instigated) the same kind of reckless behavior that led to my pregnancy and abortion seven years ago. 
This past weekend, he told me that he had been married when he was 23. There is a whole separate story there, but after telling it, I could tell he felt vulnerable, and that maybe he was worried about what my reaction might be. I thought again about telling him about my abortion, but again it felt weird to say it just as a response to him telling me something difficult and personal, so again, I kept it to myself.
Nobody except my ex-boyfriend (and the folks at Planned Parenthood) knows about my abortion, so I don’t really have anyone to talk to about this. I want to tell him (current man), because I feel like not telling him is dishonest, but that also seems selfish, and like I am just looking for absolution or forgiveness or something.  I want to tell him because I want him to know me the way he is letting me know him, but the things he has told me don’t reflect on him the way my story does on me. He has told me about failed relationships, and mistakes, and being hurt, but I feel like my story just shows me to be a reckless person who doesn’t learn from her mistakes. And the worst part of my mistake is that it doesn’t just affect me, so it’s like I am being careless with him, which is a million times worse. But, if I were to get pregnant now, I know that I would keep the baby, so does that make it different? 
If this relationship is what I think it is, I feel I should tell him. I am kind of a compulsive truth-teller, so the thought of keeping this from someone I want to be as close as I can with just seems wrong, but again, is that just a justification for my selfish need to have someone tell me I am not a horrible, stupid person?  Would it just hurt or confuse him if I told him? And the other part is, of course, what will he think of me?  It’s not the fact that I had an abortion that I am ashamed of, and it’s not what he might think of me for that that I am afraid to know.  It was a horrible position I put myself in, and a horrible experience that is punishment enough, so that I know I shouldn't be beating myself up about making the decision I made. It's the fact that I allowed this to happen once, and am still being irresponsible in the same way that I am ashamed and embarrassed about. Either way, though, I feel that now this has come back up, and I have this decision to make, and I just want to make sure I do the best thing for the right reason.  I want this person to be in my life, in a big way, but I also need to be able to live with myself.  If he's the person I think he is, I feel I should be able to tell him without fear of judgment, but is it right to put him in that position? Now this memory has come back to me, I feel like I need to resolve it, but maybe putting it on him isn't how I should do that?
Thanks to whoever reads this.
Originally posted on May 23, 2012. 
I'm a 17-year-old girl and, in most aspects, I'm confident with myself, my identity, and my body. Earlier this year, I met a girl. She had some serious drama at home and needed to get out of her house, so I let her stay at mine. Things went a LOT further than I was ready for. I had just had my first kiss the month before and I didn't feel like our relationship was ready for sex, but I went along with it because she never gave me a chance to slow things down or say no.
My feelings for her are gone; she is attractive, but we don't connect. But she has feelings for me. How can I get her to understand, or at least respect, how I feel if she doesn't understand why this was a big deal for me?
Originally posted on May 23, 2012. 
I'm a 17-year-old girl and, in most aspects, I'm confident with myself, my identity, and my body. Earlier this year, I met a girl. She had some serious drama at home and needed to get out of her house, so I let her stay at mine. Things went a LOT further than I was ready for. I had just had my first kiss the month before and I didn't feel like our relationship was ready for sex, but I went along with it because she never gave me a chance to slow things down or say no.
My feelings for her are gone; she is attractive, but we don't connect. But she has feelings for me. How can I get her to understand, or at least respect, how I feel if she doesn't understand why this was a big deal for me?
Originally posted on December 19, 2012.
I am gay and I have a brother who's gay. The problem is, he is very much into humiliation. He exposes himself online and allows his online "masters" to have control over his pictures and videos. I found his pictures recently, and the embarrassment and humiliation were a huge turn-on for him. (In real life, we've never shown any interest sexually in each other whatsoever. But when he asked if I had any naked pictures, I told him I did and sent some to him, and somehow that was a bit of a turn-on, I must admit.) On to the real problem: Soon, my brother told me that he felt really guilty, cleaned up his hard drive, deleted all his pics and mine and asked me to do the same, and swore off playing online. But I found evidence that he's resumed this habit. This has been a pattern for him, he says, and he insists he was somehow damaged in childhood. I told him I see him as my kinky brother and that he might be happier if he could just accept himself. But I don't think he should quit his "addiction" cold turkey, as it hasn't worked in the past.
Originally posted on September 5, 2012.
I've been dating someone for a little more than two months. After the second week, he was saying things like "We need a word between 'like' and 'love' because 'I like you' doesn't seem sufficient." After weeks of telling him to slow his roll, I agreed to make it official and stop dating and sleeping with other guys because he wanted to "lock it down." It's been a week, and he's still on Scruff and Growlr. I'm a little put off because he was the one who pushed for exclusivity and the title of boyfriend. Should I be concerned? Can hookup apps be part of a healthy, monogamous relationship? Obviously a talk is needed.
I'm home and listening to opera. While listening I was contemplating some issues my wife and I discussed recently. We are both bi and have been together 11 years. What came up was penis size and essentially tight clothing. When I wear tight jeans my cock is obviously showing, even when completely soft. Imagine The Stones' "Sticky fingers" album cover, just bigger. We both know this and enjoy the attention I get. What this discussion brought up was my reluctance to go to strip clubs because when I get aroused my cock seems to grab everyone's attention. This seems great but I don't want to freak out the dancers or other customers. I know visible turgidity isn’t an issue legally, but honestly, I'm at the strip club to enjoy the dancers and I don’t want to distract attention away from them. That's really it.
I'm wondering if this is the right place to ask a question for the show or if I MUST call? Either way, I'm just wondering: I identify as a queer female, having dated men and women almost in equal measure. Lately I'm finding that my fantasies are changing gears: I'm fantasizing about gay men, watching gay porn, feeling particularly sexual toward my gay male friends. I want to have intercourse with gay men. Is this insane and impossible? Might it be offensive to gay men that I'm actively trying to figure out how to satisfy my needs in this way? Is it unlikely that any gay men would be willing to get naked with a girl (and like it?)? I suppose one solution is to seek out a bisexual man, but is there anything else you'd recommend? What is the most ethical way to operate here?
Girl's Originally posted on May 09, 2012.I am a 26-year-old straight guy. My straightness and guyness are recent revelations, and it feels amazing to be able to confidently state this. Here is my trouble: I've had gender issues for the past five years. My now ex-girlfriend of three years said she couldn't be with me anymore due to these issues. Our breakup was a result of my apathy in the bedroom, which was tied to my gender issues, and her fears of me transitioning into a woman. I can see now that my insecurities about myself caused me to be a selfish partner in many ways, but mainly in the bedroom. I now realize I was allowing my sexual kinks to get the best of me. I get very turned on by the idea of giving head to a guy, but in reality it is not something that I enjoy. I also find lingerie to be very arousing. I allowed myself to focus so heavily on those aspects of my sexuality that I became insecure in my masculinity inside and outside of the bedroom. I also ended up ignoring the majority of my sexual desires as a result of my insecurity in my gender identity. I have now stopped repressing my lust toward women in general, something I had been doing that negatively affected my ex.
I am asking you, I suppose, for some advice. I am still in love with my ex. I am prepared now to be the boyfriend that she wanted me to be. But how do I prove to her that I am no longer the apathetic, distant, and repressed lover that she was with for three years? I find myself overwhelmed with regret. She saw me as someone who couldn't do the things she needed, when in reality I was just paralyzed by my insecurities.
This is a bit of a long, fucked-up story.
I've been having an affair with a older married woman with three kids for the past 10+ years. She claims her husband doesn't know about us, that she doesn't have sex with him anymore, and that she sleeps in a separate room. She requires me to be monogamous to her and, hence, doesn't allow me to date anyone else. You might wonder why on earth I put up with this, but we get along amazingly well. She's witty, funny, clever, intelligent, and drop-dead sexy. She's the best friend I've ever had. Every time we're together—if I'm not depressed—the conversation just flows. Plus the sex is pretty great, although she's not as kinky as I am and is a bit reluctant to do stuff I would like to do. Finally, and maybe most importantly, we've both made sacrifices to be together: I've turned down jobs that would require me to move overseas, and she's completely changed her career to be with me. So, in many senses, it's much more like a real relationship rather than an affair. It's just we can't easily go on holidays together, we rarely spend the night together, and we don't often get to spend the evenings together.
Why am I writing? Because I feel like my life is slipping by, and I'm not entirely happy. I don't like being alone in the evenings. To cope with the situation, I drink too much in the evenings. It's hard for me to have friends, as by nature I like to be friends with women, but the woman I'm seeing gets insanely jealous and assumes I'm trying to fuck them. I'm 38 and would like to be married. I don't have any kids, and I'm not sure I actually want kids, but I would like the option of having kids. (I'm an only child, and it would make my parents so happy if I did have kids; they occasionally drop the passive-aggressive comment about me being the "end of the line.") The married woman I'm seeing did get pregnant by me, twice, and decided to have abortions both times, rather than actually open up a conversation with me about whether we should start a full and proper life together and raise a family. She's past childbearing age now so there's no chance any longer of us having kids together.
The rest of the letter... and my response... after the jump.
Setting aside the issue of kids, I would also just like to be able to go on a holiday with someone without having to engage in the cloak-and-dagger planning rituals. I would like to host dinner parties with friends—you know, all the stuff that normal couples do. Why don't I leave? See earlier remark about her being the best friend I've ever had. I can't imagine a life without her. Besides, I've tried to leave her several times in the past for other people, but have never been able to do it. No one compares to her.
This is where things get interesting. About a month ago, a 27-year-old woman made a pass at me. I was at a low point, and so I decided to follow it up and see where it went. We started emailing, texting, then sexting, then had sex. This new person is like a sexual godsend for me. She's willing to do absolutely anything (bondage, watersports, anal play, and she says she would happily have threesomes and group sex), and she calls herself my "sex slave." She has also said she wants to have kids at some point in the future and, since she's really into me, she said she would like to have kids with me. From the very beginning, I was honest and open with her about the married woman I was seeing—which was hard for her to take, but I told her that I couldn't walk away from a 10+ year relationship for a relatively unknown stranger. So she's reluctantly agreed to put up with the situation for a little while until we get to know each other better. She the first person I've met in 10 years that I can actually imagine leaving the married woman for.
But this is the problem: I can't really talk to the 27-year old. There's a small language barrier (English isn't her native language) but, really, it's that she's not talkative, she doesn't ask questions, and she doesn't seem to want to talk about the news, or books, or films. She says she's not this way with other people, but that, for some reason, it's hard for her to talk to me. I suspect she could be good to talk to, as she's funny and chatty over text, but in person it's just weird, awkward silences a lot of the time. Furthermore, the age gap, while great from a kink perspective, is just enough that it makes cultural references hard to share.  
So, that's the problem. On one hand, I've got the perfect intellectual match who—if I could marry—I would love to spend the rest of my life with. But she won't leave her husband to be with me. (Trust me, I've asked her many times. She's made and broken so many promises to leave I can't count them anymore.) On the other hand, I've got the perfect sexual match who I probably could marry and have kids with and a normal life with, but whom I can't really talk to, and whom being with requires giving up my best friend.
Not sure what advice you might have (see a shrink?), but I'd love to hear it.  
A bit of back story: I'm in my 20s, a female lesbian, who recently was asked by a stranger I met on a dating site to use his consenting slave financially—and he invited me to use his slave's apartment as part of their slavery agreement. I've never done anything like this before, but I am planning on using him/his space for organizing a small non-profit that I run because it's awesome when kinks can help end social inequality, right? But how much investigation should I do into the nature of their relationship and whether the slave thing is fully consensual? Are there certain questions I should ask? It's a no-sex agreement also! Hope you reply, really wondering about this!
My fiancé claims that after almost six years of being together, he still does not know what he is doing in bed. Our sex life is super vanilla, but the quality of the orgasm is stellar. He knows to get me off he needs to finger my clit while tonguing my nipples. And he is great at it! Great to the point I am sure the neighbors know his name. And he just loves it when I am on top, where he can see my boobs bounce around. 
One problem with our sex life is that I have a high sex drive, as in I could go three times a day every day, while my fiancé could go weeks without sex—with me. He would be fine as long as he could masturbate. I sometimes masturbate, but I do not prefer to do so because the orgasms are better with my fiancé. Plus it takes a lot more to get me there when I am alone with myself, my toys, and my porn. My fiancé, on the other hand, will happily masturbate in front of his computer in the next room while I am in our bed waiting for him. 
I know he is partially being selfish about this because he's squeamish and likes the easier "clean up." (Masturbating into an old pair of boxers isn't as messy as actual sex.) But I also feel the real reason he prefers masturbation over sex with me is because he can engage in his breast enlargement fetish. He likes to see videos of women with their breasts expanding to the point where the woman is basically immobilized. I cannot fake that to fix our sex life, Dan, and he is not interested in watching his porn with me.
So what can I do to engage his fetish more in bed? Isn't there something?
So I'm just gonna get straight to the point: My boyfriend told me that he would like to be pegged. We talked about it a lot, and it's both something we have never done before. We haven't been together too long, so firstly, should we be experimenting with other stuff first? We have both never really had any play in the anal area, which scares me. I have no idea how to initiate this kind of play. Like obviously we have to go buy a strap-on and stuff, but how do we transition from pretty normalish sex to me ramming something into his butthole? (What size or type of strap-on?! Where do you even go and buy stuff like that?!) Like what's the middle ground here?! Is there even middle ground? Would that make it easier if we were both experimenting with each other's butts? Also. How does one get ready to have something in their butt? I just keep picturing being behind him, with him bent over and me freezing because I have no idea what to do!
My letter appeared in your column last week. I was the guy wondering what was up with the "straight" guy whose online personal ad said he had "an addiction to massive cocks in my ass." You said that the guy was most likely bi (and rounding down to straight), might be gay (and flying a false flag), but there was a very, very small chance he was actually straight (and turned on by the violation or doing "forced bi" for a dominant girlfriend).
I took your advice and sent the guy a message and he replied. I thought your readers would like to hear it directly from him: "Sorry for the delay. Dan was actually correct when he suggested that I was rounding down. At the core of it, I am bi. I am lucky to have a girlfriend that accepts and embraces me for me. I guess it could be considered a marketing ploy to brand myself as 'straight,' though I do identify as a straight male for the majority of my day."
So good call, Dan!
And guess what? The guy is a "Savage Love" reader! Before I messaged him his profile had been updated with this: "Straight with an addiction to massive cocks in my ass. Just read someone asked Dan Savage about the legitimacy of my ad, and yes, I'm real and serious." His ad is here.
I am 28, a woman, in law school, and have a history of PTSD which makes me wonder if I am inventing reasons to be upset...
I also have an incredibly high sex drive. I mean like it's ridiculous I have never met my match. I'm a two, three times a day kind of gal. Vanilla, kinky, whatever, I just love to fuck. I also try to be realistic about the odds of finding a partner who wants to fuck as much as I do. I have a set of vibrators and lots of batteries and have no problem taking care of my own needs, but I greatly prefer partnered sex. It's just so much more satisfying. 
I am dating a 38-year-old man who is kind, supportive, loving, and hilarious. He is also very distant emotionally and physically sometimes. It's weird, it's like a switch that turns on and off. He is fully present and loving and amazing most of the time and then for days or weeks he will tap out and just be gone, hard to reach out to, impossible to engage with.
We started dating in October, and very quickly started having issues with him being unable to maintain an erection during penetrative sex. I brought it up (gently, I hope) three (!!!) times, and he was somewhat responsive but not really willing to discuss the issue. By January I was feeling extremely alienated and rejected, and I broke up with him without specifically saying it was about the sex. I thought that would have been cruel.
On Valentines Day he texted me.
The rest of the letter—and my response—after the jump.
He asked me out for a drink and we ended up having incredible marathon sex that blew my mind and was everything I had been looking for while we had been dating. I'm talking like six hours of mutual oral, vaginal penetration (yes, please!), orgasms galore (both of us!), eye contact, dirty talk—the full nine. It was the best sex of my life, not only physically but also because it was with someone I care about so deeply.  We got back together after about a month of dating and awesome sex. Two, maybe three weeks back in, the impotence issues are recurring. He just doesn't seem to be able to hold on to his erection for long enough for either of us to come. 
I am starting to take it pretty personally (again) and am wondering what the fuck is going on. Am I a jerk? (I'm not a jerk.) Am I ugly? (I'm not ugly at all.) Am I doing something horrible that totally turns him off? (I'm doing all the same things he loves when he is able to be responsive.) I hesitate to bring it up with him yet again. I don't want to destroy his confidence or imply that there is something wrong with him. I don't want to medicalize his sexuality. But this is killing me. I fucking love this man he is incredible and such an impressive person. I want to be with him. Fuck I want to marry him. 
So my question is: What the fuck do I do? Tell him to see a shrink? Tell him I'm worried I will cheat on him? Break up with him? He is not a motherfucker so DTMFA is not applicable. Is it just that he's in his 40's and this kind of thing is to be expected? My #1 goal is to not hurt him with any kind of accusatory language. But Dan I need to fuck. And I'm worried that I will eventually take care of that need with an outside party. 
The only reason I am asking you what to do is that from my research on the subject it seems like we are a textbook case. But there is no textbook answer. Impotence and performance anxiety seem to be huge issues for a lot of men. I want to be supportive and I also want to fuck my boyfriend. Do you have any idea what might be going on?  Am I being an asshole? Am I overreacting? Am I taking it too personally? Am I being too demanding? We have sex about once a week currently. Maybe half of those (if lucky) we are successful. 
Should I just suck his dick more? Is this a lost cause? Is he being an asshole?
I'm a 53-year-old straight male in a long term "exclusive-ish" committed relationship. I say "exclusive-ish" because a few times a year we'll have a third join us for a 3way. So far, the third has always been male, but my better half is open to the idea of that third being female so long as she isn't the one doing the asking. As you can imagine, the possibilities of a willing woman falling into our lap is about as likely as winning the lottery. Consequently, the idea is just an unrealized fantasy of mine. However, this weekend I got a strong vibe that this younger woman was flirting with us. She was probably at the youngest 25 and at the oldest 32.
This isn't a fantasy I'm obsessed with, so I don't think I'm projecting or imagining things through a distorted lens, but I also don't want to make an ass out of myself and come off as the old creepy guy either. So I'll lay out what happened as briefly as possible and maybe you can tell me if I need to forget about it all or risk looking like a fool and try making some inroads should I encounter her again?
The rest of DADDY's long, long letter—and my short, short response—after the jump...
We were at the local casino we frequent a few times a month and this woman sits next to me at a slot machine and starts chatting me up like were old friends. My wife is to my left, she is to my right and standing behind her is her boyfriend or husband, I don't know which. I know I've never seen this woman before in my life and she is saying things like, "Oh, we see you guys here all the time," and "You guys are so nice", blah, blah, blah, just general conversation, but she's leaning in to me and making long eye contact.
She seems perfectly sober by the way.
She sat there next to me for about an hour or so, and I really didn't think anything about her as being anything other than just a really friendly person, until later. Her husband or boyfriend seemed like the shy, quiet type and he didn't say anything at all, nor did he seem to be bothered by her overt friendliness to me either. He just stood behind her the whole time.
She got up and they left and after another hour or so we decided to head home. Had I not seen her again I probably would have forgotten her altogether. We were standing in line to cash in our ticket and she comes up and grabs my arm or taps my shoulder, and is standing close asking if we won and telling me about her bad luck, but she's smiling and making serious eye contact. The boyfriend or husband was standing several feet away and again with no input. Then, as she was walking away she stops and turns around and waves again.
I don't know, as I type this all sounds completely innocent, but I don't usually mess up signals from people either. Just to add a few more details: We are a fairly attractive couple for 53 and 48 years old, both in good shape, fit and all. The younger woman had a very pretty face, but she was not in shape and her boyfriend or husband was average looking. I'd guess they were both 28ish.
So Dan, am I seeing this event through the rose colored glasses of a 53-year-old man who is thinking with his cock and not his brain? Do I need to just forget the whole thing, or should I take a chance and try to inject the fact that we might be game for some fun with her, or them for that matter, if we run into them again?  She did say, "We see you guys all the time," so I guess we'll see them again at our casino.
My boyfriend of almost three years broke up with me before Thanksgiving. But now we are trying to work things out. He is my first and only, I love him dearly, and I want to spend the rest of my life with him. He is a Gemini, he has been with countless women before me, and he recently opened up to me about his need for two women. He says that he loves me and wants to be with me, but he gets bored easily and needs the extra excitement of a third joining us in the bedroom if he is to be monogamous. He also had younger twin sisters which he says explains the reason he needs to women at once. We're looking at spending the rest of our lives together, but its extremely important for him that I be OK with occasionally bringing another woman into the bedroom.
Before I met him, I was planning to wait until marriage and had extreme anxiety around sex. He has slowly pulled me out of my shell in the bedroom and now I have a sex drive almost as great as his and enjoy experimenting and variety just as much as he does. However, I am a Leo and get extremely jealous. I'm even jealous when it comes to his friends who are girls. The thought of him looking at another woman, much less the idea of watching him screw one in front of me, makes me physically sick. I'm not sure if I can go through with it and I can't predict I'll be able to handle what would happen if we did go through with it. I want to cater to his desires and make him the happiest man in the world, but I have no idea where to even begin getting over my fears. It's also really hard to talk to anyone even my closest friends about because they all just tell me to leave him and that I deserve better. He doesn't judge me for my kinks and I don't want to judge him for his. I just want to be able to please him without hurting myself. HELP.
I hope I can get your opinion on my current situation.
I'll try to be as concise as possible. I'm a 26-year-old woman. Three years ago, I had a three-way with my 35-year-old fiancé and this nice girl he knew from high school. Let's call him "Bob" and her "Sally." The condom broke and Sally wound up pregnant despite using Plan B. Sally gave birth to a girl. For the first two years of the baby's life, Sally would NOT allow Bob to see the baby or be involved in any way. (She's Christian and she was embarrassed about conceiving during a three-way.)
Lately, Sally and Bob have been talking and now Sally is allowing Bob to see his daughter. I know there's no one to blame for this—the condom was used correctly but failed—but I'm still having kind of a hard time with it. Bob and I were planning on doing this (having a baby) for the first time with each other one day. Now i'm suddenly a stepmom. Bob has been seeing his daughter pretty frequently since Sally has been in contact with us. He's always so excited, so I feel I can't say anything about how bummed it makes me.
Any advice or thoughts you may have would be great. Is it wrong that my heart is breaking? I feel so selfish that I'm still somewhat skeptical of Sally's motives. I'm open to being disproven, but this is still pretty out of the blue.
Can you PLEASE describe life with Terry? Because I want to hear from the gay horse's mouth directly that ingesting your "husband's" feces on a regular "monogamish" basis is really what you meant by "it gets better."
The good news is that your pretend gay "marriage" has no legitimate legacy. Once you and Terry are gone who is going to care about remembering that two very damaged men played pretend house for a few decades and brought a child into the mix to make the adults feel more secure about their pretend family unit? Not the kid Terry raised who will one day be so busy in his own pretend gay "marriage" that he couldn't possibly be bothered to show up and throw dirt on a box in a hole. That might interrupt his Margaret Cho-inspired fisting class. The day after one of you dies the other will be in the arms of another man and will seek to play pretend house again until they pass. It's sad you actually think that what you turned your life into is anything other than a pathetic and sad mess. You couldn't be happy with just destroying your life and that of your so-called wi-band/hus-fe. You had to being a child into the mix in order to convince yourself that your made-up family is some how not a made up group of sad men playing pretend.
It gets better when you don't believe the lie that being gay is some how important in any meaningful way!
So my hubby and I have been together 20 years. The messages have been mixed. He's attracted to women much older than myself and much closer in age to him—we have a 20 year age difference—and he's also attracted to men. He had a terrible time trying to come to grips with his own sexuality and his inability to reconcile who he was with who he "was supposed to be" got mixed up into shame, guilt, infidelity, and addiction. Fine. Wherever. His sexuality did nothing but turn me on and help me overcome some of my own hangups. I have been through my own ringer. I cheated on him. I lied about the fact that he was my first. After my own affair I became a prostitute—with his befuddled blessing—but all of that is over. Now he wants me to be a hotwife. I want to be his sub. He has issues with being a Dom and I have issues fucking strangers. Can you refer us in a direction we can start from? I am excited for us to move on without hangups and shame and he can't get past the negative.
Bored, Dull, Sad, 
My fiance keeps shaving his beard off and I hate it! We met on a blind date three years ago and he didn't have one then but started growing one from the moment I said that that's what I prefer. He's the opposite of what I find physically attractive—he's chunky, short, feminine—but the beard and most everything else about him is wonderful, and we've built a lovely life together. Following a bout of depression, sex-drive killing medication and running a ridiculously busy business, I have struggled with libido. We have a good sex life that's taken effort on both of our parts but when his beard comes off I just can't find him attractive. It's also uncomfortable during sex and sometimes painful depending on the stage of regrowth. 
I'm very aware that he can do what he likes with his body. I would be offended if he felt similarly about something that I did to my appearance but then I take into account what he prefers when I'm changing something (not that it stops me but it's definitely a concern). And I've also got a mind to his self-esteem in how I respond to him. But I just can't help but hate it. What do you suggest? Do I just have to get over this? 
Originally posted on November 20, 2013. 
Last month at a house party, my boyfriend accidentally burned my chin, neck, and cleavage during a clumsily executed volcano shot. I was literally on fire for a few seconds. Some doctor appointments, burn creams, bandages, and awkward scabbing later, I'm healing nicely. My problem is, our sex life has become much more complicated. Before the accident, we were having sex only every week or so. But now he stares sadly at my neck wound (which still has a red line going down it) every time he looks at me. It's very hard to feel sexy when you're constantly looked at with pity, regret, and concern, and the stress of being sexually frustrated is fueling other stresses. I just want a way out of this sad circle we've found ourselves in.
Originally posted on November 27, 2013.
How stupid would it be to sleep with my boss's gorgeous 18-year-old son? My boss has become a mentor to me. He and his wife have welcomed me into their home, which includes their aforementioned son, a high-school senior. I am a 23-year-old woman. Normally, I wouldn't sleep with anyone younger than 20. But besides being very attractive, my boss's son is funny, kind, and sweet. He's also incredibly horny and has some serious unexplored kinks that most girls his age have no interest in. I want to spend the next few months fucking my boss's son—bearing in mind and honoring, of course, your campsite rule. Here are the two problems as I see them: (1) Fucking around with your boss's kid seems like a surefire way to seriously wreck your relationship with your boss. (2) He is still in high school.
Originally posted on December 11, 2013. 
I'm a straight woman who loves my boyfriend, but sex isn't a priority for me. His sex drive, on the other hand, is ridiculous. He gets very upset when I don't have sex with him and accuses me of not being interested in him anymore, which isn't the case. I just can't fuck on demand! Most people would probably say that my boyfriend is an insensitive asshole for pressuring me for sex. Except this was a switcheroo exercise: I, the girlfriend, want more sex. He, my boyfriend, doesn't see sex as a priority. When we first started dating, we had sex every day—it was incredible—but around the four-month mark, something changed. I've had to beg for it ever since—and I mean beg. I give him space, I take care of things on my own for as long as I can, and right around the time when I feel myself start to get really anxious, I ask for sex. And I am rejected. Only when I'm so hurt that I'm literally sobbing on the floor is he suddenly interested in having sex with me. Right then, right there. It happens about twice a month. I don't know what to do. I love him so much and would be a fool to leave him. Other than the sex, everything is wonderful. He is the best and most thoughtful boyfriend ever, but he says he likes being the one who's controlling the sex. Maybe I am just being a colossal asshole? My problem sounds mundane, I know, but it's killing me.
Originally posted on June 6, 2012.
Could you tell my boy to calm the heck down? Can't seem to get him to get the difference between bestiality, necrophilia, and screwin' a bearskin rug. Emphasizing my usual sexual interests—which involve rope bondage, floggin', and an e-stim unit—hasn't worked.
I'm a gay man and a hunter; he's a gay boy and a vegan. But he likes how I look in my camo, holding a rifle, so it works. Last fall, I went to Idaho and shot a bear. A taxidermist made the bear into a rug. Most people don't know this, but the head on a bearskin rug is entirely fake except for the fur. The skull, teeth, and tongue are plastic, and the eyes are glass. Bear's hardly a bear.
So he liked the rug. Even wanted me to screw him on it—until he walked in while I was doing it with the bear. I rigged up the mouth with one of those Fleshlight things, pretty much as a joke, but my boy freaked when he saw the bear giving me a blowjob. Called me sick and disgusting, and now he won't let me tie him up or anything. He says he's afraid I will kill him and screw him. What can I do?
Originally posted on July 25, 2012.
I am a 25-year-old straight woman. I recently started seeing a man. The first time I slept with him, he told me that he was interested in a relationship, and I told him that I wanted to keep things purely casual. Over the next month and a half of talking to him, hanging out, and having sex, I started to really like him. I was thinking about changing my mind and taking the relationship to the next level.
The last time I saw him was a week ago. He came over, we had sex, and then he mentioned he had met someone else. As he was beginning to elaborate, I told him to leave.
My anger comes from his timing. If he had told me this before we had sex, Dan, I would have been able to have a constructive conversation about this. The problem now, if I'm being completely honest with myself, is that I really like him and I don't want to stop seeing him.
A couple of questions: Do I reach out to him again? Did I overreact?
Originally posted on January 30, 2013.
I recently caught my boyfriend watching porn. We have talked about it before, and he said he didn't watch it while he was in a relationship. But when I caught him there with his dick in his hand, I lost it. I have never felt so hurt or betrayed. This is my first serious relationship. I can't get over how sick and sad I feel. It feels like he was cheating on me. Should I be as upset as I am? It was interactive porn—it was like he was cybersexing with one of his ex-girlfriends. What should I do?
Originally posted on February 1, 2012.
My husband is a very kinky submissive man. When we were dating, I found out that he had been talking to multiple people online and that he had met up with a professional dom a couple of times. I felt betrayed that he had done this all behind my back, even though I had told him that I would be down with him seeing a dom. (I even offered to buy him a session for his birthday!)
We got through it, and now our sex life is amazing. I tie him up, I lock his dick up, I dress him up. All I ask in return is that he be honest with me about who he's talking with online. Is that unreasonable? I know he chats with "women" online as a "woman," and I'm okay with that so long as I'm made aware of it. But today I found pictures on his phone of his cock in the chastity device I keep him in. He tried to lie but he came clean: He was chatting with a woman, it came out that he was a man, and she wanted to see pictures of his cock in his chastity belt.
Why lie? Honest to God, if he would have just told me the day he sent the pictures that he sent someone pictures of his cock, I would be okay with it! I also found another e-mail account he never told me about that he's using when he chats online as a woman. Again, no big deal! But I was under the impression that he used just this one chat program for chatting! Why hide it? My vanilla friends will be no help in this matter, and I feel pretty heartbroken. So I'm asking you.
He Isn't Originally posted on July 11, 2012. 
I'm a straight 32-year-old woman who has been in a monogamous relationship with a guy for two years. Recently, we took the plunge and moved in. Before moving in, we had experimented with some kinky stuff. (I have never come so hard or fast as the first time I fucked him in the ass with a strap-on.) Then he told me, after moving in, that he had given some thought to poly relationships before committing to me. Now I am feeling insecure about the viability of this relationship. Although he claims no desire to be in a poly situation now, I can't help but feel that I alone will ultimately not be able to fulfill him entirely. He is a soul mate who I can see growing with over time. But I worry this relationship is doomed.
I'm 40, happily married for 10 years, with the wife for 20 years. We have a good marriage, we're great friends, we have two kids, a good life. But my wife refuses to give me head. Flat-out says no. Won't do it. We have talked about it, and she says she doesn't want to and nothing I can say will ever convince her. I have tried denying her oral sex, I have tried not asking, I have tried begging. Nothing works.
I don't know what to do. Everything else is fine. I don't want an affair. It scares the hell out of me. I worry about sexual infections and I'm not sure I can just go see a sex worker. I need it to be done by a person I can get to know. But who would want to blow me regularly with no attachments or commitments?
Do you think my wife has given up the right to be mad at me for even considering this? By denying me oral, is she forcing my hand, or am I being selfish? Should I just suck it up? For lack of a better term?
I'm a gay male who's been partnered for four years, and for the last four nights my S.O. and I have been sleeping in separate beds. Money's been tight, there have been fights over that, including one last night, and our sex life has been practically nonexistent for a few months.
A couple mornings ago, as I went into the spare bedroom before leaving for work, I noticed a small bottle of poppers on the nightstand's lower shelf. Before I said good-bye to the S.O., I asked why he'd slept in there, to which he replied, "Because I felt like it." All I could think to say was, "Um... okay," and left.
Well, I had today off because of snow, and after last night's fight, I was curious. I didn't see the poppers on the nightstand, but I saw a bulky gym bag near the edge of the bed frame near the nightstand. It was filled with rather large and thick dildos, including one fisting dildo. Part of me wished Helena Bonham Carter's Marla Singer would have appeared and rolled her eyes, "Oh, don't worry. [They're] not a threat to you." But I can't use any of these myself. (I'm not much of a bottom, and the few dildos I've tried are "starters.") The ones I saw are pro-league, and I'm surprised the S.O. can enjoy them. Also: I've long known the S.O. likes nipple clamps, and I'd known about a thin sounding rod, but in my snooping I also found an extensive sounding kit. 
Again, we've been together for four years, living together for almost half of that. We've never incorporated toys into our sex besides the few times I've tried getting over my issues with bottoming. Suffice it to say, since Marla isn't sitting on my shoulder to reassure me, I am feeling threatened. Given the recent blowups, the mistrust over money, and the lack of intimacy, I'm not sure how to broach the subject. If he bought these, it's a sizable investment. If he was given them... I can't get past the shudder and even begin thinking about who might've given them to him.
He's about to go on a weekend trip tomorrow morning, and I don't know if I should say anything tonight, or wait until he returns. 

I'm in my 50s and happily married for 10 years to my second wife. She has known my full sexuality from the start, including that I love being degraded and humiliated by cruel women. I have a very strong foot fetish, enjoy every aspect of cuckoldry, including forced cream pie eating, and similar scenes. I also get very turned on by physical punishments, such as face slapped and trampling. But the ultimate excitement for me is being caned. Before I was with my current wife I saw a professional Domme who was a genuine sadist. She gave me beatings that were transcendental.
My wife willingly participates in some of my fetishes, especially those that focus on foot worship, and she will exchange cuckold fantasies with gusto. But she places great value on monogamy and is too uncomfortable ever to turn that fantasy into reality. She's more flexible on pain (face slapping, nipple clamps, etc.) and has in the past given me several breathtaking beatings with a cane. In recent years, however, she's drawn back from whipping because she doesn't like hurting me.
I love my wife very much and want to respect her limits. But as I've gone through therapy and lost some of the shame I carried, my desire for caning has become much stronger—almost beyond my ability to control. I've suggested having a beating done by a pro domme a few times a year. My old Domme lives in another state and would be perfect for the assignment. My question, I guess, is how best to explain my need and how hard I can really push for it. I really think it would increase my happiness greatly and make me a better husband.
Can't If Ben Carson thinks being gay is a choice, he should prove it by choosing to be gay himself. Christopher Halloran/I love and adore my wife, and would never stray, but I am going out of my friggin' mind because I am a kinkster (of the consensual-nonconsent and rape-play vintage with a side of ball-gag drool), yet have a very vanilla sex life. My wife knows all about my sexual predilections, does not judge them, and has tried to satisfy them, but her heart is not in it, and as a result, such attempts are epic in their non-sexiness. It's not that I don't find my wife hot. Quite the contrary, being naked with her is an instant megaboner, and I have little trouble climaxing during intercourse. But I have buttons that need to be pushed for my sex life to be truly fulfilling and satisfying in a physical and emotional sense, and that is not happening. I have resorted to masturbating with Tumblr porn on the side, which fills a physical need fleetingly, but not the emotional one, and ultimately solves nothing and is therefore depressing. In other words: If fapping fixed my problem, Dan, I would not be writing you. Now I am hitting my mid-50s without ever having fucked the way I really want (my wife is my first and last sex partner), and I'm panicking. Again, looking for the answer outside of my marriage is not an option, and I know my wife wouldn't be up for bring anyone else into our bed. Any advice?
Originally posted on December 28, 2011.
I'm a straight male in a committed live-in relationship. My girlfriend and I have sex once a week, usually on Saturday mornings. During the week, she is either too tired or too full after dinner. She often says she wants to have sex, but come 9:30 p.m., she's ready to get in bed and watch TV until she falls asleep. She asks me on a daily basis if I've masturbated in her absence. If I say no, she accuses me of lying. She has demanded to smell my hands to see if she can smell lube on them. I resent feeling interrogated and guilt-tripped over this. When I do masturbate, I always clean up after myself and I'm doing it before she gets home or after she's gone to bed. So, again, why the guilt?
Browbeating Okay, From listening to your podcast, I know you appreciate feedback from the people you have given advice to, so here you have an update from the poor guy who (according to many comments to my letter) was being fooled by a pimp and a prostitute.
To recap: I met an escort, we experienced what seemed to be a mutual attraction on the first fuck, and she then invited me to go see Fifty Shades of Grey with her. A date. I took your advice and took her to the movie... after spending the night before at her place. I wound up spending the night with her again. We got irritated looks from some of the old women at the screening—they did not approve of her acting submissive toward me (just some hair pulling and making out)—but, hey, the reason she asked me to go see the movie at all was because during our first encounter I told her I was a dominant sadist. And after the movie, she was in the mood for trying out BDSM for herself—and now I've been introduced to her sister and her friends as the man she is dating, and as her "Mr. Grey" to some of her closer friends. And we've been seeing a lot more of each other since that movie date. I have no idea where the relationship between us is going, but we enjoy each other. We are two fucked-up people finding pleasure and company together—we just happened to meet in an unusual way. Thanks for advising me to go on the date, Dan.
And in response to some of the comments: No, she didn't want me to smuggle drugs up my ass. No, she didn't have a pimp who wanted to blackmail me. No, my letter was not viral marketing for the movie. Yes, I know it sounds like something made up—but sometimes reality surprises you. The moral of my story: Found someone you like and that person likes you back? Don't fucking worry about how you met and just see where it leads.
Gay male, Magnum listener, 36-years-old, and from Slovenia here. My boyfriend and I are 17 years in a relationship. How do you make sucking same cock for 17 years interesting again? Bye!
I am a pansexual female in my early 20s, and I have been an emetophile since maybe when I was six. I remember seeing pregnant women on TV dramas throwing up and feeling a weird warm sensation in my crotch area, like I want to pee, but I don't need to pee. In my teenage years I started associating that with sex, and realized this is a fetish. Nowadays, when I want to watch porn, 95% of the time just look at videos of people, mostly girls, vomiting. Things like "the milk challenge" and "bulimia aversion videos" are pretty useful to getting me off. I don't like vomit porn that include scat play or deepthroating very much. It's pretty hard to find new porn for my kink. I've probably seen all the people-vomiting-on-each-other-and-rubbing-vomit-all-over porn searchable by Bing.
My boyfriend and I have been dating for a year, and he's great. I introduced him to Savage Love. He knew about pegging and fantasized about being pegged before he knew about you. I told him about my fetish, and he luckily isn't grossed out by vomit and is capable of pushing stomach contents up just by controlling his muscles when he's fairly full. There has been a few times where he's had a big meal before sex, and he vomited for me to watch. He gets turned on by how turned on I am. I usually get extremely wet and so turned on that I can't think about anything else, so I'm super happy I have such a GGG partner.
The rest of the letter—and it's not for the squeamish—plus responses from two guest experts... after the jump.
Before dating him, I've told people about my fetish and I'm comfortable about it, but no-one has done it for my pleasure. I've made myself throw-up too and it's exciting to an extent, but I didn't want to make it a habit, and I mostly like watching other people vomit. 
This Valentine's day, we went to a Chinese all-you-can-eat buffet with the intention of him overeating. It's spring-break here so his housemates are all gone, so we can have fun without worry. I made him drink luke-warm half-OJ-half-water which is pretty gross, until he's bloated enough to easily vomit into a large glass pan. I touched his cock and let him touch my cunt, and we fucked too. Anyway, after he's done vomiting, we fucked for good. When he was cleaning up, I was looking at the glass pan of slime, and I thought about the porn that I watch where people rub vomit all over their bodies. I also remembered a reddit comment where a girl masturbated with her boyfriend's vomit as lube, and I was intrigued. 
I didn't know how I felt about the idea of actually touching the vomit. My boyfriend was very encouraging, and I thought I should satisfy my curiosity with this rare opportunity. I hesitantly put my hand in the vomit, and immediately I was intrigued by the slimy texture, even though it was already kind of cold then. I felt my clit get engorged again, but I was still having mixed feelings about putting it near my vulva. What if I get an infection or something? 
My boyfriend encouraged me to do it. I finally moved my slimy hand to my clit. Pretty much as soon as I touched my clit, I was squirting like crazy. We moved into the bath tub and I fucked myself with a dildo while I let him put a little bit of the slime on my pubic area. I came so much! It's amazing how as soon as I indulged myself in my fetish I just lost all the inhibition and grossness. I almost couldn't tell if I was mentally turned on or not; I was too busy squirting. 
Questions:
1. Are there health risks to vomiting once in a while?
2. Are there health risks to smearing vomit on my body, including near/in my vagina? I'm not worried about  UTI's because I squirt so much.
3. Why are fetishes this powerful?
I am an older straight woman married to a man is younger than me, by about 12 years. We've been together eight years, married for one. He is handsome, friendly and charming. He tells me over and over that he loves me, I'm the only one for him, he thinks I'm sexy—all the things I do love to hear. He is good to me and because of his good job I don't have to work full time.
My problem has to do with trust. We agreed our relationship is monogamous and what that means is no interaction of a sexual nature with anyone else—including cams, or chats, or texting. Look at photos on Cragislist all you want, and indulge that porn addiction you acquired as a lonely single guy—I don't care, but keep it out of the real world. As a lover, he knows I am GGG and we have a lot of fun with sex, just the two of us. My husband expresses a very bad opinion of anyone who cheats, swears he never would and has told me one of the problems in his former marriage was that the ex accused him of cheating often and he insists was not doing that.
On my side of things is something I am ashamed to admit: I snoop. In fact I can get so anxious I am almost obsessed. I pay our phone bill so I can see all the numbers called or texted, and I know the passwords to all the e mail accounts he has I know about. I look at his cell when I can. Just typing this out reminds me how crazy I am being. 
The rest of the letter—and my response—after the jump...
I know it is wrong. But isn't it just as wrong to send a long text full of descriptions of desired sexual activities to another woman, one he has always said was nothing more than a friend? When I found that text I couldn't believe it, I wanted to throw up. So I confronted him and naturally the issue became my snooping. We resolved it—he would not contact her again, and I would not snoop anymore. That was a year and half ago. Since then I have asked a few times about whether he was in contact with her, or saw her when he is in her part of town. He always says no, and in fact has gotten mad because I haven't dropped it after so long.
I, asshole that I am, continued to snoop.
The other day I looked at what windows he had open on his phone and one was the contacts list, open to the page this woman's number is on. It dawned on me that he must have called her from work, where I wouldn't see the number on the bill. Yesterday, there was a long-distance call on our bill, a longer one to a number I didn't recognize, and when I looked it up, it is this woman's mother, who was friendly with my husband as well. I looked at his phone again this afternoon and the contacts page was open to her page again. He was at the place he can make phone calls from so I assume it was another day for him to have a nice chat with her.
Dan, I think this is cheating. But aren't I doing the same thing in a way? I feel so crazy about this, I know if I ask him about this he will be very angry. It might well be the deal breaker, which I am sure neither of us wants. I wish I could just let go of this and let him have his secret phone convos but I am afraid that they will lead to something more. And it creates resentment in my head, which is the enemy of intimacy.
So do you have some advice for me, beyond just "don't snoop"?. I already know that, I'm just having a hard time implementing that plan. Is he being a dick or should I just let him have his secret? And if he's a dick, then what?
Originally posted on May 23, 2012. 
I'm a 17-year-old girl and, in most aspects, I'm confident with myself, my identity, and my body. Earlier this year, I met a girl. She had some serious drama at home and needed to get out of her house, so I let her stay at mine. Things went a LOT further than I was ready for. I had just had my first kiss the month before and I didn't feel like our relationship was ready for sex, but I went along with it because she never gave me a chance to slow things down or say no.
My feelings for her are gone; she is attractive, but we don't connect. But she has feelings for me. How can I get her to understand, or at least respect, how I feel if she doesn't understand why this was a big deal for me?
Originally posted on December 19, 2012.
I am gay and I have a brother who's gay. The problem is, he is very much into humiliation. He exposes himself online and allows his online "masters" to have control over his pictures and videos. I found his pictures recently, and the embarrassment and humiliation were a huge turn-on for him. (In real life, we've never shown any interest sexually in each other whatsoever. But when he asked if I had any naked pictures, I told him I did and sent some to him, and somehow that was a bit of a turn-on, I must admit.) On to the real problem: Soon, my brother told me that he felt really guilty, cleaned up his hard drive, deleted all his pics and mine and asked me to do the same, and swore off playing online. But I found evidence that he's resumed this habit. This has been a pattern for him, he says, and he insists he was somehow damaged in childhood. I told him I see him as my kinky brother and that he might be happier if he could just accept himself. But I don't think he should quit his "addiction" cold turkey, as it hasn't worked in the past.
Originally posted on September 5, 2012.
I've been dating someone for a little more than two months. After the second week, he was saying things like "We need a word between 'like' and 'love' because 'I like you' doesn't seem sufficient." After weeks of telling him to slow his roll, I agreed to make it official and stop dating and sleeping with other guys because he wanted to "lock it down." It's been a week, and he's still on Scruff and Growlr. I'm a little put off because he was the one who pushed for exclusivity and the title of boyfriend. Should I be concerned? Can hookup apps be part of a healthy, monogamous relationship? Obviously a talk is needed.

I am a 26-year-old male, with ten years of sexual history. Since I was 16, I have always identified as a gay man. However, I don't think I'm gay. I've only had sexual relations with other men, but it started because a guy my age propositioned me. I was too socially awkward to talk to anyone, so hooking up with guys just seemed easier. When I went to college, I slutted around a lot, with little to no emotional connection; but in the past four years or so, I've barely been with anyone at all. Point being: I think I'm asexual. I'm really not in to sex at all, and I think I've mostly sexually engaged just because that's what adults do, right? 
So the question is, when everyone identifies me as a gay man, is it important for me to point out that I don't think I am that? I hardly understand it, so explaining it to others seems very odious. Furthermore, I don't want to devalue the plight of any LGBT individual by recanting my perceived identity. I thought being a gay man was hard, but somehow not being anything seems worse.
Not Often Horny, I'm home and listening to opera. While listening I was contemplating some issues my wife and I discussed recently. We are both bi and have been together 11 years. What came up was penis size and essentially tight clothing. When I wear tight jeans my cock is obviously showing, even when completely soft. Imagine The Stones' "Sticky fingers" album cover, just bigger. We both know this and enjoy the attention I get. What this discussion brought up was my reluctance to go to strip clubs because when I get aroused my cock seems to grab everyone's attention. This seems great but I don't want to freak out the dancers or other customers. I know visible turgidity isn’t an issue legally, but honestly, I'm at the strip club to enjoy the dancers and I don’t want to distract attention away from them. That's really it.
I'm wondering if this is the right place to ask a question for the show or if I MUST call? Either way, I'm just wondering: I identify as a queer female, having dated men and women almost in equal measure. Lately I'm finding that my fantasies are changing gears: I'm fantasizing about gay men, watching gay porn, feeling particularly sexual toward my gay male friends. I want to have intercourse with gay men. Is this insane and impossible? Might it be offensive to gay men that I'm actively trying to figure out how to satisfy my needs in this way? Is it unlikely that any gay men would be willing to get naked with a girl (and like it?)? I suppose one solution is to seek out a bisexual man, but is there anything else you'd recommend? What is the most ethical way to operate here?
Girl's Originally posted on May 09, 2012.I am a 26-year-old straight guy. My straightness and guyness are recent revelations, and it feels amazing to be able to confidently state this. Here is my trouble: I've had gender issues for the past five years. My now ex-girlfriend of three years said she couldn't be with me anymore due to these issues. Our breakup was a result of my apathy in the bedroom, which was tied to my gender issues, and her fears of me transitioning into a woman. I can see now that my insecurities about myself caused me to be a selfish partner in many ways, but mainly in the bedroom. I now realize I was allowing my sexual kinks to get the best of me. I get very turned on by the idea of giving head to a guy, but in reality it is not something that I enjoy. I also find lingerie to be very arousing. I allowed myself to focus so heavily on those aspects of my sexuality that I became insecure in my masculinity inside and outside of the bedroom. I also ended up ignoring the majority of my sexual desires as a result of my insecurity in my gender identity. I have now stopped repressing my lust toward women in general, something I had been doing that negatively affected my ex.
I am asking you, I suppose, for some advice. I am still in love with my ex. I am prepared now to be the boyfriend that she wanted me to be. But how do I prove to her that I am no longer the apathetic, distant, and repressed lover that she was with for three years? I find myself overwhelmed with regret. She saw me as someone who couldn't do the things she needed, when in reality I was just paralyzed by my insecurities.
This is a bit of a long, fucked-up story.
I've been having an affair with a older married woman with three kids for the past 10+ years. She claims her husband doesn't know about us, that she doesn't have sex with him anymore, and that she sleeps in a separate room. She requires me to be monogamous to her and, hence, doesn't allow me to date anyone else. You might wonder why on earth I put up with this, but we get along amazingly well. She's witty, funny, clever, intelligent, and drop-dead sexy. She's the best friend I've ever had. Every time we're together—if I'm not depressed—the conversation just flows. Plus the sex is pretty great, although she's not as kinky as I am and is a bit reluctant to do stuff I would like to do. Finally, and maybe most importantly, we've both made sacrifices to be together: I've turned down jobs that would require me to move overseas, and she's completely changed her career to be with me. So, in many senses, it's much more like a real relationship rather than an affair. It's just we can't easily go on holidays together, we rarely spend the night together, and we don't often get to spend the evenings together.
Why am I writing? Because I feel like my life is slipping by, and I'm not entirely happy. I don't like being alone in the evenings. To cope with the situation, I drink too much in the evenings. It's hard for me to have friends, as by nature I like to be friends with women, but the woman I'm seeing gets insanely jealous and assumes I'm trying to fuck them. I'm 38 and would like to be married. I don't have any kids, and I'm not sure I actually want kids, but I would like the option of having kids. (I'm an only child, and it would make my parents so happy if I did have kids; they occasionally drop the passive-aggressive comment about me being the "end of the line.") The married woman I'm seeing did get pregnant by me, twice, and decided to have abortions both times, rather than actually open up a conversation with me about whether we should start a full and proper life together and raise a family. She's past childbearing age now so there's no chance any longer of us having kids together.
The rest of the letter... and my response... after the jump.
Setting aside the issue of kids, I would also just like to be able to go on a holiday with someone without having to engage in the cloak-and-dagger planning rituals. I would like to host dinner parties with friends—you know, all the stuff that normal couples do. Why don't I leave? See earlier remark about her being the best friend I've ever had. I can't imagine a life without her. Besides, I've tried to leave her several times in the past for other people, but have never been able to do it. No one compares to her.
This is where things get interesting. About a month ago, a 27-year-old woman made a pass at me. I was at a low point, and so I decided to follow it up and see where it went. We started emailing, texting, then sexting, then had sex. This new person is like a sexual godsend for me. She's willing to do absolutely anything (bondage, watersports, anal play, and she says she would happily have threesomes and group sex), and she calls herself my "sex slave." She has also said she wants to have kids at some point in the future and, since she's really into me, she said she would like to have kids with me. From the very beginning, I was honest and open with her about the married woman I was seeing—which was hard for her to take, but I told her that I couldn't walk away from a 10+ year relationship for a relatively unknown stranger. So she's reluctantly agreed to put up with the situation for a little while until we get to know each other better. She the first person I've met in 10 years that I can actually imagine leaving the married woman for.
But this is the problem: I can't really talk to the 27-year old. There's a small language barrier (English isn't her native language) but, really, it's that she's not talkative, she doesn't ask questions, and she doesn't seem to want to talk about the news, or books, or films. She says she's not this way with other people, but that, for some reason, it's hard for her to talk to me. I suspect she could be good to talk to, as she's funny and chatty over text, but in person it's just weird, awkward silences a lot of the time. Furthermore, the age gap, while great from a kink perspective, is just enough that it makes cultural references hard to share.  
So, that's the problem. On one hand, I've got the perfect intellectual match who—if I could marry—I would love to spend the rest of my life with. But she won't leave her husband to be with me. (Trust me, I've asked her many times. She's made and broken so many promises to leave I can't count them anymore.) On the other hand, I've got the perfect sexual match who I probably could marry and have kids with and a normal life with, but whom I can't really talk to, and whom being with requires giving up my best friend.
Not sure what advice you might have (see a shrink?), but I'd love to hear it.  
A bit of back story: I'm in my 20s, a female lesbian, who recently was asked by a stranger I met on a dating site to use his consenting slave financially—and he invited me to use his slave's apartment as part of their slavery agreement. I've never done anything like this before, but I am planning on using him/his space for organizing a small non-profit that I run because it's awesome when kinks can help end social inequality, right? But how much investigation should I do into the nature of their relationship and whether the slave thing is fully consensual? Are there certain questions I should ask? It's a no-sex agreement also! Hope you reply, really wondering about this!
My fiancé claims that after almost six years of being together, he still does not know what he is doing in bed. Our sex life is super vanilla, but the quality of the orgasm is stellar. He knows to get me off he needs to finger my clit while tonguing my nipples. And he is great at it! Great to the point I am sure the neighbors know his name. And he just loves it when I am on top, where he can see my boobs bounce around. 
One problem with our sex life is that I have a high sex drive, as in I could go three times a day every day, while my fiancé could go weeks without sex—with me. He would be fine as long as he could masturbate. I sometimes masturbate, but I do not prefer to do so because the orgasms are better with my fiancé. Plus it takes a lot more to get me there when I am alone with myself, my toys, and my porn. My fiancé, on the other hand, will happily masturbate in front of his computer in the next room while I am in our bed waiting for him. 
I know he is partially being selfish about this because he's squeamish and likes the easier "clean up." (Masturbating into an old pair of boxers isn't as messy as actual sex.) But I also feel the real reason he prefers masturbation over sex with me is because he can engage in his breast enlargement fetish. He likes to see videos of women with their breasts expanding to the point where the woman is basically immobilized. I cannot fake that to fix our sex life, Dan, and he is not interested in watching his porn with me.
So what can I do to engage his fetish more in bed? Isn't there something?
So I'm just gonna get straight to the point: My boyfriend told me that he would like to be pegged. We talked about it a lot, and it's both something we have never done before. We haven't been together too long, so firstly, should we be experimenting with other stuff first? We have both never really had any play in the anal area, which scares me. I have no idea how to initiate this kind of play. Like obviously we have to go buy a strap-on and stuff, but how do we transition from pretty normalish sex to me ramming something into his butthole? (What size or type of strap-on?! Where do you even go and buy stuff like that?!) Like what's the middle ground here?! Is there even middle ground? Would that make it easier if we were both experimenting with each other's butts? Also. How does one get ready to have something in their butt? I just keep picturing being behind him, with him bent over and me freezing because I have no idea what to do!
My letter appeared in your column last week. I was the guy wondering what was up with the "straight" guy whose online personal ad said he had "an addiction to massive cocks in my ass." You said that the guy was most likely bi (and rounding down to straight), might be gay (and flying a false flag), but there was a very, very small chance he was actually straight (and turned on by the violation or doing "forced bi" for a dominant girlfriend).
I took your advice and sent the guy a message and he replied. I thought your readers would like to hear it directly from him: "Sorry for the delay. Dan was actually correct when he suggested that I was rounding down. At the core of it, I am bi. I am lucky to have a girlfriend that accepts and embraces me for me. I guess it could be considered a marketing ploy to brand myself as 'straight,' though I do identify as a straight male for the majority of my day."
So good call, Dan!
And guess what? The guy is a "Savage Love" reader! Before I messaged him his profile had been updated with this: "Straight with an addiction to massive cocks in my ass. Just read someone asked Dan Savage about the legitimacy of my ad, and yes, I'm real and serious." His ad is here.
I am 28, a woman, in law school, and have a history of PTSD which makes me wonder if I am inventing reasons to be upset...
I also have an incredibly high sex drive. I mean like it's ridiculous I have never met my match. I'm a two, three times a day kind of gal. Vanilla, kinky, whatever, I just love to fuck. I also try to be realistic about the odds of finding a partner who wants to fuck as much as I do. I have a set of vibrators and lots of batteries and have no problem taking care of my own needs, but I greatly prefer partnered sex. It's just so much more satisfying. 
I am dating a 38-year-old man who is kind, supportive, loving, and hilarious. He is also very distant emotionally and physically sometimes. It's weird, it's like a switch that turns on and off. He is fully present and loving and amazing most of the time and then for days or weeks he will tap out and just be gone, hard to reach out to, impossible to engage with.
We started dating in October, and very quickly started having issues with him being unable to maintain an erection during penetrative sex. I brought it up (gently, I hope) three (!!!) times, and he was somewhat responsive but not really willing to discuss the issue. By January I was feeling extremely alienated and rejected, and I broke up with him without specifically saying it was about the sex. I thought that would have been cruel.
On Valentines Day he texted me.
The rest of the letter—and my response—after the jump.
He asked me out for a drink and we ended up having incredible marathon sex that blew my mind and was everything I had been looking for while we had been dating. I'm talking like six hours of mutual oral, vaginal penetration (yes, please!), orgasms galore (both of us!), eye contact, dirty talk—the full nine. It was the best sex of my life, not only physically but also because it was with someone I care about so deeply.  We got back together after about a month of dating and awesome sex. Two, maybe three weeks back in, the impotence issues are recurring. He just doesn't seem to be able to hold on to his erection for long enough for either of us to come. 
I am starting to take it pretty personally (again) and am wondering what the fuck is going on. Am I a jerk? (I'm not a jerk.) Am I ugly? (I'm not ugly at all.) Am I doing something horrible that totally turns him off? (I'm doing all the same things he loves when he is able to be responsive.) I hesitate to bring it up with him yet again. I don't want to destroy his confidence or imply that there is something wrong with him. I don't want to medicalize his sexuality. But this is killing me. I fucking love this man he is incredible and such an impressive person. I want to be with him. Fuck I want to marry him. 
So my question is: What the fuck do I do? Tell him to see a shrink? Tell him I'm worried I will cheat on him? Break up with him? He is not a motherfucker so DTMFA is not applicable. Is it just that he's in his 40's and this kind of thing is to be expected? My #1 goal is to not hurt him with any kind of accusatory language. But Dan I need to fuck. And I'm worried that I will eventually take care of that need with an outside party. 
The only reason I am asking you what to do is that from my research on the subject it seems like we are a textbook case. But there is no textbook answer. Impotence and performance anxiety seem to be huge issues for a lot of men. I want to be supportive and I also want to fuck my boyfriend. Do you have any idea what might be going on?  Am I being an asshole? Am I overreacting? Am I taking it too personally? Am I being too demanding? We have sex about once a week currently. Maybe half of those (if lucky) we are successful. 
Should I just suck his dick more? Is this a lost cause? Is he being an asshole?
I'm a 53-year-old straight male in a long term "exclusive-ish" committed relationship. I say "exclusive-ish" because a few times a year we'll have a third join us for a 3way. So far, the third has always been male, but my better half is open to the idea of that third being female so long as she isn't the one doing the asking. As you can imagine, the possibilities of a willing woman falling into our lap is about as likely as winning the lottery. Consequently, the idea is just an unrealized fantasy of mine. However, this weekend I got a strong vibe that this younger woman was flirting with us. She was probably at the youngest 25 and at the oldest 32.
This isn't a fantasy I'm obsessed with, so I don't think I'm projecting or imagining things through a distorted lens, but I also don't want to make an ass out of myself and come off as the old creepy guy either. So I'll lay out what happened as briefly as possible and maybe you can tell me if I need to forget about it all or risk looking like a fool and try making some inroads should I encounter her again?
The rest of DADDY's long, long letter—and my short, short response—after the jump...
We were at the local casino we frequent a few times a month and this woman sits next to me at a slot machine and starts chatting me up like were old friends. My wife is to my left, she is to my right and standing behind her is her boyfriend or husband, I don't know which. I know I've never seen this woman before in my life and she is saying things like, "Oh, we see you guys here all the time," and "You guys are so nice", blah, blah, blah, just general conversation, but she's leaning in to me and making long eye contact.
She seems perfectly sober by the way.
She sat there next to me for about an hour or so, and I really didn't think anything about her as being anything other than just a really friendly person, until later. Her husband or boyfriend seemed like the shy, quiet type and he didn't say anything at all, nor did he seem to be bothered by her overt friendliness to me either. He just stood behind her the whole time.
She got up and they left and after another hour or so we decided to head home. Had I not seen her again I probably would have forgotten her altogether. We were standing in line to cash in our ticket and she comes up and grabs my arm or taps my shoulder, and is standing close asking if we won and telling me about her bad luck, but she's smiling and making serious eye contact. The boyfriend or husband was standing several feet away and again with no input. Then, as she was walking away she stops and turns around and waves again.
I don't know, as I type this all sounds completely innocent, but I don't usually mess up signals from people either. Just to add a few more details: We are a fairly attractive couple for 53 and 48 years old, both in good shape, fit and all. The younger woman had a very pretty face, but she was not in shape and her boyfriend or husband was average looking. I'd guess they were both 28ish.
So Dan, am I seeing this event through the rose colored glasses of a 53-year-old man who is thinking with his cock and not his brain? Do I need to just forget the whole thing, or should I take a chance and try to inject the fact that we might be game for some fun with her, or them for that matter, if we run into them again?  She did say, "We see you guys all the time," so I guess we'll see them again at our casino.

My girlfriend and I got married this past December (after 24 years together) in a panic after Trump won.  We're in Colorado and most of our family are back on the East coast.  In the interest of saving money and getting it done quickly, we eloped with the plan to have a big proper reception/party with everyone the next time we both traveled back home.
That WAS the plan, until apparently my wife's brother decided to move his wedding up to the summer.  I'm sure they didn't do it maliciously (everyone was very happy we finally tied the knot), just rather thoughtlessly.  But here we are and there's a bit of a conflict.  We can't afford to go back east more than once a year, so we want to go home to attend their wedding, but now we're going to have to share the spotlight with them. I can't help being more than a little resentful of this.  It's supposed to be our big day, right?  I don't want to ruin their big day, but I feel like our thunder is being stolen.  My friend suggested throwing two parties, but that seems excessive and ridiculous.  
My boyfriend of almost three years broke up with me before Thanksgiving. But now we are trying to work things out. He is my first and only, I love him dearly, and I want to spend the rest of my life with him. He is a Gemini, he has been with countless women before me, and he recently opened up to me about his need for two women. He says that he loves me and wants to be with me, but he gets bored easily and needs the extra excitement of a third joining us in the bedroom if he is to be monogamous. He also had younger twin sisters which he says explains the reason he needs to women at once. We're looking at spending the rest of our lives together, but its extremely important for him that I be OK with occasionally bringing another woman into the bedroom.
Before I met him, I was planning to wait until marriage and had extreme anxiety around sex. He has slowly pulled me out of my shell in the bedroom and now I have a sex drive almost as great as his and enjoy experimenting and variety just as much as he does. However, I am a Leo and get extremely jealous. I'm even jealous when it comes to his friends who are girls. The thought of him looking at another woman, much less the idea of watching him screw one in front of me, makes me physically sick. I'm not sure if I can go through with it and I can't predict I'll be able to handle what would happen if we did go through with it. I want to cater to his desires and make him the happiest man in the world, but I have no idea where to even begin getting over my fears. It's also really hard to talk to anyone even my closest friends about because they all just tell me to leave him and that I deserve better. He doesn't judge me for my kinks and I don't want to judge him for his. I just want to be able to please him without hurting myself. HELP.
I hope I can get your opinion on my current situation.
I'll try to be as concise as possible. I'm a 26-year-old woman. Three years ago, I had a three-way with my 35-year-old fiancé and this nice girl he knew from high school. Let's call him "Bob" and her "Sally." The condom broke and Sally wound up pregnant despite using Plan B. Sally gave birth to a girl. For the first two years of the baby's life, Sally would NOT allow Bob to see the baby or be involved in any way. (She's Christian and she was embarrassed about conceiving during a three-way.)
Lately, Sally and Bob have been talking and now Sally is allowing Bob to see his daughter. I know there's no one to blame for this—the condom was used correctly but failed—but I'm still having kind of a hard time with it. Bob and I were planning on doing this (having a baby) for the first time with each other one day. Now i'm suddenly a stepmom. Bob has been seeing his daughter pretty frequently since Sally has been in contact with us. He's always so excited, so I feel I can't say anything about how bummed it makes me.
Any advice or thoughts you may have would be great. Is it wrong that my heart is breaking? I feel so selfish that I'm still somewhat skeptical of Sally's motives. I'm open to being disproven, but this is still pretty out of the blue.
Can you PLEASE describe life with Terry? Because I want to hear from the gay horse's mouth directly that ingesting your "husband's" feces on a regular "monogamish" basis is really what you meant by "it gets better."
The good news is that your pretend gay "marriage" has no legitimate legacy. Once you and Terry are gone who is going to care about remembering that two very damaged men played pretend house for a few decades and brought a child into the mix to make the adults feel more secure about their pretend family unit? Not the kid Terry raised who will one day be so busy in his own pretend gay "marriage" that he couldn't possibly be bothered to show up and throw dirt on a box in a hole. That might interrupt his Margaret Cho-inspired fisting class. The day after one of you dies the other will be in the arms of another man and will seek to play pretend house again until they pass. It's sad you actually think that what you turned your life into is anything other than a pathetic and sad mess. You couldn't be happy with just destroying your life and that of your so-called wi-band/hus-fe. You had to being a child into the mix in order to convince yourself that your made-up family is some how not a made up group of sad men playing pretend.
It gets better when you don't believe the lie that being gay is some how important in any meaningful way!
So my hubby and I have been together 20 years. The messages have been mixed. He's attracted to women much older than myself and much closer in age to him—we have a 20 year age difference—and he's also attracted to men. He had a terrible time trying to come to grips with his own sexuality and his inability to reconcile who he was with who he "was supposed to be" got mixed up into shame, guilt, infidelity, and addiction. Fine. Wherever. His sexuality did nothing but turn me on and help me overcome some of my own hangups. I have been through my own ringer. I cheated on him. I lied about the fact that he was my first. After my own affair I became a prostitute—with his befuddled blessing—but all of that is over. Now he wants me to be a hotwife. I want to be his sub. He has issues with being a Dom and I have issues fucking strangers. Can you refer us in a direction we can start from? I am excited for us to move on without hangups and shame and he can't get past the negative.
Bored, Dull, Sad, Originally posted on November 20, 2013. 
Last month at a house party, my boyfriend accidentally burned my chin, neck, and cleavage during a clumsily executed volcano shot. I was literally on fire for a few seconds. Some doctor appointments, burn creams, bandages, and awkward scabbing later, I'm healing nicely. My problem is, our sex life has become much more complicated. Before the accident, we were having sex only every week or so. But now he stares sadly at my neck wound (which still has a red line going down it) every time he looks at me. It's very hard to feel sexy when you're constantly looked at with pity, regret, and concern, and the stress of being sexually frustrated is fueling other stresses. I just want a way out of this sad circle we've found ourselves in.
Originally posted on November 27, 2013.
How stupid would it be to sleep with my boss's gorgeous 18-year-old son? My boss has become a mentor to me. He and his wife have welcomed me into their home, which includes their aforementioned son, a high-school senior. I am a 23-year-old woman. Normally, I wouldn't sleep with anyone younger than 20. But besides being very attractive, my boss's son is funny, kind, and sweet. He's also incredibly horny and has some serious unexplored kinks that most girls his age have no interest in. I want to spend the next few months fucking my boss's son—bearing in mind and honoring, of course, your campsite rule. Here are the two problems as I see them: (1) Fucking around with your boss's kid seems like a surefire way to seriously wreck your relationship with your boss. (2) He is still in high school.
Originally posted on December 11, 2013. 
I'm a straight woman who loves my boyfriend, but sex isn't a priority for me. His sex drive, on the other hand, is ridiculous. He gets very upset when I don't have sex with him and accuses me of not being interested in him anymore, which isn't the case. I just can't fuck on demand! Most people would probably say that my boyfriend is an insensitive asshole for pressuring me for sex. Except this was a switcheroo exercise: I, the girlfriend, want more sex. He, my boyfriend, doesn't see sex as a priority. When we first started dating, we had sex every day—it was incredible—but around the four-month mark, something changed. I've had to beg for it ever since—and I mean beg. I give him space, I take care of things on my own for as long as I can, and right around the time when I feel myself start to get really anxious, I ask for sex. And I am rejected. Only when I'm so hurt that I'm literally sobbing on the floor is he suddenly interested in having sex with me. Right then, right there. It happens about twice a month. I don't know what to do. I love him so much and would be a fool to leave him. Other than the sex, everything is wonderful. He is the best and most thoughtful boyfriend ever, but he says he likes being the one who's controlling the sex. Maybe I am just being a colossal asshole? My problem sounds mundane, I know, but it's killing me.
Originally posted on June 6, 2012.
Could you tell my boy to calm the heck down? Can't seem to get him to get the difference between bestiality, necrophilia, and screwin' a bearskin rug. Emphasizing my usual sexual interests—which involve rope bondage, floggin', and an e-stim unit—hasn't worked.
I'm a gay man and a hunter; he's a gay boy and a vegan. But he likes how I look in my camo, holding a rifle, so it works. Last fall, I went to Idaho and shot a bear. A taxidermist made the bear into a rug. Most people don't know this, but the head on a bearskin rug is entirely fake except for the fur. The skull, teeth, and tongue are plastic, and the eyes are glass. Bear's hardly a bear.
So he liked the rug. Even wanted me to screw him on it—until he walked in while I was doing it with the bear. I rigged up the mouth with one of those Fleshlight things, pretty much as a joke, but my boy freaked when he saw the bear giving me a blowjob. Called me sick and disgusting, and now he won't let me tie him up or anything. He says he's afraid I will kill him and screw him. What can I do?
Originally posted on July 25, 2012.
I am a 25-year-old straight woman. I recently started seeing a man. The first time I slept with him, he told me that he was interested in a relationship, and I told him that I wanted to keep things purely casual. Over the next month and a half of talking to him, hanging out, and having sex, I started to really like him. I was thinking about changing my mind and taking the relationship to the next level.
The last time I saw him was a week ago. He came over, we had sex, and then he mentioned he had met someone else. As he was beginning to elaborate, I told him to leave.
My anger comes from his timing. If he had told me this before we had sex, Dan, I would have been able to have a constructive conversation about this. The problem now, if I'm being completely honest with myself, is that I really like him and I don't want to stop seeing him.
A couple of questions: Do I reach out to him again? Did I overreact?
Originally posted on January 30, 2013.
I recently caught my boyfriend watching porn. We have talked about it before, and he said he didn't watch it while he was in a relationship. But when I caught him there with his dick in his hand, I lost it. I have never felt so hurt or betrayed. This is my first serious relationship. I can't get over how sick and sad I feel. It feels like he was cheating on me. Should I be as upset as I am? It was interactive porn—it was like he was cybersexing with one of his ex-girlfriends. What should I do?
Originally posted on February 1, 2012.
My husband is a very kinky submissive man. When we were dating, I found out that he had been talking to multiple people online and that he had met up with a professional dom a couple of times. I felt betrayed that he had done this all behind my back, even though I had told him that I would be down with him seeing a dom. (I even offered to buy him a session for his birthday!)
We got through it, and now our sex life is amazing. I tie him up, I lock his dick up, I dress him up. All I ask in return is that he be honest with me about who he's talking with online. Is that unreasonable? I know he chats with "women" online as a "woman," and I'm okay with that so long as I'm made aware of it. But today I found pictures on his phone of his cock in the chastity device I keep him in. He tried to lie but he came clean: He was chatting with a woman, it came out that he was a man, and she wanted to see pictures of his cock in his chastity belt.
Why lie? Honest to God, if he would have just told me the day he sent the pictures that he sent someone pictures of his cock, I would be okay with it! I also found another e-mail account he never told me about that he's using when he chats online as a woman. Again, no big deal! But I was under the impression that he used just this one chat program for chatting! Why hide it? My vanilla friends will be no help in this matter, and I feel pretty heartbroken. So I'm asking you.
He Isn't Originally posted on July 11, 2012. 
I'm a straight 32-year-old woman who has been in a monogamous relationship with a guy for two years. Recently, we took the plunge and moved in. Before moving in, we had experimented with some kinky stuff. (I have never come so hard or fast as the first time I fucked him in the ass with a strap-on.) Then he told me, after moving in, that he had given some thought to poly relationships before committing to me. Now I am feeling insecure about the viability of this relationship. Although he claims no desire to be in a poly situation now, I can't help but feel that I alone will ultimately not be able to fulfill him entirely. He is a soul mate who I can see growing with over time. But I worry this relationship is doomed.
I'm 40, happily married for 10 years, with the wife for 20 years. We have a good marriage, we're great friends, we have two kids, a good life. But my wife refuses to give me head. Flat-out says no. Won't do it. We have talked about it, and she says she doesn't want to and nothing I can say will ever convince her. I have tried denying her oral sex, I have tried not asking, I have tried begging. Nothing works.
I don't know what to do. Everything else is fine. I don't want an affair. It scares the hell out of me. I worry about sexual infections and I'm not sure I can just go see a sex worker. I need it to be done by a person I can get to know. But who would want to blow me regularly with no attachments or commitments?
Do you think my wife has given up the right to be mad at me for even considering this? By denying me oral, is she forcing my hand, or am I being selfish? Should I just suck it up? For lack of a better term?
I'm a gay male who's been partnered for four years, and for the last four nights my S.O. and I have been sleeping in separate beds. Money's been tight, there have been fights over that, including one last night, and our sex life has been practically nonexistent for a few months.
A couple mornings ago, as I went into the spare bedroom before leaving for work, I noticed a small bottle of poppers on the nightstand's lower shelf. Before I said good-bye to the S.O., I asked why he'd slept in there, to which he replied, "Because I felt like it." All I could think to say was, "Um... okay," and left.
Well, I had today off because of snow, and after last night's fight, I was curious. I didn't see the poppers on the nightstand, but I saw a bulky gym bag near the edge of the bed frame near the nightstand. It was filled with rather large and thick dildos, including one fisting dildo. Part of me wished Helena Bonham Carter's Marla Singer would have appeared and rolled her eyes, "Oh, don't worry. [They're] not a threat to you." But I can't use any of these myself. (I'm not much of a bottom, and the few dildos I've tried are "starters.") The ones I saw are pro-league, and I'm surprised the S.O. can enjoy them. Also: I've long known the S.O. likes nipple clamps, and I'd known about a thin sounding rod, but in my snooping I also found an extensive sounding kit. 
Again, we've been together for four years, living together for almost half of that. We've never incorporated toys into our sex besides the few times I've tried getting over my issues with bottoming. Suffice it to say, since Marla isn't sitting on my shoulder to reassure me, I am feeling threatened. Given the recent blowups, the mistrust over money, and the lack of intimacy, I'm not sure how to broach the subject. If he bought these, it's a sizable investment. If he was given them... I can't get past the shudder and even begin thinking about who might've given them to him.
He's about to go on a weekend trip tomorrow morning, and I don't know if I should say anything tonight, or wait until he returns. 
If Ben Carson thinks being gay is a choice, he should prove it by choosing to be gay himself. Christopher Halloran/I love and adore my wife, and would never stray, but I am going out of my friggin' mind because I am a kinkster (of the consensual-nonconsent and rape-play vintage with a side of ball-gag drool), yet have a very vanilla sex life. My wife knows all about my sexual predilections, does not judge them, and has tried to satisfy them, but her heart is not in it, and as a result, such attempts are epic in their non-sexiness. It's not that I don't find my wife hot. Quite the contrary, being naked with her is an instant megaboner, and I have little trouble climaxing during intercourse. But I have buttons that need to be pushed for my sex life to be truly fulfilling and satisfying in a physical and emotional sense, and that is not happening. I have resorted to masturbating with Tumblr porn on the side, which fills a physical need fleetingly, but not the emotional one, and ultimately solves nothing and is therefore depressing. In other words: If fapping fixed my problem, Dan, I would not be writing you. Now I am hitting my mid-50s without ever having fucked the way I really want (my wife is my first and last sex partner), and I'm panicking. Again, looking for the answer outside of my marriage is not an option, and I know my wife wouldn't be up for bring anyone else into our bed. Any advice?
Originally posted on December 28, 2011.
I'm a straight male in a committed live-in relationship. My girlfriend and I have sex once a week, usually on Saturday mornings. During the week, she is either too tired or too full after dinner. She often says she wants to have sex, but come 9:30 p.m., she's ready to get in bed and watch TV until she falls asleep. She asks me on a daily basis if I've masturbated in her absence. If I say no, she accuses me of lying. She has demanded to smell my hands to see if she can smell lube on them. I resent feeling interrogated and guilt-tripped over this. When I do masturbate, I always clean up after myself and I'm doing it before she gets home or after she's gone to bed. So, again, why the guilt?
Browbeating Okay, From listening to your podcast, I know you appreciate feedback from the people you have given advice to, so here you have an update from the poor guy who (according to many comments to my letter) was being fooled by a pimp and a prostitute.
To recap: I met an escort, we experienced what seemed to be a mutual attraction on the first fuck, and she then invited me to go see Fifty Shades of Grey with her. A date. I took your advice and took her to the movie... after spending the night before at her place. I wound up spending the night with her again. We got irritated looks from some of the old women at the screening—they did not approve of her acting submissive toward me (just some hair pulling and making out)—but, hey, the reason she asked me to go see the movie at all was because during our first encounter I told her I was a dominant sadist. And after the movie, she was in the mood for trying out BDSM for herself—and now I've been introduced to her sister and her friends as the man she is dating, and as her "Mr. Grey" to some of her closer friends. And we've been seeing a lot more of each other since that movie date. I have no idea where the relationship between us is going, but we enjoy each other. We are two fucked-up people finding pleasure and company together—we just happened to meet in an unusual way. Thanks for advising me to go on the date, Dan.
And in response to some of the comments: No, she didn't want me to smuggle drugs up my ass. No, she didn't have a pimp who wanted to blackmail me. No, my letter was not viral marketing for the movie. Yes, I know it sounds like something made up—but sometimes reality surprises you. The moral of my story: Found someone you like and that person likes you back? Don't fucking worry about how you met and just see where it leads.
Gay male, Magnum listener, 36-years-old, and from Slovenia here. My boyfriend and I are 17 years in a relationship. How do you make sucking same cock for 17 years interesting again? Bye!
I am a pansexual female in my early 20s, and I have been an emetophile since maybe when I was six. I remember seeing pregnant women on TV dramas throwing up and feeling a weird warm sensation in my crotch area, like I want to pee, but I don't need to pee. In my teenage years I started associating that with sex, and realized this is a fetish. Nowadays, when I want to watch porn, 95% of the time just look at videos of people, mostly girls, vomiting. Things like "the milk challenge" and "bulimia aversion videos" are pretty useful to getting me off. I don't like vomit porn that include scat play or deepthroating very much. It's pretty hard to find new porn for my kink. I've probably seen all the people-vomiting-on-each-other-and-rubbing-vomit-all-over porn searchable by Bing.
My boyfriend and I have been dating for a year, and he's great. I introduced him to Savage Love. He knew about pegging and fantasized about being pegged before he knew about you. I told him about my fetish, and he luckily isn't grossed out by vomit and is capable of pushing stomach contents up just by controlling his muscles when he's fairly full. There has been a few times where he's had a big meal before sex, and he vomited for me to watch. He gets turned on by how turned on I am. I usually get extremely wet and so turned on that I can't think about anything else, so I'm super happy I have such a GGG partner.
The rest of the letter—and it's not for the squeamish—plus responses from two guest experts... after the jump.
Before dating him, I've told people about my fetish and I'm comfortable about it, but no-one has done it for my pleasure. I've made myself throw-up too and it's exciting to an extent, but I didn't want to make it a habit, and I mostly like watching other people vomit. 
This Valentine's day, we went to a Chinese all-you-can-eat buffet with the intention of him overeating. It's spring-break here so his housemates are all gone, so we can have fun without worry. I made him drink luke-warm half-OJ-half-water which is pretty gross, until he's bloated enough to easily vomit into a large glass pan. I touched his cock and let him touch my cunt, and we fucked too. Anyway, after he's done vomiting, we fucked for good. When he was cleaning up, I was looking at the glass pan of slime, and I thought about the porn that I watch where people rub vomit all over their bodies. I also remembered a reddit comment where a girl masturbated with her boyfriend's vomit as lube, and I was intrigued. 
I didn't know how I felt about the idea of actually touching the vomit. My boyfriend was very encouraging, and I thought I should satisfy my curiosity with this rare opportunity. I hesitantly put my hand in the vomit, and immediately I was intrigued by the slimy texture, even though it was already kind of cold then. I felt my clit get engorged again, but I was still having mixed feelings about putting it near my vulva. What if I get an infection or something? 
My boyfriend encouraged me to do it. I finally moved my slimy hand to my clit. Pretty much as soon as I touched my clit, I was squirting like crazy. We moved into the bath tub and I fucked myself with a dildo while I let him put a little bit of the slime on my pubic area. I came so much! It's amazing how as soon as I indulged myself in my fetish I just lost all the inhibition and grossness. I almost couldn't tell if I was mentally turned on or not; I was too busy squirting. 
Questions:
1. Are there health risks to vomiting once in a while?
2. Are there health risks to smearing vomit on my body, including near/in my vagina? I'm not worried about  UTI's because I squirt so much.
3. Why are fetishes this powerful?

About a month or so ago, my girlfriend went on a road-trip with some friends to St. Louis. After the trip, I learned that she had played a stripping game with them called padiddle— premise being that when you see a car with a headlight out, you hit the top of the car, say "padiddle," and everyone else has to take off an article of clothing. Two of the friends were girls, but one was a straight guy. This affair made me pretty anxious and angry. I did confront her about it, arguing that had I done the same, she would have felt bad as well. She apologized, and we made up. I do still worry that I overreacted about the whole thing.
The issue is, ever since the event, I've gotten increasingly paranoid about my girlfriend whenever she goes to a party or some other potentially sexually charged event with friends—I'm worried that she'll play some similar game or worse. I never bring this up; nothing good comes out of possessive behavior. But it has lessened my trust in the relationship, and until that point, I thought our relationship was rock solid. I don't know how I should feel on the matter. I feel like I should let it go. However, I don't know what steps I can take to come to terms with my feelings on the matter. Should I talk it out more or would that be rehashing something that isn't really a big deal? Also, did I overreact in the first place, and therefore, was my confrontation possessive?
I am an older straight woman married to a man is younger than me, by about 12 years. We've been together eight years, married for one. He is handsome, friendly and charming. He tells me over and over that he loves me, I'm the only one for him, he thinks I'm sexy—all the things I do love to hear. He is good to me and because of his good job I don't have to work full time.
My problem has to do with trust. We agreed our relationship is monogamous and what that means is no interaction of a sexual nature with anyone else—including cams, or chats, or texting. Look at photos on Cragislist all you want, and indulge that porn addiction you acquired as a lonely single guy—I don't care, but keep it out of the real world. As a lover, he knows I am GGG and we have a lot of fun with sex, just the two of us. My husband expresses a very bad opinion of anyone who cheats, swears he never would and has told me one of the problems in his former marriage was that the ex accused him of cheating often and he insists was not doing that.
On my side of things is something I am ashamed to admit: I snoop. In fact I can get so anxious I am almost obsessed. I pay our phone bill so I can see all the numbers called or texted, and I know the passwords to all the e mail accounts he has I know about. I look at his cell when I can. Just typing this out reminds me how crazy I am being. 
The rest of the letter—and my response—after the jump...
I know it is wrong. But isn't it just as wrong to send a long text full of descriptions of desired sexual activities to another woman, one he has always said was nothing more than a friend? When I found that text I couldn't believe it, I wanted to throw up. So I confronted him and naturally the issue became my snooping. We resolved it—he would not contact her again, and I would not snoop anymore. That was a year and half ago. Since then I have asked a few times about whether he was in contact with her, or saw her when he is in her part of town. He always says no, and in fact has gotten mad because I haven't dropped it after so long.
I, asshole that I am, continued to snoop.
The other day I looked at what windows he had open on his phone and one was the contacts list, open to the page this woman's number is on. It dawned on me that he must have called her from work, where I wouldn't see the number on the bill. Yesterday, there was a long-distance call on our bill, a longer one to a number I didn't recognize, and when I looked it up, it is this woman's mother, who was friendly with my husband as well. I looked at his phone again this afternoon and the contacts page was open to her page again. He was at the place he can make phone calls from so I assume it was another day for him to have a nice chat with her.
Dan, I think this is cheating. But aren't I doing the same thing in a way? I feel so crazy about this, I know if I ask him about this he will be very angry. It might well be the deal breaker, which I am sure neither of us wants. I wish I could just let go of this and let him have his secret phone convos but I am afraid that they will lead to something more. And it creates resentment in my head, which is the enemy of intimacy.
So do you have some advice for me, beyond just "don't snoop"?. I already know that, I'm just having a hard time implementing that plan. Is he being a dick or should I just let him have his secret? And if he's a dick, then what?
Originally posted on November 7, 2012. 
This probably falls into the category of a so-what's-the-problem problem: I'm a bearish 44-year-old who can't get a hot Latin 18-year-old guy to stop sucking my dick. Craigslist was involved initially. But now he comes by for weekly sessions of mutual head and leaves immediately afterward. His round trip on the subway lasts longer than his stays at my place. He's a sweet kid but deeply closeted; given what little I know of his Dominican family and group of friends, he's years away from coming out. I'm under no illusion that I'm what he's looking for, but I am an available sexual outlet. The trouble for me is he won't kiss and won't do anything social with me, and the novelty of getting naked with an 18-year-old has worn off. I could stop seeing him, I guess, but saying, "You give great head, but you bore me" is rude. I'm mindful of your rule about treating younger partners like campsites: Leave them in better shape than you found them. I'm doing that, by treating him respectfully and showing him that it's possible to be openly gay and have support from family and friends, but I don't know where to go next.
I'm in a relationship with a wonderful guy whom I love very, very much—but I dread being intimate with him, because it always ends with me screaming silently to myself as he rams himself into me as hard and fast as possible. I'm left fighting back tears, feeling alone and used. It's not that he wouldn't stop if I asked him to—but I bite my lip and try to tolerate it for as long as I can because it's the only way he can orgasm. He masturbates extremely vigorously, and when we have sex I end up feeling like a masturbatory tool rather than a partner making love. I feel so guilty whenever I turn down sex and he resorts to jacking off (which is pretty frequently now), but I can't handle the physical and emotional trauma of the alternative. I've discussed these feelings with my partner many times, but things haven't gotten any better. If there is anything I can do to salvage the intimacy in our relationship, please tell me.
My friend is a trans woman, 26, living in small town Georgia. She's been out for three years, got fired for it. She lives with her deeply religiou' family who are going out of their ways to be as mean to her as they possibly can. Lots of brothers and sisters; I'm getting a "quiverfull family in a huge compound" vibe, without knowing for sure.
A couple examples: They refuse to use her chosen pronouns, and insist on using her dead name at all times, insisting that she is a man in drag, not a woman. This Christmas, at the table, her grandmother gave all the females, except her, makeup boxes. The conversation was all about what a rambunctious boy "he" was, mingled with throwing the worst parts of the Bible at her. She tried to flee the group, and her cousin chased her down to drive the nail in further. They make family gatherings where everyone has to listen to hourlong sermons of the most hateful preachers they can find online, two on Tuesdays.
Her own father has told her time and time again that their faith "can't be compromised for [her] worldly desires." And yet, she's so deeply invested in making them accept her—and getting them to call her by her chosen name and use her correct pronouns—that she will not leave them. She has offers of people wanting to take her in, offers of people willing to give her gas money, Greyhound fare, whatever, hell, even drive the bleeping way from neighbouring states, yet still she will not accept help.
She's talking suicide and how she can never leave, can never get a job, can never have friends, can't get the help, hormones therapy and surgery or, hell, just the respect, care and affection she deserves and desperately needs. She knows about trans hotlines, talks to them regularly, she knows about organisations in Atlanta. She has trans online friends—the only friends it seems she really has are online. Yet all we seem to accomplish is make her anguish worse, not better, and solidify her decision to make it her life mission to try to convince people, who have proven every day for years that they are unworthy of her company, that she is worthy of theirs.
How can anyone get through to her? How can we best help her? She's 4500 miles from me; I cannot get to her directly.
Originally posted on December 3, 2014.
This girl just hit a bump with her boyfriend. I offered to do something he secretly wanted to try, and he said, "Urinate on me." I get the fantasy—surrender, being marked, the naughtiness. However, I can't imagine liking it and I do not want to build it into our repertoire. Set aside that I have no idea how to do it so it's sexy, safe, and sanitary. Is it okay to negotiate "one-and-done" and put it on my "No" list afterward?

Another Thursday, another Advice Round-up. This week: herpes, vore enthusiasts, ear-fuckers, and a plea for people to stop fucking Trump supporters.
In response to Cunt Or Lip Dilemma:
I’m writing in regard to the Jan 18, 2017 Letter of the Day to correct some of the information in your response and to add some advice. Although it is infrequent, it is absolutely possible to auto-inoculate with HSV-1 or -2 from one part of the body to another. As you said, hand washing is the best thing you can DO to reduce the possibility of transmission. During a herpes outbreak, however, there are things one should NOT DO. Do not combine contact with the sore with any activity that compromises the skin. This includes shaving, tweezing, picking, waxing, etc. If you have an active herpes lesion on your labia, don’t do an aggressive bikini-area shave and then move on to your legs; if you have a lesion on your lip and a zit near it, don’t pop the zit; if you have a lesion on your lip and an unwanted mustache hair near it, don’t pluck the hair; don’t pick at the lesion with tweezers and leave the tweezers around for your partner; don’t pick at the lesion with tweezers and then pick at your toenails (there is actually a fancy pants name to describe herpes of the fingers or toes - herpetic whitlow). Additionally, if you have a history of herpes and see “a bump” on your body, don’t pick at it. Maybe it’s an ingrown hair (à la Michael Scott on The Office) or maybe it’s a budding herpes lesion. Bottom line, wash your hands and don’t compromise your skin.
In response to Confused Liberal In Toronto:
Now is not the time to run, now is the time to fight! How do we fight back against our incoming government's outright hostility to at least half the population? Hit 'em where it hurts! No more fucking Republicans! Dan, please send out the call to your readers: Don't Fuck Trump Supporters. Let us all solemnly vow that in the next four years we will sound someone out on their political position before plumbing the depths of their various orifices or allowing them access to ours. Cut them off entirely. Make them as miserable as we are.
In response to Fully Understanding Lover's Longings:
My husband and I (straight, monogamous, legit happy—not bragging, it just seems by your column we’re rare) value your input for both political insight and to keep our sex life interesting. Neither of us had ever heard the term “vore” before but the idea intrigued me (I like being nibbled) so we added that to our repertoire and it was fun. Tonight, however, we saw the movie Split and it totally ruined vore for me. I don’t want to spoil the movie, but you may want to warn your readers who like this kink that this movie might turn them off of it… or maybe it will turn them on even more… who am I to judge?  Seriously though, big turn off for me as not all partners were willing participants (it is a horror movie after all) and it predictably comes to a pretty gruesome end. Actually I think it would be fair to say this movie would be triggering for any assault survivors for multiple reasons. I couldn’t think of a way to warn people without broadcasting what happens in my bedroom, but I also didn’t feel right doing nothing.  So now I'm passing the baton to you, Dude.  Do with it as you wish.
Response to Risky Business:
You asked, so I'll share my experience. My ex jammed his cock in my ear once, hard, (obviously didn't penetrate) and we both just laughed about it. I think he did it, though, so that for the rest of our relationship, whenever I asked him to repeat himself, he'd say, "What? Too much cock in your ear?" 
In regards to homelessness, my (other) ex and his friend both 100% chose to be homeless (they thought it was cool) and at first I saw the appeal, but over time it proved to be a really miserable life, much (much x 1000) more difficult to get out of than in to. Your advice to just try some less major findom was the best compromise. It really is rude to the people legitimately struggling with homelessness to compete with them for the services they honestly need. (I, too, love the word faggot, and feel like using it in a non-hateful way helps take the power back from that slur.)
Also in regards to Risky Business:
Longtime reader, first time writer. You've written it all. I've (almost) read it all. Your mid-January 2017 column: Ear sex. Homeless fetish. Suicide fetish. You've been punked, Dan, or you're doing a Stephen Glass or you've jumped the shark. Dan. Honey.
I was as surprised by those letters as you were, LTRFTW. And as I like to say: Every question that makes it into the column is just a good hypothetical Q for every reader save one. I may get punked every once in a great while (a fake Q may make it into the column), but I don't do Stephen Glass (no making up letters) and I haven't been in the vicinity of a shark. Yet. (At least I don't think so—does the person or thing that jumps the shark know they've jumped it?) And while it appears there aren't hardcore PIE (Penis-In-Ear) connoisseurs out there to explain this (probably) imaginary kink—fortunately or unfortunately—lots of readers directed us to a pretty decent pop-culture reference:
Regarding this week's column and whether ear sex is really a thing, maybe you should ask Iggy Pop! As he clearly states in Lust for Life:
I'm just a modern guyOf course I've had it in the ear beforeI've got a lust for life...

Listening to pundits discuss the president on the radio, I was inspired by your brilliant acronym (DTMFA) to yell, "Impeach the motherfucker already!" I'd love to see a line of bumper stickers and T-shirts bearing that sensible message: ITMFA! We need a shorthand for the obvious—think of the boost to productivity we'd get if we could cut half-hour conversations about the president to five simple letters: ITMFA! I appeal to you to bring this acronym into our everyday vocabulary.

I'm a straight cis dude in my early 30s hoping to find someone with whom to settle down. I've spent the past few years in short- to medium-term relationships looking for "the one" (or "the 0.64"). Some might say I've been pretty picky trying to find someone who checks all of my boxes.
There's a woman with whom I've been friends for a couple years and with whom I get along with extremely well. She's smart, funny, ambitious and beautiful. We click better than anyone I've dated, and we have very similar values. I think there's a good chance there's mutual attraction as well. Nothing more-than-flirtatious has ever happened though, as we've never been single at the same time—until now. She just got out of her most recent relationship and now I find myself thinking about whether to try turning this friendship into more. I feel more confident about long-term compatibility with her than I've felt with almost anyone.
While it feels stupid and shallow, the one thing causing me to hesitate is that I'm fairly breast-obsessed and she's not particularly well-endowed in that department. As fetishes go, a breast fixation seems pretty common, even boring, but it seems to run pretty deep for me. I've had multiple girlfriends express surprise/appreciation for just how much I've enjoyed their breasts (as compared to past boyfriends), and most of the porn I watch is very breast-focused. I'm not obsessed with huge breasts, just something average or above—enough to play with and enough that cleavage is an option (as that seems to be a big part of the turn-on).
My question: To what extent does this matter long-term? Is this something I'll get over if I'm sufficiently invested in the person? Will I find myself missing having access to boobs? (An open relationship/etc isn't an option.) Secondly, would telling a smaller-chested partner about my breast interest be likely to make them feel bad or self-conscious? If so would that mean I'd have to somehow keep this part of myself secret from them forever? Should I try making this relationship something more substantial, or leave the friendship intact and keep dating other women?

I pretty much fell out of the closet after Trump got elected. I had a kid to raise in a small conservative town and I've always figured she was my top priority. For years now I've focused on being the calmest, safest space I could for my child and I put her needs ahead of my own. I thought there would be time for me once she was older. 
But his election made my own lack of community feel so painful that I couldn't stay locked away any longer. So I came out to a few people and then a few more and it keeps happening. And now I'm going through this massive jumble of emotions that seems scarier every single day. I've tried to be smart and proactive here. I found a good therapist (I drive pretty far away to see him but he's worth it) and I'm seeing him consistently. I talked to my doctor about all of this and attempted to see what he knew about local support (there is none). I tried a few of the online dating apps just to meet some new people but I kept getting relentlessly hit on by men instead of women and goddamn it all because I think I feel more alone now than I did when I was refusing to acknowledge I had any emotions or that I was even gay in the first place. I'm still trying there, and I'm attempting to initiate what I can when someone interests me, but it all feels like I'm in way over my head. It's so much to process all at once. 
I know exactly one other lesbian in my little town and I've tried connecting with her but she's got her own issues. I can't uproot my kid and I can't afford to up and quit my job and just move to a more open and accepting city even though I'd really love to. I have at least four years until that's an option. I don't know what to do or who to reach out to, Dan, and I feel like I'm losing my fucking mind. 
A 
 This isn't a sex related question, so if you don't run it or respond, I'll understand.  Over all the years I've been reading your column, you've become something of a trusted political commentator along the way, and I want to get your opinion. 
In the run up to the most recent presidential election, a number of celebrities made comments along the lines of, "If Trump wins, I'm moving to Canada." Lena Dunham springs to mind, and Snoop Dogg made some reference as well once it was clear that Trump had won. But as I write this the world is staring down the barrel of Trump's inauguration, and I haven't heard of anyone notable packing their bags. I guess my question boils down to: why not?
Now, full disclosure—I'm Canadian. But after eight years of watching Obama's presidency make such mild or nonexistent progress on health care, LGBTQ rights, gun control, racism, sexism, environmental protection, equality, financial security for workers, etc., only for it to lead to such a blowback as to elect Trump and threaten to roll it all back or worse; to see the government solidly in the hands of plutocrats and alt-right nazis, I just don't understand. The US seems so incurably divided, and the division is getting worse.
By no means am I saying Canada is perfect. We're threatened by most of the same issues as in the US, and have some uniquely our own. PM Trudeau isn't as left-leaning as he's often made out to be in the American press, and some distinctly Trump-style voices are rising on the right. But when it comes to social progress important measures just seem so much more secure here, or pushed further down the field. And an influx of liberal ex-pat Americans would only make them more secure in elections of the future.
Emigrating is no trivial thing, I get that. But for people with the means—I don't just mean celebrities—what keeps them from doing it? Patriotism? Our climate? (It's not that bad, I swear!) I've (half) joked that the history of Russia is the history of human misery—after the first couple of hundred years, anyone who could leave should have done so if they had to walk. As the US faces down yet another decade of fighting not to move backwards, at what point do you say enough? At what point do you choose a battlefield you can win on?

This (sadly) isn't a question about sex but since it's about genitals, I thought I'd send it to you anyway since I can't find the answer. About 2-3 times per year, I get a cold sore (on my mouth lips) and because life is cruel, these often coincide with having my period. I am vigilant about washing my hands before and after changing my tampon and I try never to touch the cold sore but I'm wondering about the possibility of inadvertently giving myself genital herpes. I have been accidentally celibate for about five years and have this horror that I'll end up with a non-sexual STI. Could life be that unfair? Or can I let this fear go? 

I am quite the follower on social media: Facebook and Twitter in particular. I make no trolling comments, no #MAGA hashtags; I just look with my male gaze. Like critic Laura Mulvey says, it's only natural.
I've lost some interest in pornography, so I use everyday pictures of women, typically selfies. It helps me to know the story behind the face and body. None of these pics are pornographic—just feel-good selfies by young women posted on social media. I don't communicate with these people because that'd be creepy. I'm not worried about whether this is abnormal. I just wondered if people would be okay with this, if people were aware of behavior like mine when they post, and if I should ask for permission to wank to selfies of these "girls next door."
(Not) 
I'm about eight years older than you and am in good shape for a man my age. Better than most my age. I have been straight for most of my life. I'm still very attracted to women very much. About nine years ago I had a sexual affair with a sweet and very sexy gay man. It was short lived because I was scared of anyone finding out. He was, sensitive, very passionate, and powerful in bed. I would wrap my legs around him while he banged me. Not having had that experience before... it was totally amazing to watch and feel. I wanted and still want more. But only with the right person.
About that time, women stopped paying attention to me and I thought that perhaps I should explore more of my gay side. I tried to get back together with that same man a few years later but because I was so flaky towards his requests he doesn't want to have anything to do with me. I can see that, but I'm still incredibly attracted to him on a physical level. He has almost a queeny way about him. You definitely know that he is gay when he walks into a room, but that's another part of him that really turns me on. That very gay accent and a bit of swishiness that turns me on very much.
So, I tried going to places like Rain City Jacks and some Meet Ups... but nobody there is attractive to me and it usually ends up being a waste of my time and money. Five years ago I met an Asian gay man who was attractive to me but he was so closed minded. When we finally got around to having sex, he stated that he never does anal sex. So it was mostly just us rubbing our bodies naked over each other until we came and I gave him a few blow jobs. But the no anal sex thing and his lack of passion started to turn me off and eventually I wasn't interested anymore.
I've dated women for a few years after that. Some of them were beautiful but they would blow me off after one or two dates but kept saying to call them... that sooner or later they would have time. What kind of bullshit is that? So, last year after dating this beautiful woman for two dates and 25 or 30 days of texting back and forth... I called it quits on dating.
I'm very open to either gender but it seems there is nobody out there for me. I don't like going to bars, waste of time and money. Meet Ups meetings are usually not any good. More waste of time and money. I've also tried online dating sites, both straight and gay... both are very flaky and a waste of time and money as well.
I've almost entirely given up on women, even though I'm way more attracted to them than 90 percent of the guys out there. Is there any way that you know of on how to meet femmy kinda guys that might want to date an older, attractive, in shape, horny guy? I only dig slim, VERY smooth guys, with a bit of a preppy look. No tats. All this passion and nobody to share it with. HELP???

Thanks, Dan. You were right. — 
 I'm a 28-year-old straight female, and I have a dilemma. I was in a relationship with a guy on and off for about five years. We met in college, dated on and off, we dated other people when we weren't together. It eventually progressed to something more serious after college and we were in a committed, monogamous relationship for about a year or two. However, things we didn't talk much about in college started becoming an issue, i.e. the fact that he wanted kids and I didn't and that I'd have to convert to his religion if we wanted to eventually marry. Needless to say, even though we had chemistry, things didn't work out, and we broke up about a year and a half ago. Now here's my dilemma: I've dated other guys since my ex, and slept with a few since then, but the sex never seems to be as good. And every time I have mediocre sex, it makes me miss my ex (although I have not tried to reach out to him). Am I doomed to have mediocre sex for the rest of my life? What can I do? 

I recently moved to the South, and on Grindr I’m noticing a lot more racist messaging in profiles, sometimes as overt as "no Blacks" and "no Asians." I’m wondering what I can (or should) do as a chat user? Is is sufficient just to block these people? Should I flag their profiles? Or should I message them and ask them to change their profile?

Kind of in a pickle. Straight white male, in a cis relationship, and I am thinking that maybe my GF is cheating on me, but I have no caught-in-the-act solid proof. We've been together for almost four years now, and after we moved in two years ago, our sex life kinda took a nosedive after some life problems we both had. But I thought we were just at a "new normal."
A couple months ago, while she was drunk, she was plainly texting a guy right in front of me while we were getting ready for bed. She passed out, and I scrolled through the texts, and it looked like they were setting up for a meet-up. The next morning I called her out on it and we had a big fight.  Went to counseling a few times, and things seemed to improve.
Lately, she's become more distant again and frequently asks why we aren't having sex as often as we used to—and I plainly bring up that she doesn't want to engage, or else she rejects my advances, and so nothing happens. A few days later, again, she left her phone unlocked and I scrolled through the messages and found more messages with the same guy. Nothing as risqué this time, but he definitely expressed his desire for her, and she said the same thing back. They might or might not be meeting up again in the near future.
A few questions. Should I allow this to come to a head and try to catch her in the act? Or should I tell her I saw her texts messages again? Either way, is the only way to go forward to break up, or is there any hope left that we can salvage this? I know that snooping is wrong, but after the rather obvious lack of hiding anything when she was drunk the first time, I've been harboring worries. 
Readers and listeners send me smart emails—and sometimes very good advice—for other readers and listeners. There are comments threads on every column posted to www.thestranger.com (and on every podcast at www.savagelovecast.com), so most of these emails are from people reading my column in other publications. Since I hate to see anything go to waste—especially good advice—I'm gonna to try posting a selection of these emails to Slog on Thursdays.
So! In response to Man Behind The Cam Girl:
As a former camgirl, my explanation of my work was often about the same (I described mine as online marketing and relationship management). But, after a few years, I went one better: I got a casual, part-time freelance gig. Because camming can be emotionally demanding work, a lot of us hit burnout eventually. Why not spend a couple hours a week writing, editing, coding or doing something else on a freelance or volunteer basis? This path doesn't just give you something to say at cocktail parties. It also helps you avoid those resume gaps that can show up after many years of adult-oriented work. And, it can lead to a new career path if you ever want to do something else. I do my old part-time gig full-time now. Cam girls are already freelancers, so they know what they need to about time management, motivation, marketing and the like. 
Still Freelancing, 
It has always been gospel to me that I would never ever ever consider breast implants. I’m just not that person. I’ve mentally rehearsed the reasons multiple times. “No way I could spend money on something so superficial when there are people in the world who can’t feed themselves. Plus, augmentation is expensive, and beauty shouldn’t only be accessible to the rich. It would be disloyal to all other small-breasted women too! I can’t desert their ranks and tilt the average size upwards. And I can’t capitulate to—and be complicit in—the ridiculous idea that possessing breasts of a certain shape and size is an integral part of being a woman.” 
Then there are the more personal reasons… 
“I’ve got heaps of smarts and other virtues, and that’s why someone should be with me. Anyone who likes me because I’m ‘hot’ is missing the point of me, so it doesn’t matter what I look like. I’ve always valued the genuine over the fake anyway, what’s natural over what’s artificial. I just want to be me, and to be loved as such. I’d never be with anyone who finds my lack of breasts a deal-breaker, so it’s a useful filter to apply. At the same time, I’m already lucky in how attractive I am. I usually get the men I want—so clearly I’m doing just fine. Without augmentation.”
But, Dan, they’re really small. They disappear when I’m underneath someone, and they’re these little droopy triangles when I’m on top. I fantasize about having the kind of boobs that are worth unveiling, that might even yield that moment of admiring speechlessness the first time I unbutton. (Or is that only in the movies?) As it is, I’m super self-conscious. I don’t feel sexy. My minuscule breasts are probably part of the reason I prefer sex drunk. What are your views on cosmetic surgery? I’ve never thought of myself as being the kind of person who would consider it. But I’m no longer sure that the authentic/fake dichotomy is as relevant to life as I’d assumed. And realistically I spend money on frivolous shit all the time. 

My partner and I are getting married on February 26th.  We are both male.  We have been living together since May and together as a couple just over two years. After the November election we made the decision to move up the wedding we had been talking about but were planning on having perhaps a year down the road. The reasons were romantic as well as practical. First, I purchase my insurance on the exchange and have pre-existing conditions. After the inevitable repeal of the Affordable Care Act it's not clear whether I will be able to get health insurance at ANY price. My lovely husband-to-be has outstanding insurance at his job and after we're married I can access his insurance benefits. Secondly, we are concerned that Trump's Supreme Court picks, with his Vice-President's urging, will undo marriage equality and perhaps take us back to a time when we will not be able to marry. Last, but not least, I am crazy in love with him and want to be married!
Now my question; My partner has a number of relatives who were vocal supporters of Donald Trump and Mike Pence. I had said as soon as we began planning our wedding that I would not have people there who worked hard to put my right to marry under threat. Now, after speaking to his mother, my fiancee is asking me to invite at least two couples who I would rather not have there. He says their support of Trump had nothing to do with our rights and was based on other factors. I don't care. It's not like Pence's positions on LGBT issues were a secret. I continue to say that I don't want people there who made decisions in the election that threaten my rights and my freedom.
Should I grit my teeth and invite them or should I dig my heels in and tell them to fuck off? The invitations need to go out in the next week or two. Help!!
Knowingly, 
Straight male fan, Dan. I'm visiting with a lover Jan 10-15th before she leaves the country for awhile. We want to have a week of amazing passionate no condom sex. It will be the week right before her period usually falls. STD risk already addressed. My question is what is the best birth control option for us in such a strictly short term scenario. We don't want to use spermicide or a diaphragm. Having a baby together is definitely not an option right now. Our idea is to use ella or Plan B or something equally effective after our fucking marathon. Do you feel this would be a sound decision? If not, what would you recommend?
Fucking Is Very Exciting, Dan, 
I am recently engaged to the love of my life, who I have been with for eight years. However... six years ago, I did something terrible. After drinking too much, I made out with a married man in his hotel room and had inappropriate phone calls with him for two months. I made horrible choices. It seems like a dream. I have rationalized it for all of this time—it was one-time physically, it wasn't "sex," and I wasn't falling in love. But after the engagement, my eyes opened to the cruel, selfish thing I did. It wasn't a one-night-stand that my fiancé might never discover. I live in fear that these phone calls will be found out.
Now it seems too late to confess without losing it all. I haven't slept in a month. I could lose everything—my family, my friends, my love. Planning a wedding seems impossible because I'm so scared it will be canceled. I wish there was a time machine that could take me back to the point where I could confess to him much sooner. Complicating this issue is the fact that I recently got in touch with the married man, who says the secret is safe. I kind of believe it. He has a lot on the line—a reputable career and two young children. But in my heart, I know even a 1% chance of this getting out is too much. 
Do I tell my fiancé that I was unfaithful to him six years ago? How do I ask for his forgiveness? Why am I a shitty human being?

My boyfriend is a fine art photographer and has always vocalized his appreciation of beautiful women and the female body. He works with many, often nude, women in an intimate setting with just the two of them in her house or ours (when I am away). While I am out of town, he is more likely to go out for dinner with a model and/or stay up late hanging out with them in our apartment. He has an incredible talent and eye for beauty and detail, and I support him because I appreciate his art and the joy it brings him! Photography is the best thing that he started in his life and I am beyond happy for him to have found it.
However, I can become emotional—jealous, apprehensive, anxious. I think this is because when we temporarily broke up, he slept with a model he worked with, and also because he doesn't photograph me like he does models. I'd fucking love to take more photos with him but he recently said he feels nervous working with people close to him. When asked about relationships and cheating he says "never say never."
He is an incredibly sexy man and I feel anxious of his constant temptation, being surrounded by sexy females in vulnerable, provocative settings. He is a fiercely sexual being and regularly talks about it.

I’ve known this person, Kathy, for about ten years and we're very good friends. We would text each other daily, hang out regularly, and all in all were pretty close. In college, she was always dating someone new but would do things like invite me over for family events like Thanksgiving, Christmas and even birthdays. It got to the point where our friends and her boyfriends thought we were dating. After college, we continued to hang out and were still fairly close, but it wasn’t until I saw her go home with another guy that I realized I had feelings for her. I asked her if she felt the same way and she said no and I accepted that things would never work out between us. 
I was understandably upset and didn’t want to put myself in the “friend-zone” and waste my time holding onto the hope that she changes her mind. I told her I needed space and cut her out of my life. That’s probably not the most mature thing to do, but I didn’t want to make myself miserable by listening to her talk about all the guys she’s fucking, having her introduce me to them as her good friend, and feeling like her fake boyfriend at family events.
At the same time, most of my guy friends all became addicted to online video games. Before you laugh, it’s gotten to a point where they’ll play from 7pm to 5am, some of them will take off work just to play World of Warcraft and my one friend even stopped applying for jobs after college and now all he does is live in his parent’s basement playing video games.
Needless to say, I did some soul searching and decided to do something that I want to do and apply to the Peace Corps to hopefully work fighting HIV in Africa. It’s something I’ve always wanted to do, and I’m at a point in my life where I can put everything on hold to go do that. However, on the application you are required to list a mentor and close friend as a reference, I chose Kathy. I put her name down because she's a good friend and all my other friends have dropped off the face of the earth and refuse to text me back or even return my calls.
Enough time has passed that I’m trying to be her friend again, but it seems like she wants to ignore the reasons why we initially stopped talking. Whenever we talk, it’s typically about the guy she’s fucking this week and how good or bad the sex is. Additionally, she’s also in a long distance open relationship with a guy from across the country and she wants me to meet him. I’m trying to be happy for her but it’s becoming more and more difficult when she’s insistent on me meeting the guys she’s with in order to get some sort of approval from me. I understand she views me as a friend, but I don’t think she wants to acknowledge that I had, and still have, feelings for her.
Fast forward to yesterday, after finding reasons to avoid meeting her long distance boyfriend over the holidays, Kathy invited me as the 5th wheel on a double date between her, her boyfriend and my roommate with his girlfriend. They’re also going to be hanging out at my apartment and it feels like she’s trying to corner me into meeting him. I’m sure Kathy's boyfriend is a good guy, but I genuinely don’t want to meet him.
I don’t really know what to do in this situation. Is it possible to still remain friends with this person if it feels like she’s not respecting my personal space or the boundaries between us, or do I have to cut her out completely? 

I identify as a poly straight cis white guy in my mid 30s fortunate enough to live in a coastal liberal bastion. I'm invoked in kinky and sex positive communities. I do my best to be an ally to the people who do not have the same privilege I have because they are queer, trans, otherwise not male, POC, etc. However, as far as attraction/arousal goes, I'm really something like a Kinsey 0.75.
Earlier this year, I began a relationship with a transwoman. I've known her for some time and I've never seen her as anything but a woman, hell I didn't even know her trans status for the first few years I knew her. I've always found her terribly attractive and she's just an all around cool person. In the past, I've had fleeting attraction for a few transwomen and I once made out with a transwoman but it's never been a specific turn on or fetish of mine. Porn featuring people with breasts and penises has never been something I've watched, been aroused by or jerked off to. My girlfriend hasn't had bottom surgery, and it was a transition for me to get used to sex when PIV is off the table but I'm quite happy. 
When I first started dating her a queer and trans friend of mine said, "I want to warn you, someday someone is going to call you a faggot. Just be ready for it." Well, I went to school somewhere in the middle of America so it's certainly not the first time that will have happened. However the idea that I'm struggling with now is this: Am I Queer? I'm not asking in that I feel burdened with the label and it is attacking my sense of identity, but more in the sense of, "If I say I'm queer am I 'invading' the space of other people?" It's not really something I'd use often, if for no other reason that to respect my girlfriend's wish to not be outed. However I am in a lot of "safe space" type situations and I do have some right to my own story. I'm worried that if I did identify as queer in one of these spaces with people who know me to be hetero (or who make the pretty accurate assumption that I'm hetero) am I taking a label that doesn't rightfully belong to me?
Am I allowed to say I'm queer?

I'm 26 years old, living in Amsterdam, busy with my career and professional sports. I have a good body and face, but I am bald. What bugs me a lot is that people (other gays) are so quick to pigeonhole me into this category of muscular leather boys who get fisted at Berghain, or, based off the things I have heard with regard to me, that I look like a fucking bouncer, and that I am definitely not 26 but 34... 
I just feel so insecure about myself, so sad that I sometimes get such comments from guys. I know we can't be everyone's type, and I know there are so many guys who like my look, but I just get so pissed off when people make such assumptions about me and my private life. And the tone and commentary I have heard a few times even makes me feel plain ugly and unworthy.
It is just the weird symbolic attribution of bald gay men with the more underground, older, techno, fetish scene that I struggle with and find hard to relate and respond to. Do I respond, or not? I am so confused. 
Boy's 
I live in a city that has an active trading community. People will post a picture of something they no longer value and what they would be looking for in return. For example, I got a sweet antique drop leaf table for a $12 bottle of wine. It's a community sharing and caring kind of place that lots of people are involved with. Last week, a self-professed sex toy tester posted that she had dildos and butt plugs only used once to test them. She professed as a sex educator she wouldn't do anything to promote the risk of STI's and that the pieces have been sterilized. She also claimed it's very common in her community to share these things. A lot of people gave her a hard time and were fairly aghast at the idea. To me, I know a lot of people won't hesitate to get down and dirty and swap a mix of bodily fluids with someone they've just met online, at a bar, restaurant wherever. Fucking a stranger like that seems to me to be riskier than fucking a piece of plastic. What do you think?

I'm a 25-year-old immigrant who recently moved to the USA. For most of my life, I've been an introvert living in a small town and my interactions with girls and women has been limited. I'm not a shy person but my environment has been predominantly filled with males, and culture has been very strict in terms of male-female interaction. I've never been in a relationship and I'm a virgin. Now that I am in the United States, I seek to establish some sort or relationship with women both personally and sexually. I feel I might have delayed interaction for too long.
What do I do? Would peers here consider me a loser of some sort for being sexually inexperienced? Is that even a thing? What is a reasonable expectation I should have from women here? Am I even asking the right questions?

I’ve been married forever (over 40 years) and am still sexually active. Our sex life has mostly consisted of oral sex—his choice. Personally, I prefer penetration, which we have for 30 seconds or less (every once in a while) but have gone along with his choice of oral sex. Needless to say, we are both VERY good at what we do after all this time. I gave more than I got as I aged—again my choice. Except I am now almost 70 and he is 72 and I am bored with giving blow jobs. He gets sulky when I try to tell him that I am tired not of sex but of giving blowjobs. Of course, at his age penetration is a little more of a challenge but not impossible. But to him it seems like more work. Well, giving blow jobs is a lot of work, too! 
He feels he gives me a good life (of course I give him a good life too) and he gives me what I want, which is telling me a story a few times a month before I fall asleep. I get it. But the idea that I am trading blow jobs for lightweight bedtime stories strikes me as low-grade prostitution.
He doesn’t fight well. Instead, he gets depressed and/or sulks and makes the whole thing a big deal. This current round of him sulking and making this a huge deal is going on for 24 hours with many more hours or maybe days to go.  Which I guess is how we got to 40+ years and not resolving this. I guess at this point I am not going to insist on intercourse nor am I once again going to have an affair (which I have done every once in a while to get a good fuck) but, jeez, do I have to keep giving blowjobs forever? 

Two quick letters to start out the week, both from European girls wanting to know if they're bi—and, hey, who better than me to ask than me? 
First, from Germany:
I argue with a lover (man, I'm a woman) about this, he says I'm bi: I love cocks, and I really love them. But I like women too, just not that intensely—I don't dream endlessly about curves & cunts like I do cocksucking (long haul flight tip right there, wow do flights go like the wind). My thing with women is skewed, I only have sex with women in the company of men/man, and my arousal is pretty power-play centered: she either dominates me (pushing my face into her pussy, riding my mouth) or I tease her & put her in humiliating positions (that I myself would be turned on by, were I in her place). What's the story? Am I over thinking it when I think I'm sexist? I identify as straightish. Because the idea of having sex with a woman alone is not-a-turn-on/terrifying. I'm pretty horny about going down on girls but not really into breasts & kissing and all the cool famously beautiful things about we women. Part of me wonders if it's some kind of deep repression that scares me away from identifying/being actually bi.
What's your take?
